1000
810,enty. 
The children of Lod, Hadid, and Ono, seven hundred twenty and five. 
The children of Jericho, three hundred forty and five. 
The children of Senaah, three thousand and six hundred and thirty. 
The priests: the children of Jedaiah, of the house of Jeshua, nine hundred seventy and three. 
The children of Immer, a thousand fifty and two. 
The children of Pashur, a thousand two hundred forty and seven. 
The children of Harim, a thousand and seventeen. 
The Levites: the children of Jeshua and Kadmiel, of the children of Hodaviah, seventy and four. 
The singers: the children of Asaph, an hundred twenty and eight. 
The children of the porters: the children of Shallum, the children of Ater, the children of Talmon, the children of Akkub, the children of Hatita, the children of Shobai, in all an hundre
1040,m not, he examined the keepers, and commanded that they should be put to death. And he went down from Judaea to Caesarea, and there abode. 
And Herod was highly displeased with them of Tyre and Sidon: but they came with one accord to him, and, having made Blastus the king's chamberlain their friend, desired peace; because their country was nourished by the king's country. 
And upon a set day Herod, arrayed in royal apparel, sat upon his throne, and made an oration unto them. 
And the people gave a shout, saying, It is the voice of a god, and not of a man. 
And immediately the angel of the Lord smote him, because he gave not God the glory: and he was eaten of worms, and gave up the ghost. 
But the word of God grew and multiplied. 
And Barnabas and Saul returned from Jerusalem, when they had fulfilled their ministry, and took with them John, whose surname was Mark. 
Now there were in the church that was at Antioch certain prophets and teachers; as Barnabas, and Simeon that was called Niger, and Lucius of Cyrene, and Manaen, wh
765, daughter of Uriel of Gibeah. And there was war between Abijah and Jeroboam. 
And Abijah set the battle in array with an army of valiant men of war, even four hundred thousand chosen men: Jeroboam also set the battle in array against him with eight hundred thousand chosen men, being mighty men of valour. 
And Abijah stood up upon mount Zemaraim, which is in mount Ephraim, and said, Hear me, thou Jeroboam, and all Israel; 
Ought ye not to know that the LORD God of Israel gave the kingdom over Israel to David for ever, even to him and to his sons by a covenant of salt? 
Yet Jeroboam the son of Nebat, the servant of Solomon the son of David, is risen up, and hath rebelled against his lord. 
And there are gathered unto him vain men, the children of Belial, an
1068,ying, Take away the filthy garments from him. And unto him he said, Behold, I have caused thine iniquity to pass from thee, and I will clothe thee with change of raiment. 
And I said, Let them set a fair mitre upon his head. So they set a fair mitre upon his head, and clothed him with garments. And the angel of the LORD stood by. 
And the angel of the LORD protested unto Joshua, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; If thou wilt walk in my ways, and if thou wilt keep my charge, then thou shalt also judge my house, and shalt also keep my courts, and I will give thee places to walk among these that stand by. 
Hear now, O Joshua the high priest, thou, and thy fellows that sit before thee: for they are men wondered at: for, behold, I will bring forth my servant the BRANCH. 
For behold the stone that I have laid before Joshua; upon one stone shall be seven eyes: behold, I will engrave the graving thereof, saith the LORD of hosts, and I will remove the iniquity of that land in one day. 
In that day, saith the LORD of hosts, shall ye call every man his neigh
827,hat ye resist not evil: but whosoever shall smite thee on thy right cheek, turn to him the other also. 
And if any man will sue thee at the law, and take away thy coat, let him have thy cloak also. 
And whosoever shall compel thee to go a mile, go with him twain. 
Give to him that asketh thee, and from him that would borrow of thee turn not thou away. 
Ye have heard that it hath been said, Thou shalt love thy neighbour, and hate thine enemy. 
But I say unto you, Love your enemies, bless them that curse you, do good to them that hate you, and pray for them which despitefully use you, and persecute you; 
That ye may be the children of your Father which is in heaven: for he maketh his sun to rise on the evil and on the good, and sendeth rain on the just and on the unjust. 
For if ye love them which love you, what rewar
930, a rebellious people, lying children, children that will not hear the law of the LORD: 
Which say to the seers, See not; and to the prophets, Prophesy not unto us right things, speak unto us smooth things, prophesy deceits: 
Get you out of the way, turn aside out of the path, cause the Holy One of Israel to cease from before us. 
Wherefore thus saith the Holy One of Israel, Because ye despise this word, and trust in oppression and perverseness, and stay thereon: 
Therefore this iniquity shall be to you as a breach ready to fall, swelling out in a high wall, whose breaking cometh suddenly at an instant. 
And he shall break it as the breaking of the potters' vessel that is broken in pieces; he shall not spare: so that there shall not be found in the bursting of it a sherd to take fire from the hearth, or to take water withal out of the pit. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD, the Holy One of Israel; In returning and rest sha
922,g. And when he had spoken unto me, I was strengthened, and said, Let my lord speak; for thou hast strengthened me. 
Then said he, Knowest thou wherefore I come unto thee? and now will I return to fight with the prince of Persia: and when I am gone forth, lo, the prince of Grecia shall come. 
But I will shew thee that which is noted in the scripture of truth: and there is none that holdeth with me in these things, but Michael your prince. 
Also I in the first year of Darius the Mede, even I, stood to confirm and to strengthen him. 
And now will I shew thee the truth. Behold, there shall stand up yet three kings in Persia; and the fourth shall be far richer than they all: and by his strength through his riches he shall stir up all against the realm of Grecia. 
And a mighty king shall stand up, that shall rule with great dominion, and do according to his will. 
And when he shall stand up, his kingdom shall be br
888, which fell down from Jupiter? 
Seeing then that these things cannot be spoken against, ye ought to be quiet, and to do nothing rashly. 
For ye have brought hither these men, which are neither robbers of churches, nor yet blasphemers of your goddess. 
Wherefore if Demetrius, and the craftsmen which are with him, have a matter against any man, the law is open, and there are deputies: let them implead one another. 
But if ye enquire any thing concerning other matters, it shall be determined in a lawful assembly. 
For we are in danger to be called in question for this day's uproar, there being no cause whereby we may give an account of this concourse. 
And when he had thus spoken, he dismissed the assembly. 
And after the uproar was ceased, Paul called unto him the disciples, and embraced them, and departed for to go into Macedonia. 
And when he had gone over those parts, and ha
725,k, thou art covered with fatness; then he forsook God which made him, and lightly esteemed the Rock of his salvation. 
They provoked him to jealousy with strange gods, with abominations provoked they him to anger. 
They sacrificed unto devils, not to God; to gods whom they knew not, to new gods that came newly up, whom your fathers feared not. 
Of the Rock that begat thee thou art unmindful, and hast forgotten God that formed thee. 
And when the LORD saw it, he abhorred them, because of the provoking of his sons, and of his daughters. 
And he said, I will hide my face from them, I will see what their end shall be: for they are a very froward generation, children in whom is no faith. 
They have moved me to jealousy w
769,oe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye devour widows' houses, and for a pretence make long prayer: therefore ye shall receive the greater damnation. 
Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye compass sea and land to make one proselyte, and when he is made, ye make him twofold more the child of hell than yourselves. 
Woe unto you, ye blind guides, which say, Whosoever shall swear by the temple, it is nothing; but whosoever shall swear by the gold of the temple, he is a debtor! 
Ye fools and blind: for whether is greater, the gold, or the temple that sanctifieth the gold? 
And, Whosoever shall swear by the altar, it is nothing; but whosoever sweareth by the gift that is upon it, he is guilty. 
Ye fools and blind: for whether is gre
935,ll surely be given into the hand of the king of Babylon's army, which shall take it. 
Therefore the princes said unto the king, We beseech thee, let this man be put to death: for thus he weakeneth the hands of the men of war that remain in this city, and the hands of all the people, in speaking such words unto them: for this man seeketh not the welfare of this people, but the hurt. 
Then Zedekiah the king said, Behold, he is in your hand: for the king is not he that can do any thing against you. 
Then took they Jeremiah, and cast him into the dungeon of Malchiah the son of Hammelech, that was in the court of the prison: and they let down Jeremiah with cords. And in the dungeon there was no water, but mire: so Jeremiah sunk in the mire. 
Now when Ebedmelech the Ethiopian, one of the eunuchs which was in the king's house, heard that they had put Jeremiah in the dungeon; the king then sitting in the gate of Benjamin; 
Ebedme
954,d that justifieth. 
Who is he that condemneth? It is Christ that died, yea rather, that is risen again, who is even at the right hand of God, who also maketh intercession for us. 
Who shall separate us from the love of Christ? shall tribulation, or distress, or persecution, or famine, or nakedness, or peril, or sword? 
As it is written, For thy sake we are killed all the day long; we are accounted as sheep for the slaughter. 
Nay, in all these things we are more than conquerors through him that loved us. 
For I am persuaded, that neither death, nor life, nor angels, nor principalities, nor powers, nor things present, nor things to come, 
Nor height, nor depth, nor any other creature, shall be able to separate us from the love of God, which is in Christ Jesus our Lord. 
I say the truth in Christ, I lie not, my conscience also bearing me witness in the Holy Ghost, 
That I have great heaviness and continual sorrow in my heart. 
For I could wis
803,to the land of your possession, which Moses the servant of the LORD gave you on the other side Jordan. 
But take diligent heed to do the commandment and the law, which Moses the servant of the LORD charged you, to love the LORD your God, and to walk in all his ways, and to keep his commandments, and to cleave unto him, and to serve him with all your heart and with all your soul. 
So Joshua blessed them, and sent them away: and they went unto their tents. 
Now to the one half of the tribe of Manasseh Moses had given possession in Bashan: but unto the other half thereof gave Joshua among their brethren on this side Jordan westward. And when Joshua sent them away also unto their tents, then he blessed them, 
And he spake unto them, saying, Return with much riches unto your tents, and with very m
861,e commandments of the LORD, and do them ; and that ye seek not after your own heart and your own eyes, after which ye use to go a whoring: 
That ye may remember, and do all my commandments, and be holy unto your God. 
I am the LORD your God, which brought you out of the land of Egypt, to be your God: I am the LORD your God. 
Now Korah, the son of Izhar, the son of Kohath, the son of Levi, and Dathan and Abiram, the sons of Eliab, and On, the son of Peleth, sons of Reuben, took men: 
And they rose up before Moses, with certain of the children of Israel, two hundred and fifty princes of the assembly, famous in the congregation, men of renown: 
And they gathered themselves together against Moses and against Aaron, and said unto them, Ye take too much upon you, seeing all the congregation are holy, every one of them, and the LORD is among them: wherefor
780,f Jair slew Lahmi the brother of Goliath the Gittite, whose spear staff was like a weaver's beam. 
And yet again there was war at Gath, where was a man of great stature, whose fingers and toes were four and twenty, six on each hand, and six on each foot and he also was the son of the giant. 
But when he defied Israel, Jonathan the son of Shimea David's brother slew him. 
These were born unto the giant in Gath; and they fell by the hand of David, and by the hand of his servants. 
And Satan stood up against Israel, and provoked David to number Israel. 
And David said to Joab and to the rulers of the people, Go, number Israel from Beersheba even to Dan; and bring the number of them to me, that I may know it. 
And Joab answered, The LORD make his people an hundred times so 
896, 
And Chesed, and Hazo, and Pildash, and Jidlaph, and Bethuel. 
And Bethuel begat Rebekah: these eight Milcah did bear to Nahor, Abraham's brother. 
And his concubine, whose name was Reumah, she bare also Tebah, and Gaham, and Thahash, and Maachah. 
And Sarah was an hundred and seven and twenty years old: these were the years of the life of Sarah. 
And Sarah died in Kirjatharba; the same is Hebron in the land of Canaan: and Abraham came to mourn for Sarah, and to weep for her. 
And Abraham stood up from before his dead, and spake unto the sons of Heth, saying, 
I am a stranger and a sojourner with you: give me a possession of a buryingplace with you, that I may bury my dead out of my sight. 
And the children of Heth answered Abraham, saying unto him, 
Hear us, my lord: thou art a mighty prince among us: in the choice of our sepulchres bury thy dead; none of us shall withhold from the
758,s, that I may go up and down upon the mountains, and bewail my virginity, I and my fellows. 
And he said, Go. And he sent her away for two months: and she went with her companions, and bewailed her virginity upon the mountains. 
And it came to pass at the end of two months, that she returned unto her father, who did with her according to his vow which he had vowed: and she knew no man. And it was a custom in Israel, 
That the daughters of Israel went yearly to lament the daughter of Jephthah the Gileadite four days in a year. 
And the men of Ephraim gathered themselves together, and went northward, and said unto Jephthah, Wherefore passedst thou over to fight against the children of Ammon, and didst not call us to go with thee? we will burn thine h
1007,d, and sounded with trumpets, also the singers with instruments of musick, and such as taught to sing praise. Then Athaliah rent her clothes, and said, Treason, Treason. 
Then Jehoiada the priest brought out the captains of hundreds that were set over the host, and said unto them, Have her forth of the ranges: and whoso followeth her, let him be slain with the sword. For the priest said, Slay her not in the house of the LORD. 
So they laid hands on her; and when she was come to the entering of the horse gate by the king's house, they slew her there. 
And Jehoiada made a covenant between him, and between all the people, and between the king, that they should be the LORD's people. 
Then all the people went to the house of Baal, and brake it down, and brake his altars and his images in pieces, and slew Mattan the priest of Baal before the altars. 
Also Jehoiada appointed the offices of the house of the LORD by the hand of the priests the Levites, whom David had distributed in the house of the LO
991,ermined, in the midst of all the land. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD of hosts, O my people that dwellest in Zion, be not afraid of the Assyrian: he shall smite thee with a rod, and shall lift up his staff against thee, after the manner of Egypt. 
For yet a very little while, and the indignation shall cease, and mine anger in their destruction. 
And the LORD of hosts shall stir up a scourge for him according to the slaughter of Midian at the rock of Oreb: and as his rod was upon the sea, so shall he lift it up after the manner of Egypt. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that his burden shall be taken away from off thy shoulder, and his yoke from off thy neck, and the yoke shall be destroyed because of the anointing. 
He is come to Aiath, he is passed to Migron; at Michmash he hath laid up his carriages: 
They are gone over the passage: they have taken up their lodging at Geba; Ramah is afraid; Gibeah of Saul is fled. 
Lift up thy voice, O daughter of Gallim: cause it
821, 
So that the fishes of the sea, and the fowls of the heaven, and the beasts of the field, and all creeping things that creep upon the earth, and all the men that are upon the face of the earth, shall shake at my presence, and the mountains shall be thrown down, and the steep places shall fall, and every wall shall fall to the ground. 
And I will call for a sword against him throughout all my mountains, saith the Lord GOD: every man's sword shall be against his brother. 
And I will plead against him with pestilence and with blood; and I will rain upon him, and upon his bands, and upon the many people that are with him, an overflowing rain, and great hailstones, fire, and brimstone. 
Thus will I magnify myself, and sanctify myself; and I will be known in the eyes of many nations, and they shall know that I am t
998,were accomplished for the circumcising of the child, his name was called JESUS, which was so named of the angel before he was conceived in the womb. 
And when the days of her purification according to the law of Moses were accomplished, they brought him to Jerusalem, to present him to the Lord; 
(As it is written in the law of the LORD, Every male that openeth the womb shall be called holy to the Lord;) 
And to offer a sacrifice according to that which is said in the law of the Lord, A pair of turtledoves, or two young pigeons. 
And, behold, there was a man in Jerusalem, whose name was Simeon; and the same man was just and devout, waiting for the consolation of Israel: and the Holy Ghost was upon him. 
And it was revealed unto him by the Holy Ghost, that he should not see death, before he had seen the Lord's Christ. 
And he came by the Spirit into the temple: and when the parents brought in the child Jesus, to do for him after the custom of the law, 
Then took he him up in his arms, 
1035,m, even to him and to his seed throughout their generations. 
Moreover the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Take thou also unto thee principal spices, of pure myrrh five hundred shekels, and of sweet cinnamon half so much, even two hundred and fifty shekels, and of sweet calamus two hundred and fifty shekels, 
And of cassia five hundred shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary, and of oil olive an hin: 
And thou shalt make it an oil of holy ointment, an ointment compound after the art of the apothecary: it shall be an holy anointing oil. 
And thou shalt anoint the tabernacle of the congregation therewith, and the ark of the testimony, 
And the table and all his vessels, and the candlestick and his vessels, and the altar of incense, 
And the altar of burnt offering with all his vessels, and the laver and his foot. 
And thou shalt sanctify them, that they may be most holy: whatsoever toucheth them shall be holy. 
And thou shalt anoint Aaron and his sons, and consecrate them, that they may minister unto me in the priest's
816,Israel. 
And they came unto the children of Reuben, and to the children of Gad, and to the half tribe of Manasseh, unto the land of Gilead, and they spake with them, saying, 
Thus saith the whole congregation of the LORD, What trespass is this that ye have committed against the God of Israel, to turn away this day from following the LORD, in that ye have builded you an altar, that ye might rebel this day against the LORD? 
Is the iniquity of Peor too little for us, from which we are not cleansed until this day, although there was a plague in the congregation of the LORD, 
But that ye must turn away this day from following the LORD? and it will be, seeing ye rebel to day against the LORD, that to morrow he will be wroth with the whole congregation of Israel. 
Notwithstanding, if the land of your possession
965,re they that carried us away captive required of us a song; and they that wasted us required of us mirth, saying, Sing us one of the songs of Zion. 
How shall we sing the LORD's song in a strange land? 
If I forget thee, O Jerusalem, let my right hand forget her cunning. 
If I do not remember thee, let my tongue cleave to the roof of my mouth; if I prefer not Jerusalem above my chief joy. 
Remember, O LORD, the children of Edom in the day of Jerusalem; who said, Rase it, rase it, even to the foundation thereof. 
O daughter of Babylon, who art to be destroyed; happy shall he be, that rewardeth thee as thou hast served us. 
Happy shall he be, that taketh and dasheth thy little ones against the stones. 
I will praise thee with my whole heart: before the gods will I sing praise unto thee. 
I will worship toward thy holy temple, and praise thy name for thy lovingkindness and for thy truth: for thou hast magnified thy word above all thy name. 
In the day wh
735,: 
And they shall wander from sea to sea, and from the north even to the east, they shall run to and fro to seek the word of the LORD, and shall not find it. 
In that day shall the fair virgins and young men faint for thirst. 
They that swear by the sin of Samaria, and say, Thy god, O Dan, liveth; and, The manner of Beersheba liveth; even they shall fall, and never rise up again. 
I saw the LORD standing upon the altar: and he said, Smite the lintel of the door, that the posts may shake: and cut them in the head, all of them; and I will slay the last of them with the sword: he that fleeth of them shall not flee away, and he that escapeth of them shall not be delivered. 
Though they dig into hell, thence shall mine hand take t
808,uttereth his voice, there is a multitude of waters in the heavens, and he causeth the vapours to ascend from the ends of the earth; he maketh lightnings with rain, and bringeth forth the wind out of his treasures. 
Every man is brutish in his knowledge: every founder is confounded by the graven image: for his molten image is falsehood, and there is no breath in them. 
They are vanity, and the work of errors: in the time of their visitation they shall perish. 
The portion of Jacob is not like them: for he is the former of all things; and Israel is the rod of his inheritance: The LORD of hosts is his name. 
Gather up thy wares out of the land, O inhabitant of the fortress. 
For thus saith the LORD, Behold, I will sling out the inhabitants of the land at this once, and will distress them, that they m
811,he earth: so that if a man can number the dust of the earth, then shall thy seed also be numbered. 
Arise, walk through the land in the length of it and in the breadth of it; for I will give it unto thee. 
Then Abram removed his tent, and came and dwelt in the plain of Mamre, which is in Hebron, and built there an altar unto the LORD. 
And it came to pass in the days of Amraphel king of Shinar, Arioch king of Ellasar, Chedorlaomer king of Elam, and Tidal king of nations; 
That these made war with Bera king of Sodom, and with Birsha king of Gomorrah, Shinab king of Admah, and Shemeber king of Zeboiim, and the king of Bela, which is Zoar. 
All these were joined together in the vale of Siddim, which is the salt sea. 
Twelve years they served Chedorlaomer, and in the thirteenth year they rebelled. 
And i
981,lesh, as God had commanded him: and the LORD shut him in. 
And the flood was forty days upon the earth; and the waters increased, and bare up the ark, and it was lift up above the earth. 
And the waters prevailed, and were increased greatly upon the earth; and the ark went upon the face of the waters. 
And the waters prevailed exceedingly upon the earth; and all the high hills, that were under the whole heaven, were covered. 
Fifteen cubits upward did the waters prevail; and the mountains were covered. 
And all flesh died that moved upon the earth, both of fowl, and of cattle, and of beast, and of every creeping thing that creepeth upon the earth, and every man: 
All in whose nostrils was the breath of life, of all that was in the dry land, died. 
And every living substance was destroyed which was upon the face of the ground, both man, and cattle, and the creeping things, and the fowl of the heaven; and they were destroyed from the earth: and Noah only remained alive
915,his brethren, James, and Joses, and Simon, and Judas? 
And his sisters, are they not all with us? Whence then hath this man all these things? 
And they were offended in him. But Jesus said unto them, A prophet is not without honour, save in his own country, and in his own house. 
And he did not many mighty works there because of their unbelief. 
At that time Herod the tetrarch heard of the fame of Jesus, 
And said unto his servants, This is John the Baptist; he is risen from the dead; and therefore mighty works do shew forth themselves in him. 
For Herod had laid hold on John, and bound him, and put him in prison for Herodias' sake, his brother Philip's wife. 
For John said unto him, It is not lawful for thee to have her. 
And when he would have put him to death, he feared the multitude, because they counted him as a prophet. 
But when Herod's birthday was kept, the daughter of Herodias danced before t
1029,reth for ever, when David praised by their ministry; and the priests sounded trumpets before them, and all Israel stood. 
Moreover Solomon hallowed the middle of the court that was before the house of the LORD: for there he offered burnt offerings, and the fat of the peace offerings, because the brasen altar which Solomon had made was not able to receive the burnt offerings, and the meat offerings, and the fat. 
Also at the same time Solomon kept the feast seven days, and all Israel with him, a very great congregation, from the entering in of Hamath unto the river of Egypt. 
And in the eighth day they made a solemn assembly: for they kept the dedication of the altar seven days, and the feast seven days. 
And on the three and twentieth day of the seventh month he sent the people away into their tents, glad and merry in heart for the goodness that the LORD had shewed unto David, and to Solomon, and to Israel his people. 
Thus Solomon finished the house of the LORD, and the king's house: and all that came into Solomo
855,, and gave to her that she had reserved after she was sufficed. 
And her mother in law said unto her, Where hast thou gleaned to day? and where wroughtest thou? blessed be he that did take knowledge of thee. And she shewed her mother in law with whom she had wrought, and said, The man's name with whom I wrought to day is Boaz. 
And Naomi said unto her daughter in law, Blessed be he of the LORD, who hath not left off his kindness to the living and to the dead. And Naomi said unto her, The man is near of kin unto us, one of our next kinsmen. 
And Ruth the Moabitess said, He said unto me also, Thou shalt keep fast by my young men, until they have ended all my harvest. 
And Naomi said unto Ruth her daughter in law, It is good, my daughter, that thou go out with his maidens, that they meet thee not in any other field. 
So she kept fast by the maide
1067,y shall say, Blessed are the barren, and the wombs that never bare, and the paps which never gave suck. 
Then shall they begin to say to the mountains, Fall on us; and to the hills, Cover us. 
For if they do these things in a green tree, what shall be done in the dry? 
And there were also two other, malefactors, led with him to be put to death. 
And when they were come to the place, which is called Calvary, there they crucified him, and the malefactors, one on the right hand, and the other on the left. 
Then said Jesus, Father, forgive them; for they know not what they do. And they parted his raiment, and cast lots. 
And the people stood beholding. And the rulers also with them derided him, saying, He saved others; let him save himself, if he be Christ, the chosen of God. 
And the soldiers also mocked him, coming to him, and offering him vinegar, 
And saying, If thou be the king of the Jews, save thyself. 
And a superscription also was written over him in letters of Greek, and Latin, and Hebrew, THIS IS THE KING OF THE JEWS. 
And one of the malefactor
979,sses; they see not, nor know; that they may be ashamed. 
Who hath formed a god, or molten a graven image that is profitable for nothing? 
Behold, all his fellows shall be ashamed: and the workmen, they are of men: let them all be gathered together, let them stand up; yet they shall fear, and they shall be ashamed together. 
The smith with the tongs both worketh in the coals, and fashioneth it with hammers, and worketh it with the strength of his arms: yea, he is hungry, and his strength faileth: he drinketh no water, and is faint. 
The carpenter stretcheth out his rule; he marketh it out with a line; he fitteth it with planes, and he marketh it out with the compass, and maketh it after the figure of a man, according to the beauty of a man; that it may remain in the house. 
He heweth him down cedars, and taketh the cypress and the oak, which he strengtheneth for himself among the trees of the forest: he planteth an ash, and the rain doth nourish it. 
Then shall it b
856,hine eyes. 
But oh that God would speak, and open his lips against thee; 
And that he would shew thee the secrets of wisdom, that they are double to that which is! Know therefore that God exacteth of thee less than thine iniquity deserveth. 
Canst thou by searching find out God? canst thou find out the Almighty unto perfection? 
It is as high as heaven; what canst thou do? deeper than hell; what canst thou know? 
The measure thereof is longer than the earth, and broader than the sea. 
If he cut off, and shut up, or gather together, then who can hinder him? 
For he knoweth vain men: he seeth wickedness also; will he not then consider it? 
For vain men would be wise, though man be born like a wild ass's colt. 
If thou prepare thine heart, and stretch out thine hands toward him; 
If iniquity be in thine hand, put it far away, and let not wickednes
847,laboured with me in the gospel, with Clement also, and with other my fellowlabourers, whose names are in the book of life. 
Rejoice in the Lord alway: and again I say, Rejoice. 
Let your moderation be known unto all men. The Lord is at hand. 
Be careful for nothing; but in every thing by prayer and supplication with thanksgiving let your requests be made known unto God. 
And the peace of God, which passeth all understanding, shall keep your hearts and minds through Christ Jesus. 
Finally, brethren, whatsoever things are true, whatsoever things are honest, whatsoever things are just, whatsoever things are pure, whatsoever things are lovely, whatsoever things are of good report; if there be any virtue, and if there be any praise, think on these things. 
Those things, which ye have both learned, and received, and heard, and seen in me, do
848,e thy servants for ever. 
But he forsook the counsel of the old men, which they had given him, and consulted with the young men that were grown up with him, and which stood before him: 
And he said unto them, What counsel give ye that we may answer this people, who have spoken to me, saying, Make the yoke which thy father did put upon us lighter? 
And the young men that were grown up with him spake unto him, saying, Thus shalt thou speak unto this people that spake unto thee, saying, Thy father made our yoke heavy, but make thou it lighter unto us; thus shalt thou say unto them, My little finger shall be thicker than my father's loins. 
And now whereas my father did lade you with a heavy yoke, I will add to your yoke: my father hath chastised you with whips, but I will chastise you with scorpions. 
So Jeroboam and all the people came to
908,y, whithersoever thou shalt send them, and shall pray unto the LORD toward the city which thou hast chosen, and toward the house that I have built for thy name: 
Then hear thou in heaven their prayer and their supplication, and maintain their cause. 
If they sin against thee, (for there is no man that sinneth not,) and thou be angry with them, and deliver them to the enemy, so that they carry them away captives unto the land of the enemy, far or near; 
Yet if they shall bethink themselves in the land whither they were carried captives, and repent, and make supplication unto thee in the land of them that carried them captives, saying, We have sinned, and have done perversely, we have committed wickedness; 
And so return unto thee with all their heart, and with all their soul, in the land of their enemies, which led them away captive, and pray unto thee toward their land, which thou gavest unto th
764,trong, whom ye see and know: yea, the faith which is by him hath given him this perfect soundness in the presence of you all. 
And now, brethren, I wot that through ignorance ye did it, as did also your rulers. 
But those things, which God before had shewed by the mouth of all his prophets, that Christ should suffer, he hath so fulfilled. 
Repent ye therefore, and be converted, that your sins may be blotted out, when the times of refreshing shall come from the presence of the Lord. 
And he shall send Jesus Christ, which before was preached unto you: 
Whom the heaven must receive until the times of restitution of all things, which God hath spoken by the mouth of all his holy prophets since the world began. 
For Moses truly said unto the fathers, A prophet
864,ge: now therefore I will restore it unto thee. 
Yet he restored the money unto his mother; and his mother took two hundred shekels of silver, and gave them to the founder, who made thereof a graven image and a molten image: and they were in the house of Micah. 
And the man Micah had an house of gods, and made an ephod, and teraphim, and consecrated one of his sons, who became his priest. 
In those days there was no king in Israel, but every man did that which was right in his own eyes. 
And there was a young man out of Bethlehemjudah of the family of Judah, who was a Levite, and he sojourned there. 
And the man departed out of the city from Bethlehemjudah to sojourn where he could find a place: and he came to mount Ephraim to the house of Micah, as he journeyed. 
And Micah said unto him, Whence comest thou? And he said unto him, I am a Levite of Bethle
986,; and I will plant them, and not pluck them up. 
And I will give them an heart to know me, that I am the LORD: and they shall be my people, and I will be their God: for they shall return unto me with their whole heart. 
And as the evil figs, which cannot be eaten, they are so evil; surely thus saith the LORD, So will I give Zedekiah the king of Judah, and his princes, and the residue of Jerusalem, that remain in this land, and them that dwell in the land of Egypt: 
And I will deliver them to be removed into all the kingdoms of the earth for their hurt, to be a reproach and a proverb, a taunt and a curse, in all places whither I shall drive them. 
And I will send the sword, the famine, and the pestilence, among them, till they be consumed from off the land that I gave unto them and to their fathers. 
The word that came to Jeremiah concerning all the people of Judah in the fourth year of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah king of Judah, that was the first year of Nebuchadrezzar ki
824,aying, Shall I go up into any of the cities of Judah? And the LORD said unto him, Go up. And David said, Whither shall I go up? And he said, Unto Hebron. 
So David went up thither, and his two wives also, Ahinoam the Jezreelitess, and Abigail Nabal's wife the Carmelite. 
And his men that were with him did David bring up, every man with his household: and they dwelt in the cities of Hebron. 
And the men of Judah came, and there they anointed David king over the house of Judah. And they told David, saying, That the men of Jabeshgilead were they that buried Saul. 
And David sent messengers unto the men of Jabeshgilead, and said unto them, Blessed be ye of the LORD, that ye have shewed this kindness unto your lord, even unto Saul, and have buried him. 
And now the LORD shew kindness and truth unto you: and I also wil
990,bring you out from the people, and gather you out of the countries wherein ye have been scattered; and I will be sanctified in you before the heathen. 
And ye shall know that I am the LORD, when I shall bring you into the land of Israel, into the country for the which I lifted up mine hand to give it to your fathers. 
And there shall ye remember your ways, and all your doings, wherein ye have been defiled; and ye shall lothe yourselves in your own sight for all your evils that ye have committed. 
And ye shall know that I am the LORD when I have wrought with you for my name's sake, not according to your wicked ways, nor according to your corrupt doings, O ye house of Israel, saith the Lord GOD. 
Moreover the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, set thy face toward the south, and drop thy word toward the south, and prophesy against the forest of the south field; 
And say to the forest of the south, Hear the word of the LORD; Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I wil
975,he nations with the kings of the Medes, the captains thereof, and all the rulers thereof, and all the land of his dominion. 
And the land shall tremble and sorrow: for every purpose of the LORD shall be performed against Babylon, to make the land of Babylon a desolation without an inhabitant. 
The mighty men of Babylon have forborn to fight, they have remained in their holds: their might hath failed; they became as women: they have burned her dwellingplaces; her bars are broken. 
One post shall run to meet another, and one messenger to meet another, to shew the king of Babylon that his city is taken at one end, 
And that the passages are stopped, and the reeds they have burned with fire, and the men of war are affrighted. 
For thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; The daughter of Babylon is like a threshingfloor, it is time to thresh her: yet a little while, and the time of her harvest shall come. 
Nebuchadrezzar the king of Babylon hath devoured me,
1030,s of the Reubenites: and they that were numbered of them were forty and three thousand and seven hundred and thirty. 
And the sons of Pallu; Eliab. 
And the sons of Eliab; Nemuel, and Dathan, and Abiram. This is that Dathan and Abiram, which were famous in the congregation, who strove against Moses and against Aaron in the company of Korah, when they strove against the LORD: 
And the earth opened her mouth, and swallowed them up together with Korah, when that company died, what time the fire devoured two hundred and fifty men: and they became a sign. 
Notwithstanding the children of Korah died not. 
The sons of Simeon after their families: of Nemuel, the family of the Nemuelites: of Jamin, the family of the Jaminites: of Jachin, the family of the Jachinites: 
Of Zerah, the family of the Zarhites: of Shaul, the family of the Shaulites. 
These are the families of the Simeonites, twenty and two thousand and two hundred. 
The children of Gad after their families: of Zephon, the family of the Zephonites: of Haggi, the f
753, ran through the midst of the land, saying, Why should the kings of Assyria come, and find much water? 
Also he strengthened himself, and built up all the wall that was broken, and raised it up to the towers, and another wall without, and repaired Millo in the city of David, and made darts and shields in abundance. 
And he set captains of war over the people, and gathered them together to him in the street of the gate of the city, and spake comfortably to them, saying, 
Be strong and courageous, be not afraid nor dismayed for the king of Assyria, nor for all the multitude that is with him: for there be more with us than with him: 
With him is an arm of flesh; but with us is the LORD our God to help us, and to fight our battles. And the people 
1065,ands, therefore thou shalt surely rejoice. 
Three times in a year shall all thy males appear before the LORD thy God in the place which he shall choose; in the feast of unleavened bread, and in the feast of weeks, and in the feast of tabernacles: and they shall not appear before the LORD empty: 
Every man shall give as he is able, according to the blessing of the LORD thy God which he hath given thee. 
Judges and officers shalt thou make thee in all thy gates, which the LORD thy God giveth thee, throughout thy tribes: and they shall judge the people with just judgment. 
Thou shalt not wrest judgment; thou shalt not respect persons, neither take a gift: for a gift doth blind the eyes of the wise, and pervert the words of the righteous. 
That which is altogether just shalt thou follow, that thou mayest live, and inherit the land which the LORD thy God giveth thee. 
Thou shalt not plant thee a grove of any trees near unto the altar of the LORD thy God, which thou shalt make thee. 
Neither shalt thou set thee up any image; which the LORD thy God hateth.
741, not found for the damsel: 
Then they shall bring out the damsel to the door of her father's house, and the men of her city shall stone her with stones that she die: because she hath wrought folly in Israel, to play the whore in her father's house: so shalt thou put evil away from among you. 
If a man be found lying with a woman married to an husband, then they shall both of them die, both the man that lay with the woman, and the woman: so shalt thou put away evil from Israel. 
If a damsel that is a virgin be betrothed unto an husband, and a man find her in the city, and lie with her; 
Then ye shall bring them both out unto the gate of that city, and ye shall stone them with stones that they die; the damsel, because she cried not, 
1001,pon mine affliction and my pain; and forgive all my sins. 
Consider mine enemies; for they are many; and they hate me with cruel hatred. 
O keep my soul, and deliver me: let me not be ashamed; for I put my trust in thee. 
Let integrity and uprightness preserve me; for I wait on thee. 
Redeem Israel, O God, out of all his troubles. 
Judge me, O LORD; for I have walked in mine integrity: I have trusted also in the LORD; therefore I shall not slide. 
Examine me, O LORD, and prove me; try my reins and my heart. 
For thy lovingkindness is before mine eyes: and I have walked in thy truth. 
I have not sat with vain persons, neither will I go in with dissemblers. 
I have hated the congregation of evil doers; and will not sit with the wicked. 
I will wash mine hands in innocency: so will I compass thine altar, O LORD: 
That I may publish with the voice of thanksgiving, and tell of all thy wondrous works. 
LORD, I have loved the habitation of thy house, and the place where thine honour dwelleth. 
844,struction, and be wise, and refuse it not. 
Blessed is the man that heareth me, watching daily at my gates, waiting at the posts of my doors. 
For whoso findeth me findeth life, and shall obtain favour of the LORD. 
But he that sinneth against me wrongeth his own soul: all they that hate me love death. 
Wisdom hath builded her house, she hath hewn out her seven pillars: 
She hath killed her beasts; she hath mingled her wine; she hath also furnished her table. 
She hath sent forth her maidens: she crieth upon the highest places of the city, 
Whoso is simple, let him turn in hither: as for him that wanteth understanding, she saith to him, 
Come, eat of my bread, and drink of the wine which I have mingled. 
Forsake the foolish, and live; and go in the way of understanding. 
He that reproveth a scorner getteth to himself shame: and he t
1051, nothing to do with that just man: for I have suffered many things this day in a dream because of him. 
But the chief priests and elders persuaded the multitude that they should ask Barabbas, and destroy Jesus. 
The governor answered and said unto them, Whether of the twain will ye that I release unto you? They said, Barabbas. 
Pilate saith unto them, What shall I do then with Jesus which is called Christ? They all say unto him, Let him be crucified. 
And the governor said, Why, what evil hath he done? But they cried out the more, saying, Let him be crucified. 
When Pilate saw that he could prevail nothing, but that rather a tumult was made, he took water, and washed his hands before the multitude, saying, I am innocent of the blood of this just person: see ye to it. 
Then answered all the people, and said, His blood be on us, and on our children. 
Then released he Barabbas unto them: and when he had scourged Jesus, he delivered him to be crucified. 
Then the soldiers of the governor took Jesus into the common hall, and gathered unto h
953,re slaughter; it is furbished that it may glitter: should we then make mirth? it contemneth the rod of my son, as every tree. 
And he hath given it to be furbished, that it may be handled: this sword is sharpened, and it is furbished, to give it into the hand of the slayer. 
Cry and howl, son of man: for it shall be upon my people, it shall be upon all the princes of Israel: terrors by reason of the sword shall be upon my people: smite therefore upon thy thigh. 
Because it is a trial, and what if the sword contemn even the rod? it shall be no more, saith the Lord GOD. 
Thou therefore, son of man, prophesy, and smite thine hands together. and let the sword be doubled the third time, the sword of the slain: it is the sword of the great men that are slain, which entereth into their privy chambers. 
I have set the point of the sword against all their gates, that their heart may faint, and their ruins be multiplied: ah! it is made bright, it is
895,hor him: 
But to them that rebuke him shall be delight, and a good blessing shall come upon them. 
Every man shall kiss his lips that giveth a right answer. 
Prepare thy work without, and make it fit for thyself in the field; and afterwards build thine house. 
Be not a witness against thy neighbour without cause; and deceive not with thy lips. 
Say not, I will do so to him as he hath done to me: I will render to the man according to his work. 
I went by the field of the slothful, and by the vineyard of the man void of understanding; 
And, lo, it was all grown over with thorns, and nettles had covered the face thereof, and the stone wall thereof was broken down. 
Then I saw, and considered it well: I looked upon it, and received instruction. 
Yet a little sleep, a little slumber, a little folding of the hands to sleep: 
So shall thy poverty come as one that travelleth; and thy want a
780,hosoever eateth it shall be cut off. 
And every soul that eateth that which died of itself, or that which was torn with beasts, whether it be one of your own country, or a stranger, he shall both wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even: then shall he be clean. 
But if he wash them not, nor bathe his flesh; then he shall bear his iniquity. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and say unto them, I am the LORD your God. 
After the doings of the land of Egypt, wherein ye dwelt, shall ye not do: and after the doings of the land of Canaan, whither I bring you, shall ye not do: neither shall ye walk in their ordinances. 
Ye shall do my judgments, and keep mine ordinances, to walk therein: I am the LORD 
945, the Jews round about him, and said unto him, How long dost thou make us to doubt? If thou be the Christ, tell us plainly. 
Jesus answered them, I told you, and ye believed not: the works that I do in my Father's name, they bear witness of me. 
But ye believe not, because ye are not of my sheep, as I said unto you. 
My sheep hear my voice, and I know them, and they follow me: 
And I give unto them eternal life; and they shall never perish, neither shall any man pluck them out of my hand. 
My Father, which gave them me, is greater than all; and no man is able to pluck them out of my Father's hand. 
I and my Father are one. 
Then the Jews took up stones again to stone him. 
Jesus answered them, Many good works have I shewed you from my Father; for which of those works do ye stone me? 
The Jews answered him, saying, For a good work we stone thee not; but for blasphemy; and because that thou, being a man, makest thyself God. 
Jesus ans
749,the king's son, and Azrikam the governor of the house, and Elkanah that was next to the king. 
And the children of Israel carried away captive of their brethren two hundred thousand, women, sons, and daughters, and took also away much spoil from them, and brought the spoil to Samaria. 
But a prophet of the LORD was there, whose name was Oded: and he went out before the host that came to Samaria, and said unto them, Behold, because the LORD God of your fathers was wroth with Judah, he hath delivered them into your hand, and ye have slain them in a rage that reacheth up unto heaven. 
And now ye purpose to keep under the children of Judah and Jerusalem for bondmen and bondwomen unto you: but are there not with you, even with you, sins against
964,ey found Saul and his sons fallen in mount Gilboa. 
And when they had stripped him, they took his head, and his armour, and sent into the land of the Philistines round about, to carry tidings unto their idols, and to the people. 
And they put his armour in the house of their gods, and fastened his head in the temple of Dagon. 
And when all Jabeshgilead heard all that the Philistines had done to Saul, 
They arose, all the valiant men, and took away the body of Saul, and the bodies of his sons, and brought them to Jabesh, and buried their bones under the oak in Jabesh, and fasted seven days. 
So Saul died for his transgression which he committed against the LORD, even against the word of the LORD, which he kept not, and also for asking counsel of one that had a familiar spirit, to enquire of it; 
And enquired not of the LORD: therefore he slew him, and turned the kingdom unto David the son of Jesse. 
Then all Israel gathered themselves to David unto He
843,ide me; I shall not sit as a widow, neither shall I know the loss of children: 
But these two things shall come to thee in a moment in one day, the loss of children, and widowhood: they shall come upon thee in their perfection for the multitude of thy sorceries, and for the great abundance of thine enchantments. 
For thou hast trusted in thy wickedness: thou hast said, None seeth me. Thy wisdom and thy knowledge, it hath perverted thee; and thou hast said in thine heart, I am, and none else beside me. 
Therefore shall evil come upon thee; thou shalt not know from whence it riseth: and mischief shall fall upon thee; thou shalt not be able to put it off: and desolation shall come upon thee suddenly, which thou shalt not know. 
Stand now with thine enchantments, and with the multitude of thy sorceries, wherein thou hast laboured from 
988, we will hang them up unto the LORD in Gibeah of Saul, whom the LORD did choose. And the king said, I will give them. 
But the king spared Mephibosheth, the son of Jonathan the son of Saul, because of the LORD's oath that was between them, between David and Jonathan the son of Saul. 
But the king took the two sons of Rizpah the daughter of Aiah, whom she bare unto Saul, Armoni and Mephibosheth; and the five sons of Michal the daughter of Saul, whom she brought up for Adriel the son of Barzillai the Meholathite: 
And he delivered them into the hands of the Gibeonites, and they hanged them in the hill before the LORD: and they fell all seven together, and were put to death in the days of harvest, in the first days, in the beginning of barley harvest. 
And Rizpah the daughter of Aiah took sackcloth, and spread it for her upon the rock, from the beginning of harvest until water dropped upon them out of heaven, and suffered neither the birds of the air to rest on them by day, no
865,so arose afterward, and went out of the cave, and cried after Saul, saying, My lord the king. And when Saul looked behind him, David stooped with his face to the earth, and bowed himself. 
And David said to Saul, Wherefore hearest thou men's words, saying, Behold, David seeketh thy hurt? 
Behold, this day thine eyes have seen how that the LORD had delivered thee to day into mine hand in the cave: and some bade me kill thee: but mine eye spared thee; and I said, I will not put forth mine hand against my lord; for he is the LORD's anointed. 
Moreover, my father, see, yea, see the skirt of thy robe in my hand: for in that I cut off the skirt of thy robe, and killed thee not, know thou and see that there is neither evil nor transgression in mine hand, and I have not sinned against thee; yet thou huntest my soul to take it. 
The LORD judge between me and the
826,rethren and all the house of his father came down, and took him, and brought him up, and buried him between Zorah and Eshtaol in the buryingplace of Manoah his father. And he judged Israel twenty years. 
And there was a man of mount Ephraim, whose name was Micah. 
And he said unto his mother, The eleven hundred shekels of silver that were taken from thee, about which thou cursedst, and spakest of also in mine ears, behold, the silver is with me; I took it. And his mother said, Blessed be thou of the LORD, my son. 
And when he had restored the eleven hundred shekels of silver to his mother, his mother said, I had wholly dedicated the silver unto the LORD from my hand for my son, to make a graven image and a molten image: now therefore I will restore it unto thee. 
Yet he restored the money unto his mother; and his m
835,to come near by their families, the family of Matri was taken, and Saul the son of Kish was taken: and when they sought him, he could not be found. 
Therefore they enquired of the LORD further, if the man should yet come thither. And the LORD answered, Behold he hath hid himself among the stuff. 
And they ran and fetched him thence: and when he stood among the people, he was higher than any of the people from his shoulders and upward. 
And Samuel said to all the people, See ye him whom the LORD hath chosen, that there is none like him among all the people? And all the people shouted, and said, God save the king. 
Then Samuel told the people the manner of the kingdom, and wrote it in a book, and laid it up before the LORD. And Samuel sent all the people away, every man to his house. 
And Saul also went home to Gibeah; and th
1066, 
So Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard took them, and brought them to the king of Babylon to Riblah. 
And the king of Babylon smote them, and put them to death in Riblah in the land of Hamath. Thus Judah was carried away captive out of his own land. 
This is the people whom Nebuchadrezzar carried away captive: in the seventh year three thousand Jews and three and twenty: 
In the eighteenth year of Nebuchadrezzar he carried away captive from Jerusalem eight hundred thirty and two persons: 
In the three and twentieth year of Nebuchadrezzar Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard carried away captive of the Jews seven hundred forty and five persons: all the persons were four thousand and six hundred. 
And it came to pass in the seven and thirtieth year of the captivity of Jehoiachin king of Judah, in the twelfth month, in the five and twentieth day of the month, that Evilmerodach king of Babylon in the first year of his reign lifted up the head of Jehoiachin king of Judah, and brought him forth out of prison. 
And spake kindly unto him, and set his thro
962,r. 
Thus saith the LORD; For three transgressions of Damascus, and for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because they have threshed Gilead with threshing instruments of iron: 
But I will send a fire into the house of Hazael, which shall devour the palaces of Benhadad. 
I will break also the bar of Damascus, and cut off the inhabitant from the plain of Aven, and him that holdeth the sceptre from the house of Eden: and the people of Syria shall go into captivity unto Kir, saith the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD; For three transgressions of Gaza, and for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because they carried away captive the whole captivity, to deliver them up to Edom: 
But I will send a fire on the wall of Gaza, which shall devour the palaces thereof: 
And I will cut off the inhabitant from Ashdod, and him that holdeth the sceptre from Ashkelon, and I will turn mine hand against Ekron: and the remnant of the Philistines
1018,her ye cannot come. 
Then said the Jews among themselves, Whither will he go, that we shall not find him? will he go unto the dispersed among the Gentiles, and teach the Gentiles? 
What manner of saying is this that he said, Ye shall seek me, and shall not find me: and where I am, thither ye cannot come? 
In the last day, that great day of the feast, Jesus stood and cried, saying, If any man thirst, let him come unto me, and drink. 
He that believeth on me, as the scripture hath said, out of his belly shall flow rivers of living water. 
(But this spake he of the Spirit, which they that believe on him should receive: for the Holy Ghost was not yet given; because that Jesus was not yet glorified.) 
Many of the people therefore, when they heard this saying, said, Of a truth this is the Prophet. 
Others said, This is the Christ. But some said, Shall Christ come out of Galilee? 
Hath not the scripture said, That Christ cometh of the seed of David, and out of the town of Bethlehem, where David was? 
So there 
922,ove all that their fathers had done. 
For they also built them high places, and images, and groves, on every high hill, and under every green tree. 
And there were also sodomites in the land: and they did according to all the abominations of the nations which the LORD cast out before the children of Israel. 
And it came to pass in the fifth year of king Rehoboam, that Shishak king of Egypt came up against Jerusalem: 
And he took away the treasures of the house of the LORD, and the treasures of the king's house; he even took away all: and he took away all the shields of gold which Solomon had made. 
And king Rehoboam made in their stead brasen shields, and committed them unto the hands of the chief of the guard, which kept the door of the king's house. 
And it was so, when the king went into the house of the LORD, that the guard bare them, and brought them back into the guard chamber. 
Now the rest of the acts
856,silver, ivory, and apes, and peacocks. 
So king Solomon exceeded all the kings of the earth for riches and for wisdom. 
And all the earth sought to Solomon, to hear his wisdom, which God had put in his heart. 
And they brought every man his present, vessels of silver, and vessels of gold, and garments, and armour, and spices, horses, and mules, a rate year by year. 
And Solomon gathered together chariots and horsemen: and he had a thousand and four hundred chariots, and twelve thousand horsemen, whom he bestowed in the cities for chariots, and with the king at Jerusalem. 
And the king made silver to be in Jerusalem as stones, and cedars made he to be as the sycomore trees that are in the vale, for abundance. 
And Solomon had horses brought out of Egypt, and linen yarn: the king's merchants received the linen yarn at a price. 
And a chariot came
1026,d all the chariots of Egypt, and captains over every one of them. 
And the LORD hardened the heart of Pharaoh king of Egypt, and he pursued after the children of Israel: and the children of Israel went out with an high hand. 
But the Egyptians pursued after them, all the horses and chariots of Pharaoh, and his horsemen, and his army, and overtook them encamping by the sea, beside Pihahiroth, before Baalzephon. 
And when Pharaoh drew nigh, the children of Israel lifted up their eyes, and, behold, the Egyptians marched after them; and they were sore afraid: and the children of Israel cried out unto the LORD. 
And they said unto Moses, Because there were no graves in Egypt, hast thou taken us away to die in the wilderness? wherefore hast thou dealt thus with us, to carry us forth out of Egypt? 
Is not this the word that we did tell thee in Egypt, saying, Let us alone, that we may serve the Egyptians? For it had been better for us to serve the Egyptians, than that we should die in the wilderness. 
And Moses said un
795,Shall the prey be taken from the mighty, or the lawful captive delivered? 
But thus saith the LORD, Even the captives of the mighty shall be taken away, and the prey of the terrible shall be delivered: for I will contend with him that contendeth with thee, and I will save thy children. 
And I will feed them that oppress thee with their own flesh; and they shall be drunken with their own blood, as with sweet wine: and all flesh shall know that I the LORD am thy Saviour and thy Redeemer, the mighty One of Jacob. 
Thus saith the LORD, Where is the bill of your mother's divorcement, whom I have put away? or which of my creditors is it to whom I have sold you? Behold, for your iniquities have ye sold yourselves, and for your transgressions is your mother put away. 
Wherefore, when I came, 
831,s then cometh, and taketh bread, and giveth them, and fish likewise. 
This is now the third time that Jesus shewed himself to his disciples, after that he was risen from the dead. 
So when they had dined, Jesus saith to Simon Peter, Simon, son of Jonas, lovest thou me more than these? He saith unto him, Yea, Lord; thou knowest that I love thee. He saith unto him, Feed my lambs. 
He saith to him again the second time, Simon, son of Jonas, lovest thou me? He saith unto him, Yea, Lord; thou knowest that I love thee. He saith unto him, Feed my sheep. 
He saith unto him the third time, Simon, son of Jonas, lovest thou me? Peter was grieved because he said unto him the third time, Lovest thou me? And he said unto him, Lord, thou knowest all things; thou knowest that I love thee. Jesus saith unto him, Feed my sheep. 
Verily, v
869,nd am sent to speak unto thee, and to shew thee these glad tidings. 
And, behold, thou shalt be dumb, and not able to speak, until the day that these things shall be performed, because thou believest not my words, which shall be fulfilled in their season. 
And the people waited for Zacharias, and marvelled that he tarried so long in the temple. 
And when he came out, he could not speak unto them: and they perceived that he had seen a vision in the temple: for he beckoned unto them, and remained speechless. 
And it came to pass, that, as soon as the days of his ministration were accomplished, he departed to his own house. 
And after those days his wife Elisabeth conceived, and hid herself five months, saying, 
Thus hath the Lord dealt with me in the days wherein he looked on me, to take away my reproach among men. 
And in the sixth month the angel Gabriel wa
789,m, the king said unto the damsel, Ask of me whatsoever thou wilt, and I will give it thee. 
And he sware unto her, Whatsoever thou shalt ask of me, I will give it thee, unto the half of my kingdom. 
And she went forth, and said unto her mother, What shall I ask? And she said, The head of John the Baptist. 
And she came in straightway with haste unto the king, and asked, saying, I will that thou give me by and by in a charger the head of John the Baptist. 
And the king was exceeding sorry; yet for his oath's sake, and for their sakes which sat with him, he would not reject her. 
And immediately the king sent an executioner, and commanded his head to be brought: and he went and beheaded him in the prison, 
And brought his head in a charger, and gave it to the damsel: and the damse
933, of brass upon his legs, and a target of brass between his shoulders. 
And the staff of his spear was like a weaver's beam; and his spear's head weighed six hundred shekels of iron: and one bearing a shield went before him. 
And he stood and cried unto the armies of Israel, and said unto them, Why are ye come out to set your battle in array? am not I a Philistine, and ye servants to Saul? choose you a man for you, and let him come down to me. 
If he be able to fight with me, and to kill me, then will we be your servants: but if I prevail against him, and kill him, then shall ye be our servants, and serve us. 
And the Philistine said, I defy the armies of Israel this day; give me a man, that we may fight together. 
When Saul and all Israel heard those words of the Philistine, they were dismayed, and greatly afraid. 
Now David was the son of that Ephrathite of Bethlehemjudah, whose name was Jesse; and he had eight sons: a
787, before mine eyes: and I have walked in thy truth. 
I have not sat with vain persons, neither will I go in with dissemblers. 
I have hated the congregation of evil doers; and will not sit with the wicked. 
I will wash mine hands in innocency: so will I compass thine altar, O LORD: 
That I may publish with the voice of thanksgiving, and tell of all thy wondrous works. 
LORD, I have loved the habitation of thy house, and the place where thine honour dwelleth. 
Gather not my soul with sinners, nor my life with bloody men: 
In whose hands is mischief, and their right hand is full of bribes. 
But as for me, I will walk in mine integrity: redeem me, and be merciful unto me. 
My foot standeth in an even place: in the congregations will I bless the LORD. 
The LORD is my light and my s
809,r if the casting away of them be the reconciling of the world, what shall the receiving of them be, but life from the dead? 
For if the firstfruit be holy, the lump is also holy: and if the root be holy, so are the branches. 
And if some of the branches be broken off, and thou, being a wild olive tree, wert graffed in among them, and with them partakest of the root and fatness of the olive tree; 
Boast not against the branches. But if thou boast, thou bearest not the root, but the root thee. 
Thou wilt say then, The branches were broken off, that I might be graffed in. 
Well; because of unbelief they were broken off, and thou standest by faith. Be not highminded, but fear: 
For if God spared not the natural branches, take heed lest he also spare not thee. 
Behold therefore the goodness and severity
998,e to his brother, What hath the LORD answered? and, What hath the LORD spoken? 
And the burden of the LORD shall ye mention no more: for every man's word shall be his burden; for ye have perverted the words of the living God, of the LORD of hosts our God. 
Thus shalt thou say to the prophet, What hath the LORD answered thee? and, What hath the LORD spoken? 
But since ye say, The burden of the LORD; therefore thus saith the LORD; Because ye say this word, The burden of the LORD, and I have sent unto you, saying, Ye shall not say, The burden of the LORD; 
Therefore, behold, I, even I, will utterly forget you, and I will forsake you, and the city that I gave you and your fathers, and cast you out of my presence: 
And I will bring an everlasting reproach upon you, and a perpetual shame, which shall not be forgotten. 
The LORD shewed me, and, behold, two baskets of figs were set before the temple of the LORD, after that Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon had carried away captive Jeconiah the 
1050, of the water of the river, and pour it upon the dry land: and the water which thou takest out of the river shall become blood upon the dry land. 
And Moses said unto the LORD, O my LORD, I am not eloquent, neither heretofore, nor since thou hast spoken unto thy servant: but I am slow of speech, and of a slow tongue. 
And the LORD said unto him, Who hath made man's mouth? or who maketh the dumb, or deaf, or the seeing, or the blind? have not I the LORD? 
Now therefore go, and I will be with thy mouth, and teach thee what thou shalt say. 
And he said, O my LORD, send, I pray thee, by the hand of him whom thou wilt send. 
And the anger of the LORD was kindled against Moses, and he said, Is not Aaron the Levite thy brother? I know that he can speak well. And also, behold, he cometh forth to meet thee: and when he seeth thee, he will be glad in his heart. 
And thou shalt speak unto him, and put words in his mouth: and I will be with thy mouth, and with his mouth, and will teach you what ye shall do. 
And he shall be thy spokesman unto the
886,which I command thee this day, to love the LORD thy God, and to walk ever in his ways; then shalt thou add three cities more for thee, beside these three: 
That innocent blood be not shed in thy land, which the LORD thy God giveth thee for an inheritance, and so blood be upon thee. 
But if any man hate his neighbour, and lie in wait for him, and rise up against him, and smite him mortally that he die, and fleeth into one of these cities: 
Then the elders of his city shall send and fetch him thence, and deliver him into the hand of the avenger of blood, that he may die. 
Thine eye shall not pity him, but thou shalt put away the guilt of innocent blood from Israel, that it may go well with thee. 
Thou shalt not remove thy neighbour's landmark, which they of old time have set in thine inheritance, which thou shalt inherit in the land that the LORD thy God giveth thee to posses
770,use we have not power, but to make ourselves an ensample unto you to follow us. 
For even when we were with you, this we commanded you, that if any would not work, neither should he eat. 
For we hear that there are some which walk among you disorderly, working not at all, but are busybodies. 
Now them that are such we command and exhort by our Lord Jesus Christ, that with quietness they work, and eat their own bread. 
But ye, brethren, be not weary in well doing. 
And if any man obey not our word by this epistle, note that man, and have no company with him, that he may be ashamed. 
Yet count him not as an enemy, but admonish him as a brother. 
Now the Lord of peace himself give you peace always by all means. The Lord be with you all. 
The salutation of Paul wi
820,down. 
And as he sat upon the mount of Olives over against the temple, Peter and James and John and Andrew asked him privately, 
Tell us, when shall these things be? and what shall be the sign when all these things shall be fulfilled? 
And Jesus answering them began to say, Take heed lest any man deceive you: 
For many shall come in my name, saying, I am Christ; and shall deceive many. 
And when ye shall hear of wars and rumours of wars, be ye not troubled: for such things must needs be; but the end shall not be yet. 
For nation shall rise against nation, and kingdom against kingdom: and there shall be earthquakes in divers places, and there shall be famines and troubles: these are the beginnings of sorrows. 
But take heed to yourselves: for they shall deliver you up to councils; and in the synagogues ye shal
1074, offend thee, pluck it out, and cast it from thee: it is better for thee to enter into life with one eye, rather than having two eyes to be cast into hell fire. 
Take heed that ye despise not one of these little ones; for I say unto you, That in heaven their angels do always behold the face of my Father which is in heaven. 
For the Son of man is come to save that which was lost. 
How think ye? if a man have an hundred sheep, and one of them be gone astray, doth he not leave the ninety and nine, and goeth into the mountains, and seeketh that which is gone astray? 
And if so be that he find it, verily I say unto you, he rejoiceth more of that sheep, than of the ninety and nine which went not astray. 
Even so it is not the will of your Father which is in heaven, that one of these little ones should perish. 
Moreover if thy brother shall trespass against thee, go and tell him his fault between thee and him alone: if he shall hear thee, thou hast gained thy brother. 
But if he will not hear thee, then take with thee one or two more, that in the mouth of two or th
915, to pass when thou shalt have the dominion, that thou shalt break his yoke from off thy neck. 
And Esau hated Jacob because of the blessing wherewith his father blessed him: and Esau said in his heart, The days of mourning for my father are at hand; then will I slay my brother Jacob. 
And these words of Esau her elder son were told to Rebekah: and she sent and called Jacob her younger son, and said unto him, Behold, thy brother Esau, as touching thee, doth comfort himself, purposing to kill thee. 
Now therefore, my son, obey my voice; arise, flee thou to Laban my brother to Haran; 
And tarry with him a few days, until thy brother's fury turn away; 
Until thy brother's anger turn away from thee, and he forget that which thou hast done to him: then I will send, and fetch thee from thence: why should I be deprived also of you both in one day? 
And Rebekah said to Isaac, I am weary of my life because of th
976,of and the stones thereof. 
Then the angel that talked with me went forth, and said unto me, Lift up now thine eyes, and see what is this that goeth forth. 
And I said, What is it? And he said, This is an ephah that goeth forth. He said moreover, This is their resemblance through all the earth. 
And, behold, there was lifted up a talent of lead: and this is a woman that sitteth in the midst of the ephah. 
And he said, This is wickedness. And he cast it into the midst of the ephah; and he cast the weight of lead upon the mouth thereof. 
Then lifted I up mine eyes, and looked, and, behold, there came out two women, and the wind was in their wings; for they had wings like the wings of a stork: and they lifted up the ephah between the earth and the heaven. 
Then said I to the angel that talked with me, Whither do these bear the ephah? 
And he said unto me, To build it an house in the land of Shinar: and it shall be established, and set there upon her own base. 
And 
741,l tell the matter. 
Cast thy bread upon the waters: for thou shalt find it after many days. 
Give a portion to seven, and also to eight; for thou knowest not what evil shall be upon the earth. 
If the clouds be full of rain, they empty themselves upon the earth: and if the tree fall toward the south, or toward the north, in the place where the tree falleth, there it shall be. 
He that observeth the wind shall not sow; and he that regardeth the clouds shall not reap. 
As thou knowest not what is the way of the spirit, nor how the bones do grow in the womb of her that is with child: even so thou knowest not the works of God who maketh all. 
In the morning sow thy seed, and in the evening withhold not thine hand: for thou knowest not 
805,me to know the way wherein I should walk; for I lift up my soul unto thee. 
Deliver me, O LORD, from mine enemies: I flee unto thee to hide me. 
Teach me to do thy will; for thou art my God: thy spirit is good; lead me into the land of uprightness. 
Quicken me, O LORD, for thy name's sake: for thy righteousness' sake bring my soul out of trouble. 
And of thy mercy cut off mine enemies, and destroy all them that afflict my soul: for I am thy servant. 
Blessed be the LORD my strength which teacheth my hands to war, and my fingers to fight: 
My goodness, and my fortress; my high tower, and my deliverer; my shield, and he in whom I trust; who subdueth my people under me. 
LORD, what is man, that thou takest knowledge of him! or the son of man, that thou makest account of him! 
Man is like to vanity
930,aphat set of the Levites, and of the priests, and of the chief of the fathers of Israel, for the judgment of the LORD, and for controversies, when they returned to Jerusalem. 
And he charged them, saying, Thus shall ye do in the fear of the LORD, faithfully, and with a perfect heart. 
And what cause soever shall come to you of your brethren that dwell in your cities, between blood and blood, between law and commandment, statutes and judgments, ye shall even warn them that they trespass not against the LORD, and so wrath come upon you, and upon your brethren: this do, and ye shall not trespass. 
And, behold, Amariah the chief priest is over you in all matters of the LORD; and Zebadiah the son of Ishmael, the ruler of the house of Judah, for all the king's matters: also the Levites shall be officers before you. Deal courageously, and the LORD shall be with the good. 
It came to pass after this also, that the children o
872,ngel that smote the people, and said, Lo, I have sinned, and I have done wickedly: but these sheep, what have they done? let thine hand, I pray thee, be against me, and against my father's house. 
And Gad came that day to David, and said unto him, Go up, rear an altar unto the LORD in the threshingfloor of Araunah the Jebusite. 
And David, according to the saying of Gad, went up as the LORD commanded. 
And Araunah looked, and saw the king and his servants coming on toward him: and Araunah went out, and bowed himself before the king on his face upon the ground. 
And Araunah said, Wherefore is my lord the king come to his servant? And David said, To buy the threshingfloor of thee, to build an altar unto the LORD, that the plague may be stayed from the people. 
And Araunah said unto David, Let my lord the king take and offer up what seemeth good unto him: behold,
867,nto them, The Son of man is delivered into the hands of men, and they shall kill him; and after that he is killed, he shall rise the third day. 
But they understood not that saying, and were afraid to ask him. 
And he came to Capernaum: and being in the house he asked them, What was it that ye disputed among yourselves by the way? 
But they held their peace: for by the way they had disputed among themselves, who should be the greatest. 
And he sat down, and called the twelve, and saith unto them, If any man desire to be first, the same shall be last of all, and servant of all. 
And he took a child, and set him in the midst of them: and when he had taken him in his arms, he said unto them, 
Whosoever shall receive one of such children in my name, receiveth me: and whosoever shall receive me, receiveth not me, but him that sent me. 
And John answered him, s
1011,u beginnest to put the sickle to the corn. 
And thou shalt keep the feast of weeks unto the LORD thy God with a tribute of a freewill offering of thine hand, which thou shalt give unto the LORD thy God, according as the LORD thy God hath blessed thee: 
And thou shalt rejoice before the LORD thy God, thou, and thy son, and thy daughter, and thy manservant, and thy maidservant, and the Levite that is within thy gates, and the stranger, and the fatherless, and the widow, that are among you, in the place which the LORD thy God hath chosen to place his name there. 
And thou shalt remember that thou wast a bondman in Egypt: and thou shalt observe and do these statutes. 
Thou shalt observe the feast of tabernacles seven days, after that thou hast gathered in thy corn and thy wine: 
And thou shalt rejoice in thy feast, thou, and thy son, and thy daughter, and thy manservant, and thy maidservant, and the Levite, the stranger, and the fatherless, and the widow, that are within thy gates. 
Seven days shalt 
724,l make thine horn iron, and I will make thy hoofs brass: and thou shalt beat in pieces many people: and I will consecrate their gain unto the LORD, and their substance unto the Lord of the whole earth. 
Now gather thyself in troops, O daughter of troops: he hath laid siege against us: they shall smite the judge of Israel with a rod upon the cheek. 
But thou, Bethlehem Ephratah, though thou be little among the thousands of Judah, yet out of thee shall he come forth unto me that is to be ruler in Israel; whose goings forth have been from of old, from everlasting. 
Therefore will he give them up, until the time that she which travaileth hath brought forth: then the remnant of his brethren shall return unto the childre
1026,, lift up thine eyes now the way toward the north. So I lifted up mine eyes the way toward the north, and behold northward at the gate of the altar this image of jealousy in the entry. 
He said furthermore unto me, Son of man, seest thou what they do? even the great abominations that the house of Israel committeth here, that I should go far off from my sanctuary? but turn thee yet again, and thou shalt see greater abominations. 
And he brought me to the door of the court; and when I looked, behold a hole in the wall. 
Then said he unto me, Son of man, dig now in the wall: and when I had digged in the wall, behold a door. 
And he said unto me, Go in, and behold the wicked abominations that they do here. 
So I went in and saw; and behold every form of creeping things, and abominable beasts, and all the idols of the house of Israel, pourtrayed upon the wall round about. 
And there stood before them seventy men of the ancients of the house of Israel, and in the midst of them stood Jaazaniah the son of Shaphan, with
875,t thou me? And he said unto him, Lord, thou knowest all things; thou knowest that I love thee. Jesus saith unto him, Feed my sheep. 
Verily, verily, I say unto thee, When thou wast young, thou girdest thyself, and walkedst whither thou wouldest: but when thou shalt be old, thou shalt stretch forth thy hands, and another shall gird thee, and carry thee whither thou wouldest not. 
This spake he, signifying by what death he should glorify God. And when he had spoken this, he saith unto him, Follow me. 
Then Peter, turning about, seeth the disciple whom Jesus loved following; which also leaned on his breast at supper, and said, Lord, which is he that betrayeth thee? 
Peter seeing him saith to Jesus, Lord, and what shall this man do? 
Jesus saith unto him, If I will that he tarry till I come, what is that to thee? follow thou me. 
Then went this saying abroad among th
976, unto the mighty God. 
For though thy people Israel be as the sand of the sea, yet a remnant of them shall return: the consumption decreed shall overflow with righteousness. 
For the Lord GOD of hosts shall make a consumption, even determined, in the midst of all the land. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD of hosts, O my people that dwellest in Zion, be not afraid of the Assyrian: he shall smite thee with a rod, and shall lift up his staff against thee, after the manner of Egypt. 
For yet a very little while, and the indignation shall cease, and mine anger in their destruction. 
And the LORD of hosts shall stir up a scourge for him according to the slaughter of Midian at the rock of Oreb: and as his rod was upon the sea, so shall he lift it up after the manner of Egypt. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that his burden shall be taken away from off thy shoulder, and his yoke from off thy neck, and the yoke shall be destroyed because of the anointing. 
He i
889,ound about: the length was fifty cubits, and the breadth five and twenty cubits. 
And the posts thereof were toward the utter court; and palm trees were upon the posts thereof, on this side, and on that side: and the going up to it had eight steps. 
And the chambers and the entries thereof were by the posts of the gates, where they washed the burnt offering. 
And in the porch of the gate were two tables on this side, and two tables on that side, to slay thereon the burnt offering and the sin offering and the trespass offering. 
And at the side without, as one goeth up to the entry of the north gate, were two tables; and on the other side, which was at the porch of the gate, were two tables. 
Four tables were on this side, and four tables on that side, by the side of the gate; eight tables, whereupon they slew their sacrifices. 
And the four tables were of hewn stone for the bu
969,ing, Go, find out the arrows. If I expressly say unto the lad, Behold, the arrows are on this side of thee, take them; then come thou: for there is peace to thee, and no hurt; as the LORD liveth. 
But if I say thus unto the young man, Behold, the arrows are beyond thee; go thy way: for the LORD hath sent thee away. 
And as touching the matter which thou and I have spoken of, behold, the LORD be between thee and me for ever. 
So David hid himself in the field: and when the new moon was come, the king sat him down to eat meat. 
And the king sat upon his seat, as at other times, even upon a seat by the wall: and Jonathan arose, and Abner sat by Saul's side, and David's place was empty. 
Nevertheless Saul spake not any thing that day: for he thought, Something hath befallen him, he is not clean; surely he is not clean. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, which was the second day of the month, that David's place was empty: and Saul said unto Jonathan his son, 
953,a multitude after thee: believe them not, though they speak fair words unto thee. 
I have forsaken mine house, I have left mine heritage; I have given the dearly beloved of my soul into the hand of her enemies. 
Mine heritage is unto me as a lion in the forest; it crieth out against me: therefore have I hated it. 
Mine heritage is unto me as a speckled bird, the birds round about are against her; come ye, assemble all the beasts of the field, come to devour. 
Many pastors have destroyed my vineyard, they have trodden my portion under foot, they have made my pleasant portion a desolate wilderness. 
They have made it desolate, and being desolate it mourneth unto me; the whole land is made desolate, because no man layeth it to heart. 
The spoilers are come upon all high places through the wilderness: for the sword of the LORD shall devour from the one end of the land even to the other end of the land: no flesh shall have peace. 
They have sow
750,labour, working with his hands the thing which is good, that he may have to give to him that needeth. 
Let no corrupt communication proceed out of your mouth, but that which is good to the use of edifying, that it may minister grace unto the hearers. 
And grieve not the holy Spirit of God, whereby ye are sealed unto the day of redemption. 
Let all bitterness, and wrath, and anger, and clamour, and evil speaking, be put away from you, with all malice: 
And be ye kind one to another, tenderhearted, forgiving one another, even as God for Christ's sake hath forgiven you. 
Be ye therefore followers of God, as dear children; 
And walk in love, as Christ also hath loved us, and hath given himself for us an offering and a sacrifice to God for a swe
973, 
For as ye have drunk upon my holy mountain, so shall all the heathen drink continually, yea, they shall drink, and they shall swallow down, and they shall be as though they had not been. 
But upon mount Zion shall be deliverance, and there shall be holiness; and the house of Jacob shall possess their possessions. 
And the house of Jacob shall be a fire, and the house of Joseph a flame, and the house of Esau for stubble, and they shall kindle in them, and devour them; and there shall not be any remaining of the house of Esau; for the LORD hath spoken it. 
And they of the south shall possess the mount of Esau; and they of the plain the Philistines: and they shall possess the fields of Ephraim, and the fields of Samaria: and Benjamin shall possess Gilead. 
And the captivity of this host of the children of Israel shall possess that of the Canaanites, even unto Zarephath; and the captivity of Jerusalem, which is in Sepharad, shall possess the cities of the south
867,tes; on the south three gates; and on the west three gates. 
And the wall of the city had twelve foundations, and in them the names of the twelve apostles of the Lamb. 
And he that talked with me had a golden reed to measure the city, and the gates thereof, and the wall thereof. 
And the city lieth foursquare, and the length is as large as the breadth: and he measured the city with the reed, twelve thousand furlongs. The length and the breadth and the height of it are equal. 
And he measured the wall thereof, an hundred and forty and four cubits, according to the measure of a man, that is, of the angel. 
And the building of the wall of it was of jasper: and the city was pure gold, like unto clear glass. 
And the foundations of the wall of the city were garnished with all manner of precious stones. The first foundation was jasper; the second, sapphire; the
917, Lord Jesus Christ; 
Submitting yourselves one to another in the fear of God. 
Wives, submit yourselves unto your own husbands, as unto the Lord. 
For the husband is the head of the wife, even as Christ is the head of the church: and he is the saviour of the body. 
Therefore as the church is subject unto Christ, so let the wives be to their own husbands in every thing. 
Husbands, love your wives, even as Christ also loved the church, and gave himself for it; 
That he might sanctify and cleanse it with the washing of water by the word, 
That he might present it to himself a glorious church, not having spot, or wrinkle, or any such thing; but that it should be holy and without blemish. 
So ought men to love their wives as their own bodies. He that loveth his wife loveth himself. 
For no man ever yet hated his own flesh; but nourisheth and cherisheth it, even as the Lord the church: 
For we are members of h
946,give thee the inheritance of my fathers. And he laid him down upon his bed, and turned away his face, and would eat no bread. 
But Jezebel his wife came to him, and said unto him, Why is thy spirit so sad, that thou eatest no bread? 
And he said unto her, Because I spake unto Naboth the Jezreelite, and said unto him, Give me thy vineyard for money; or else, if it please thee, I will give thee another vineyard for it: and he answered, I will not give thee my vineyard. 
And Jezebel his wife said unto him, Dost thou now govern the kingdom of Israel? arise, and eat bread, and let thine heart be merry: I will give thee the vineyard of Naboth the Jezreelite. 
So she wrote letters in Ahab's name, and sealed them with his seal, and sent the letters unto the elders and to the nobles that were in his city, dwelling with Naboth. 
And she wrote in the letters, saying, Proclaim a fast, and set Naboth on high among the people: 
And set two men, s
1066,ou art my hiding place; thou shalt preserve me from trouble; thou shalt compass me about with songs of deliverance. Selah. 
I will instruct thee and teach thee in the way which thou shalt go: I will guide thee with mine eye. 
Be ye not as the horse, or as the mule, which have no understanding: whose mouth must be held in with bit and bridle, lest they come near unto thee. 
Many sorrows shall be to the wicked: but he that trusteth in the LORD, mercy shall compass him about. 
Be glad in the LORD, and rejoice, ye righteous: and shout for joy, all ye that are upright in heart. 
Rejoice in the LORD, O ye righteous: for praise is comely for the upright. 
Praise the LORD with harp: sing unto him with the psaltery and an instrument of ten strings. 
Sing unto him a new song; play skilfully with a loud noise. 
For the word of the LORD is right; and all his works are done in truth. 
He loveth righteousness and judgment: the earth is full of the goodness of the LORD. 
By the word of the LORD were the heavens made; and all the host of them by the breath of his mo
926,me soul will I destroy from among his people. 
Ye shall do no manner of work: it shall be a statute for ever throughout your generations in all your dwellings. 
It shall be unto you a sabbath of rest, and ye shall afflict your souls: in the ninth day of the month at even, from even unto even, shall ye celebrate your sabbath. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, saying, The fifteenth day of this seventh month shall be the feast of tabernacles for seven days unto the LORD. 
On the first day shall be an holy convocation: ye shall do no servile work therein. 
Seven days ye shall offer an offering made by fire unto the LORD: on the eighth day shall be an holy convocation unto you; and ye shall offer an offering made by fire unto the LORD: it is a solemn assembly; and ye shall do no servile work therein. 
These are the feasts of the LORD, which ye shall proclaim to be holy convoca
982,and thou art tormented. 
And beside all this, between us and you there is a great gulf fixed: so that they which would pass from hence to you cannot; neither can they pass to us, that would come from thence. 
Then he said, I pray thee therefore, father, that thou wouldest send him to my father's house: 
For I have five brethren; that he may testify unto them, lest they also come into this place of torment. 
Abraham saith unto him, They have Moses and the prophets; let them hear them. 
And he said, Nay, father Abraham: but if one went unto them from the dead, they will repent. 
And he said unto him, If they hear not Moses and the prophets, neither will they be persuaded, though one rose from the dead. 
Then said he unto the disciples, It is impossible but that offences will come: but woe unto him, through whom they come! 
It were better for him that a millstone were hanged about his neck, and he cast into the sea, than that he should offend one of these little ones. 
T
1007,ts. 
And the suburbs of the cities, which ye shall give unto the Levites, shall reach from the wall of the city and outward a thousand cubits round about. 
And ye shall measure from without the city on the east side two thousand cubits, and on the south side two thousand cubits, and on the west side two thousand cubits, and on the north side two thousand cubits; and the city shall be in the midst: this shall be to them the suburbs of the cities. 
And among the cities which ye shall give unto the Levites there shall be six cities for refuge, which ye shall appoint for the manslayer, that he may flee thither: and to them ye shall add forty and two cities. 
So all the cities which ye shall give to the Levites shall be forty and eight cities: them shall ye give with their suburbs. 
And the cities which ye shall give shall be of the possession of the children of Israel: from them that have many ye shall give many; but from them that have few ye shall give few: every one shall give of his cities un
876,t all. 
Neither shall they defile themselves any more with their idols, nor with their detestable things, nor with any of their transgressions: but I will save them out of all their dwellingplaces, wherein they have sinned, and will cleanse them: so shall they be my people, and I will be their God. 
And David my servant shall be king over them; and they all shall have one shepherd: they shall also walk in my judgments, and observe my statutes, and do them. 
And they shall dwell in the land that I have given unto Jacob my servant, wherein your fathers have dwelt; and they shall dwell therein, even they, and their children, and their children's children for ever: and my servant David shall be their prince for ever. 
Moreover I will make a covenant of peace with them; it shall be an everlasting covenant with them: and I will place them, and multiply them, and will se
788,beit the name of the city was Laish at the first. 
And the children of Dan set up the graven image: and Jonathan, the son of Gershom, the son of Manasseh, he and his sons were priests to the tribe of Dan until the day of the captivity of the land. 
And they set them up Micah's graven image, which he made, all the time that the house of God was in Shiloh. 
And it came to pass in those days, when there was no king in Israel, that there was a certain Levite sojourning on the side of mount Ephraim, who took to him a concubine out of Bethlehemjudah. 
And his concubine played the whore against him, and went away from him unto her father's house to Bethlehemjudah, and was there four whole months. 
And her husband arose, and went after her, to speak friendly unto her, and to bring her 
807,ulteries, fornications, murders, 
Thefts, covetousness, wickedness, deceit, lasciviousness, an evil eye, blasphemy, pride, foolishness: 
All these evil things come from within, and defile the man. 
And from thence he arose, and went into the borders of Tyre and Sidon, and entered into an house, and would have no man know it: but he could not be hid. 
For a certain woman, whose young daughter had an unclean spirit, heard of him, and came and fell at his feet: 
The woman was a Greek, a Syrophenician by nation; and she besought him that he would cast forth the devil out of her daughter. 
But Jesus said unto her, Let the children first be filled: for it is not meet to take the children's bread, and to cast it unto the dogs. 
And she answered and said unto him, Yes, Lord: yet the dogs under the table 
872, and understand all mysteries, and all knowledge; and though I have all faith, so that I could remove mountains, and have not charity, I am nothing. 
And though I bestow all my goods to feed the poor, and though I give my body to be burned, and have not charity, it profiteth me nothing. 
Charity suffereth long, and is kind; charity envieth not; charity vaunteth not itself, is not puffed up, 
Doth not behave itself unseemly, seeketh not her own, is not easily provoked, thinketh no evil; 
Rejoiceth not in iniquity, but rejoiceth in the truth; 
Beareth all things, believeth all things, hopeth all things, endureth all things. 
Charity never faileth: but whether there be prophecies, they shall fail; whether there be tongues, they shall cease; whether there be knowledge, it shall vanish away. 
For we know in part, and we prophesy in part. 
But when that which is per
929, house; and I was delivered of a child with her in the house. 
And it came to pass the third day after that I was delivered, that this woman was delivered also: and we were together; there was no stranger with us in the house, save we two in the house. 
And this woman's child died in the night; because she overlaid it. 
And she arose at midnight, and took my son from beside me, while thine handmaid slept, and laid it in her bosom, and laid her dead child in my bosom. 
And when I rose in the morning to give my child suck, behold, it was dead: but when I had considered it in the morning, behold, it was not my son, which I did bear. 
And the other woman said, Nay; but the living is my son, and the dead is thy son. And this said, No; but the dead is thy son, and the living is my son. Thus they spake before the king. 
Then said the king, The one saith, This is my son that liveth, and thy son is the dead: and the other sa
765,im there king over Israel: and blow ye with the trumpet, and say, God save king Solomon. 
Then ye shall come up after him, that he may come and sit upon my throne; for he shall be king in my stead: and I have appointed him to be ruler over Israel and over Judah. 
And Benaiah the son of Jehoiada answered the king, and said, Amen: the LORD God of my lord the king say so too. 
As the LORD hath been with my lord the king, even so be he with Solomon, and make his throne greater than the throne of my lord king David. 
So Zadok the priest, and Nathan the prophet, and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, and the Cherethites, and the Pelethites, went down, and caused Solomon to ride upon king David's mule, and brought him to Gihon. 
And Zadok the priest took an horn of oi
943, one, that is, God. 
Thou knowest the commandments, Do not commit adultery, Do not kill, Do not steal, Do not bear false witness, Honour thy father and thy mother. 
And he said, All these have I kept from my youth up. 
Now when Jesus heard these things, he said unto him, Yet lackest thou one thing: sell all that thou hast, and distribute unto the poor, and thou shalt have treasure in heaven: and come, follow me. 
And when he heard this, he was very sorrowful: for he was very rich. 
And when Jesus saw that he was very sorrowful, he said, How hardly shall they that have riches enter into the kingdom of God! 
For it is easier for a camel to go through a needle's eye, than for a rich man to enter into the kingdom of God. 
And they that heard it said, Who then can be saved? 
And he said, The things which are impossible with men are possible with God. 
Then Peter said, Lo, we have left all, and followed thee. 
And he said unto them, Ve
748,e unto you when he was yet in Galilee, 
Saying, The Son of man must be delivered into the hands of sinful men, and be crucified, and the third day rise again. 
And they remembered his words, 
And returned from the sepulchre, and told all these things unto the eleven, and to all the rest. 
It was Mary Magdalene and Joanna, and Mary the mother of James, and other women that were with them, which told these things unto the apostles. 
And their words seemed to them as idle tales, and they believed them not. 
Then arose Peter, and ran unto the sepulchre; and stooping down, he beheld the linen clothes laid by themselves, and departed, wondering in himself at that which was come to pass. 
And, behold, two of them went that same day to a village 
722,d thou hast well done that thou art come. Now therefore are we all here present before God, to hear all things that are commanded thee of God. 
Then Peter opened his mouth, and said, Of a truth I perceive that God is no respecter of persons: 
But in every nation he that feareth him, and worketh righteousness, is accepted with him. 
The word which God sent unto the children of Israel, preaching peace by Jesus Christ: (he is Lord of all:) 
That word, I say, ye know, which was published throughout all Judaea, and began from Galilee, after the baptism which John preached; 
How God anointed Jesus of Nazareth with the Holy Ghost and with power: who went about doing good, and healing all that were oppressed of the devil
989,verting the soul: the testimony of the LORD is sure, making wise the simple. 
The statutes of the LORD are right, rejoicing the heart: the commandment of the LORD is pure, enlightening the eyes. 
The fear of the LORD is clean, enduring for ever: the judgments of the LORD are true and righteous altogether. 
More to be desired are they than gold, yea, than much fine gold: sweeter also than honey and the honeycomb. 
Moreover by them is thy servant warned: and in keeping of them there is great reward. 
Who can understand his errors? cleanse thou me from secret faults. 
Keep back thy servant also from presumptuous sins; let them not have dominion over me: then shall I be upright, and I shall be innocent from the great transgression. 
Let the words of my mouth, and the meditation of my heart, be acceptable in thy sight, O LORD, my strength, and my redeemer. 
The LORD hear thee in the day of trouble; the name of the God of Jacob defend thee; 
Send thee help from the sanctuary, and 
1007,y shall increase and bring fruit: and I will settle you after your old estates, and will do better unto you than at your beginnings: and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
Yea, I will cause men to walk upon you, even my people Israel; and they shall possess thee, and thou shalt be their inheritance, and thou shalt no more henceforth bereave them of men. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; Because they say unto you, Thou land devourest up men, and hast bereaved thy nations: 
Therefore thou shalt devour men no more, neither bereave thy nations any more, saith the Lord GOD. 
Neither will I cause men to hear in thee the shame of the heathen any more, neither shalt thou bear the reproach of the people any more, neither shalt thou cause thy nations to fall any more, saith the Lord GOD. 
Moreover the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, when the house of Israel dwelt in their own land, they defiled it by their own way and by their doings: their way was before me as the uncleanness of a removed 
846,o us judgment: let us know among ourselves what is good. 
For Job hath said, I am righteous: and God hath taken away my judgment. 
Should I lie against my right? my wound is incurable without transgression. 
What man is like Job, who drinketh up scorning like water? 
Which goeth in company with the workers of iniquity, and walketh with wicked men. 
For he hath said, It profiteth a man nothing that he should delight himself with God. 
Therefore hearken unto me ye men of understanding: far be it from God, that he should do wickedness; and from the Almighty, that he should commit iniquity. 
For the work of a man shall he render unto him, and cause every man to find according to his ways. 
Yea, surely God will not do wickedly, neither will the Almighty pervert judgment. 
Who hath given him a charge over the earth? or who hath disposed the
751,rought their flocks, and their herds, and all that they have. 
And it shall come to pass, when Pharaoh shall call you, and shall say, What is your occupation? 
That ye shall say, Thy servants' trade hath been about cattle from our youth even until now, both we, and also our fathers: that ye may dwell in the land of Goshen; for every shepherd is an abomination unto the Egyptians. 
Then Joseph came and told Pharaoh, and said, My father and my brethren, and their flocks, and their herds, and all that they have, are come out of the land of Canaan; and, behold, they are in the land of Goshen. 
And he took some of his brethren, even five men, and presented them unto Pharaoh. 
And Pharaoh said unto his brethren, What is your occupation? And they sa
765,he LORD will destroy this city. But he seemed as one that mocked unto his sons in law. 
And when the morning arose, then the angels hastened Lot, saying, Arise, take thy wife, and thy two daughters, which are here; lest thou be consumed in the iniquity of the city. 
And while he lingered, the men laid hold upon his hand, and upon the hand of his wife, and upon the hand of his two daughters; the LORD being merciful unto him: and they brought him forth, and set him without the city. 
And it came to pass, when they had brought them forth abroad, that he said, Escape for thy life; look not behind thee, neither stay thou in all the plain; escape to the mountain, lest thou be consumed. 
And Lot said unto them, Oh, not so, my LORD: 
Behold now, thy servant hath 
829, the coasts thereof round about. 
And Moses commanded the children of Israel, saying, This is the land which ye shall inherit by lot, which the LORD commanded to give unto the nine tribes, and to the half tribe: 
For the tribe of the children of Reuben according to the house of their fathers, and the tribe of the children of Gad according to the house of their fathers, have received their inheritance; and half the tribe of Manasseh have received their inheritance: 
The two tribes and the half tribe have received their inheritance on this side Jordan near Jericho eastward, toward the sunrising. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
These are the names of the men which shall divide the land unto you: Eleazar the priest, and Joshua the son of Nun. 
And ye shall take one prince of every tribe, to divide the land by inh
799,e for all people: all that burden themselves with it shall be cut in pieces, though all the people of the earth be gathered together against it. 
In that day, saith the LORD, I will smite every horse with astonishment, and his rider with madness: and I will open mine eyes upon the house of Judah, and will smite every horse of the people with blindness. 
And the governors of Judah shall say in their heart, The inhabitants of Jerusalem shall be my strength in the LORD of hosts their God. 
In that day will I make the governors of Judah like an hearth of fire among the wood, and like a torch of fire in a sheaf; and they shall devour all the people round about, on the right hand and on the left: and Jerusalem shall be inhabited again in her own place, even in Jerusalem. 
The LORD also shall sa
804,nd Nabal answered David's servants, and said, Who is David? and who is the son of Jesse? there be many servants now a days that break away every man from his master. 
Shall I then take my bread, and my water, and my flesh that I have killed for my shearers, and give it unto men, whom I know not whence they be? 
So David's young men turned their way, and went again, and came and told him all those sayings. 
And David said unto his men, Gird ye on every man his sword. And they girded on every man his sword; and David also girded on his sword: and there went up after David about four hundred men; and two hundred abode by the stuff. 
But one of the young men told Abigail, Nabal's wife, saying, Behold, David sent messengers out of the wilderness to salute our master; and he railed on them. 
But the
816,and he said to Laban, What is this thou hast done unto me? did not I serve with thee for Rachel? wherefore then hast thou beguiled me? 
And Laban said, It must not be so done in our country, to give the younger before the firstborn. 
Fulfil her week, and we will give thee this also for the service which thou shalt serve with me yet seven other years. 
And Jacob did so, and fulfilled her week: and he gave him Rachel his daughter to wife also. 
And Laban gave to Rachel his daughter Bilhah his handmaid to be her maid. 
And he went in also unto Rachel, and he loved also Rachel more than Leah, and served with him yet seven other years. 
And when the LORD saw that Leah was hated, he opened her womb: but Rachel was barren. 
And Leah conceived, and bare a son, and she called his name Reuben: for she said, Surely 
771,or buyest ought of thy neighbour's hand, ye shall not oppress one another: 
According to the number of years after the jubile thou shalt buy of thy neighbour, and according unto the number of years of the fruits he shall sell unto thee: 
According to the multitude of years thou shalt increase the price thereof, and according to the fewness of years thou shalt diminish the price of it: for according to the number of the years of the fruits doth he sell unto thee. 
Ye shall not therefore oppress one another; but thou shalt fear thy God:for I am the LORD your God. 
Wherefore ye shall do my statutes, and keep my judgments, and do them; and ye shall dwell in the land in safety. 
And the land shall yield her fruit, and ye shall eat your fill, and dwell therein in saf
728,Jordan, to go in to possess the land, which the LORD your God giveth you to possess it. 
And to the Reubenites, and to the Gadites, and to half the tribe of Manasseh, spake Joshua, saying, 
Remember the word which Moses the servant of the LORD commanded you, saying, The LORD your God hath given you rest, and hath given you this land. 
Your wives, your little ones, and your cattle, shall remain in the land which Moses gave you on this side Jordan; but ye shall pass before your brethren armed, all the mighty men of valour, and help them; 
Until the LORD have given your brethren rest, as he hath given you, and they also have possessed the land which the LORD your God giveth them: then ye shall return unto the land of your
948,the LORD. 
And Moses and Aaron came in unto Pharaoh, and said unto him, Thus saith the LORD God of the Hebrews, How long wilt thou refuse to humble thyself before me? let my people go, that they may serve me. 
Else, if thou refuse to let my people go, behold, to morrow will I bring the locusts into thy coast: 
And they shall cover the face of the earth, that one cannot be able to see the earth: and they shall eat the residue of that which is escaped, which remaineth unto you from the hail, and shall eat every tree which groweth for you out of the field: 
And they shall fill thy houses, and the houses of all thy servants, and the houses of all the Egyptians; which neither thy fathers, nor thy fathers' fathers have seen, since the day that they were upon the earth unto this day. And he turned himself, and went out from Pharaoh. 
And Pharaoh's servants said unto him, How long shall this man be a snare unto us? let the men go, that they m
942,hey will hear, or whether they will forbear, (for they are a rebellious house,) yet shall know that there hath been a prophet among them. 
And thou, son of man, be not afraid of them, neither be afraid of their words, though briers and thorns be with thee, and thou dost dwell among scorpions: be not afraid of their words, nor be dismayed at their looks, though they be a rebellious house. 
And thou shalt speak my words unto them, whether they will hear, or whether they will forbear: for they are most rebellious. 
But thou, son of man, hear what I say unto thee; Be not thou rebellious like that rebellious house: open thy mouth, and eat that I give thee. 
And when I looked, behold, an hand was sent unto me; and, lo, a roll of a book was therein; 
And he spread it before me; and it was written within and without: and there was written therein lamentations, and mourning, and woe. 
Moreover he said unto me, Son of man, eat that thou f
789,te a letter against Jerusalem to Artaxerxes the king in this sort: 
Then wrote Rehum the chancellor, and Shimshai the scribe, and the rest of their companions; the Dinaites, the Apharsathchites, the Tarpelites, the Apharsites, the Archevites, the Babylonians, the Susanchites, the Dehavites, and the Elamites, 
And the rest of the nations whom the great and noble Asnapper brought over, and set in the cities of Samaria, and the rest that are on this side the river, and at such a time. 
This is the copy of the letter that they sent unto him, even unto Artaxerxes the king; Thy servants the men on this side the river, and at such a time. 
Be it known unto the king, that the Jews which came up from thee to us are come unto Jerusalem, building the rebellious and the bad city, and have s
806,d he will smite her power in the sea; and she shall be devoured with fire. 
Ashkelon shall see it, and fear; Gaza also shall see it, and be very sorrowful, and Ekron; for her expectation shall be ashamed; and the king shall perish from Gaza, and Ashkelon shall not be inhabited. 
And a bastard shall dwell in Ashdod, and I will cut off the pride of the Philistines. 
And I will take away his blood out of his mouth, and his abominations from between his teeth: but he that remaineth, even he, shall be for our God, and he shall be as a governor in Judah, and Ekron as a Jebusite. 
And I will encamp about mine house because of the army, because of him that passeth by, and because of him that returneth: and no oppressor shall pass through them any more: for now have I seen with mine eyes. 
Rejoice greatl
1026, which is among the trees of the forest? 
Shall wood be taken thereof to do any work? or will men take a pin of it to hang any vessel thereon? 
Behold, it is cast into the fire for fuel; the fire devoureth both the ends of it, and the midst of it is burned. Is it meet for any work? 
Behold, when it was whole, it was meet for no work: how much less shall it be meet yet for any work, when the fire hath devoured it, and it is burned? 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; As the vine tree among the trees of the forest, which I have given to the fire for fuel, so will I give the inhabitants of Jerusalem. 
And I will set my face against them; they shall go out from one fire, and another fire shall devour them; and ye shall know that I am the LORD, when I set my face against them. 
And I will make the land desolate, because they have committed a trespass, saith the Lord GOD. 
Again the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, cause Jerusalem to know her abominations, 
And say, Thus saith the Lord GOD unto Jer
871,ud abode upon the tabernacle they rested in their tents. 
And when the cloud tarried long upon the tabernacle many days, then the children of Israel kept the charge of the LORD, and journeyed not. 
And so it was, when the cloud was a few days upon the tabernacle; according to the commandment of the LORD they abode in their tents, and according to the commandment of the LORD they journeyed. 
And so it was, when the cloud abode from even unto the morning, and that the cloud was taken up in the morning, then they journeyed: whether it was by day or by night that the cloud was taken up, they journeyed. 
Or whether it were two days, or a month, or a year, that the cloud tarried upon the tabernacle, remaining thereon, the children of Israel abode in their tents, and journeyed not: but when it was taken up, they journeyed. 
At the commandment of the LORD they rested
729,ich had heard of his wisdom. 
And Hiram king of Tyre sent his servants unto Solomon; for he had heard that they had anointed him king in the room of his father: for Hiram was ever a lover of David. 
And Solomon sent to Hiram, saying, 
Thou knowest how that David my father could not build an house unto the name of the LORD his God for the wars which were about him on every side, until the LORD put them under the soles of his feet. 
But now the LORD my God hath given me rest on every side, so that there is neither adversary nor evil occurrent. 
And, behold, I purpose to build an house unto the name of the LORD my God, as the LORD spake unto David my father, saying, Thy son, whom I will set upon thy throne in thy room, he 
804, God. 
Thou shalt not offer the blood of my sacrifice with leavened bread; neither shall the fat of my sacrifice remain until the morning. 
The first of the firstfruits of thy land thou shalt bring into the house of the LORD thy God. Thou shalt not seethe a kid in his mother's milk. 
Behold, I send an Angel before thee, to keep thee in the way, and to bring thee into the place which I have prepared. 
Beware of him, and obey his voice, provoke him not; for he will not pardon your transgressions: for my name is in him. 
But if thou shalt indeed obey his voice, and do all that I speak; then I will be an enemy unto thine enemies, and an adversary unto thine adversaries. 
For mine Angel shall go before thee, and bring thee in unto the Amorites, and the Hittites, and the Perizzites, and the Canaanit
969,them in parables: because they seeing see not; and hearing they hear not, neither do they understand. 
And in them is fulfilled the prophecy of Esaias, which saith, By hearing ye shall hear, and shall not understand; and seeing ye shall see, and shall not perceive: 
For this people's heart is waxed gross, and their ears are dull of hearing, and their eyes they have closed; lest at any time they should see with their eyes and hear with their ears, and should understand with their heart, and should be converted, and I should heal them. 
But blessed are your eyes, for they see: and your ears, for they hear. 
For verily I say unto you, That many prophets and righteous men have desired to see those things which ye see, and have not seen them; and to hear those things which ye hear, and have not heard them. 
Hear ye therefore the parable of the sower. 
When any one heareth the word of the kingdom, and understandeth it not, then cometh the wicked one, and catche
994,fore him, and made him rule over kings? he gave them as the dust to his sword, and as driven stubble to his bow. 
He pursued them, and passed safely; even by the way that he had not gone with his feet. 
Who hath wrought and done it, calling the generations from the beginning? I the LORD, the first, and with the last; I am he. 
The isles saw it, and feared; the ends of the earth were afraid, drew near, and came. 
They helped every one his neighbour; and every one said to his brother, Be of good courage. 
So the carpenter encouraged the goldsmith, and he that smootheth with the hammer him that smote the anvil, saying, It is ready for the sodering: and he fastened it with nails, that it should not be moved. 
But thou, Israel, art my servant, Jacob whom I have chosen, the seed of Abraham my friend. 
Thou whom I have taken from the ends of the earth, and called thee from the chief men thereof, and said unto thee, Thou art my servant; I have chosen thee, and not cast thee away. 
Fear t
1062,O Jacob and Israel; for thou art my servant: I have formed thee; thou art my servant: O Israel, thou shalt not be forgotten of me. 
I have blotted out, as a thick cloud, thy transgressions, and, as a cloud, thy sins: return unto me; for I have redeemed thee. 
Sing, O ye heavens; for the LORD hath done it: shout, ye lower parts of the earth: break forth into singing, ye mountains, O forest, and every tree therein: for the LORD hath redeemed Jacob, and glorified himself in Israel. 
Thus saith the LORD, thy redeemer, and he that formed thee from the womb, I am the LORD that maketh all things; that stretcheth forth the heavens alone; that spreadeth abroad the earth by myself; 
That frustrateth the tokens of the liars, and maketh diviners mad; that turneth wise men backward, and maketh their knowledge foolish; 
That confirmeth the word of his servant, and performeth the counsel of his messengers; that saith to Jerusalem, Thou shalt be inhabited; and to the cities of Judah, Ye shall be built, and I will raise up the decayed places thereof: 
That saith 
803,r of the LORD. 
Then Hezekiah the king rose early, and gathered the rulers of the city, and went up to the house of the LORD. 
And they brought seven bullocks, and seven rams, and seven lambs, and seven he goats, for a sin offering for the kingdom, and for the sanctuary, and for Judah. And he commanded the priests the sons of Aaron to offer them on the altar of the LORD. 
So they killed the bullocks, and the priests received the blood, and sprinkled it on the altar: likewise, when they had killed the rams, they sprinkled the blood upon the altar: they killed also the lambs, and they sprinkled the blood upon the altar. 
And they brought forth the he goats for the sin offering before the king and the congregation; and they laid their hands upon them: 
And the priests killed them, and they made 
800,r they had made that the prison. 
When Jeremiah was entered into the dungeon, and into the cabins, and Jeremiah had remained there many days; 
Then Zedekiah the king sent, and took him out: and the king asked him secretly in his house, and said, Is there any word from the LORD? And Jeremiah said, There is: for, said he, thou shalt be delivered into the hand of the king of Babylon. 
Moreover Jeremiah said unto king Zedekiah, What have I offended against thee, or against thy servants, or against this people, that ye have put me in prison? 
Where are now your prophets which prophesied unto you, saying, The king of Babylon shall not come against you, nor against this land? 
Therefore hear now, I pray thee, O my lord the king: let my supplication, I pray thee, be accepted before thee; that thou
837,him! 
Therefore as the fire devoureth the stubble, and the flame consumeth the chaff, so their root shall be as rottenness, and their blossom shall go up as dust: because they have cast away the law of the LORD of hosts, and despised the word of the Holy One of Israel. 
Therefore is the anger of the LORD kindled against his people, and he hath stretched forth his hand against them, and hath smitten them: and the hills did tremble, and their carcases were torn in the midst of the streets. For all this his anger is not turned away, but his hand is stretched out still. 
And he will lift up an ensign to the nations from far, and will hiss unto them from the end of the earth: and, behold, they shall come with speed swiftly: 
None shall be weary nor stumble among them; none shall slumber nor sleep; neither shall the girdle of their
726,ood works, which they shall behold, glorify God in the day of visitation. 
Submit yourselves to every ordinance of man for the Lord's sake: whether it be to the king, as supreme; 
Or unto governors, as unto them that are sent by him for the punishment of evildoers, and for the praise of them that do well. 
For so is the will of God, that with well doing ye may put to silence the ignorance of foolish men: 
As free, and not using your liberty for a cloke of maliciousness, but as the servants of God. 
Honour all men. Love the brotherhood. Fear God. Honour the king. 
Servants, be subject to your masters with all fear; not only to the good and gentle, but also to the froward. 
For this is thankworthy, if a man for conscie
991,wed his people the power of his works, that he may give them the heritage of the heathen. 
The works of his hands are verity and judgment; all his commandments are sure. 
They stand fast for ever and ever, and are done in truth and uprightness. 
He sent redemption unto his people: he hath commanded his covenant for ever: holy and reverend is his name. 
The fear of the LORD is the beginning of wisdom: a good understanding have all they that do his commandments: his praise endureth for ever. 
Praise ye the LORD. Blessed is the man that feareth the LORD, that delighteth greatly in his commandments. 
His seed shall be mighty upon earth: the generation of the upright shall be blessed. 
Wealth and riches shall be in his house: and his righteousness endureth for ever. 
Unto the upright there ariseth light in the darkness: he is gracious, and full of compassion, and righteous. 
A good man sheweth favour, and lendeth: he will guide his affairs with discretion. 
Surely he shall not be m
779, will be empty. 
And when thou hast stayed three days, then thou shalt go down quickly, and come to the place where thou didst hide thyself when the business was in hand, and shalt remain by the stone Ezel. 
And I will shoot three arrows on the side thereof, as though I shot at a mark. 
And, behold, I will send a lad, saying, Go, find out the arrows. If I expressly say unto the lad, Behold, the arrows are on this side of thee, take them; then come thou: for there is peace to thee, and no hurt; as the LORD liveth. 
But if I say thus unto the young man, Behold, the arrows are beyond thee; go thy way: for the LORD hath sent thee away. 
And as touching the matter which thou and I have spoken of, behold, the LORD be between thee and me for ever. 
So David hid himself in the
865, vow which he had vowed: and she knew no man. And it was a custom in Israel, 
That the daughters of Israel went yearly to lament the daughter of Jephthah the Gileadite four days in a year. 
And the men of Ephraim gathered themselves together, and went northward, and said unto Jephthah, Wherefore passedst thou over to fight against the children of Ammon, and didst not call us to go with thee? we will burn thine house upon thee with fire. 
And Jephthah said unto them, I and my people were at great strife with the children of Ammon; and when I called you, ye delivered me not out of their hands. 
And when I saw that ye delivered me not, I put my life in my hands, and passed over against the children of Ammon, and the LORD delivered them into my hand: wherefore then are ye come up unto me this day, to fight against me? 
Then Jephthah gathered together all th
983,ple go, and they departed? 
Now therefore make a new cart, and take two milch kine, on which there hath come no yoke, and tie the kine to the cart, and bring their calves home from them: 
And take the ark of the LORD, and lay it upon the cart; and put the jewels of gold, which ye return him for a trespass offering, in a coffer by the side thereof; and send it away, that it may go. 
And see, if it goeth up by the way of his own coast to Bethshemesh, then he hath done us this great evil: but if not, then we shall know that it is not his hand that smote us: it was a chance that happened to us. 
And the men did so; and took two milch kine, and tied them to the cart, and shut up their calves at home: 
And they laid the ark of the LORD upon the cart, and the coffer with the mice of gold and the images of their emerods. 
And the kine took the straight way to the way of Bethshemesh, and went along the highway, lowing as they went, and turned not aside to the right hand or to t
800,ve fought against Rabbah, and have taken the city of waters. 
Now therefore gather the rest of the people together, and encamp against the city, and take it: lest I take the city, and it be called after my name. 
And David gathered all the people together, and went to Rabbah, and fought against it, and took it. 
And he took their king's crown from off his head, the weight whereof was a talent of gold with the precious stones: and it was set on David's head. And he brought forth the spoil of the city in great abundance. 
And he brought forth the people that were therein, and put them under saws, and under harrows of iron, and under axes of iron, and made them pass through the brick-kiln: and thus did he unto all the cities of the children of Ammon. So David and all the people returned unto 
827, but the LORD trieth the hearts. 
A wicked doer giveth heed to false lips; and a liar giveth ear to a naughty tongue. 
Whoso mocketh the poor reproacheth his Maker: and he that is glad at calamities shall not be unpunished. 
Children's children are the crown of old men; and the glory of children are their fathers. 
Excellent speech becometh not a fool: much less do lying lips a prince. 
A gift is as a precious stone in the eyes of him that hath it: whithersoever it turneth, it prospereth. 
He that covereth a transgression seeketh love; but he that repeateth a matter separateth very friends. 
A reproof entereth more into a wise man than an hundred stripes into a fool. 
An evil man seeketh only rebellion: therefore a cruel messenger shall be sent against him. 
Let a bear robbed of her whelps meet a man, rather than a 
739,e other answering rebuked him, saying, Dost not thou fear God, seeing thou art in the same condemnation? 
And we indeed justly; for we receive the due reward of our deeds: but this man hath done nothing amiss. 
And he said unto Jesus, Lord, remember me when thou comest into thy kingdom. 
And Jesus said unto him, Verily I say unto thee, To day shalt thou be with me in paradise. 
And it was about the sixth hour, and there was a darkness over all the earth until the ninth hour. 
And the sun was darkened, and the veil of the temple was rent in the midst. 
And when Jesus had cried with a loud voice, he said, Father, into thy hands I commend my spirit: and having said thus, he gave up the ghost. 
Now when the centurion saw what was don
807, 
So I took the evidence of the purchase, both that which was sealed according to the law and custom, and that which was open: 
And I gave the evidence of the purchase unto Baruch the son of Neriah, the son of Maaseiah, in the sight of Hanameel mine uncle's son, and in the presence of the witnesses that subscribed the book of the purchase, before all the Jews that sat in the court of the prison. 
And I charged Baruch before them, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Take these evidences, this evidence of the purchase, both which is sealed, and this evidence which is open; and put them in an earthen vessel, that they may continue many days. 
For thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Houses and fields and vineyards shall be possessed again in this land. 
Now when I h
757,Lord, how he had said unto him, Before the cock crow, thou shalt deny me thrice. 
And Peter went out, and wept bitterly. 
And the men that held Jesus mocked him, and smote him. 
And when they had blindfolded him, they struck him on the face, and asked him, saying, Prophesy, who is it that smote thee? 
And many other things blasphemously spake they against him. 
And as soon as it was day, the elders of the people and the chief priests and the scribes came together, and led him into their council, saying, 
Art thou the Christ? tell us. And he said unto them, If I tell you, ye will not believe: 
And if I also ask you, ye will not answer me, nor let me go. 
Hereafter shall the Son of man sit on the right hand of the power of God. 
Then said they all, 
833,make a full end of all nations whither I have scattered thee, yet I will not make a full end of thee: but I will correct thee in measure, and will not leave thee altogether unpunished. 
For thus saith the LORD, Thy bruise is incurable, and thy wound is grievous. 
There is none to plead thy cause, that thou mayest be bound up: thou hast no healing medicines. 
All thy lovers have forgotten thee; they seek thee not; for I have wounded thee with the wound of an enemy, with the chastisement of a cruel one, for the multitude of thine iniquity; because thy sins were increased. 
Why criest thou for thine affliction? thy sorrow is incurable for the multitude of thine iniquity: because thy sins were increased, I have done these things unto thee. 
Therefore all they that devour thee shall be devoured; and all thine adversaries, ever
874,. 
We give thanks to God and the Father of our Lord Jesus Christ, praying always for you, 
Since we heard of your faith in Christ Jesus, and of the love which ye have to all the saints, 
For the hope which is laid up for you in heaven, whereof ye heard before in the word of the truth of the gospel; 
Which is come unto you, as it is in all the world; and bringeth forth fruit, as it doth also in you, since the day ye heard of it, and knew the grace of God in truth: 
As ye also learned of Epaphras our dear fellowservant, who is for you a faithful minister of Christ; 
Who also declared unto us your love in the Spirit. 
For this cause we also, since the day we heard it, do not cease to pray for you, and to desire that ye might be filled with the knowledge of his will in all wisdom and spiritual understanding; 
That ye might walk worthy of the Lord unto all pleasing, 
904, seven. 
The sons of Judah; Pharez, Hezron, and Carmi, and Hur, and Shobal. 
And Reaiah the son of Shobal begat Jahath; and Jahath begat Ahumai, and Lahad. These are the families of the Zorathites. 
And these were of the father of Etam; Jezreel, and Ishma, and Idbash: and the name of their sister was Hazelelponi: 
And Penuel the father of Gedor, and Ezer the father of Hushah. These are the sons of Hur, the firstborn of Ephratah, the father of Bethlehem. 
And Ashur the father of Tekoa had two wives, Helah and Naarah. 
And Naarah bare him Ahuzam, and Hepher, and Temeni, and Haahashtari. These were the sons of Naarah. 
And the sons of Helah were, Zereth, and Jezoar, and Ethnan. 
And Coz begat Anub, and Zobebah, and the families of Aharhel the son of Harum. 
And Jabez was more honourable than his brethren: and his mother called his name Jabez, saying, Because I bare him with sorrow. 
And Jabez c
760, of Azariah, the son of Zephaniah, 
The son of Tahath, the son of Assir, the son of Ebiasaph, the son of Korah, 
The son of Izhar, the son of Kohath, the son of Levi, the son of Israel. 
And his brother Asaph, who stood on his right hand, even Asaph the son of Berachiah, the son of Shimea, 
The son of Michael, the son of Baaseiah, the son of Malchiah, 
The son of Ethni, the son of Zerah, the son of Adaiah, 
The son of Ethan, the son of Zimmah, the son of Shimei, 
The son of Jahath, the son of Gershom, the son of Levi. 
And their brethren the sons of Merari stood on the left hand: Ethan the son of Kishi, the son of Abdi, the son of Malluch, 
The son of Hashabiah, the son of Amaziah, the son of Hilkiah, 
The son of Amzi, the son of Bani, the son of Sha
1076,t in the mouth of all his prophets. And the Lord said, Thou shalt entice him, and thou shalt also prevail: go out, and do even so. 
Now therefore, behold, the LORD hath put a lying spirit in the mouth of these thy prophets, and the LORD hath spoken evil against thee. 
Then Zedekiah the son of Chenaanah came near, and smote Micaiah upon the cheek, and said, Which way went the Spirit of the LORD from me to speak unto thee? 
And Micaiah said, Behold, thou shalt see on that day when thou shalt go into an inner chamber to hide thyself. 
Then the king of Israel said, Take ye Micaiah, and carry him back to Amon the governor of the city, and to Joash the king's son; 
And say, Thus saith the king, Put this fellow in the prison, and feed him with bread of affliction and with water of affliction, until I return in peace. 
And Micaiah said, If thou certainly return in peace, then hath not the LORD spoken by me. And he said, Hearken, all ye people. 
So the king of Israel and Jehoshaphat the king of Judah went up to Ramothgilead. 
And the king of Israel said unto Jehoshapha
995,or ever. 
Now after this it came to pass, that David smote the Philistines, and subdued them, and took Gath and her towns out of the hand of the Philistines. 
And he smote Moab; and the Moabites became David's servants, and brought gifts. 
And David smote Hadarezer king of Zobah unto Hamath, as he went to stablish his dominion by the river Euphrates. 
And David took from him a thousand chariots, and seven thousand horsemen, and twenty thousand footmen: David also houghed all the chariot horses, but reserved of them an hundred chariots. 
And when the Syrians of Damascus came to help Hadarezer king of Zobah, David slew of the Syrians two and twenty thousand men. 
Then David put garrisons in Syriadamascus; and the Syrians became David's servants, and brought gifts. Thus the LORD preserved David whithersoever he went. 
And David took the shields of gold that were on the servants of Hadarezer, and brought them to Jerusalem. 
Likewise from Tibhath, and from Chun, cities of Hadarezer, br
943,rs: therefore have I made thee a reproach unto the heathen, and a mocking to all countries. 
Those that be near, and those that be far from thee, shall mock thee, which art infamous and much vexed. 
Behold, the princes of Israel, every one were in thee to their power to shed blood. 
In thee have they set light by father and mother: in the midst of thee have they dealt by oppression with the stranger: in thee have they vexed the fatherless and the widow. 
Thou hast despised mine holy things, and hast profaned my sabbaths. 
In thee are men that carry tales to shed blood: and in thee they eat upon the mountains: in the midst of thee they commit lewdness. 
In thee have they discovered their fathers' nakedness: in thee have they humbled her that was set apart for pollution. 
And one hath committed abomination with his neighbour's wife; and another hath lewdly defiled his daughter in law; and another in thee hath humbled his sister, hi
836,u's wife: and she bare to Esau Jeush, and Jaalam, and Korah. 
These were dukes of the sons of Esau: the sons of Eliphaz the firstborn son of Esau; duke Teman, duke Omar, duke Zepho, duke Kenaz, 
Duke Korah, duke Gatam, and duke Amalek: these are the dukes that came of Eliphaz in the land of Edom; these were the sons of Adah. 
And these are the sons of Reuel Esau's son; duke Nahath, duke Zerah, duke Shammah, duke Mizzah: these are the dukes that came of Reuel in the land of Edom; these are the sons of Bashemath Esau's wife. 
And these are the sons of Aholibamah Esau's wife; duke Jeush, duke Jaalam, duke Korah: these were the dukes that came of Aholibamah the daughter of Anah, Esau's wife. 
These are the sons of Esau, who is Edom, and these are their dukes. 
These are the sons of Seir the Horite, who inhabited the land; Lotan,
978,n the swelling of Jordan? 
For even thy brethren, and the house of thy father, even they have dealt treacherously with thee; yea, they have called a multitude after thee: believe them not, though they speak fair words unto thee. 
I have forsaken mine house, I have left mine heritage; I have given the dearly beloved of my soul into the hand of her enemies. 
Mine heritage is unto me as a lion in the forest; it crieth out against me: therefore have I hated it. 
Mine heritage is unto me as a speckled bird, the birds round about are against her; come ye, assemble all the beasts of the field, come to devour. 
Many pastors have destroyed my vineyard, they have trodden my portion under foot, they have made my pleasant portion a desolate wilderness. 
They have made it desolate, and being desolate it mourneth unto me; the whole land is made desolate, because no man layeth it to heart. 
The spoilers are come upon all high places through the wilderness: for the sword of the L
1070,
David therefore sent out spies, and understood that Saul was come in very deed. 
And David arose, and came to the place where Saul had pitched: and David beheld the place where Saul lay, and Abner the son of Ner, the captain of his host: and Saul lay in the trench, and the people pitched round about him. 
Then answered David and said to Ahimelech the Hittite, and to Abishai the son of Zeruiah, brother to Joab, saying, Who will go down with me to Saul to the camp? And Abishai said, I will go down with thee. 
So David and Abishai came to the people by night: and, behold, Saul lay sleeping within the trench, and his spear stuck in the ground at his bolster: but Abner and the people lay round about him. 
Then said Abishai to David, God hath delivered thine enemy into thine hand this day: now therefore let me smite him, I pray thee, with the spear even to the earth at once, and I will not smite him the second time. 
And David said to Abishai, Destroy him not: for who can stretch forth his hand against the LORD's anointed, and be guiltless? 
David said furthe
732,r strength is laid waste. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that Tyre shall be forgotten seventy years, according to the days of one king: after the end of seventy years shall Tyre sing as an harlot. 
Take an harp, go about the city, thou harlot that hast been forgotten; make sweet melody, sing many songs, that thou mayest be remembered. 
And it shall come to pass after the end of seventy years, that the LORD will visit Tyre, and she shall turn to her hire, and shall commit fornication with all the kingdoms of the world upon the face of the earth. 
And her merchandise and her hire shall be holiness to the LORD: it shall not be treasured nor laid up; for her merchandise shall be for them that dwell before the LORD, to
1028,fore the LORD God, the God of Israel. 
For I will cast out the nations before thee, and enlarge thy borders: neither shall any man desire thy land, when thou shalt go up to appear before the LORD thy God thrice in the year. 
Thou shalt not offer the blood of my sacrifice with leaven; neither shall the sacrifice of the feast of the passover be left unto the morning. 
The first of the firstfruits of thy land thou shalt bring unto the house of the LORD thy God. Thou shalt not seethe a kid in his mother's milk. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Write thou these words: for after the tenor of these words I have made a covenant with thee and with Israel. 
And he was there with the LORD forty days and forty nights; he did neither eat bread, nor drink water. And he wrote upon the tables the words of the covenant, the ten commandments. 
And it came to pass, when Moses came down from mount Sinai with the two tables of testimony in Moses' hand, when he came down from the mount, that Moses wist not that the skin of his face shon
960,rness, and cities which are not inhabited. 
And I will prepare destroyers against thee, every one with his weapons: and they shall cut down thy choice cedars, and cast them into the fire. 
And many nations shall pass by this city, and they shall say every man to his neighbour, Wherefore hath the LORD done thus unto this great city? 
Then they shall answer, Because they have forsaken the covenant of the LORD their God, and worshipped other gods, and served them. 
Weep ye not for the dead, neither bemoan him: but weep sore for him that goeth away: for he shall return no more, nor see his native country. 
For thus saith the LORD touching Shallum the son of Josiah king of Judah, which reigned instead of Josiah his father, which went forth out of this place; He shall not return thither any more: 
But he shall die in the place whither they have led him captive, and shall see this land no more. 
Woe unto him that buildeth his house by unrighteousness, a
836, saith the LORD, Set thine house in order: for thou shalt die, and not live. 
Then Hezekiah turned his face toward the wall, and prayed unto the LORD, 
And said, Remember now, O LORD, I beseech thee, how I have walked before thee in truth and with a perfect heart, and have done that which is good in thy sight. And Hezekiah wept sore. 
Then came the word of the LORD to Isaiah, saying, 
Go, and say to Hezekiah, Thus saith the LORD, the God of David thy father, I have heard thy prayer, I have seen thy tears: behold, I will add unto thy days fifteen years. 
And I will deliver thee and this city out of the hand of the king of Assyria: and I will defend this city. 
And this shall be a sign unto thee from the LORD, that the LORD will do this thing that he hath spoken; 
Behold, I will bring again the shadow of the degrees, which is 
731,y that were numbered of them were forty and three thousand and seven hundred and thirty. 
And the sons of Pallu; Eliab. 
And the sons of Eliab; Nemuel, and Dathan, and Abiram. This is that Dathan and Abiram, which were famous in the congregation, who strove against Moses and against Aaron in the company of Korah, when they strove against the LORD: 
And the earth opened her mouth, and swallowed them up together with Korah, when that company died, what time the fire devoured two hundred and fifty men: and they became a sign. 
Notwithstanding the children of Korah died not. 
The sons of Simeon after their families: of Nemuel, the family of the Nemuelites: of Jamin, the family of the Jaminites: of Jachin, the family of the Ja
904,ish the fruit of the stout heart of the king of Assyria, and the glory of his high looks. 
For he saith, By the strength of my hand I have done it, and by my wisdom; for I am prudent: and I have removed the bounds of the people, and have robbed their treasures, and I have put down the inhabitants like a valiant man: 
And my hand hath found as a nest the riches of the people: and as one gathereth eggs that are left, have I gathered all the earth; and there was none that moved the wing, or opened the mouth, or peeped. 
Shall the axe boast itself against him that heweth therewith? or shall the saw magnify itself against him that shaketh it? as if the rod should shake itself against them that lift it up, or as if the staff should lift up itself, as if it were no wood. 
Therefore shall the Lord, the Lord of hosts, send among his fat ones leanness; and under his glory he shall kindle a burning lik
764,ost thou not pardon my transgression, and take away my iniquity? for now shall I sleep in the dust; and thou shalt seek me in the morning, but I shall not be. 
Then answered Bildad the Shuhite, and said, 
How long wilt thou speak these things? and how long shall the words of thy mouth be like a strong wind? 
Doth God pervert judgment? or doth the Almighty pervert justice? 
If thy children have sinned against him, and he have cast them away for their transgression; 
If thou wouldest seek unto God betimes, and make thy supplication to the Almighty; 
If thou wert pure and upright; surely now he would awake for thee, and make the habitation of thy righteousness prosperous. 
Though thy beginning was small, yet thy latter end should greatly increase. 
For enqu
819,David, he sent messengers after Abner, which brought him again from the well of Sirah: but David knew it not. 
And when Abner was returned to Hebron, Joab took him aside in the gate to speak with him quietly, and smote him there under the fifth rib, that he died, for the blood of Asahel his brother. 
And afterward when David heard it, he said, I and my kingdom are guiltless before the LORD for ever from the blood of Abner the son of Ner: 
Let it rest on the head of Joab, and on all his father's house; and let there not fail from the house of Joab one that hath an issue, or that is a leper, or that leaneth on a staff, or that falleth on the sword, or that lacketh bread. 
So Joab, and Abishai his brother slew Abner, because he had slain their brother Asahel at Gibeon in the battle. 
And David said to Joab, and
935, heareth; not any of her vows, or of her bonds wherewith she hath bound her soul, shall stand: and the LORD shall forgive her, because her father disallowed her. 
And if she had at all an husband, when she vowed, or uttered ought out of her lips, wherewith she bound her soul; 
And her husband heard it, and held his peace at her in the day that he heard it: then her vows shall stand, and her bonds wherewith she bound her soul shall stand. 
But if her husband disallowed her on the day that he heard it; then he shall make her vow which she vowed, and that which she uttered with her lips, wherewith she bound her soul, of none effect: and the LORD shall forgive her. 
But every vow of a widow, and of her that is divorced, wherewith they have bound their souls, shall stand against her. 
And if she vowed in her husband's house, or bound her soul by a bond with an oath; 
And her husband heard it, and held his peace at her, and dis
732,time past, and it hath been testified to his owner, and he hath not kept him in, but that he hath killed a man or a woman; the ox shall be stoned, and his owner also shall be put to death. 
If there be laid on him a sum of money, then he shall give for the ransom of his life whatsoever is laid upon him. 
Whether he have gored a son, or have gored a daughter, according to this judgment shall it be done unto him. 
If the ox shall push a manservant or a maidservant; he shall give unto their master thirty shekels of silver, and the ox shall be stoned. 
And if a man shall open a pit, or if a man shall dig a pit, and not cover it, and an ox or an ass fall therein; 
The owner of the pit shall make it good, and give money unto the
896, was night. 
Therefore, when he was gone out, Jesus said, Now is the Son of man glorified, and God is glorified in him. 
If God be glorified in him, God shall also glorify him in himself, and shall straightway glorify him. 
Little children, yet a little while I am with you. Ye shall seek me: and as I said unto the Jews, Whither I go, ye cannot come; so now I say to you. 
A new commandment I give unto you, That ye love one another; as I have loved you, that ye also love one another. 
By this shall all men know that ye are my disciples, if ye have love one to another. 
Simon Peter said unto him, Lord, whither goest thou? Jesus answered him, Whither I go, thou canst not follow me now; but thou shalt follow me afterwards. 
Peter said unto him, Lord, why cannot I follow thee now? I will lay down my life for thy sake. 
Jesus answered him, Wilt thou lay down thy life for my sake? Verily, ve
812,shonites according to their families were thirteen cities with their suburbs. 
And unto the families of the children of Merari, the rest of the Levites, out of the tribe of Zebulun, Jokneam with her suburbs, and Kartah with her suburbs, 
Dimnah with her suburbs, Nahalal with her suburbs; four cities. 
And out of the tribe of Reuben, Bezer with her suburbs, and Jahazah with her suburbs, 
Kedemoth with her suburbs, and Mephaath with her suburbs; four cities. 
And out of the tribe of Gad, Ramoth in Gilead with her suburbs, to be a city of refuge for the slayer; and Mahanaim with her suburbs, 
Heshbon with her suburbs, Jazer with her suburbs; four cities in all. 
So all the cities for the children of Merari by their families, which were remaining of the families of the Levites, were by their lot twelve ci
1074,e Caesar: and, lo, God hath given thee all them that sail with thee. 
Wherefore, sirs, be of good cheer: for I believe God, that it shall be even as it was told me. 
Howbeit we must be cast upon a certain island. 
But when the fourteenth night was come, as we were driven up and down in Adria, about midnight the shipmen deemed that they drew near to some country; 
And sounded, and found it twenty fathoms: and when they had gone a little further, they sounded again, and found it fifteen fathoms. 
Then fearing lest we should have fallen upon rocks, they cast four anchors out of the stern, and wished for the day. 
And as the shipmen were about to flee out of the ship, when they had let down the boat into the sea, under colour as though they would have cast anchors out of the foreship, 
Paul said to the centurion and to the soldiers, Except these abide in the ship, ye cannot be saved. 
Then the soldiers cut off the ropes of the boat, and let her fall off. 
And while the day was coming on, Paul besought them all to take meat, saying, This day is the fourteenth day
920,side the burnt sacrifice of the morning. 
He slew also the bullock and the ram for a sacrifice of peace offerings, which was for the people: and Aaron's sons presented unto him the blood, which he sprinkled upon the altar round about, 
And the fat of the bullock and of the ram, the rump, and that which covereth the inwards, and the kidneys, and the caul above the liver: 
And they put the fat upon the breasts, and he burnt the fat upon the altar: 
And the breasts and the right shoulder Aaron waved for a wave offering before the LORD; as Moses commanded. 
And Aaron lifted up his hand toward the people, and blessed them, and came down from offering of the sin offering, and the burnt offering, and peace offerings. 
And Moses and Aaron went into the tabernacle of the congregation, and came out, and blessed the people: and the glory of the LORD appeared unto all the people. 
And there came a fire out from before 
1069,m; and if he repent, forgive him. 
And if he trespass against thee seven times in a day, and seven times in a day turn again to thee, saying, I repent; thou shalt forgive him. 
And the apostles said unto the Lord, Increase our faith. 
And the Lord said, If ye had faith as a grain of mustard seed, ye might say unto this sycamine tree, Be thou plucked up by the root, and be thou planted in the sea; and it should obey you. 
But which of you, having a servant plowing or feeding cattle, will say unto him by and by, when he is come from the field, Go and sit down to meat? 
And will not rather say unto him, Make ready wherewith I may sup, and gird thyself, and serve me, till I have eaten and drunken; and afterward thou shalt eat and drink? 
Doth he thank that servant because he did the things that were commanded him? I trow not. 
So likewise ye, when ye shall have done all those things which are commanded you, say, We are unprofitable servants: we have done that which was our duty to do. 
And it came to pass, as he went to Jerusalem, that he passed through the
1072,before the LORD, with their little ones, their wives, and their children. 
Then upon Jahaziel the son of Zechariah, the son of Benaiah, the son of Jeiel, the son of Mattaniah, a Levite of the sons of Asaph, came the Spirit of the LORD in the midst of the congregation; 
And he said, Hearken ye, all Judah, and ye inhabitants of Jerusalem, and thou king Jehoshaphat, Thus saith the LORD unto you, Be not afraid nor dismayed by reason of this great multitude; for the battle is not yours, but God's. 
To morrow go ye down against them: behold, they come up by the cliff of Ziz; and ye shall find them at the end of the brook, before the wilderness of Jeruel. 
Ye shall not need to fight in this battle: set yourselves, stand ye still, and see the salvation of the LORD with you, O Judah and Jerusalem: fear not, nor be dismayed; to morrow go out against them: for the LORD will be with you. 
And Jehoshaphat bowed his head with his face to the ground: and all Judah and the inhabitants of Jerusalem fell before the LORD, worshipping the LORD. 
And the Levites, of the childr
919,ead nor drinking wine; and ye say, He hath a devil. 
The Son of man is come eating and drinking; and ye say, Behold a gluttonous man, and a winebibber, a friend of publicans and sinners! 
But wisdom is justified of all her children. 
And one of the Pharisees desired him that he would eat with him. And he went into the Pharisee's house, and sat down to meat. 
And, behold, a woman in the city, which was a sinner, when she knew that Jesus sat at meat in the Pharisee's house, brought an alabaster box of ointment, 
And stood at his feet behind him weeping, and began to wash his feet with tears, and did wipe them with the hairs of her head, and kissed his feet, and anointed them with the ointment. 
Now when the Pharisee which had bidden him saw it, he spake within himself, saying, This man, if he were a prophet, would have known who and what manner of woman this is that toucheth him: for she is a sinner. 
And Je
780,hat are to be redeemed of the two hundred and threescore and thirteen of the firstborn of the children of Israel, which are more than the Levites; 
Thou shalt even take five shekels apiece by the poll, after the shekel of the sanctuary shalt thou take them: (the shekel is twenty gerahs:) 
And thou shalt give the money, wherewith the odd number of them is to be redeemed, unto Aaron and to his sons. 
And Moses took the redemption money of them that were over and above them that were redeemed by the Levites: 
Of the firstborn of the children of Israel took he the money; a thousand three hundred and threescore and five shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary: 
And Moses gave the money of them that were redeemed unto Aaron and to his sons, according to the word of the LOR
866,gypt, and will cause them to return into the land of Pathros, into the land of their habitation; and they shall be there a base kingdom. 
It shall be the basest of the kingdoms; neither shall it exalt itself any more above the nations: for I will diminish them, that they shall no more rule over the nations. 
And it shall be no more the confidence of the house of Israel, which bringeth their iniquity to remembrance, when they shall look after them: but they shall know that I am the Lord GOD. 
And it came to pass in the seven and twentieth year, in the first month, in the first day of the month, the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon caused his army to serve a great service against Tyrus: every head was made bald, and every shoulder was peeled: yet had he no wages, nor his army, for Tyrus, for the service tha
1007,; they shall run, and not be weary; and they shall walk, and not faint. 
Keep silence before me, O islands; and let the people renew their strength: let them come near; then let them speak: let us come near together to judgment. 
Who raised up the righteous man from the east, called him to his foot, gave the nations before him, and made him rule over kings? he gave them as the dust to his sword, and as driven stubble to his bow. 
He pursued them, and passed safely; even by the way that he had not gone with his feet. 
Who hath wrought and done it, calling the generations from the beginning? I the LORD, the first, and with the last; I am he. 
The isles saw it, and feared; the ends of the earth were afraid, drew near, and came. 
They helped every one his neighbour; and every one said to his brother, Be of good courage. 
So the carpenter encouraged the goldsmith, and he that smootheth with the hammer him that smote the anvil, saying, It is ready for the sodering: and he fastened it with nails, th
990, shall scoff at the kings, and the princes shall be a scorn unto them: they shall deride every strong hold; for they shall heap dust, and take it. 
Then shall his mind change, and he shall pass over, and offend, imputing this his power unto his god. 
Art thou not from everlasting, O LORD my God, mine Holy One? we shall not die. O LORD, thou hast ordained them for judgment; and, O mighty God, thou hast established them for correction. 
Thou art of purer eyes than to behold evil, and canst not look on iniquity: wherefore lookest thou upon them that deal treacherously, and holdest thy tongue when the wicked devoureth the man that is more righteous than he? 
And makest men as the fishes of the sea, as the creeping things, that have no ruler over them? 
They take up all of them with the angle, they catch them in their net, and gather them in their drag: therefore they rejoice and are glad. 
Therefore they sacrifice unto their net, and burn incense unto their drag; because by them 
882,r your furtherance and joy of faith; 
That your rejoicing may be more abundant in Jesus Christ for me by my coming to you again. 
Only let your conversation be as it becometh the gospel of Christ: that whether I come and see you, or else be absent, I may hear of your affairs, that ye stand fast in one spirit, with one mind striving together for the faith of the gospel; 
And in nothing terrified by your adversaries: which is to them an evident token of perdition, but to you of salvation, and that of God. 
For unto you it is given in the behalf of Christ, not only to believe on him, but also to suffer for his sake; 
Having the same conflict which ye saw in me, and now hear to be in me. 
If there be therefore any consolation in Christ, if any comfort of love, if any fellowship of the Spirit, if any bowels and mercies, 
Fulfil ye my joy, that ye be likeminded, having the sa
807,st me; and I will pardon all their iniquities, whereby they have sinned, and whereby they have transgressed against me. 
And it shall be to me a name of joy, a praise and an honour before all the nations of the earth, which shall hear all the good that I do unto them: and they shall fear and tremble for all the goodness and for all the prosperity that I procure unto it. 
Thus saith the LORD; Again there shall be heard in this place, which ye say shall be desolate without man and without beast, even in the cities of Judah, and in the streets of Jerusalem, that are desolate, without man, and without inhabitant, and without beast, 
The voice of joy, and the voice of gladness, the voice of the bridegroom, and the voice of the bride, the voice of them that shall say, Praise the LORD of hosts: for the 
782,o the general assembly and church of the firstborn, which are written in heaven, and to God the Judge of all, and to the spirits of just men made perfect, 
And to Jesus the mediator of the new covenant, and to the blood of sprinkling, that speaketh better things that that of Abel. 
See that ye refuse not him that speaketh. For if they escaped not who refused him that spake on earth, much more shall not we escape, if we turn away from him that speaketh from heaven: 
Whose voice then shook the earth: but now he hath promised, saying, Yet once more I shake not the earth only, but also heaven. 
And this word, Yet once more, signifieth the removing of those things that are shaken, as of things that are made, that those things which cannot be shaken may remain. 
Wherefore we re
1000,as king in Jeshurun, when the heads of the people and the tribes of Israel were gathered together. 
Let Reuben live, and not die; and let not his men be few. 
And this is the blessing of Judah: and he said, Hear, LORD, the voice of Judah, and bring him unto his people: let his hands be sufficient for him; and be thou an help to him from his enemies. 
And of Levi he said, Let thy Thummim and thy Urim be with thy holy one, whom thou didst prove at Massah, and with whom thou didst strive at the waters of Meribah; 
Who said unto his father and to his mother, I have not seen him; neither did he acknowledge his brethren, nor knew his own children: for they have observed thy word, and kept thy covenant. 
They shall teach Jacob thy judgments, and Israel thy law: they shall put incense before thee, and whole burnt sacrifice upon thine altar. 
Bless, LORD, his substance, and accept the work of his hands; smite through the loins of them that rise against him, and of them that hate him, that they 
812,erusalem. 
Then came the word of the LORD unto the prophet Jeremiah saying, 
Thus saith the LORD, the God of Israel; Thus shall ye say to the king of Judah, that sent you unto me to enquire of me; Behold, Pharaoh's army, which is come forth to help you, shall return to Egypt into their own land. 
And the Chaldeans shall come again, and fight against this city, and take it, and burn it with fire. 
Thus saith the LORD; Deceive not yourselves, saying, The Chaldeans shall surely depart from us: for they shall not depart. 
For though ye had smitten the whole army of the Chaldeans that fight against you, and there remained but wounded men among them, yet should they rise up every man in his tent, and burn this city with fire. 
And it came to pass, that when the army of the Chaldeans was broken up from Jerus
903,ot be accepted. 
Ye shall not offer unto the LORD that which is bruised, or crushed, or broken, or cut; neither shall ye make any offering thereof in your land. 
Neither from a stranger's hand shall ye offer the bread of your God of any of these; because their corruption is in them, and blemishes be in them: they shall not be accepted for you. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
When a bullock, or a sheep, or a goat, is brought forth, then it shall be seven days under the dam; and from the eighth day and thenceforth it shall be accepted for an offering made by fire unto the LORD. 
And whether it be cow, or ewe, ye shall not kill it and her young both in one day. 
And when ye will offer a sacrifice of thanksgiving unto the LORD, offer it at your own will. 
On the same day it shall be eaten up; ye shall leave none of it until the morrow: I am the LORD. 
Therefore shall ye keep my command
794,him mortally that he die, and fleeth into one of these cities: 
Then the elders of his city shall send and fetch him thence, and deliver him into the hand of the avenger of blood, that he may die. 
Thine eye shall not pity him, but thou shalt put away the guilt of innocent blood from Israel, that it may go well with thee. 
Thou shalt not remove thy neighbour's landmark, which they of old time have set in thine inheritance, which thou shalt inherit in the land that the LORD thy God giveth thee to possess it. 
One witness shall not rise up against a man for any iniquity, or for any sin, in any sin that he sinneth: at the mouth of two witnesses, or at the mouth of three witnesses, shall the matter be established. 
If a false witness rise up against any man to testify against him that wh
992,t thy judgments, (which if a man do, he shall live in them;) and withdrew the shoulder, and hardened their neck, and would not hear. 
Yet many years didst thou forbear them, and testifiedst against them by thy spirit in thy prophets: yet would they not give ear: therefore gavest thou them into the hand of the people of the lands. 
Nevertheless for thy great mercies' sake thou didst not utterly consume them, nor forsake them; for thou art a gracious and merciful God. 
Now therefore, our God, the great, the mighty, and the terrible God, who keepest covenant and mercy, let not all the trouble seem little before thee, that hath come upon us, on our kings, on our princes, and on our priests, and on our prophets, and on our fathers, and on all thy people, since the time of the kings of Assyria unto this day. 
Howbeit thou art just in all that is brought upon us; for thou hast done right, but we have done wickedly: 
Neither have our kings, our princes, our priests, nor our fathers, ke
726,ere come from Bethany, he was hungry: 
And seeing a fig tree afar off having leaves, he came, if haply he might find any thing thereon: and when he came to it, he found nothing but leaves; for the time of figs was not yet. 
And Jesus answered and said unto it, No man eat fruit of thee hereafter for ever. And his disciples heard it. 
And they come to Jerusalem: and Jesus went into the temple, and began to cast out them that sold and bought in the temple, and overthrew the tables of the moneychangers, and the seats of them that sold doves; 
And would not suffer that any man should carry any vessel through the temple. 
And he taught, saying unto them, Is it not written, My house shall be called of all nations the house 
1064, them; for they are found. And on whom is all the desire of Israel? Is it not on thee, and on all thy father's house? 
And Saul answered and said, Am not I a Benjamite, of the smallest of the tribes of Israel? and my family the least of all the families of the tribe of Benjamin? wherefore then speakest thou so to me? 
And Samuel took Saul and his servant, and brought them into the parlour, and made them sit in the chiefest place among them that were bidden, which were about thirty persons. 
And Samuel said unto the cook, Bring the portion which I gave thee, of which I said unto thee, Set it by thee. 
And the cook took up the shoulder, and that which was upon it, and set it before Saul. And Samuel said, Behold that which is left! set it before thee, and eat: for unto this time hath it been kept for thee since I said, I have invited the people. So Saul did eat with Samuel that day. 
And when they were come down from the high place into the city, Samuel communed with Saul upon the top of the house. 
And they arose early: and it came to pass about the 
921,own lusts, 
And saying, Where is the promise of his coming? for since the fathers fell asleep, all things continue as they were from the beginning of the creation. 
For this they willingly are ignorant of, that by the word of God the heavens were of old, and the earth standing out of the water and in the water: 
Whereby the world that then was, being overflowed with water, perished: 
But the heavens and the earth, which are now, by the same word are kept in store, reserved unto fire against the day of judgment and perdition of ungodly men. 
But, beloved, be not ignorant of this one thing, that one day is with the Lord as a thousand years, and a thousand years as one day. 
The Lord is not slack concerning his promise, as some men count slackness; but is longsuffering to us-ward, not willing that any should perish, but that all should come to repentance. 
But the day of the Lord will come as a thief in the nig
897, Jordan before the Ephraimites: and it was so, that when those Ephraimites which were escaped said, Let me go over; that the men of Gilead said unto him, Art thou an Ephraimite? If he said, Nay; 
Then said they unto him, Say now Shibboleth: and he said Sibboleth: for he could not frame to pronounce it right. Then they took him, and slew him at the passages of Jordan: and there fell at that time of the Ephraimites forty and two thousand. 
And Jephthah judged Israel six years. Then died Jephthah the Gileadite, and was buried in one of the cities of Gilead. 
And after him Ibzan of Bethlehem judged Israel. 
And he had thirty sons, and thirty daughters, whom he sent abroad, and took in thirty daughters from abroad for his sons. And he judged Israel seven years. 
Then died Ibzan, and was buried at Bethlehem. 
And after him Elon, a Zebulonite, judged Israel; and he judged Israel ten years. 

862,t shall burn it upon the altar for a sweet savour unto the LORD; and the priest shall make an atonement for him, and it shall be forgiven him. 
And if he bring a lamb for a sin offering, he shall bring it a female without blemish. 
And he shall lay his hand upon the head of the sin offering, and slay it for a sin offering in the place where they kill the burnt offering. 
And the priest shall take of the blood of the sin offering with his finger, and put it upon the horns of the altar of burnt offering, and shall pour out all the blood thereof at the bottom of the altar: 
And he shall take away all the fat thereof, as the fat of the lamb is taken away from the sacrifice of the peace offerings; and the priest shall burn them upon the altar, according to the offerings made by fire unto the LORD: and the priest shall make an atonement for his sin that he
1038,he land. 
And they told him, and said, We came unto the land whither thou sentest us, and surely it floweth with milk and honey; and this is the fruit of it. 
Nevertheless the people be strong that dwell in the land, and the cities are walled, and very great: and moreover we saw the children of Anak there. 
The Amalekites dwell in the land of the south: and the Hittites, and the Jebusites, and the Amorites, dwell in the mountains: and the Canaanites dwell by the sea, and by the coast of Jordan. 
And Caleb stilled the people before Moses, and said, Let us go up at once, and possess it; for we are well able to overcome it. 
But the men that went up with him said, We be not able to go up against the people; for they are stronger than we. 
And they brought up an evil report of the land which they had searched unto the children of Israel, saying, The land, through which we have gone to search it, is a land that eateth up the inhabitants thereof; and all the people that we saw in it are men of a great stature. 
And there we saw 
780,hall burn thereon sweet incense every morning: when he dresseth the lamps, he shall burn incense upon it. 
And when Aaron lighteth the lamps at even, he shall burn incense upon it, a perpetual incense before the LORD throughout your generations. 
Ye shall offer no strange incense thereon, nor burnt sacrifice, nor meat offering; neither shall ye pour drink offering thereon. 
And Aaron shall make an atonement upon the horns of it once in a year with the blood of the sin offering of atonements: once in the year shall he make atonement upon it throughout your generations: it is most holy unto the LORD. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
When thou takest the sum of the children of Israel after their number, then shall they give every man a ransom for his soul unto the 
898,d carest for no man: for thou regardest not the person of men, but teachest the way of God in truth: Is it lawful to give tribute to Caesar, or not? 
Shall we give, or shall we not give? But he, knowing their hypocrisy, said unto them, Why tempt ye me? bring me a penny, that I may see it. 
And they brought it. And he saith unto them, Whose is this image and superscription? And they said unto him, Caesar's. 
And Jesus answering said unto them, Render to Caesar the things that are Caesar's, and to God the things that are God's. And they marvelled at him. 
Then come unto him the Sadducees, which say there is no resurrection; and they asked him, saying, 
Master, Moses wrote unto us, If a man's brother die, and leave his wife behind him, and leave no children, that his brother should take his wife, and raise up seed unto his brother. 
Now there were seven brethren: and the first took a wife
781, begat Uzza, and Ahihud. 
And Shaharaim begat children in the country of Moab, after he had sent them away; Hushim and Baara were his wives. 
And he begat of Hodesh his wife, Jobab, and Zibia, and Mesha, and Malcham, 
And Jeuz, and Shachia, and Mirma. These were his sons, heads of the fathers. 
And of Hushim he begat Abitub, and Elpaal. 
The sons of Elpaal; Eber, and Misham, and Shamed, who built Ono, and Lod, with the towns thereof: 
Beriah also, and Shema, who were heads of the fathers of the inhabitants of Aijalon, who drove away the inhabitants of Gath: 
And Ahio, Shashak, and Jeremoth, 
And Zebadiah, and Arad, and Ader, 
And Michael, and Ispah, and Joha, the sons of Beriah; 
And Zebadiah, and Meshullam, and Hezeki, and Heber, 
Ishmerai also, and Jezliah, and Jobab, 
782,t up his staff against thee, after the manner of Egypt. 
For yet a very little while, and the indignation shall cease, and mine anger in their destruction. 
And the LORD of hosts shall stir up a scourge for him according to the slaughter of Midian at the rock of Oreb: and as his rod was upon the sea, so shall he lift it up after the manner of Egypt. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that his burden shall be taken away from off thy shoulder, and his yoke from off thy neck, and the yoke shall be destroyed because of the anointing. 
He is come to Aiath, he is passed to Migron; at Michmash he hath laid up his carriages: 
They are gone over the passage: they have taken up their lodging at Geba; Ramah is afraid; Gibeah of Saul is fled. 
Lift up thy voice, O daughter of Ga
807,the servants, and asked what these things meant. 
And he said unto him, Thy brother is come; and thy father hath killed the fatted calf, because he hath received him safe and sound. 
And he was angry, and would not go in: therefore came his father out, and intreated him. 
And he answering said to his father, Lo, these many years do I serve thee, neither transgressed I at any time thy commandment: and yet thou never gavest me a kid, that I might make merry with my friends: 
But as soon as this thy son was come, which hath devoured thy living with harlots, thou hast killed for him the fatted calf. 
And he said unto him, Son, thou art ever with me, and all that I have is thine. 
It was meet that we should make merry, and be glad: for this thy brother was dead, and is alive again; and was lost, and i
738,eturn thou, and all thy servants. 
So the king returned, and came to Jordan. And Judah came to Gilgal, to go to meet the king, to conduct the king over Jordan. 
And Shimei the son of Gera, a Benjamite, which was of Bahurim, hasted and came down with the men of Judah to meet king David. 
And there were a thousand men of Benjamin with him, and Ziba the servant of the house of Saul, and his fifteen sons and his twenty servants with him; and they went over Jordan before the king. 
And there went over a ferry boat to carry over the king's household, and to do what he thought good. And Shimei the son of Gera fell down before the king, as he was come over Jordan; 
And said unto the king, Let not my lord impute iniquity unto me, neither
796,nto the priests for the passover offerings two thousand and six hundred small cattle and three hundred oxen. 
Conaniah also, and Shemaiah and Nethaneel, his brethren, and Hashabiah and Jeiel and Jozabad, chief of the Levites, gave unto the Levites for passover offerings five thousand small cattle, and five hundred oxen. 
So the service was prepared, and the priests stood in their place, and the Levites in their courses, according to the king's commandment. 
And they killed the passover, and the priests sprinkled the blood from their hands, and the Levites flayed them. 
And they removed the burnt offerings, that they might give according to the divisions of the families of the people, to offer unto the LORD, as it is written in the book of Moses. And so did they with the oxen. 
And they
963,ithin me; for I have grievously rebelled: abroad the sword bereaveth, at home there is as death. 
They have heard that I sigh: there is none to comfort me: all mine enemies have heard of my trouble; they are glad that thou hast done it: thou wilt bring the day that thou hast called, and they shall be like unto me. 
Let all their wickedness come before thee; and do unto them, as thou hast done unto me for all my transgressions: for my sighs are many, and my heart is faint. 
How hath the LORD covered the daughter of Zion with a cloud in his anger, and cast down from heaven unto the earth the beauty of Israel, and remembered not his footstool in the day of his anger! 
The LORD hath swallowed up all the habitations of Jacob, and hath not pitied: he hath thrown down in his wrath the strong holds of the daughter of Judah; he hath brought them down to the ground: he hath polluted the kingdom and the princes thereof. 
He hath cut off in his fierce anger all
736,hands, and rebuked thee yesternight. 
And Laban answered and said unto Jacob, These daughters are my daughters, and these children are my children, and these cattle are my cattle, and all that thou seest is mine: and what can I do this day unto these my daughters, or unto their children which they have born? 
Now therefore come thou, let us make a covenant, I and thou; and let it be for a witness between me and thee. 
And Jacob took a stone, and set it up for a pillar. 
And Jacob said unto his brethren, Gather stones; and they took stones, and made an heap: and they did eat there upon the heap. 
And Laban called it Jegarsahadutha: but Jacob called it Galeed. 
And Laban said, This heap is a witness between me and thee this day.
1025,eth of beasts upon them, with the poison of serpents of the dust. 
The sword without, and terror within, shall destroy both the young man and the virgin, the suckling also with the man of gray hairs. 
I said, I would scatter them into corners, I would make the remembrance of them to cease from among men: 
Were it not that I feared the wrath of the enemy, lest their adversaries should behave themselves strangely, and lest they should say, Our hand is high, and the LORD hath not done all this. 
For they are a nation void of counsel, neither is there any understanding in them. 
O that they were wise, that they understood this, that they would consider their latter end! 
How should one chase a thousand, and two put ten thousand to flight, except their Rock had sold them, and the LORD had shut them up? 
For their rock is not as our Rock, even our enemies themselves being judges. 
For their vine is of the vine of Sodom, and of the fields of Gomorrah: their grapes are grapes of gall, their clusters are bitter: 
Their
773,s, and of fishes. 
And there came of all people to hear the wisdom of Solomon, from all kings of the earth, which had heard of his wisdom. 
And Hiram king of Tyre sent his servants unto Solomon; for he had heard that they had anointed him king in the room of his father: for Hiram was ever a lover of David. 
And Solomon sent to Hiram, saying, 
Thou knowest how that David my father could not build an house unto the name of the LORD his God for the wars which were about him on every side, until the LORD put them under the soles of his feet. 
But now the LORD my God hath given me rest on every side, so that there is neither adversary nor evil occurrent. 
And, behold, I purpose to build an house unto the name of the LORD my God, as the LORD spake unto David my father,
1041,d unto him, Go not up after them; turn away from them, and come upon them over against the mulberry trees. 
And it shall be, when thou shalt hear a sound of going in the tops of the mulberry trees, that then thou shalt go out to battle: for God is gone forth before thee to smite the host of the Philistines. 
David therefore did as God commanded him: and they smote the host of the Philistines from Gibeon even to Gazer. 
And the fame of David went out into all lands; and the LORD brought the fear of him upon all nations. 
And David made him houses in the city of David, and prepared a place for the ark of God, and pitched for it a tent. 
Then David said, None ought to carry the ark of God but the Levites: for them hath the LORD chosen to carry the ark of God, and to minister unto him for ever. 
And David gathered all Israel together to Jerusalem, to bring up the ark of the LORD unto his place, which he had prepared for it. 
And David assembled the children of Aaron, and the Levites: 
Of the sons of Kohath; Uriel the chief, and h
1071,eof, that it may yield unto you the increase thereof: I am the LORD your God. 
Ye shall not eat any thing with the blood: neither shall ye use enchantment, nor observe times. 
Ye shall not round the corners of your heads, neither shalt thou mar the corners of thy beard. 
Ye shall not make any cuttings in your flesh for the dead, nor print any marks upon you: I am the LORD. 
Do not prostitute thy daughter, to cause her to be a whore; lest the land fall to whoredom, and the land become full of wickedness. 
Ye shall keep my sabbaths, and reverence my sanctuary: I am the LORD. 
Regard not them that have familiar spirits, neither seek after wizards, to be defiled by them: I am the LORD your God. 
Thou shalt rise up before the hoary head, and honour the face of the old man, and fear thy God: I am the LORD. 
And if a stranger sojourn with thee in your land, ye shall not vex him. 
But the stranger that dwelleth with you shall be unto you as one born among you, and thou shalt love him as thyself; for ye were strangers in the land of Egypt: I am the LORD your God. 
816,ch is called by thy name: for we do not present our supplications before thee for our righteousnesses, but for thy great mercies. 
O Lord, hear; O Lord, forgive; O Lord, hearken and do; defer not, for thine own sake, O my God: for thy city and thy people are called by thy name. 
And whiles I was speaking, and praying, and confessing my sin and the sin of my people Israel, and presenting my supplication before the LORD my God for the holy mountain of my God; 
Yea, whiles I was speaking in prayer, even the man Gabriel, whom I had seen in the vision at the beginning, being caused to fly swiftly, touched me about the time of the evening oblation. 
And he informed me, and talked with me, and said, O Daniel, I am now come forth to give thee skill and understanding. 
At the beginning of thy supplications the com
760,cause he followeth not us. 
But Jesus said, Forbid him not: for there is no man which shall do a miracle in my name, that can lightly speak evil of me. 
For he that is not against us is on our part. 
For whosoever shall give you a cup of water to drink in my name, because ye belong to Christ, verily I say unto you, he shall not lose his reward. 
And whosoever shall offend one of these little ones that believe in me, it is better for him that a millstone were hanged about his neck, and he were cast into the sea. 
And if thy hand offend thee, cut it off: it is better for thee to enter into life maimed, than having two hands to go into hell, into the fire that never shall be quenched: 
Where their worm dieth not, and the fire is not quenched. 
And if th
860,s Sarah. 
These are the families of the sons of Asher according to those that were numbered of them; who were fifty and three thousand and four hundred. 
Of the sons of Naphtali after their families: of Jahzeel, the family of the Jahzeelites: of Guni, the family of the Gunites: 
Of Jezer, the family of the Jezerites: of Shillem, the family of the Shillemites. 
These are the families of Naphtali according to their families: and they that were numbered of them were forty and five thousand and four hundred. 
These were the numbered of the children of Israel, six hundred thousand and a thousand seven hundred and thirty. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Unto these the land shall be divided for an inheritance according to the number of names. 
To many thou shalt give the more inheritance, and to few thou shalt give the less inheritance: to every 
881,hanaim: 
Ahimaaz was in Naphtali; he also took Basmath the daughter of Solomon to wife: 
Baanah the son of Hushai was in Asher and in Aloth: 
Jehoshaphat the son of Paruah, in Issachar: 
Shimei the son of Elah, in Benjamin: 
Geber the son of Uri was in the country of Gilead, in the country of Sihon king of the Amorites, and of Og king of Bashan; and he was the only officer which was in the land. 
Judah and Israel were many, as the sand which is by the sea in multitude, eating and drinking, and making merry. 
And Solomon reigned over all kingdoms from the river unto the land of the Philistines, and unto the border of Egypt: they brought presents, and served Solomon all the days of his life. 
And Solomon's provision for one day was thirty measures of fine flour, and threescore measures of meal, 
Ten fat oxen, and twenty oxen out of the pastures, and an hundred sheep, bes
982,r of blood, until he stood before the congregation. 
Then came near the heads of the fathers of the Levites unto Eleazar the priest, and unto Joshua the son of Nun, and unto the heads of the fathers of the tribes of the children of Israel; 
And they spake unto them at Shiloh in the land of Canaan, saying, The LORD commanded by the hand of Moses to give us cities to dwell in, with the suburbs thereof for our cattle. 
And the children of Israel gave unto the Levites out of their inheritance, at the commandment of the LORD, these cities and their suburbs. 
And the lot came out for the families of the Kohathites: and the children of Aaron the priest, which were of the Levites, had by lot out of the tribe of Judah, and out of the tribe of Simeon, and out of the tribe of Benjamin, thirteen cities. 
And the rest of the children of Kohath had by lot out of the families of the tribe of Ephraim, and out of the tribe of Dan, and out of the half tribe of Manasseh, ten cities. 
An
823,o of every sort shalt thou bring into the ark, to keep them alive with thee; they shall be male and female. 
Of fowls after their kind, and of cattle after their kind, of every creeping thing of the earth after his kind, two of every sort shall come unto thee, to keep them alive. 
And take thou unto thee of all food that is eaten, and thou shalt gather it to thee; and it shall be for food for thee, and for them. 
Thus did Noah; according to all that God commanded him, so did he. 
And the LORD said unto Noah, Come thou and all thy house into the ark; for thee have I seen righteous before me in this generation. 
Of every clean beast thou shalt take to thee by sevens, the male and his female: and of beasts that are not clean by two, the male and his female. 
Of fowls also of the air by sevens, the male and the fema
885,ys of Solomon. 
And Solomon had forty thousand stalls of horses for his chariots, and twelve thousand horsemen. 
And those officers provided victual for king Solomon, and for all that came unto king Solomon's table, every man in his month: they lacked nothing. 
Barley also and straw for the horses and dromedaries brought they unto the place where the officers were, every man according to his charge. 
And God gave Solomon wisdom and understanding exceeding much, and largeness of heart, even as the sand that is on the sea shore. 
And Solomon's wisdom excelled the wisdom of all the children of the east country, and all the wisdom of Egypt. 
For he was wiser than all men; than Ethan the Ezrahite, and Heman, and Chalcol, and Darda, the sons of Mahol: and his fame was in all nations round about. 
And he spake three thousand proverbs: and his songs were a thousand and five. 
And 
965,l, even the whole congregation, into the desert of Zin in the first month: and the people abode in Kadesh; and Miriam died there, and was buried there. 
And there was no water for the congregation: and they gathered themselves together against Moses and against Aaron. 
And the people chode with Moses, and spake, saying, Would God that we had died when our brethren died before the LORD! 
And why have ye brought up the congregation of the LORD into this wilderness, that we and our cattle should die there? 
And wherefore have ye made us to come up out of Egypt, to bring us in unto this evil place? it is no place of seed, or of figs, or of vines, or of pomegranates; neither is there any water to drink. 
And Moses and Aaron went from the presence of the assembly unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, and they fell upon their faces: and the glory of the LORD appeared unto them. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Take the rod, and gather 
1029, and not killed; 
As sorrowful, yet alway rejoicing; as poor, yet making many rich; as having nothing, and yet possessing all things. 
O ye Corinthians, our mouth is open unto you, our heart is enlarged. 
Ye are not straitened in us, but ye are straitened in your own bowels. 
Now for a recompence in the same, (I speak as unto my children,) be ye also enlarged. 
Be ye not unequally yoked together with unbelievers: for what fellowship hath righteousness with unrighteousness? and what communion hath light with darkness? 
And what concord hath Christ with Belial? or what part hath he that believeth with an infidel? 
And what agreement hath the temple of God with idols? for ye are the temple of the living God; as God hath said, I will dwell in them, and walk in them; and I will be their God, and they shall be my people. 
Wherefore come out from among them, and be ye separate, saith the Lord, and touch not the unclean thing; and I will receive you. 
And will be a Father unto you, and ye shall be my sons and daughters, s
744,st it round about; let none thereof escape: recompense her according to her work; according to all that she hath done, do unto her: for she hath been proud against the LORD, against the Holy One of Israel. 
Therefore shall her young men fall in the streets, and all her men of war shall be cut off in that day, saith the LORD. 
Behold, I am against thee, O thou most proud, saith the Lord GOD of hosts: for thy day is come, the time that I will visit thee. 
And the most proud shall stumble and fall, and none shall raise him up: and I will kindle a fire in his cities, and it shall devour all round about him. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; The children of Israel and the children of Judah were oppressed together: and all that took them capti
1072,ding to thine own heart, and fulfil all thy counsel. 
We will rejoice in thy salvation, and in the name of our God we will set up our banners: the LORD fulfil all thy petitions. 
Now know I that the LORD saveth his anointed; he will hear him from his holy heaven with the saving strength of his right hand. 
Some trust in chariots, and some in horses: but we will remember the name of the LORD our God. 
They are brought down and fallen: but we are risen, and stand upright. 
Save, LORD: let the king hear us when we call. 
The king shall joy in thy strength, O LORD; and in thy salvation how greatly shall he rejoice! 
Thou hast given him his heart's desire, and hast not withholden the request of his lips. Selah. 
For thou preventest him with the blessings of goodness: thou settest a crown of pure gold on his head. 
He asked life of thee, and thou gavest it him, even length of days for ever and ever. 
His glory is great in thy salvation: honour and majesty hast thou laid upon him. 
For thou hast made him most blessed for ever: thou hast made him exceeding glad wi
1005,me the preaching might be fully known, and that all the Gentiles might hear: and I was delivered out of the mouth of the lion. 
And the Lord shall deliver me from every evil work, and will preserve me unto his heavenly kingdom: to whom be glory for ever and ever. Amen. 
Salute Prisca and Aquila, and the household of Onesiphorus. 
Erastus abode at Corinth: but Trophimus have I left at Miletum sick. 
Do thy diligence to come before winter. Eubulus greeteth thee, and Pudens, and Linus, and Claudia, and all the brethren. 
The Lord Jesus Christ be with thy spirit. Grace be with you. Amen. 
Paul, a servant of God, and an apostle of Jesus Christ, according to the faith of God's elect, and the acknowledging of the truth which is after godliness; 
In hope of eternal life, which God, that cannot lie, promised before the world began; 
But hath in due times manifested his word through preaching, which is committed unto me according to the commandment of God our Saviour; 
To Titus, mine own son after th
1025,an having ten pieces of silver, if she lose one piece, doth not light a candle, and sweep the house, and seek diligently till she find it? 
And when she hath found it, she calleth her friends and her neighbours together, saying, Rejoice with me; for I have found the piece which I had lost. 
Likewise, I say unto you, there is joy in the presence of the angels of God over one sinner that repenteth. 
And he said, A certain man had two sons: 
And the younger of them said to his father, Father, give me the portion of goods that falleth to me. And he divided unto them his living. 
And not many days after the younger son gathered all together, and took his journey into a far country, and there wasted his substance with riotous living. 
And when he had spent all, there arose a mighty famine in that land; and he began to be in want. 
And he went and joined himself to a citizen of that country; and he sent him into his fields to feed swine. 
And he would fain have filled his belly with the husks that the swine did eat: 
823,lvation hath appeared to all men, 
Teaching us that, denying ungodliness and worldly lusts, we should live soberly, righteously, and godly, in this present world; 
Looking for that blessed hope, and the glorious appearing of the great God and our Saviour Jesus Christ; 
Who gave himself for us, that he might redeem us from all iniquity, and purify unto himself a peculiar people, zealous of good works. 
These things speak, and exhort, and rebuke with all authority. Let no man despise thee. 
Put them in mind to be subject to principalities and powers, to obey magistrates, to be ready to every good work, 
To speak evil of no man, to be no brawlers, but gentle, shewing all meekness unto all men. 
For we ourselves also were sometimes foolish, disobedient, deceived, serving divers lusts and pleasures, living in malice 
832, unto the priest that shall be in those days, and say unto him, I profess this day unto the LORD thy God, that I am come unto the country which the LORD sware unto our fathers for to give us. 
And the priest shall take the basket out of thine hand, and set it down before the altar of the LORD thy God. 
And thou shalt speak and say before the LORD thy God, A Syrian ready to perish was my father, and he went down into Egypt, and sojourned there with a few, and became there a nation, great, mighty, and populous: 
And the Egyptians evil entreated us, and afflicted us, and laid upon us hard bondage: 
And when we cried unto the LORD God of our fathers, the LORD heard our voice, and looked on our affliction, and our labour, and our oppression: 
And the LORD brought us forth out of Egypt with a mighty hand, and with an outstretc
1003,f the priests made the ointment of the spices. 
And Mattithiah, one of the Levites, who was the firstborn of Shallum the Korahite, had the set office over the things that were made in the pans. 
And other of their brethren, of the sons of the Kohathites, were over the shewbread, to prepare it every sabbath. 
And these are the singers, chief of the fathers of the Levites, who remaining in the chambers were free: for they were employed in that work day and night. 
These chief fathers of the Levites were chief throughout their generations; these dwelt at Jerusalem. 
And in Gibeon dwelt the father of Gibeon, Jehiel, whose wife's name was Maachah: 
And his firstborn son Abdon, then Zur, and Kish, and Baal, and Ner, and Nadab. 
And Gedor, and Ahio, and Zechariah, and Mikloth. 
And Mikloth begat Shimeam. And they also dwelt with their brethren at Jerusalem, over against their brethren. 
And Ner begat Kish; and Kish begat Saul; and Saul begat Jonathan, and Malchishua, and Abinadab, and Eshbaal. 

886,of you that forsaketh not all that he hath, he cannot be my disciple. 
Salt is good: but if the salt have lost his savour, wherewith shall it be seasoned? 
It is neither fit for the land, nor yet for the dunghill; but men cast it out. He that hath ears to hear, let him hear. 
Then drew near unto him all the publicans and sinners for to hear him. 
And the Pharisees and scribes murmured, saying, This man receiveth sinners, and eateth with them. 
And he spake this parable unto them, saying, 
What man of you, having an hundred sheep, if he lose one of them, doth not leave the ninety and nine in the wilderness, and go after that which is lost, until he find it? 
And when he hath found it, he layeth it on his shoulders, rejoicing. 
And when he cometh home, he calleth together his friends and neighbours, saying unto them, Rejoice with me; for I have found my sheep which was lost. 
862, Israel like to the stars of the heavens. 
Joab the son of Zeruiah began to number, but he finished not, because there fell wrath for it against Israel; neither was the number put in the account of the chronicles of king David. 
And over the king's treasures was Azmaveth the son of Adiel: and over the storehouses in the fields, in the cities, and in the villages, and in the castles, was Jehonathan the son of Uzziah: 
And over them that did the work of the field for tillage of the ground was Ezri the son of Chelub: 
And over the vineyards was Shimei the Ramathite: over the increase of the vineyards for the wine cellars was Zabdi the Shiphmite: 
And over the olive trees and the sycomore trees that were in the low plains was Baalhanan the Gederite: and over the cellars of oil was Joash: 
And over the herds that fed in Sharon was Shitrai the Sharonite: a
722,nd the name of the second called he Ephraim: For God hath caused me to be fruitful in the land of my affliction. 
And the seven years of plenteousness, that was in the land of Egypt, were ended. 
And the seven years of dearth began to come, according as Joseph had said: and the dearth was in all lands; but in all the land of Egypt there was bread. 
And when all the land of Egypt was famished, the people cried to Pharaoh for bread: and Pharaoh said unto all the Egyptians, Go unto Joseph; what he saith to you, do. 
And the famine was over all the face of the earth: and Joseph opened all the storehouses, and sold unto the Egyptians; and the famine waxed sore in the land of Egypt. 
And all countries came into Egypt t
924,rusalem and of Samaria; 
Shall I not, as I have done unto Samaria and her idols, so do to Jerusalem and her idols? 
Wherefore it shall come to pass, that when the Lord hath performed his whole work upon mount Zion and on Jerusalem, I will punish the fruit of the stout heart of the king of Assyria, and the glory of his high looks. 
For he saith, By the strength of my hand I have done it, and by my wisdom; for I am prudent: and I have removed the bounds of the people, and have robbed their treasures, and I have put down the inhabitants like a valiant man: 
And my hand hath found as a nest the riches of the people: and as one gathereth eggs that are left, have I gathered all the earth; and there was none that moved the wing, or opened the mouth, or peeped. 
Shall the axe boast itself against him that heweth therewith? or shall the saw magnify itself against him that shaketh it? as if the rod should shake itself ag
764, more, but the word which I have spoken shall be done, saith the Lord GOD. 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, prophesy against the prophets of Israel that prophesy, and say thou unto them that prophesy out of their own hearts, Hear ye the word of the LORD; 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; Woe unto the foolish prophets, that follow their own spirit, and have seen nothing! 
O Israel, thy prophets are like the foxes in the deserts. 
Ye have not gone up into the gaps, neither made up the hedge for the house of Israel to stand in the battle in the day of the LORD. 
They have seen vanity and lying divination, saying, The LORD saith: and the LORD hath not sent them: and they have made others to hope that they would confirm the word. 
Have ye 
947,e of Israel. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; This is Jerusalem: I have set it in the midst of the nations and countries that are round about her. 
And she hath changed my judgments into wickedness more than the nations, and my statutes more than the countries that are round about her: for they have refused my judgments and my statutes, they have not walked in them. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Because ye multiplied more than the nations that are round about you, and have not walked in my statutes, neither have kept my judgments, neither have done according to the judgments of the nations that are round about you; 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I, even I, am against thee, and will execute judgments in the midst of thee in the sight of the nations. 
And I will do in thee that which I have not done, and whereunto I will not do any more the like, because of all thine abominations. 
Therefore the fathers shall eat the sons i
796,in saving my life; and I cannot escape to the mountain, lest some evil take me, and I die: 
Behold now, this city is near to flee unto, and it is a little one: Oh, let me escape thither, (is it not a little one?) and my soul shall live. 
And he said unto him, See, I have accepted thee concerning this thing also, that I will not overthrow this city, for the which thou hast spoken. 
Haste thee, escape thither; for I cannot do anything till thou be come thither. Therefore the name of the city was called Zoar. 
The sun was risen upon the earth when Lot entered into Zoar. 
Then the LORD rained upon Sodom and upon Gomorrah brimstone and fire from the LORD out of heaven; 
And he overthrew those cities, and all the plain, and all the inhabitants of the cities, and that which grew upon the grou
752,ut whom, when I was at Jerusalem, the chief priests and the elders of the Jews informed me, desiring to have judgment against him. 
To whom I answered, It is not the manner of the Romans to deliver any man to die, before that he which is accused have the accusers face to face, and have licence to answer for himself concerning the crime laid against him. 
Therefore, when they were come hither, without any delay on the morrow I sat on the judgment seat, and commanded the man to be brought forth. 
Against whom when the accusers stood up, they brought none accusation of such things as I supposed: 
But had certain questions against him of their own superstition, and of one Jesus, which was dead, whom Paul affirmed to be alive. 
And because I doubt
1032,ophesy, O son of man. 
And the Spirit of the LORD fell upon me, and said unto me, Speak; Thus saith the LORD; Thus have ye said, O house of Israel: for I know the things that come into your mind, every one of them. 
Ye have multiplied your slain in this city, and ye have filled the streets thereof with the slain. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Your slain whom ye have laid in the midst of it, they are the flesh, and this city is the caldron: but I will bring you forth out of the midst of it. 
Ye have feared the sword; and I will bring a sword upon you, saith the Lord GOD. 
And I will bring you out of the midst thereof, and deliver you into the hands of strangers, and will execute judgments among you. 
Ye shall fall by the sword; I will judge you in the border of Israel; and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
This city shall not be your caldron, neither shall ye be the flesh in the midst thereof; but I will judge you in the border of Israel: 
And ye shall know that I am the LORD: for ye have not walked in my statu
755, house of Aaron now say, that his mercy endureth for ever. 
Let them now that fear the LORD say, that his mercy endureth for ever. 
I called upon the LORD in distress: the LORD answered me, and set me in a large place. 
The LORD is on my side; I will not fear: what can man do unto me? 
The LORD taketh my part with them that help me: therefore shall I see my desire upon them that hate me. 
It is better to trust in the LORD than to put confidence in man. 
It is better to trust in the LORD than to put confidence in princes. 
All nations compassed me about: but in the name of the LORD will I destroy them. 
They compassed me about; yea, they compassed me about: but in the name of the LORD I will destroy them. 
They compassed me about like bees: they 
999,the stem of Jesse, and a Branch shall grow out of his roots: 
And the spirit of the LORD shall rest upon him, the spirit of wisdom and understanding, the spirit of counsel and might, the spirit of knowledge and of the fear of the LORD; 
And shall make him of quick understanding in the fear of the LORD: and he shall not judge after the sight of his eyes, neither reprove after the hearing of his ears: 
But with righteousness shall he judge the poor, and reprove with equity for the meek of the earth: and he shall smite the earth: with the rod of his mouth, and with the breath of his lips shall he slay the wicked. 
And righteousness shall be the girdle of his loins, and faithfulness the girdle of his reins. 
The wolf also shall dwell with the lamb, and the leopard shall lie down with the kid; and the calf and the young lion and the fatling together; and a little child shall lead them. 
And the cow and the bear shall feed; their young ones shall lie down together: and the lion shall eat st
838,these were the sons of Joktan. 
Shem, Arphaxad, Shelah, 
Eber, Peleg, Reu, 
Serug, Nahor, Terah, 
Abram; the same is Abraham. 
The sons of Abraham; Isaac, and Ishmael. 
These are their generations: The firstborn of Ishmael, Nebaioth; then Kedar, and Adbeel, and Mibsam, 
Mishma, and Dumah, Massa, Hadad, and Tema, 
Jetur, Naphish, and Kedemah. These are the sons of Ishmael. 
Now the sons of Keturah, Abraham's concubine: she bare Zimran, and Jokshan, and Medan, and Midian, and Ishbak, and Shuah. And the sons of Jokshan; Sheba, and Dedan. 
And the sons of Midian; Ephah, and Epher, and Henoch, and Abida, and Eldaah. All these are the sons of Keturah. 
And Abraham begat Isaac. The sons of Isaac; Esau and Israel. 
The sons of Esau; Eliphaz, Reuel, and Jeush, and Jaalam, and Korah. 
The sons of Eliphaz; Teman, and Omar, Zephi, and Gat
958,h. 
Princes are hanged up by their hand: the faces of elders were not honoured. 
They took the young men to grind, and the children fell under the wood. 
The elders have ceased from the gate, the young men from their musick. 
The joy of our heart is ceased; our dance is turned into mourning. 
The crown is fallen from our head: woe unto us, that we have sinned! 
For this our heart is faint; for these things our eyes are dim. 
Because of the mountain of Zion, which is desolate, the foxes walk upon it. 
Thou, O LORD, remainest for ever; thy throne from generation to generation. 
Wherefore dost thou forget us for ever, and forsake us so long time? 
Turn thou us unto thee, O LORD, and we shall be turned; renew our days as of old. 
But thou hast utterly rejected us; thou art very wroth against us. 
Now it came to pass in the thirtieth year, in the fourth month, in the fifth day of the month, as I was among the captives by the river of Chebar, that th
787,isciples to them that were set down; and likewise of the fishes as much as they would. 
When they were filled, he said unto his disciples, Gather up the fragments that remain, that nothing be lost. 
Therefore they gathered them together, and filled twelve baskets with the fragments of the five barley loaves, which remained over and above unto them that had eaten. 
Then those men, when they had seen the miracle that Jesus did, said, This is of a truth that prophet that should come into the world. 
When Jesus therefore perceived that they would come and take him by force, to make him a king, he departed again into a mountain himself alone. 
And when even was now come, his disciples went down unto the sea, 
And entered into a ship, and went over the sea toward Capernaum. And it w
976, years. 
Wherefore I was grieved with that generation, and said, They do alway err in their heart; and they have not known my ways. 
So I sware in my wrath, They shall not enter into my rest.) 
Take heed, brethren, lest there be in any of you an evil heart of unbelief, in departing from the living God. 
But exhort one another daily, while it is called To day; lest any of you be hardened through the deceitfulness of sin. 
For we are made partakers of Christ, if we hold the beginning of our confidence stedfast unto the end; 
While it is said, To day if ye will hear his voice, harden not your hearts, as in the provocation. 
For some, when they had heard, did provoke: howbeit not all that came out of Egypt by Moses. 
But with whom was he grieved forty years? was it not with them that had sinned, whose carcases fell in the wilderness? 
And to whom sware he that they should not enter into his rest, but to them that believed not? 
So we see that they could not enter in
858,: for he had pitched a tent for it at Jerusalem. 
Moreover the brasen altar, that Bezaleel the son of Uri, the son of Hur, had made, he put before the tabernacle of the LORD: and Solomon and the congregation sought unto it. 
And Solomon went up thither to the brasen altar before the LORD, which was at the tabernacle of the congregation, and offered a thousand burnt offerings upon it. 
In that night did God appear unto Solomon, and said unto him, Ask what I shall give thee. 
And Solomon said unto God, Thou hast shewed great mercy unto David my father, and hast made me to reign in his stead. 
Now, O LORD God, let thy promise unto David my father be established: for thou hast made me king over a people like the dust of the earth in multitude. 
Give me now wisdom and knowledge, that I may go out and come in before this people: for who can judge this 
972,y unto thee in our affliction, then thou wilt hear and help. 
And now, behold, the children of Ammon and Moab and mount Seir, whom thou wouldest not let Israel invade, when they came out of the land of Egypt, but they turned from them, and destroyed them not; 
Behold, I say, how they reward us, to come to cast us out of thy possession, which thou hast given us to inherit. 
O our God, wilt thou not judge them? for we have no might against this great company that cometh against us; neither know we what to do: but our eyes are upon thee. 
And all Judah stood before the LORD, with their little ones, their wives, and their children. 
Then upon Jahaziel the son of Zechariah, the son of Benaiah, the son of Jeiel, the son of Mattaniah, a Levite of the sons of Asaph, came the Spirit of the LORD in the midst of the congregation; 
And he said, Hearken ye, all Judah, and ye inhabitants of Jerusalem, and thou king Jehoshaphat, Thus saith the LORD unto you, Be not afraid 
1028, place, because it is thy due, and thy sons' due, of the sacrifices of the LORD made by fire: for so I am commanded. 
And the wave breast and heave shoulder shall ye eat in a clean place; thou, and thy sons, and thy daughters with thee: for they be thy due, and thy sons' due, which are given out of the sacrifices of peace offerings of the children of Israel. 
The heave shoulder and the wave breast shall they bring with the offerings made by fire of the fat, to wave it for a wave offering before the LORD; and it shall be thine, and thy sons' with thee, by a statute for ever; as the LORD hath commanded. 
And Moses diligently sought the goat of the sin offering, and, behold, it was burnt: and he was angry with Eleazar and Ithamar, the sons of Aaron which were left alive, saying, 
Wherefore have ye not eaten the sin offering in the holy place, seeing it is most holy, and God hath given it you to bear the iniquity of the congregation, to make atonement for them before the LORD? 
Behold, the blood of it was not brought
882,ng the book of records of the chronicles; and they were read before the king. 
And it was found written, that Mordecai had told of Bigthana and Teresh, two of the king's chamberlains, the keepers of the door, who sought to lay hand on the king Ahasuerus. 
And the king said, What honour and dignity hath been done to Mordecai for this? Then said the king's servants that ministered unto him, There is nothing done for him. 
And the king said, Who is in the court? Now Haman was come into the outward court of the king's house, to speak unto the king to hang Mordecai on the gallows that he had prepared for him. 
And the king's servants said unto him, Behold, Haman standeth in the court. And the king said, Let him come in. 
So Haman came in. And the king said unto him, What shall be done unto the man whom the king delighteth to honour? Now Haman thought in his heart, To whom wo
877,erformed all that the king commanded. And after that God was intreated for the land. 
Moreover the Philistines had yet war again with Israel; and David went down, and his servants with him, and fought against the Philistines: and David waxed faint. 
And Ishbibenob, which was of the sons of the giant, the weight of whose spear weighed three hundred shekels of brass in weight, he being girded with a new sword, thought to have slain David. 
But Abishai the son of Zeruiah succoured him, and smote the Philistine, and killed him. Then the men of David sware unto him, saying, Thou shalt go no more out with us to battle, that thou quench not the light of Israel. 
And it came to pass after this, that there was again a battle with the Philistines at Gob: then Sibbechai the Hushathite slew Saph, which was of the sons of the giant. 
And there was again a battle in Gob with the
1059,be despised. 
He that is despised, and hath a servant, is better than he that honoureth himself, and lacketh bread. 
A righteous man regardeth the life of his beast: but the tender mercies of the wicked are cruel. 
He that tilleth his land shall be satisfied with bread: but he that followeth vain persons is void of understanding. 
The wicked desireth the net of evil men: but the root of the righteous yieldeth fruit. 
The wicked is snared by the transgression of his lips: but the just shall come out of trouble. 
A man shall be satisfied with good by the fruit of his mouth: and the recompence of a man's hands shall be rendered unto him. 
The way of a fool is right in his own eyes: but he that hearkeneth unto counsel is wise. 
A fool's wrath is presently known: but a prudent man covereth shame. 
He that speaketh truth sheweth forth righteousness: but a false witness deceit. 
There is that speaketh like the piercings of a sword: but the tongue of the wise is health. 
The lip of truth shall be established for ever: but a lying tongue is but for a m
774,en the ancient high places are ours in possession: 
Therefore prophesy and say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Because they have made you desolate, and swallowed you up on every side, that ye might be a possession unto the residue of the heathen, and ye are taken up in the lips of talkers, and are an infamy of the people: 
Therefore, ye mountains of Israel, hear the word of the Lord GOD; Thus saith the Lord GOD to the mountains, and to the hills, to the rivers, and to the valleys, to the desolate wastes, and to the cities that are forsaken, which became a prey and derision to the residue of the heathen that are round about; 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Surely in the fire of my jealousy have I spoken against the residue of the heathen, and against all Idumea, whic
734,he thing wherein they dealt proudly he was above them. 
And Jethro, Moses' father in law, took a burnt offering and sacrifices for God: and Aaron came, and all the elders of Israel, to eat bread with Moses' father in law before God. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, that Moses sat to judge the people: and the people stood by Moses from the morning unto the evening. 
And when Moses' father in law saw all that he did to the people, he said, What is this thing that thou doest to the people? why sittest thou thyself alone, and all the people stand by thee from morning unto even? 
And Moses said unto his father in law, Because the people come unto me to enquire of God: 
When they have a matter, they come unto me; and I judge be
1040,to us, and bless us; and cause his face to shine upon us; Selah. 
That thy way may be known upon earth, thy saving health among all nations. 
Let the people praise thee, O God; let all the people praise thee. 
O let the nations be glad and sing for joy: for thou shalt judge the people righteously, and govern the nations upon earth. Selah. 
Let the people praise thee, O God; let all the people praise thee. 
Then shall the earth yield her increase; and God, even our own God, shall bless us. 
God shall bless us; and all the ends of the earth shall fear him. 
Let God arise, let his enemies be scattered: let them also that hate him flee before him. 
As smoke is driven away, so drive them away: as wax melteth before the fire, so let the wicked perish at the presence of God. 
But let the righteous be glad; let them rejoice before God: yea, let them exceedingly rejoice. 
Sing unto God, sing praises to his name: extol him that rideth upon the heavens by his name JAH, and rejoice before him. 
A father of the fatherless, and a judge of
744,as come into his own country, he taught them in their synagogue, insomuch that they were astonished, and said, Whence hath this man this wisdom, and these mighty works? 
Is not this the carpenter's son? is not his mother called Mary? and his brethren, James, and Joses, and Simon, and Judas? 
And his sisters, are they not all with us? Whence then hath this man all these things? 
And they were offended in him. But Jesus said unto them, A prophet is not without honour, save in his own country, and in his own house. 
And he did not many mighty works there because of their unbelief. 
At that time Herod the tetrarch heard of the fame of Jesus, 
And said unto his servants, This is John the Baptist; he is risen from the dead; and therefore mi
929,
Then came the children of Israel, even the whole congregation, into the desert of Zin in the first month: and the people abode in Kadesh; and Miriam died there, and was buried there. 
And there was no water for the congregation: and they gathered themselves together against Moses and against Aaron. 
And the people chode with Moses, and spake, saying, Would God that we had died when our brethren died before the LORD! 
And why have ye brought up the congregation of the LORD into this wilderness, that we and our cattle should die there? 
And wherefore have ye made us to come up out of Egypt, to bring us in unto this evil place? it is no place of seed, or of figs, or of vines, or of pomegranates; neither is there any water to drink. 
And Moses and Aaron went from the presence of the assembly unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, and they fell upon their faces: and the glory of the LORD appeared unto them
975,ding to their service was: 
Of the sons of Asaph; Zaccur, and Joseph, and Nethaniah, and Asarelah, the sons of Asaph under the hands of Asaph, which prophesied according to the order of the king. 
Of Jeduthun: the sons of Jeduthun; Gedaliah, and Zeri, and Jeshaiah, Hashabiah, and Mattithiah, six, under the hands of their father Jeduthun, who prophesied with a harp, to give thanks and to praise the LORD. 
Of Heman: the sons of Heman: Bukkiah, Mattaniah, Uzziel, Shebuel, and Jerimoth, Hananiah, Hanani, Eliathah, Giddalti, and Romamtiezer, Joshbekashah, Mallothi, Hothir, and Mahazioth: 
All these were the sons of Heman the king's seer in the words of God, to lift up the horn. And God gave to Heman fourteen sons and three daughters. 
All these were under the hands of their father for song in the house of the LORD, with cymbals, psalteries, and harps, for the service of the house of God, according to the king's order to Asaph, Jeduthun, and Heman. 
So the number of 
825,ten thousand westward: and it shall be over against the oblation of the holy portion; and the increase thereof shall be for food unto them that serve the city. 
And they that serve the city shall serve it out of all the tribes of Israel. 
All the oblation shall be five and twenty thousand by five and twenty thousand: ye shall offer the holy oblation foursquare, with the possession of the city. 
And the residue shall be for the prince, on the one side and on the other of the holy oblation, and of the possession of the city, over against the five and twenty thousand of the oblation toward the east border, and westward over against the five and twenty thousand toward the west border, over against the portions for the prince: and it shall be the holy oblation; and the sanctuary of the house shall be in the midst there
789,For the king had taken counsel, and his princes, and all the congregation in Jerusalem, to keep the passover in the second month. 
For they could not keep it at that time, because the priests had not sanctified themselves sufficiently, neither had the people gathered themselves together to Jerusalem. 
And the thing pleased the king and all the congregation. 
So they established a decree to make proclamation throughout all Israel, from Beersheba even to Dan, that they should come to keep the passover unto the LORD God of Israel at Jerusalem: for they had not done it of a long time in such sort as it was written. 
So the posts went with the letters from the king and his princes throughout all Israel and Judah, and according to the commandment of the king, saying, Ye children of Is
782, the Gadites. 
And the rest of Gilead, and all Bashan, being the kingdom of Og, gave I unto the half tribe of Manasseh; all the region of Argob, with all Bashan, which was called the land of giants. 
Jair the son of Manasseh took all the country of Argob unto the coasts of Geshuri and Maachathi; and called them after his own name, Bashanhavothjair, unto this day. 
And I gave Gilead unto Machir. 
And unto the Reubenites and unto the Gadites I gave from Gilead even unto the river Arnon half the valley, and the border even unto the river Jabbok, which is the border of the children of Ammon; 
The plain also, and Jordan, and the coast thereof, from Chinnereth even unto the sea of the plain, even the salt sea, under Ashdothpisgah eastward. 
And I commanded you at that time, say
762,very where, and the height five cubits of fine twined linen, and their sockets of brass. 
All the vessels of the tabernacle in all the service thereof, and all the pins thereof, and all the pins of the court, shall be of brass. 
And thou shalt command the children of Israel, that they bring thee pure oil olive beaten for the light, to cause the lamp to burn always. 
In the tabernacle of the congregation without the vail, which is before the testimony, Aaron and his sons shall order it from evening to morning before the LORD: it shall be a statute for ever unto their generations on the behalf of the children of Israel. 
And take thou unto thee Aaron thy brother, and his sons with him, from among the children of Israel, that he may minister unto me in th
986,always, that he might preserve us alive, as it is at this day. 
And it shall be our righteousness, if we observe to do all these commandments before the LORD our God, as he hath commanded us. 
When the LORD thy God shall bring thee into the land whither thou goest to possess it, and hath cast out many nations before thee, the Hittites, and the Girgashites, and the Amorites, and the Canaanites, and the Perizzites, and the Hivites, and the Jebusites, seven nations greater and mightier than thou; 
And when the LORD thy God shall deliver them before thee; thou shalt smite them, and utterly destroy them; thou shalt make no covenant with them, nor shew mercy unto them: 
Neither shalt thou make marriages with them; thy daughter thou shalt not give unto his son, nor his daughter shalt thou take unto thy son. 
For they will turn away thy son from following me, that they may serve other gods: so will the anger of the LORD be kindled against you, and destroy thee suddenly. 
But thus
779,. 
And when David heard that Nabal was dead, he said, Blessed be the LORD, that hath pleaded the cause of my reproach from the hand of Nabal, and hath kept his servant from evil: for the LORD hath returned the wickedness of Nabal upon his own head. And David sent and communed with Abigail, to take her to him to wife. 
And when the servants of David were come to Abigail to Carmel, they spake unto her, saying, David sent us unto thee, to take thee to him to wife. 
And she arose, and bowed herself on her face to the earth, and said, Behold, let thine handmaid be a servant to wash the feet of the servants of my lord. 
And Abigail hasted, and arose and rode upon an ass, with five damsels of hers that went after her; and she went after the messengers of David, and became his
848, when she was come to her house, she found the devil gone out, and her daughter laid upon the bed. 
And again, departing from the coasts of Tyre and Sidon, he came unto the sea of Galilee, through the midst of the coasts of Decapolis. 
And they bring unto him one that was deaf, and had an impediment in his speech; and they beseech him to put his hand upon him. 
And he took him aside from the multitude, and put his fingers into his ears, and he spit, and touched his tongue; 
And looking up to heaven, he sighed, and saith unto him, Ephphatha, that is, Be opened. 
And straightway his ears were opened, and the string of his tongue was loosed, and he spake plain. 
And he charged them that they should tell no man: but the more he charged them, so much the more a great deal they published it; 
And were beyond measure astonished, saying, He hat
1026,ke a shadow that declineth; and I am withered like grass. 
But thou, O LORD, shall endure for ever; and thy remembrance unto all generations. 
Thou shalt arise, and have mercy upon Zion: for the time to favour her, yea, the set time, is come. 
For thy servants take pleasure in her stones, and favour the dust thereof. 
So the heathen shall fear the name of the LORD, and all the kings of the earth thy glory. 
When the LORD shall build up Zion, he shall appear in his glory. 
He will regard the prayer of the destitute, and not despise their prayer. 
This shall be written for the generation to come: and the people which shall be created shall praise the LORD. 
For he hath looked down from the height of his sanctuary; from heaven did the LORD behold the earth; 
To hear the groaning of the prisoner; to loose those that are appointed to death; 
To declare the name of the LORD in Zion, and his praise in Jerusalem; 
When the people are gathered together, and the kingdoms, to serve the LORD. 
He weakened my strength in th
1027,heavens be no more, they shall not awake, nor be raised out of their sleep. 
O that thou wouldest hide me in the grave, that thou wouldest keep me secret, until thy wrath be past, that thou wouldest appoint me a set time, and remember me! 
If a man die, shall he live again? all the days of my appointed time will I wait, till my change come. 
Thou shalt call, and I will answer thee: thou wilt have a desire to the work of thine hands. 
For now thou numberest my steps: dost thou not watch over my sin? 
My transgression is sealed up in a bag, and thou sewest up mine iniquity. 
And surely the mountains falling cometh to nought, and the rock is removed out of his place. 
The waters wear the stones: thou washest away the things which grow out of the dust of the earth; and thou destroyest the hope of man. 
Thou prevailest for ever against him, and he passeth: thou changest his countenance, and sendest him away. 
His sons come to honour, and he knoweth it not; and they are brought low, but he perceiveth it not of them. 

909,RD, before the new court, 
And said, O LORD God of our fathers, art not thou God in heaven? and rulest not thou over all the kingdoms of the heathen? and in thine hand is there not power and might, so that none is able to withstand thee? 
Art not thou our God, who didst drive out the inhabitants of this land before thy people Israel, and gavest it to the seed of Abraham thy friend for ever? 
And they dwelt therein, and have built thee a sanctuary therein for thy name, saying, 
If, when evil cometh upon us, as the sword, judgment, or pestilence, or famine, we stand before this house, and in thy presence, (for thy name is in this house,) and cry unto thee in our affliction, then thou wilt hear and help. 
And now, behold, the children of Ammon and Moab and mount Seir, whom thou wouldest not let Israel invade, when they came out of the land of Egypt, but they turned from them, and destroyed them not;
999,ome near, he beheld the city, and wept over it, 
Saying, If thou hadst known, even thou, at least in this thy day, the things which belong unto thy peace! but now they are hid from thine eyes. 
For the days shall come upon thee, that thine enemies shall cast a trench about thee, and compass thee round, and keep thee in on every side, 
And shall lay thee even with the ground, and thy children within thee; and they shall not leave in thee one stone upon another; because thou knewest not the time of thy visitation. 
And he went into the temple, and began to cast out them that sold therein, and them that bought; 
Saying unto them, It is written, My house is the house of prayer: but ye have made it a den of thieves. 
And he taught daily in the temple. But the chief priests and the scribes and the chief of the people sought to destroy him, 
And could not find what they might do: for all the people were very attentive to hear him. 
And it came to pass, that on one of those days, as he taught
1048,ou to me. 
So he let him go: then she said, A bloody husband thou art, because of the circumcision. 
And the LORD said to Aaron, Go into the wilderness to meet Moses. And he went, and met him in the mount of God, and kissed him. 
And Moses told Aaron all the words of the LORD who had sent him, and all the signs which he had commanded him. 
And Moses and Aaron went and gathered together all the elders of the children of Israel: 
And Aaron spake all the words which the LORD had spoken unto Moses, and did the signs in the sight of the people. 
And the people believed: and when they heard that the LORD had visited the children of Israel, and that he had looked upon their affliction, then they bowed their heads and worshipped. 
And afterward Moses and Aaron went in, and told Pharaoh, Thus saith the LORD God of Israel, Let my people go, that they may hold a feast unto me in the wilderness. 
And Pharaoh said, Who is the LORD, that I should obey his voice to let Israel go? I know not the LORD, neither will I let Israel go. 
And they said, T
769,nations for my name's sake. 
And then shall many be offended, and shall betray one another, and shall hate one another. 
And many false prophets shall rise, and shall deceive many. 
And because iniquity shall abound, the love of many shall wax cold. 
But he that shall endure unto the end, the same shall be saved. 
And this gospel of the kingdom shall be preached in all the world for a witness unto all nations; and then shall the end come. 
When ye therefore shall see the abomination of desolation, spoken of by Daniel the prophet, stand in the holy place, (whoso readeth, let him understand:) 
Then let them which be in Judaea flee into the mountains: 
Let him which is on the housetop not come down to take any thing out of his house: 
Neither let him which is in
834,rcase shall be meat unto all fowls of the air, and unto the beasts of the earth, and no man shall fray them away. 
The LORD will smite thee with the botch of Egypt, and with the emerods, and with the scab, and with the itch, whereof thou canst not be healed. 
The LORD shall smite thee with madness, and blindness, and astonishment of heart: 
And thou shalt grope at noonday, as the blind gropeth in darkness, and thou shalt not prosper in thy ways: and thou shalt be only oppressed and spoiled evermore, and no man shall save thee. 
Thou shalt betroth a wife, and another man shall lie with her: thou shalt build an house, and thou shalt not dwell therein: thou shalt plant a vineyard, and shalt not gather the grapes thereof. 
Thine ox shall be slain before thine eyes, and thou shalt not eat thereof: thine ass shall be violently t
894,d, this is the joy of his way, and out of the earth shall others grow. 
Behold, God will not cast away a perfect man, neither will he help the evil doers: 
Till he fill thy mouth with laughing, and thy lips with rejoicing. 
They that hate thee shall be clothed with shame; and the dwelling place of the wicked shall come to nought. 
Then Job answered and said, 
I know it is so of a truth: but how should man be just with God? 
If he will contend with him, he cannot answer him one of a thousand. 
He is wise in heart, and mighty in strength: who hath hardened himself against him, and hath prospered? 
Which removeth the mountains, and they know not: which overturneth them in his anger. 
Which shaketh the earth out of her place, and the pillars thereof tremble. 
Which commandeth the sun, and it riseth not; and sealeth up the stars. 
Which alone spreadeth out the heavens, and treadeth upon
826, a wife unto my son Isaac. 
And the servant said unto him, Peradventure the woman will not be willing to follow me unto this land: must I needs bring thy son again unto the land from whence thou camest? 
And Abraham said unto him, Beware thou that thou bring not my son thither again. 
The LORD God of heaven, which took me from my father's house, and from the land of my kindred, and which spake unto me, and that sware unto me, saying, Unto thy seed will I give this land; he shall send his angel before thee, and thou shalt take a wife unto my son from thence. 
And if the woman will not be willing to follow thee, then thou shalt be clear from this my oath: only bring not my son thither again. 
And the servant put his hand under the thigh of Abraham his master, and sware to him concerning that matter. 
And the servant 
741,shall pass through, then ye shall be trodden down by it. 
From the time that it goeth forth it shall take you: for morning by morning shall it pass over, by day and by night: and it shall be a vexation only to understand the report. 
For the bed is shorter than that a man can stretch himself on it: and the covering narrower than that he can wrap himself in it. 
For the LORD shall rise up as in mount Perazim, he shall be wroth as in the valley of Gibeon, that he may do his work, his strange work; and bring to pass his act, his strange act. 
Now therefore be ye not mockers, lest your bands be made strong: for I have heard from the Lord GOD of hosts a consumption, even determined upon the whole earth. 
Give ye ear, and hear my voice; 
751,sit on the throne of Israel; so that thy children take heed to their way, that they walk before me as thou hast walked before me. 
And now, O God of Israel, let thy word, I pray thee, be verified, which thou spakest unto thy servant David my father. 
But will God indeed dwell on the earth? behold, the heaven and heaven of heavens cannot contain thee; how much less this house that I have builded? 
Yet have thou respect unto the prayer of thy servant, and to his supplication, O LORD my God, to hearken unto the cry and to the prayer, which thy servant prayeth before thee to day: 
That thine eyes may be open toward this house night and day, even toward the place of which thou hast said, My name shall be there: that thou mayest hearken unto the p
799,: and Moses blessed them. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
On the first day of the first month shalt thou set up the tabernacle of the tent of the congregation. 
And thou shalt put therein the ark of the testimony, and cover the ark with the vail. 
And thou shalt bring in the table, and set in order the things that are to be set in order upon it; and thou shalt bring in the candlestick, and light the lamps thereof. 
And thou shalt set the altar of gold for the incense before the ark of the testimony, and put the hanging of the door to the tabernacle. 
And thou shalt set the altar of the burnt offering before the door of the tabernacle of the tent of the congregation. 
And thou shalt set the laver between the tent of the congregation and the altar, and shalt put water therein. 
And
943,ave not hearkened unto my words, nor to my law, but rejected it. 
To what purpose cometh there to me incense from Sheba, and the sweet cane from a far country? your burnt offerings are not acceptable, nor your sacrifices sweet unto me. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD, Behold, I will lay stumblingblocks before this people, and the fathers and the sons together shall fall upon them; the neighbour and his friend shall perish. 
Thus saith the LORD, Behold, a people cometh from the north country, and a great nation shall be raised from the sides of the earth. 
They shall lay hold on bow and spear; they are cruel, and have no mercy; their voice roareth like the sea; and they ride upon horses, set in array as men for war against thee, O daughter of Zion. 
We have heard the fame thereof: our hands wax feeble: anguish hath taken hold of us, and pain, as of a woman in travail. 
Go not forth into the field, nor walk by the way; for the sword
1027,many things they witness against thee? 
And he answered him to never a word; insomuch that the governor marvelled greatly. 
Now at that feast the governor was wont to release unto the people a prisoner, whom they would. 
And they had then a notable prisoner, called Barabbas. 
Therefore when they were gathered together, Pilate said unto them, Whom will ye that I release unto you? Barabbas, or Jesus which is called Christ? 
For he knew that for envy they had delivered him. 
When he was set down on the judgment seat, his wife sent unto him, saying, Have thou nothing to do with that just man: for I have suffered many things this day in a dream because of him. 
But the chief priests and elders persuaded the multitude that they should ask Barabbas, and destroy Jesus. 
The governor answered and said unto them, Whether of the twain will ye that I release unto you? They said, Barabbas. 
Pilate saith unto them, What shall I do then with Jesus which is called Christ? They all say unto him, Let him be crucified. 
And the go
798,nd of the woman, and of him that lieth with her that is unclean. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses after the death of the two sons of Aaron, when they offered before the LORD, and died; 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Speak unto Aaron thy brother, that he come not at all times into the holy place within the vail before the mercy seat, which is upon the ark; that he die not: for I will appear in the cloud upon the mercy seat. 
Thus shall Aaron come into the holy place: with a young bullock for a sin offering, and a ram for a burnt offering. 
He shall put on the holy linen coat, and he shall have the linen breeches upon his flesh, and shall be girded with a linen girdle, and with the linen mitre shall he be attired: these are holy garments; therefore shall he wash his flesh in water, and so pu
742,d all Israel with him, took Achan the son of Zerah, and the silver, and the garment, and the wedge of gold, and his sons, and his daughters, and his oxen, and his asses, and his sheep, and his tent, and all that he had: and they brought them unto the valley of Achor. 
And Joshua said, Why hast thou troubled us? the LORD shall trouble thee this day. And all Israel stoned him with stones, and burned them with fire, after they had stoned them with stones. 
And they raised over him a great heap of stones unto this day. So the LORD turned from the fierceness of his anger. Wherefore the name of that place was called, The valley of Achor, unto this day. 
And the LORD said unto Joshua, Fear not, neither be thou dismayed: take all the people
960,er. 
And they made their father drink wine that night: and the firstborn went in, and lay with her father; and he perceived not when she lay down, nor when she arose. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, that the firstborn said unto the younger, Behold, I lay yesternight with my father: let us make him drink wine this night also; and go thou in, and lie with him, that we may preserve seed of our father. 
And they made their father drink wine that night also: and the younger arose, and lay with him; and he perceived not when she lay down, nor when she arose. 
Thus were both the daughters of Lot with child by their father. 
And the first born bare a son, and called his name Moab: the same is the father of the Moabites unto this day. 
And the younger, she also bare a son, and called his name Benammi: the same is the father of the children of Ammon unto this day. 
And Abraham journeyed from thence toward the south country, and dwelled between Kadesh a
968,ke merry. 
Thou shalt yet plant vines upon the mountains of Samaria: the planters shall plant, and shall eat them as common things. 
For there shall be a day, that the watchmen upon the mount Ephraim shall cry, Arise ye, and let us go up to Zion unto the LORD our God. 
For thus saith the LORD; Sing with gladness for Jacob, and shout among the chief of the nations: publish ye, praise ye, and say, O LORD, save thy people, the remnant of Israel. 
Behold, I will bring them from the north country, and gather them from the coasts of the earth, and with them the blind and the lame, the woman with child and her that travaileth with child together: a great company shall return thither. 
They shall come with weeping, and with supplications will I lead them: I will cause them to walk by the rivers of waters in a straight way, wherein they shall not stumble: for I am a father to Israel, and Ephraim is my firstborn. 
Hear the word of the LORD, O ye nations, and decla
989,t behind them: so they were before Judah, and the ambushment was behind them. 
And when Judah looked back, behold, the battle was before and behind: and they cried unto the LORD, and the priests sounded with the trumpets. 
Then the men of Judah gave a shout: and as the men of Judah shouted, it came to pass, that God smote Jeroboam and all Israel before Abijah and Judah. 
And the children of Israel fled before Judah: and God delivered them into their hand. 
And Abijah and his people slew them with a great slaughter: so there fell down slain of Israel five hundred thousand chosen men. 
Thus the children of Israel were brought under at that time, and the children of Judah prevailed, because they relied upon the LORD God of their fathers. 
And Abijah pursued after Jeroboam, and took cities from him, Bethel with the towns thereof, and Jeshanah with the towns thereof, and Ephraim with the towns thereof. 
Neither did Jeroboam recover strength again in the days of Abijah: and the LO
871, a storm hurleth him out of his place. 
For God shall cast upon him, and not spare: he would fain flee out of his hand. 
Men shall clap their hands at him, and shall hiss him out of his place. 
Surely there is a vein for the silver, and a place for gold where they fine it. 
Iron is taken out of the earth, and brass is molten out of the stone. 
He setteth an end to darkness, and searcheth out all perfection: the stones of darkness, and the shadow of death. 
The flood breaketh out from the inhabitant; even the waters forgotten of the foot: they are dried up, they are gone away from men. 
As for the earth, out of it cometh bread: and under it is turned up as it were fire. 
The stones of it are the place of sapphires: and it hath dust of gold. 
There is a path which no fowl knoweth, and which the vulture's eye hath not seen: 
The lion's whelps have not trodden it
1005,of the army, and wasted the country of the children of Ammon, and came and besieged Rabbah. But David tarried at Jerusalem. And Joab smote Rabbah, and destroyed it. 
And David took the crown of their king from off his head, and found it to weigh a talent of gold, and there were precious stones in it; and it was set upon David's head: and he brought also exceeding much spoil out of the city. 
And he brought out the people that were in it, and cut them with saws, and with harrows of iron, and with axes. Even so dealt David with all the cities of the children of Ammon. And David and all the people returned to Jerusalem. 
And it came to pass after this, that there arose war at Gezer with the Philistines; at which time Sibbechai the Hushathite slew Sippai, that was of the children of the giant: and they were subdued. 
And there was war again with the Philistines; and Elhanan the son of Jair slew Lahmi the brother of Goliath the Gittite, whose spear staff was like a weaver's beam. 
And yet again 
888,The heaven for height, and the earth for depth, and the heart of kings is unsearchable. 
Take away the dross from the silver, and there shall come forth a vessel for the finer. 
Take away the wicked from before the king, and his throne shall be established in righteousness. 
Put not forth thyself in the presence of the king, and stand not in the place of great men: 
For better it is that it be said unto thee, Come up hither; than that thou shouldest be put lower in the presence of the prince whom thine eyes have seen. 
Go not forth hastily to strive, lest thou know not what to do in the end thereof, when thy neighbour hath put thee to shame. 
Debate thy cause with thy neighbour himself; and discover not a secret to another: 
Lest he that heareth it put thee to shame, and thine infamy turn not away. 
A word fitly spoken is like apples of gold in pictures of silver. 
As an earr
759,re the children of the wicked one; 
The enemy that sowed them is the devil; the harvest is the end of the world; and the reapers are the angels. 
As therefore the tares are gathered and burned in the fire; so shall it be in the end of this world. 
The Son of man shall send forth his angels, and they shall gather out of his kingdom all things that offend, and them which do iniquity; 
And shall cast them into a furnace of fire: there shall be wailing and gnashing of teeth. 
Then shall the righteous shine forth as the sun in the kingdom of their Father. Who hath ears to hear, let him hear. 
Again, the kingdom of heaven is like unto treasure hid in a field; the which when a man hath found, he hideth, and for joy thereof goeth and selleth all that he hat
1008,he mouth of God, and came to fight in the valley of Megiddo. 
And the archers shot at king Josiah; and the king said to his servants, Have me away; for I am sore wounded. 
His servants therefore took him out of that chariot, and put him in the second chariot that he had; and they brought him to Jerusalem, and he died, and was buried in one of the sepulchres of his fathers. And all Judah and Jerusalem mourned for Josiah. 
And Jeremiah lamented for Josiah: and all the singing men and the singing women spake of Josiah in their lamentations to this day, and made them an ordinance in Israel: and, behold, they are written in the lamentations. 
Now the rest of the acts of Josiah, and his goodness, according to that which was written in the law of the LORD, 
And his deeds, first and last, behold, they are written in the book of the kings of Israel and Judah. 
Then the people of the land took Jehoahaz the son of Josiah, and made him king in his father's stead in Jerusalem. 
Jehoahaz was twenty and thre
921,
Let the stars of the twilight thereof be dark; let it look for light, but have none; neither let it see the dawning of the day: 
Because it shut not up the doors of my mother's womb, nor hid sorrow from mine eyes. 
Why died I not from the womb? why did I not give up the ghost when I came out of the belly? 
Why did the knees prevent me? or why the breasts that I should suck? 
For now should I have lain still and been quiet, I should have slept: then had I been at rest, 
With kings and counsellors of the earth, which build desolate places for themselves; 
Or with princes that had gold, who filled their houses with silver: 
Or as an hidden untimely birth I had not been; as infants which never saw light. 
There the wicked cease from troubling; and there the weary be at rest. 
There the prisoners rest together; they hear not the voice of the oppressor. 
The small and great are there; and the servant is free from
980, gain troubleth his own house; but he that hateth gifts shall live. 
The heart of the righteous studieth to answer: but the mouth of the wicked poureth out evil things. 
The LORD is far from the wicked: but he heareth the prayer of the righteous. 
The light of the eyes rejoiceth the heart: and a good report maketh the bones fat. 
The ear that heareth the reproof of life abideth among the wise. 
He that refuseth instruction despiseth his own soul: but he that heareth reproof getteth understanding. 
The fear of the LORD is the instruction of wisdom; and before honour is humility. 
The preparations of the heart in man, and the answer of the tongue, is from the LORD. 
All the ways of a man are clean in his own eyes; but the LORD weigheth the spirits. 
Commit thy works unto the LORD, and thy thoughts shall be established. 
The LORD hath made all things for himself: yea, even the wicked for the day of evil. 
Every one that is proud in heart is an abomination to the LORD: 
1052, LORD said unto Moses, Stretch forth thine hand toward heaven, that there may be hail in all the land of Egypt, upon man, and upon beast, and upon every herb of the field, throughout the land of Egypt. 
And Moses stretched forth his rod toward heaven: and the LORD sent thunder and hail, and the fire ran along upon the ground; and the LORD rained hail upon the land of Egypt. 
So there was hail, and fire mingled with the hail, very grievous, such as there was none like it in all the land of Egypt since it became a nation. 
And the hail smote throughout all the land of Egypt all that was in the field, both man and beast; and the hail smote every herb of the field, and brake every tree of the field. 
Only in the land of Goshen, where the children of Israel were, was there no hail. 
And Pharaoh sent, and called for Moses and Aaron, and said unto them, I have sinned this time: the LORD is righteous, and I and my people are wicked. 
Intreat the LORD (for it is enough) that there be no more mighty thunderings and hail; and I will let you go, an
905,d preach the baptism of repentance for the remission of sins. 
And there went out unto him all the land of Judaea, and they of Jerusalem, and were all baptized of him in the river of Jordan, confessing their sins. 
And John was clothed with camel's hair, and with a girdle of a skin about his loins; and he did eat locusts and wild honey; 
And preached, saying, There cometh one mightier than I after me, the latchet of whose shoes I am not worthy to stoop down and unloose. 
I indeed have baptized you with water: but he shall baptize you with the Holy Ghost. 
And it came to pass in those days, that Jesus came from Nazareth of Galilee, and was baptized of John in Jordan. 
And straightway coming up out of the water, he saw the heavens opened, and the Spirit like a dove descending upon him: 
And there came a voice from heaven, saying, Thou art my beloved Son, in whom I am well pleased. 
And immediat
923,was called the land of giants. 
Jair the son of Manasseh took all the country of Argob unto the coasts of Geshuri and Maachathi; and called them after his own name, Bashanhavothjair, unto this day. 
And I gave Gilead unto Machir. 
And unto the Reubenites and unto the Gadites I gave from Gilead even unto the river Arnon half the valley, and the border even unto the river Jabbok, which is the border of the children of Ammon; 
The plain also, and Jordan, and the coast thereof, from Chinnereth even unto the sea of the plain, even the salt sea, under Ashdothpisgah eastward. 
And I commanded you at that time, saying, The LORD your God hath given you this land to possess it: ye shall pass over armed before your brethren the children of Israel, all that are meet for the war. 
But your wives, and your little ones, and your cattle, (for I know that ye have much cattle,) shall abide in your cities which I have given you;
775,acle of the testimony. 
And the children of Israel took their journeys out of the wilderness of Sinai; and the cloud rested in the wilderness of Paran. 
And they first took their journey according to the commandment of the LORD by the hand of Moses. 
In the first place went the standard of the camp of the children of Judah according to their armies: and over his host was Nahshon the son of Amminadab. 
And over the host of the tribe of the children of Issachar was Nethaneel the son of Zuar. 
And over the host of the tribe of the children of Zebulun was Eliab the son of Helon. 
And the tabernacle was taken down; and the sons of Gershon and the sons of Merari set forward, bearing the tabernacle. 
And the standard of the camp of Reuben set forward according to their ar
806,abhorreth not evil. 
Thy mercy, O LORD, is in the heavens; and thy faithfulness reacheth unto the clouds. 
Thy righteousness is like the great mountains; thy judgments are a great deep: O LORD, thou preservest man and beast. 
How excellent is thy lovingkindness, O God! therefore the children of men put their trust under the shadow of thy wings. 
They shall be abundantly satisfied with the fatness of thy house; and thou shalt make them drink of the river of thy pleasures. 
For with thee is the fountain of life: in thy light shall we see light. 
O continue thy lovingkindness unto them that know thee; and thy righteousness to the upright in heart. 
Let not the foot of pride come against me, and let not the hand of the wicked remove me. 
There are the workers of iniquity fallen: they are cast down, 
965,and Paul, 
Men that have hazarded their lives for the name of our Lord Jesus Christ. 
We have sent therefore Judas and Silas, who shall also tell you the same things by mouth. 
For it seemed good to the Holy Ghost, and to us, to lay upon you no greater burden than these necessary things; 
That ye abstain from meats offered to idols, and from blood, and from things strangled, and from fornication: from which if ye keep yourselves, ye shall do well. Fare ye well. 
So when they were dismissed, they came to Antioch: and when they had gathered the multitude together, they delivered the epistle: 
Which when they had read, they rejoiced for the consolation. 
And Judas and Silas, being prophets also themselves, exhorted the brethren with many words, and confirmed them. 
And after they had tarried there a space, they were let go in peace from the brethren unto the apostles. 
Notwithstanding it pleased Silas to abide there still. 
Paul also and Barnabas continu
1066,ed. 
I spake unto thee in thy prosperity; but thou saidst, I will not hear. This hath been thy manner from thy youth, that thou obeyedst not my voice. 
The wind shall eat up all thy pastors, and thy lovers shall go into captivity: surely then shalt thou be ashamed and confounded for all thy wickedness. 
O inhabitant of Lebanon, that makest thy nest in the cedars, how gracious shalt thou be when pangs come upon thee, the pain as of a woman in travail! 
As I live, saith the LORD, though Coniah the son of Jehoiakim king of Judah were the signet upon my right hand, yet would I pluck thee thence; 
And I will give thee into the hand of them that seek thy life, and into the hand of them whose face thou fearest, even into the hand of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon, and into the hand of the Chaldeans. 
And I will cast thee out, and thy mother that bare thee, into another country, where ye were not born; and there shall ye die. 
But to the land whereunto they desire to return, thither shall they not return. 
Is this man Coniah a despised broken idol? is he a v
1054,nd not be written with the righteous. 
But I am poor and sorrowful: let thy salvation, O God, set me up on high. 
I will praise the name of God with a song, and will magnify him with thanksgiving. 
This also shall please the LORD better than an ox or bullock that hath horns and hoofs. 
The humble shall see this, and be glad: and your heart shall live that seek God. 
For the LORD heareth the poor, and despiseth not his prisoners. 
Let the heaven and earth praise him, the seas, and every thing that moveth therein. 
For God will save Zion, and will build the cities of Judah: that they may dwell there, and have it in possession. 
The seed also of his servants shall inherit it: and they that love his name shall dwell therein. 
MAKE HASTE, O GOD, TO DELIVER ME; MAKE HASTE TO HELP ME, O LORD. 
Let them be ashamed and confounded that seek after my soul: let them be turned backward, and put to confusion, that desire my hurt. 
Let them be turned back for a reward of their shame that say, Aha, aha. 
Let all those that seek thee rejoice and be glad i
899, behold darkness and sorrow, and the light is darkened in the heavens thereof. 
In the year that king Uzziah died I saw also the LORD sitting upon a throne, high and lifted up, and his train filled the temple. 
Above it stood the seraphims: each one had six wings; with twain he covered his face, and with twain he covered his feet, and with twain he did fly. 
And one cried unto another, and said, Holy, holy, holy, is the LORD of hosts: the whole earth is full of his glory. 
And the posts of the door moved at the voice of him that cried, and the house was filled with smoke. 
Then said I, Woe is me! for I am undone; because I am a man of unclean lips, and I dwell in the midst of a people of unclean lips: for mine eyes have seen the King, the LORD of hosts. 
Then flew one of the seraphims unto me, having a live coal in his hand, which he had taken with the tongs from off the altar: 
And he 
790,art able; for the spirit of the holy gods is in thee. 
Then Daniel, whose name was Belteshazzar, was astonied for one hour, and his thoughts troubled him. The king spake, and said, Belteshazzar, let not the dream, or the interpretation thereof, trouble thee. Belteshazzar answered and said, My lord, the dream be to them that hate thee, and the interpretation thereof to thine enemies. 
The tree that thou sawest, which grew, and was strong, whose height reached unto the heaven, and the sight thereof to all the earth; 
Whose leaves were fair, and the fruit thereof much, and in it was meat for all; under which the beasts of the field dwelt, and upon whose branches the fowls of the heaven had their habitation: 
It is thou, O king, that art grown and become strong: for thy greatness is 
986,n our land. 
Mercy and truth are met together; righteousness and peace have kissed each other. 
Truth shall spring out of the earth; and righteousness shall look down from heaven. 
Yea, the LORD shall give that which is good; and our land shall yield her increase. 
Righteousness shall go before him; and shall set us in the way of his steps. 
Bow down thine ear, O LORD, hear me: for I am poor and needy. 
Preserve my soul; for I am holy: O thou my God, save thy servant that trusteth in thee. 
Be merciful unto me, O Lord: for I cry unto thee daily. 
Rejoice the soul of thy servant: for unto thee, O Lord, do I lift up my soul. 
For thou, Lord, art good, and ready to forgive; and plenteous in mercy unto all them that call upon thee. 
Give ear, O LORD, unto my prayer; and attend to the voice of my supplications. 
In the day of my trouble I will call upon thee: for thou wilt answer me. 
Among the gods there is none like unto thee, O Lord; neither are there any works like unto th
742,n Egypt, were two souls: all the souls of the house of Jacob, which came into Egypt, were threescore and ten. 
And he sent Judah before him unto Joseph, to direct his face unto Goshen; and they came into the land of Goshen. 
And Joseph made ready his chariot, and went up to meet Israel his father, to Goshen, and presented himself unto him; and he fell on his neck, and wept on his neck a good while. 
And Israel said unto Joseph, Now let me die, since I have seen thy face, because thou art yet alive. 
And Joseph said unto his brethren, and unto his father's house, I will go up, and shew Pharaoh, and say unto him, My brethren, and my father's house, which were in the land of Canaan, are come unto me; 
And the men are shepherds, for the
821,gth. 
By me kings reign, and princes decree justice. 
By me princes rule, and nobles, even all the judges of the earth. 
I love them that love me; and those that seek me early shall find me. 
Riches and honour are with me; yea, durable riches and righteousness. 
My fruit is better than gold, yea, than fine gold; and my revenue than choice silver. 
I lead in the way of righteousness, in the midst of the paths of judgment: 
That I may cause those that love me to inherit substance; and I will fill their treasures. 
The LORD possessed me in the beginning of his way, before his works of old. 
I was set up from everlasting, from the beginning, or ever the earth was. 
When there were no depths, I was brought forth; when there were no fountains abounding with water. 
Before the mountains were settled, before the hills
1050, seer, and Saul the son of Kish, and Abner the son of Ner, and Joab the son of Zeruiah, had dedicated; and whosoever had dedicated any thing, it was under the hand of Shelomith, and of his brethren. 
Of the Izharites, Chenaniah and his sons were for the outward business over Israel, for officers and judges. 
And of the Hebronites, Hashabiah and his brethren, men of valour, a thousand and seven hundred, were officers among them of Israel on this side Jordan westward in all the business of the LORD, and in the service of the king. 
Among the Hebronites was Jerijah the chief, even among the Hebronites, according to the generations of his fathers. In the fortieth year of the reign of David they were sought for, and there were found among them mighty men of valour at Jazer of Gilead. 
And his brethren, men of valour, were two thousand and seven hundred chief fathers, whom king David made rulers over the Reubenites, the Gadites, and the half tribe of Manasseh, for every matter pertaining to God, and affairs of the king. 
Now the children of
858, 
If a man walking in the spirit and falsehood do lie, saying, I will prophesy unto thee of wine and of strong drink; he shall even be the prophet of this people. 
I will surely assemble, O Jacob, all of thee; I will surely gather the remnant of Israel; I will put them together as the sheep of Bozrah, as the flock in the midst of their fold: they shall make great noise by reason of the multitude of men. 
The breaker is come up before them: they have broken up, and have passed through the gate, and are gone out by it: and their king shall pass before them, and the LORD on the head of them. 
And I said, Hear, I pray you, O heads of Jacob, and ye princes of the house of Israel; Is it not for you to know judgment? 
Who hate the good, and love the evil; who pluck off their skin from off them, and their flesh from off their bones; 
Who also eat the fle
774,ters: under the laver were undersetters molten, at the side of every addition. 
And the mouth of it within the chapiter and above was a cubit: but the mouth thereof was round after the work of the base, a cubit and an half: and also upon the mouth of it were gravings with their borders, foursquare, not round. 
And under the borders were four wheels; and the axletrees of the wheels were joined to the base: and the height of a wheel was a cubit and half a cubit. 
And the work of the wheels was like the work of a chariot wheel: their axletrees, and their naves, and their felloes, and their spokes, were all molten. 
And there were four undersetters to the four corners of one base: and the undersetters were of the very base itself. 
And in the top of the base was there
807,ot ye: for I know that ye seek Jesus, which was crucified. 
He is not here: for he is risen, as he said. Come, see the place where the Lord lay. 
And go quickly, and tell his disciples that he is risen from the dead; and, behold, he goeth before you into Galilee; there shall ye see him: lo, I have told you. 
And they departed quickly from the sepulchre with fear and great joy; and did run to bring his disciples word. 
And as they went to tell his disciples, behold, Jesus met them, saying, All hail. And they came and held him by the feet, and worshipped him. 
Then said Jesus unto them, Be not afraid: go tell my brethren that they go into Galilee, and there shall they see me. 
Now when they were going, behold, some of the watch came into the city, and shewed unto the chief priests all the things th
963,hall flee away naked in that day, saith the LORD. 
Hear this word that the LORD hath spoken against you, O children of Israel, against the whole family which I brought up from the land of Egypt, saying, 
You only have I known of all the families of the earth: therefore I will punish you for all your iniquities. 
Can two walk together, except they be agreed? 
Will a lion roar in the forest, when he hath no prey? will a young lion cry out of his den, if he have taken nothing? 
Can a bird fall in a snare upon the earth, where no gin is for him? shall one take up a snare from the earth, and have taken nothing at all? 
Shall a trumpet be blown in the city, and the people not be afraid? shall there be evil in a city, and the LORD hath not done it? 
Surely the Lord GOD will do nothing, but he revealeth his secret unto his servants the prophets. 
The lion hath roared, who will not fear? the Lord GOD hath spoken, who can but prophesy? 
Publish in the palaces
971,f nine months and twenty days. 
And Joab gave up the sum of the number of the people unto the king: and there were in Israel eight hundred thousand valiant men that drew the sword; and the men of Judah were five hundred thousand men. 
And David's heart smote him after that he had numbered the people. And David said unto the LORD, I have sinned greatly in that I have done: and now, I beseech thee, O LORD, take away the iniquity of thy servant; for I have done very foolishly. 
For when David was up in the morning, the word of the LORD came unto the prophet Gad, David's seer, saying, 
Go and say unto David, Thus saith the LORD, I offer thee three things; choose thee one of them, that I may do it unto thee. 
So Gad came to David, and told him, and said unto him, Shall seven years of famine come unto thee in thy land? or wilt thou flee three months before thine enemies, while they pursue thee? or that there be three days' pestilence in thy land? now advise, and 
811,g to the deserving of his hands; 
(For my father fought for you, and adventured his life far, and delivered you out of the hand of Midian: 
And ye are risen up against my father's house this day, and have slain his sons, threescore and ten persons, upon one stone, and have made Abimelech, the son of his maidservant, king over the men of Shechem, because he is your brother;) 
If ye then have dealt truly and sincerely with Jerubbaal and with his house this day, then rejoice ye in Abimelech, and let him also rejoice in you: 
But if not, let fire come out from Abimelech, and devour the men of Shechem, and the house of Millo; and let fire come out from the men of Shechem, and from the house of Millo, and devour Abimelech. 
And Jotham ran away, and fled, and went to Beer, and dwelt there, for fear of Abime
975, upright is to depart from evil: he that keepeth his way preserveth his soul. 
Pride goeth before destruction, and an haughty spirit before a fall. 
Better it is to be of an humble spirit with the lowly, than to divide the spoil with the proud. 
He that handleth a matter wisely shall find good: and whoso trusteth in the LORD, happy is he. 
The wise in heart shall be called prudent: and the sweetness of the lips increaseth learning. 
Understanding is a wellspring of life unto him that hath it: but the instruction of fools is folly. 
The heart of the wise teacheth his mouth, and addeth learning to his lips. 
Pleasant words are as an honeycomb, sweet to the soul, and health to the bones. 
There is a way that seemeth right unto a man, but the end thereof are the ways of death. 
He that laboureth laboureth for himself; for his mouth craveth it of him. 
An ungodly man diggeth up evil: and in his lips there is as a burning fire. 
A froward man soweth strife: and a whi
1023, God beside me: I girded thee, though thou hast not known me: 
That they may know from the rising of the sun, and from the west, that there is none beside me. I am the LORD, and there is none else. 
I form the light, and create darkness: I make peace, and create evil: I the LORD do all these things. 
Drop down, ye heavens, from above, and let the skies pour down righteousness: let the earth open, and let them bring forth salvation, and let righteousness spring up together; I the LORD have created it. 
Woe unto him that striveth with his Maker! Let the potsherd strive with the potsherds of the earth. Shall the clay say to him that fashioneth it, What makest thou? or thy work, He hath no hands? 
Woe unto him that saith unto his father, What begettest thou? or to the woman, What hast thou brought forth? 
Thus saith the LORD, the Holy One of Israel, and his Maker, Ask me of things to come concerning my sons, and concerning the work of my hands command ye me. 
I have made the earth, and created man upon it: I, ev
1069, hath delivered Zebah and Zalmunna into mine hand, then I will tear your flesh with the thorns of the wilderness and with briers. 
And he went up thence to Penuel, and spake unto them likewise: and the men of Penuel answered him as the men of Succoth had answered him. 
And he spake also unto the men of Penuel, saying, When I come again in peace, I will break down this tower. 
Now Zebah and Zalmunna were in Karkor, and their hosts with them, about fifteen thousand men, all that were left of all the hosts of the children of the east: for there fell an hundred and twenty thousand men that drew sword. 
And Gideon went up by the way of them that dwelt in tents on the east of Nobah and Jogbehah, and smote the host; for the host was secure. 
And when Zebah and Zalmunna fled, he pursued after them, and took the two kings of Midian, Zebah and Zalmunna, and discomfited all the host. 
And Gideon the son of Joash returned from battle before the sun was up, 
And caught a young man of the men of Succoth, and enquired of him: and he described unto him the princes of S
733,heir corruption is in them, and blemishes be in them: they shall not be accepted for you. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
When a bullock, or a sheep, or a goat, is brought forth, then it shall be seven days under the dam; and from the eighth day and thenceforth it shall be accepted for an offering made by fire unto the LORD. 
And whether it be cow, or ewe, ye shall not kill it and her young both in one day. 
And when ye will offer a sacrifice of thanksgiving unto the LORD, offer it at your own will. 
On the same day it shall be eaten up; ye shall leave none of it until the morrow: I am the LORD. 
Therefore shall ye keep my commandments, and do them: I am the LORD. 
Neither shall ye profane my holy name; but I will 
1062,gim, a Bethlehemite, slew the brother of Goliath the Gittite, the staff of whose spear was like a weaver's beam. 
And there was yet a battle in Gath, where was a man of great stature, that had on every hand six fingers, and on every foot six toes, four and twenty in number; and he also was born to the giant. 
And when he defied Israel, Jonathan the son of Shimeah the brother of David slew him. 
These four were born to the giant in Gath, and fell by the hand of David, and by the hand of his servants. 
And David spake unto the LORD the words of this song in the day that the LORD had delivered him out of the hand of all his enemies, and out of the hand of Saul: 
And he said, The LORD is my rock, and my fortress, and my deliverer; 
The God of my rock; in him will I trust: he is my shield, and the horn of my salvation, my high tower, and my refuge, my saviour; thou savest me from violence. 
I will call on the LORD, who is worthy to be praised: so shall I be saved from mine enemies. 
When the waves of death compassed me, the floods of ungodly men made 
871, lord the king? 
And Achish answered and said to David, I know that thou art good in my sight, as an angel of God: notwithstanding the princes of the Philistines have said, He shall not go up with us to the battle. 
Wherefore now rise up early in the morning with thy master's servants that are come with thee: and as soon as ye be up early in the morning, and have light, depart. 
So David and his men rose up early to depart in the morning, to return into the land of the Philistines. And the Philistines went up to Jezreel. 
And it came to pass, when David and his men were come to Ziklag on the third day, that the Amalekites had invaded the south, and Ziklag, and smitten Ziklag, and burned it with fire; 
And had taken the women captives, that were therein: they slew not any, either great or small, but carried them away, and went on their way. 
So David and his m
863,in every corner of Jerusalem. 
And in every several city of Judah he made high places to burn incense unto other gods, and provoked to anger the LORD God of his fathers. 
Now the rest of his acts and of all his ways, first and last, behold, they are written in the book of the kings of Judah and Israel. 
And Ahaz slept with his fathers, and they buried him in the city, even in Jerusalem: but they brought him not into the sepulchres of the kings of Israel: and Hezekiah his son reigned in his stead. 
Hezekiah began to reign when he was five and twenty years old, and he reigned nine and twenty years in Jerusalem. And his mother's name was Abijah, the daughter of Zechariah. 
And he did that which was right in the sight of the LORD, according to all that David his father had done. 
He in the first year of his reign, in the first month, opened the doors of t
791,he house of Israel and to the house of Judah. 
In those days, and at that time, will I cause the Branch of righteousness to grow up unto David; and he shall execute judgment and righteousness in the land. 
In those days shall Judah be saved, and Jerusalem shall dwell safely: and this is the name wherewith she shall be called, The LORD our righteousness. 
For thus saith the LORD; David shall never want a man to sit upon the throne of the house of Israel; 
Neither shall the priests the Levites want a man before me to offer burnt offerings, and to kindle meat offerings, and to do sacrifice continually. 
And the word of the LORD came unto Jeremiah, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD; If ye can break my covenant of the day, and my covenant of the night, and that there should not be day and n
722,titudes marvelled, saying, It was never so seen in Israel. 
But the Pharisees said, He casteth out devils through the prince of the devils. 
And Jesus went about all the cities and villages, teaching in their synagogues, and preaching the gospel of the kingdom, and healing every sickness and every disease among the people. 
But when he saw the multitudes, he was moved with compassion on them, because they fainted, and were scattered abroad, as sheep having no shepherd. 
Then saith he unto his disciples, The harvest truly is plenteous, but the labourers are few; 
Pray ye therefore the Lord of the harvest, that he will send forth labourers into his harvest. 
And when he had called unto him his twelve disciples, he 
785, before thine eyes. 
Now consider this, ye that forget God, lest I tear you in pieces, and there be none to deliver. 
Whoso offereth praise glorifieth me: and to him that ordereth his conversation aright will I shew the salvation of God. 
Have mercy upon me, O God, according to thy lovingkindness: according unto the multitude of thy tender mercies blot out my transgressions. 
Wash me throughly from mine iniquity, and cleanse me from my sin. 
For I acknowledge my transgressions: and my sin is ever before me. 
Against thee, thee only, have I sinned, and done this evil in thy sight: that thou mightest be justified when thou speakest, and be clear when thou judgest. 
Behold, I was shapen in iniquity; and in sin did my mother conceive me. 
Behold, thou desirest truth in the inwar
929,Egypt by night. 
Thou shalt therefore sacrifice the passover unto the LORD thy God, of the flock and the herd, in the place which the LORD shall choose to place his name there. 
Thou shalt eat no leavened bread with it; seven days shalt thou eat unleavened bread therewith, even the bread of affliction; for thou camest forth out of the land of Egypt in haste: that thou mayest remember the day when thou camest forth out of the land of Egypt all the days of thy life. 
And there shall be no leavened bread seen with thee in all thy coast seven days; neither shall there any thing of the flesh, which thou sacrificedst the first day at even, remain all night until the morning. 
Thou mayest not sacrifice the passover within any of thy gates, which the LORD thy God giveth thee: 
But at the place which the LORD thy God shall choose to place his name in, there thou shalt sacrifice the passover at even, at the going down of the 
909,ves of them also: and I will recompense them according to their deeds, and according to the works of their own hands. 
For thus saith the LORD God of Israel unto me; Take the wine cup of this fury at my hand, and cause all the nations, to whom I send thee, to drink it. 
And they shall drink, and be moved, and be mad, because of the sword that I will send among them. 
Then took I the cup at the LORD's hand, and made all the nations to drink, unto whom the LORD had sent me: 
To wit, Jerusalem, and the cities of Judah, and the kings thereof, and the princes thereof, to make them a desolation, an astonishment, an hissing, and a curse; as it is this day; 
Pharaoh king of Egypt, and his servants, and his princes, and all his people; 
And all the mingled people, and all the kings of the land of Uz, and all the kings of the land of the Philistines, and Ashkelon, and Azzah, and Ekron, and the remnant of A
899,n this mountain; and ye say, that in Jerusalem is the place where men ought to worship. 
Jesus saith unto her, Woman, believe me, the hour cometh, when ye shall neither in this mountain, nor yet at Jerusalem, worship the Father. 
Ye worship ye know not what: we know what we worship: for salvation is of the Jews. 
But the hour cometh, and now is, when the true worshippers shall worship the Father in spirit and in truth: for the Father seeketh such to worship him. 
God is a Spirit: and they that worship him must worship him in spirit and in truth. 
The woman saith unto him, I know that Messias cometh, which is called Christ: when he is come, he will tell us all things. 
Jesus saith unto her, I that speak unto thee am he. 
And upon this came his disciples, and marvelled that he talked with the woman: yet no man said, What seekest thou? or, Why talkest thou with her? 
The woman then left he
765, he made him that remaineth have dominion over the nobles among the people: the LORD made me have dominion over the mighty. 
Out of Ephraim was there a root of them against Amalek; after thee, Benjamin, among thy people; out of Machir came down governors, and out of Zebulun they that handle the pen of the writer. 
And the princes of Issachar were with Deborah; even Issachar, and also Barak: he was sent on foot into the valley. For the divisions of Reuben there were great thoughts of heart. 
Why abodest thou among the sheepfolds, to hear the bleatings of the flocks? For the divisions of Reuben there were great searchings of heart. 
Gilead abode beyond Jordan: and why did Dan remain in ships? Asher continued on the sea shore, and abode in his breaches. 
Zeb
969,e scriptures must be fulfilled. 
And they all forsook him, and fled. 
And there followed him a certain young man, having a linen cloth cast about his naked body; and the young men laid hold on him: 
And he left the linen cloth, and fled from them naked. 
And they led Jesus away to the high priest: and with him were assembled all the chief priests and the elders and the scribes. 
And Peter followed him afar off, even into the palace of the high priest: and he sat with the servants, and warmed himself at the fire. 
And the chief priests and all the council sought for witness against Jesus to put him to death; and found none. 
For many bare false witness against him, but their witness agreed not together. 
And there arose certain, and bare false witness against him, saying, 
We heard him say, I will destroy this temple that is made with hands, and within three days I will build another made without hands. 
But neither so did their witness agree together. 
An
1067, handmaid, and for the young man which is with thy servants: there is no want of any thing. 
And the old man said, Peace be with thee; howsoever let all thy wants lie upon me; only lodge not in the street. 
So he brought him into his house, and gave provender unto the asses: and they washed their feet, and did eat and drink. 
Now as they were making their hearts merry, behold, the men of the city, certain sons of Belial, beset the house round about, and beat at the door, and spake to the master of the house, the old man, saying, Bring forth the man that came into thine house, that we may know him. 
And the man, the master of the house, went out unto them, and said unto them, Nay, my brethren, nay, I pray you, do not so wickedly; seeing that this man is come into mine house, do not this folly. 
Behold, here is my daughter a maiden, and his concubine; them I will bring out now, and humble ye them, and do with them what seemeth good unto you: but unto this man do not so vile a thing. 
But the men would not hearken to him: so the man took his concubine, a
1074,tayed, until the people had avenged themselves upon their enemies. Is not this written in the book of Jasher? So the sun stood still in the midst of heaven, and hasted not to go down about a whole day. 
And there was no day like that before it or after it, that the LORD hearkened unto the voice of a man: for the LORD fought for Israel. 
And Joshua returned, and all Israel with him, unto the camp to Gilgal. 
But these five kings fled, and hid themselves in a cave at Makkedah. 
And it was told Joshua, saying, The five kings are found hid in a cave at Makkedah. 
And Joshua said, Roll great stones upon the mouth of the cave, and set men by it for to keep them: 
And stay ye not, but pursue after your enemies, and smite the hindmost of them; suffer them not to enter into their cities: for the LORD your God hath delivered them into your hand. 
And it came to pass, when Joshua and the children of Israel had made an end of slaying them with a very great slaughter, till they were consumed, that the rest which remained of them entered into fenced cities. 
And all the p
983,well on the sabbath days. 
Then saith he to the man, Stretch forth thine hand. And he stretched it forth; and it was restored whole, like as the other. 
Then the Pharisees went out, and held a council against him, how they might destroy him. 
But when Jesus knew it, he withdrew himself from thence: and great multitudes followed him, and he healed them all; 
And charged them that they should not make him known: 
That it might be fulfilled which was spoken by Esaias the prophet, saying, 
Behold my servant, whom I have chosen; my beloved, in whom my soul is well pleased: I will put my spirit upon him, and he shall shew judgment to the Gentiles. 
He shall not strive, nor cry; neither shall any man hear his voice in the streets. 
A bruised reed shall he not break, and smoking flax shall he not quench, till he send forth judgment unto victory. 
And in his name shall the Gentiles trust. 
Then was brought unto him one possessed with a devil, blind, and dumb: and he healed him,
806, this day a blessing and a curse; 
A blessing, if ye obey the commandments of the LORD your God, which I command you this day: 
And a curse, if ye will not obey the commandments of the LORD your God, but turn aside out of the way which I command you this day, to go after other gods, which ye have not known. 
And it shall come to pass, when the LORD thy God hath brought thee in unto the land whither thou goest to possess it, that thou shalt put the blessing upon mount Gerizim, and the curse upon mount Ebal. 
Are they not on the other side Jordan, by the way where the sun goeth down, in the land of the Canaanites, which dwell in the champaign over against Gilgal, beside the plains of Moreh? 
For ye shall pass over Jordan to go in to possess the land which the LORD your God giveth you, and ye shall
749, of hell. 
The proverbs of Solomon. A wise son maketh a glad father: but a foolish son is the heaviness of his mother. 
Treasures of wickedness profit nothing: but righteousness delivereth from death. 
The LORD will not suffer the soul of the righteous to famish: but he casteth away the substance of the wicked. 
He becometh poor that dealeth with a slack hand: but the hand of the diligent maketh rich. 
He that gathereth in summer is a wise son: but he that sleepeth in harvest is a son that causeth shame. 
Blessings are upon the head of the just: but violence covereth the mouth of the wicked. 
The memory of the just is blessed: but the name of the wicked shall rot. 
The wise in heart will receive commandments: but a prating fool shall fall.
960,aptains. 
And of the children of Benjamin, the kindred of Saul, three thousand: for hitherto the greatest part of them had kept the ward of the house of Saul. 
And of the children of Ephraim twenty thousand and eight hundred, mighty men of valour, famous throughout the house of their fathers. 
And of the half tribe of Manasseh eighteen thousand, which were expressed by name, to come and make David king. 
And of the children of Issachar, which were men that had understanding of the times, to know what Israel ought to do; the heads of them were two hundred; and all their brethren were at their commandment. 
Of Zebulun, such as went forth to battle, expert in war, with all instruments of war, fifty thousand, which could keep rank: they were not of double heart. 
And of Naphtali a thousand captains, and with them with shield and spear thirty and seven thousand. 
And of the Danites expert in war twenty and eight thousand and six hundred. 
And of Asher
914,ven, that a man may eat thereof, and not die. 
I am the living bread which came down from heaven: if any man eat of this bread, he shall live for ever: and the bread that I will give is my flesh, which I will give for the life of the world. 
The Jews therefore strove among themselves, saying, How can this man give us his flesh to eat? 
Then Jesus said unto them, Verily, verily, I say unto you, Except ye eat the flesh of the Son of man, and drink his blood, ye have no life in you. 
Whoso eateth my flesh, and drinketh my blood, hath eternal life; and I will raise him up at the last day. 
For my flesh is meat indeed, and my blood is drink indeed. 
He that eateth my flesh, and drinketh my blood, dwelleth in me, and I in him. 
As the living Father hath sent me, and I live by the Father: so he that eateth me, even he shall live by me. 
This is that bread which came down from heaven: not as your fathers did 
1013,his way have I kept, and not declined. 
Neither have I gone back from the commandment of his lips; I have esteemed the words of his mouth more than my necessary food. 
But he is in one mind, and who can turn him? and what his soul desireth, even that he doeth. 
For he performeth the thing that is appointed for me: and many such things are with him. 
Therefore am I troubled at his presence: when I consider, I am afraid of him. 
For God maketh my heart soft, and the Almighty troubleth me: 
Because I was not cut off before the darkness, neither hath he covered the darkness from my face. 
Why, seeing times are not hidden from the Almighty, do they that know him not see his days? 
Some remove the landmarks; they violently take away flocks, and feed thereof. 
They drive away the ass of the fatherless, they take the widow's ox for a pledge. 
They turn the needy out of the way: the poor of the earth hide themselves together. 
Behold, as wild asses in the desert, go they forth to their work; rising betimes 
866,s the anointed of the LORD. 
So David stayed his servants with these words, and suffered them not to rise against Saul. But Saul rose up out of the cave, and went on his way. 
David also arose afterward, and went out of the cave, and cried after Saul, saying, My lord the king. And when Saul looked behind him, David stooped with his face to the earth, and bowed himself. 
And David said to Saul, Wherefore hearest thou men's words, saying, Behold, David seeketh thy hurt? 
Behold, this day thine eyes have seen how that the LORD had delivered thee to day into mine hand in the cave: and some bade me kill thee: but mine eye spared thee; and I said, I will not put forth mine hand against my lord; for he is the LORD's anointed. 
Moreover, my father, see, yea, see the skirt of thy robe in my hand: for in that I cut off the skirt of thy robe, and killed thee not, k
905,ents, to another two, and to another one; to every man according to his several ability; and straightway took his journey. 
Then he that had received the five talents went and traded with the same, and made them other five talents. 
And likewise he that had received two, he also gained other two. 
But he that had received one went and digged in the earth, and hid his lord's money. 
After a long time the lord of those servants cometh, and reckoneth with them. 
And so he that had received five talents came and brought other five talents, saying, Lord, thou deliveredst unto me five talents: behold, I have gained beside them five talents more. 
His lord said unto him, Well done, thou good and faithful servant: thou hast been faithful over a few things, I will make thee ruler over many things: enter thou into the joy of thy lord. 
He also that had received two talents came and said, Lord, thou del
734, porch, and of the houses thereof, and of the treasuries thereof, and of the upper chambers thereof, and of the inner parlours thereof, and of the place of the mercy seat, 
And the pattern of all that he had by the spirit, of the courts of the house of the LORD, and of all the chambers round about, of the treasuries of the house of God, and of the treasuries of the dedicated things: 
Also for the courses of the priests and the Levites, and for all the work of the service of the house of the LORD, and for all the vessels of service in the house of the LORD. 
He gave of gold by weight for things of gold, for all instruments of all manner of service; silver also for all instruments of silver by weight, for all instruments of ev
871,nd this day all of you before the LORD your God; your captains of your tribes, your elders, and your officers, with all the men of Israel, 
Your little ones, your wives, and thy stranger that is in thy camp, from the hewer of thy wood unto the drawer of thy water: 
That thou shouldest enter into covenant with the LORD thy God, and into his oath, which the LORD thy God maketh with thee this day: 
That he may establish thee to day for a people unto himself, and that he may be unto thee a God, as he hath said unto thee, and as he hath sworn unto thy fathers, to Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob. 
Neither with you only do I make this covenant and this oath; 
But with him that standeth here with us this day before the LORD our God, and also with him that is not here with us this day: 
(For ye know how we have dwelt in the land of Egypt; and how we came through the n
929,hoso keepeth the commandment shall feel no evil thing: and a wise man's heart discerneth both time and judgment. 
Because to every purpose there is time and judgment, therefore the misery of man is great upon him. 
For he knoweth not that which shall be: for who can tell him when it shall be? 
There is no man that hath power over the spirit to retain the spirit; neither hath he power in the day of death: and there is no discharge in that war; neither shall wickedness deliver those that are given to it. 
All this have I seen, and applied my heart unto every work that is done under the sun: there is a time wherein one man ruleth over another to his own hurt. 
And so I saw the wicked buried, who had come and gone from the place of the holy, and they were forgotten in the city where they had so done: this is also vanity. 
Because sentence against an evil work is not executed speedily, therefore the heart of the sons of 
874,ren of God by faith in Christ Jesus. 
For as many of you as have been baptized into Christ have put on Christ. 
There is neither Jew nor Greek, there is neither bond nor free, there is neither male nor female: for ye are all one in Christ Jesus. 
And if ye be Christ's, then are ye Abraham's seed, and heirs according to the promise. 
Now I say, That the heir, as long as he is a child, differeth nothing from a servant, though he be lord of all; 
But is under tutors and governors until the time appointed of the father. 
Even so we, when we were children, were in bondage under the elements of the world: 
But when the fulness of the time was come, God sent forth his Son, made of a woman, made under the law, 
To redeem them that were under the law, that we might receive the adoption of sons. 
And because ye are sons, God hath sent forth the Spirit of his Son into your
1060, he scorneth the scorners: but he giveth grace unto the lowly. 
The wise shall inherit glory: but shame shall be the promotion of fools. 
Hear, ye children, the instruction of a father, and attend to know understanding. 
For I give you good doctrine, forsake ye not my law. 
For I was my father's son, tender and only beloved in the sight of my mother. 
He taught me also, and said unto me, Let thine heart retain my words: keep my commandments, and live. 
Get wisdom, get understanding: forget it not; neither decline from the words of my mouth. 
Forsake her not, and she shall preserve thee: love her, and she shall keep thee. 
Wisdom is the principal thing; therefore get wisdom: and with all thy getting get understanding. 
Exalt her, and she shall promote thee: she shall bring thee to honour, when thou dost embrace her. 
She shall give to thine head an ornament of grace: a crown of glory shall she deliver to thee. 
Hear, O my son, and receive my sayings; and the years of thy life shall be many. 
I have taught thee in the way of wisdom; I have led th
991,in, a little while, and ye shall see me, because I go to the Father. 
Then said some of his disciples among themselves, What is this that he saith unto us, A little while, and ye shall not see me: and again, a little while, and ye shall see me: and, Because I go to the Father? 
They said therefore, What is this that he saith, A little while? we cannot tell what he saith. 
Now Jesus knew that they were desirous to ask him, and said unto them, Do ye enquire among yourselves of that I said, A little while, and ye shall not see me: and again, a little while, and ye shall see me? 
Verily, verily, I say unto you, That ye shall weep and lament, but the world shall rejoice: and ye shall be sorrowful, but your sorrow shall be turned into joy. 
A woman when she is in travail hath sorrow, because her hour is come: but as soon as she is delivered of the child, she remembereth no more the anguish, for joy that a man is born into the world. 
And ye now therefore have sorrow: but I will see 
845,and horsemen: and the people were without number that came with him out of Egypt; the Lubims, the Sukkiims, and the Ethiopians. 
And he took the fenced cities which pertained to Judah, and came to Jerusalem. 
Then came Shemaiah the prophet to Rehoboam, and to the princes of Judah, that were gathered together to Jerusalem because of Shishak, and said unto them, Thus saith the LORD, Ye have forsaken me, and therefore have I also left you in the hand of Shishak. 
Whereupon the princes of Israel and the king humbled themselves; and they said, The LORD is righteous. 
And when the LORD saw that they humbled themselves, the word of the LORD came to Shemaiah, saying, They have humbled themselves; therefore I will not destroy them, but I will grant them some deliverance; and my wrath shall not be poured out upon Jerusalem by the hand of Shish
915,na, and with our fathers: who received the lively oracles to give unto us: 
To whom our fathers would not obey, but thrust him from them, and in their hearts turned back again into Egypt, 
Saying unto Aaron, Make us gods to go before us: for as for this Moses, which brought us out of the land of Egypt, we wot not what is become of him. 
And they made a calf in those days, and offered sacrifice unto the idol, and rejoiced in the works of their own hands. 
Then God turned, and gave them up to worship the host of heaven; as it is written in the book of the prophets, O ye house of Israel, have ye offered to me slain beasts and sacrifices by the space of forty years in the wilderness? 
Yea, ye took up the tabernacle of Moloch, and the star of your god Remphan, figures which ye made to worship them: and I will carry you away beyond Babylon. 
Our fathers had the tabernacle of witness in the wilderness, as he 
846,sh: for his mercy endureth for ever. 
O give thanks unto the God of heaven: for his mercy endureth for ever. 
By the rivers of Babylon, there we sat down, yea, we wept, when we remembered Zion. 
We hanged our harps upon the willows in the midst thereof. 
For there they that carried us away captive required of us a song; and they that wasted us required of us mirth, saying, Sing us one of the songs of Zion. 
How shall we sing the LORD's song in a strange land? 
If I forget thee, O Jerusalem, let my right hand forget her cunning. 
If I do not remember thee, let my tongue cleave to the roof of my mouth; if I prefer not Jerusalem above my chief joy. 
Remember, O LORD, the children of Edom in the day of Jerusalem; who said, Rase it, rase it, even to the foundation thereof. 
O daughter of Babylon, who art to be destroyed; happy shall he be,
903, and Jehiel, and Unni, and Eliab, and Maaseiah, and Benaiah, with psalteries on Alamoth; 
And Mattithiah, and Elipheleh, and Mikneiah, and Obededom, and Jeiel, and Azaziah, with harps on the Sheminith to excel. 
And Chenaniah, chief of the Levites, was for song: he instructed about the song, because he was skilful. 
And Berechiah and Elkanah were doorkeepers for the ark. 
And Shebaniah, and Jehoshaphat, and Nethaneel, and Amasai, and Zechariah, and Benaiah, and Eliezer, the priests, did blow with the trumpets before the ark of God: and Obededom and Jehiah were doorkeepers for the ark. 
So David, and the elders of Israel, and the captains over thousands, went to bring up the ark of the covenant of the LORD out of the house of Obededom with joy. 
And it came to pass, when God helped the Levites that bare the ark of the covenant of the LORD, that they offered seven bullocks and seven rams. 
An
1008,ool. 
If ye be willing and obedient, ye shall eat the good of the land: 
But if ye refuse and rebel, ye shall be devoured with the sword: for the mouth of the LORD hath spoken it. 
How is the faithful city become an harlot! it was full of judgment; righteousness lodged in it; but now murderers. 
Thy silver is become dross, thy wine mixed with water: 
Thy princes are rebellious, and companions of thieves: every one loveth gifts, and followeth after rewards: they judge not the fatherless, neither doth the cause of the widow come unto them. 
Therefore saith the LORD, the LORD of hosts, the mighty One of Israel, Ah, I will ease me of mine adversaries, and avenge me of mine enemies: 
And I will turn my hand upon thee, and purely purge away thy dross, and take away all thy tin: 
And I will restore thy judges as at the first, and thy counsellors as at the beginning: afterward thou shalt be called, The city of righteousness, the faithful city. 
Zion shall be redeemed with judgment, and her converts wi
1055,ierce anger of the LORD toward Israel. 
For if ye turn away from after him, he will yet again leave them in the wilderness; and ye shall destroy all this people. 
And they came near unto him, and said, We will build sheepfolds here for our cattle, and cities for our little ones: 
But we ourselves will go ready armed before the children of Israel, until we have brought them unto their place: and our little ones shall dwell in the fenced cities because of the inhabitants of the land. 
We will not return unto our houses, until the children of Israel have inherited every man his inheritance. 
For we will not inherit with them on yonder side Jordan, or forward; because our inheritance is fallen to us on this side Jordan eastward. 
And Moses said unto them, If ye will do this thing, if ye will go armed before the LORD to war, 
And will go all of you armed over Jordan before the LORD, until he hath driven out his enemies from before him, 
And the land be subdued before the LORD: then afterward ye shall return, and be guiltless before the LORD, an
1046,edness be not discovered thereon. 
Now these are the judgments which thou shalt set before them. 
If thou buy an Hebrew servant, six years he shall serve: and in the seventh he shall go out free for nothing. 
If he came in by himself, he shall go out by himself: if he were married, then his wife shall go out with him. 
If his master have given him a wife, and she have born him sons or daughters; the wife and her children shall be her master's, and he shall go out by himself. 
And if the servant shall plainly say, I love my master, my wife, and my children; I will not go out free: 
Then his master shall bring him unto the judges; he shall also bring him to the door, or unto the door post; and his master shall bore his ear through with an aul; and he shall serve him for ever. 
And if a man sell his daughter to be a maidservant, she shall not go out as the menservants do. 
If she please not her master, who hath betrothed her to himself, then shall he let her be redeemed: to sell her unto a strange nation he shall have no power, seein
986,h any manner of beast. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that lieth with his sister, the daughter of his father, or the daughter of his mother. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that lieth with his mother in law. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that smiteth his neighbour secretly. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that taketh reward to slay an innocent person. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that confirmeth not all the words of this law to do them. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
And it shall come to pass, if thou shalt hearken diligently unto the voice of the LORD thy God, to observe and to do all his commandments which I command thee this day, that the LORD thy God will set thee on high above all nations of the earth: 
And all these blessings shall come on thee, and overtake thee, if thou shalt hearken unto the voice of the LORD thy God. 
Blessed shalt thou be in the city, and bless
861,t. And they fell upon their faces. 
And Moses said unto Aaron, Take a censer, and put fire therein from off the altar, and put on incense, and go quickly unto the congregation, and make an atonement for them: for there is wrath gone out from the LORD; the plague is begun. 
And Aaron took as Moses commanded, and ran into the midst of the congregation; and, behold, the plague was begun among the people: and he put on incense, and made an atonement for the people. 
And he stood between the dead and the living; and the plague was stayed. 
Now they that died in the plague were fourteen thousand and seven hundred, beside them that died about the matter of Korah. 
And Aaron returned unto Moses unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation: and the plague was stayed. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and take 
924,ing's daughter of the south shall come to the king of the north to make an agreement: but she shall not retain the power of the arm; neither shall he stand, nor his arm: but she shall be given up, and they that brought her, and he that begat her, and he that strengthened her in these times. 
But out of a branch of her roots shall one stand up in his estate, which shall come with an army, and shall enter into the fortress of the king of the north, and shall deal against them, and shall prevail: 
And shall also carry captives into Egypt their gods, with their princes, and with their precious vessels of silver and of gold; and he shall continue more years than the king of the north. 
So the king of the south shall come into his kingdom, and shall return into his own land. 
But his sons shall be stirred up, and shall assemble a multitude of great forces: and one shall certainly come, and overflow, and pass through:
783, kept bound with chains and in fetters; and he brake the bands, and was driven of the devil into the wilderness.) 
And Jesus asked him, saying, What is thy name? And he said, Legion: because many devils were entered into him. 
And they besought him that he would not command them to go out into the deep. 
And there was there an herd of many swine feeding on the mountain: and they besought him that he would suffer them to enter into them. And he suffered them. 
Then went the devils out of the man, and entered into the swine: and the herd ran violently down a steep place into the lake, and were choked. 
When they that fed them saw what was done, they fled, and went and told it in the city and in the country. 
Then they went out to see what was done; and came to Jesus, and fou
958,ken nothing: nevertheless at thy word I will let down the net. 
And when they had this done, they inclosed a great multitude of fishes: and their net brake. 
And they beckoned unto their partners, which were in the other ship, that they should come and help them. And they came, and filled both the ships, so that they began to sink. 
When Simon Peter saw it, he fell down at Jesus' knees, saying, Depart from me; for I am a sinful man, O Lord. 
For he was astonished, and all that were with him, at the draught of the fishes which they had taken: 
And so was also James, and John, the sons of Zebedee, which were partners with Simon. And Jesus said unto Simon, Fear not; from henceforth thou shalt catch men. 
And when they had brought their ships to land, they forsook all, and followed him. 
And it came to pass, when he was in a certain city, behold a man full of leprosy: who seeing Jesus fell on his face, and besought him, saying, Lord, if thou wilt, 
925,ips do honour me, but have removed their heart far from me, and their fear toward me is taught by the precept of men: 
Therefore, behold, I will proceed to do a marvellous work among this people, even a marvellous work and a wonder: for the wisdom of their wise men shall perish, and the understanding of their prudent men shall be hid. 
Woe unto them that seek deep to hide their counsel from the LORD, and their works are in the dark, and they say, Who seeth us? and who knoweth us? 
Surely your turning of things upside down shall be esteemed as the potter's clay: for shall the work say of him that made it, He made me not? or shall the thing framed say of him that framed it, He had no understanding? 
Is it not yet a very little while, and Lebanon shall be turned into a fruitful field, and the fruitful field shall be esteemed as a forest? 
And in that day shall the deaf hear the words of the book, and the eyes of th
766,g the prophets that make my people err, that bite with their teeth, and cry, Peace; and he that putteth not into their mouths, they even prepare war against him. 
Therefore night shall be unto you, that ye shall not have a vision; and it shall be dark unto you, that ye shall not divine; and the sun shall go down over the prophets, and the day shall be dark over them. 
Then shall the seers be ashamed, and the diviners confounded: yea, they shall all cover their lips; for there is no answer of God. 
But truly I am full of power by the spirit of the LORD, and of judgment, and of might, to declare unto Jacob his transgression, and to Israel his sin. 
Hear this, I pray you, ye heads of the house of Jacob, and princes of the house of Israel, that abhor judgment,
793,unbelief. And he went round about the villages, teaching. 
And he called unto him the twelve, and began to send them forth by two and two; and gave them power over unclean spirits; 
And commanded them that they should take nothing for their journey, save a staff only; no scrip, no bread, no money in their purse: 
But be shod with sandals; and not put on two coats. 
And he said unto them, In what place soever ye enter into an house, there abide till ye depart from that place. 
And whosoever shall not receive you, nor hear you, when ye depart thence, shake off the dust under your feet for a testimony against them. Verily I say unto you, It shall be more tolerable for Sodom and Gomorrha in the day of judgment, than for that city. 
And they went out, and preached that men should repent.
869,o do the service of the children of Israel in the tabernacle of the congregation, and to make an atonement for the children of Israel: that there be no plague among the children of Israel, when the children of Israel come nigh unto the sanctuary. 
And Moses, and Aaron, and all the congregation of the children of Israel, did to the Levites according unto all that the LORD commanded Moses concerning the Levites, so did the children of Israel unto them. 
And the Levites were purified, and they washed their clothes; and Aaron offered them as an offering before the LORD; and Aaron made an atonement for them to cleanse them. 
And after that went the Levites in to do their service in the tabernacle of the congregation before Aaron, and before his sons: as the LORD had commanded Moses concerning the Levites, so did they unto them. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, sa
821, brute beasts, in those things they corrupt themselves. 
Woe unto them! for they have gone in the way of Cain, and ran greedily after the error of Balaam for reward, and perished in the gainsaying of Core. 
These are spots in your feasts of charity, when they feast with you, feeding themselves without fear: clouds they are without water, carried about of winds; trees whose fruit withereth, without fruit, twice dead, plucked up by the roots; 
Raging waves of the sea, foaming out their own shame; wandering stars, to whom is reserved the blackness of darkness for ever. 
And Enoch also, the seventh from Adam, prophesied of these, saying, Behold, the Lord cometh with ten thousands of his saints, 
To execute judgment upon all, and to convince all that are ungodly among them of all their ungodly deeds which they have
825,, twelve years: six years reigned he in Tirzah. 
And he bought the hill Samaria of Shemer for two talents of silver, and built on the hill, and called the name of the city which he built, after the name of Shemer, owner of the hill, Samaria. 
But Omri wrought evil in the eyes of the LORD, and did worse than all that were before him. 
For he walked in all the way of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, and in his sin wherewith he made Israel to sin, to provoke the LORD God of Israel to anger with their vanities. 
Now the rest of the acts of Omri which he did, and his might that he shewed, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel? 
So Omri slept with his fathers, and was buried in Samaria: and Ahab his son reigned in his stead. 
And in the thirty and eighth year of Asa king of Judah began Ahab
925,er: they shall be set in gold in their inclosings. 
And the stones shall be with the names of the children of Israel, twelve, according to their names, like the engravings of a signet; every one with his name shall they be according to the twelve tribes. 
And thou shalt make upon the breastplate chains at the ends of wreathen work of pure gold. 
And thou shalt make upon the breastplate two rings of gold, and shalt put the two rings on the two ends of the breastplate. 
And thou shalt put the two wreathen chains of gold in the two rings which are on the ends of the breastplate. 
And the other two ends of the two wreathen chains thou shalt fasten in the two ouches, and put them on the shoulderpieces of the ephod before it. 
And thou shalt make two rings of gold, and thou shalt put them upon the two ends of the breastplate in the border thereof, which is in the side of the ephod inward. 
And two other rings of gold 
1042,Jew, askest drink of me, which am a woman of Samaria? for the Jews have no dealings with the Samaritans. 
Jesus answered and said unto her, If thou knewest the gift of God, and who it is that saith to thee, Give me to drink; thou wouldest have asked of him, and he would have given thee living water. 
The woman saith unto him, Sir, thou hast nothing to draw with, and the well is deep: from whence then hast thou that living water? 
Art thou greater than our father Jacob, which gave us the well, and drank thereof himself, and his children, and his cattle? 
Jesus answered and said unto her, Whosoever drinketh of this water shall thirst again: 
But whosoever drinketh of the water that I shall give him shall never thirst; but the water that I shall give him shall be in him a well of water springing up into everlasting life. 
The woman saith unto him, Sir, give me this water, that I thirst not, neither come hither to draw. 
Jesus saith unto her, Go, call thy husband, and come hither. 
The woman answered and said, I have no husband. J
1011,
The high places also of Aven, the sin of Israel, shall be destroyed: the thorn and the thistle shall come up on their altars; and they shall say to the mountains, Cover us; and to the hills, Fall on us. 
O Israel, thou hast sinned from the days of Gibeah: there they stood: the battle in Gibeah against the children of iniquity did not overtake them. 
It is in my desire that I should chastise them; and the people shall be gathered against them, when they shall bind themselves in their two furrows. 
And Ephraim is as an heifer that is taught, and loveth to tread out the corn; but I passed over upon her fair neck: I will make Ephraim to ride; Judah shall plow, and Jacob shall break his clods. 
Sow to yourselves in righteousness, reap in mercy; break up your fallow ground: for it is time to seek the LORD, till he come and rain righteousness upon you. 
Ye have plowed wickedness, ye have reaped iniquity; ye have eaten the fruit of lies: because thou didst trust in thy way, in the multitude of thy might
854,ests and for Levites, saith the LORD. 
For as the new heavens and the new earth, which I will make, shall remain before me, saith the LORD, so shall your seed and your name remain. 
And it shall come to pass, that from one new moon to another, and from one sabbath to another, shall all flesh come to worship before me, saith the LORD. 
And they shall go forth, and look upon the carcases of the men that have transgressed against me: for their worm shall not die, neither shall their fire be quenched; and they shall be an abhorring unto all flesh. 
The words of Jeremiah the son of Hilkiah, of the priests that were in Anathoth in the land of Benjamin: 
To whom the word of the LORD came in the days of Josiah the son of Amon king of Judah, in the thirteenth year of his reign. 
It came also in the days of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah king of Judah, un
862, LORD in Zion? is not her king in her? Why have they provoked me to anger with their graven images, and with strange vanities? 
The harvest is past, the summer is ended, and we are not saved. 
For the hurt of the daughter of my people am I hurt; I am black; astonishment hath taken hold on me. 
Is there no balm in Gilead; is there no physician there? why then is not the health of the daughter of my people recovered? 
Oh that my head were waters, and mine eyes a fountain of tears, that I might weep day and night for the slain of the daughter of my people! 
Oh that I had in the wilderness a lodging place of wayfaring men; that I might leave my people, and go from them! for they be all adulterers, an assembly of treacherous men. 
And they bend their tongues like their bow for lies: but they are not valiant for the truth upon the earth; for they proceed f
1029,be afraid of the beasts of the earth. 
For thou shalt be in league with the stones of the field: and the beasts of the field shall be at peace with thee. 
And thou shalt know that thy tabernacle shall be in peace; and thou shalt visit thy habitation, and shalt not sin. 
Thou shalt know also that thy seed shall be great, and thine offspring as the grass of the earth. 
Thou shalt come to thy grave in a full age, like as a shock of corn cometh in in his season. 
Lo this, we have searched it, so it is; hear it, and know thou it for thy good. 
But Job answered and said, 
Oh that my grief were throughly weighed, and my calamity laid in the balances together! 
For now it would be heavier than the sand of the sea: therefore my words are swallowed up. 
For the arrows of the Almighty are within me, the poison whereof drinketh up my spirit: the terrors of God do set themselves in array against me. 
Doth the wild ass bray when he hath grass? or loweth the ox over his fodder? 
Can that which is unsavoury be eaten without salt?
790,wn her forest, saith the LORD, though it cannot be searched; because they are more than the grasshoppers, and are innumerable. 
The daughter of Egypt shall be confounded; she shall be delivered into the hand of the people of the north. 
The LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, saith; Behold, I will punish the multitude of No, and Pharaoh, and Egypt, with their gods, and their kings; even Pharaoh, and all them that trust in him: 
And I will deliver them into the hand of those that seek their lives, and into the hand of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon, and into the hand of his servants: and afterward it shall be inhabited, as in the days of old, saith the LORD. 
But fear not thou, O my servant Jacob, and be not dismayed, O Israel: for, behold, I will save thee from afar off, and thy se
1038,her of Sychem. 
But when the time of the promise drew nigh, which God had sworn to Abraham, the people grew and multiplied in Egypt, 
Till another king arose, which knew not Joseph. 
The same dealt subtilly with our kindred, and evil entreated our fathers, so that they cast out their young children, to the end they might not live. 
In which time Moses was born, and was exceeding fair, and nourished up in his father's house three months: 
And when he was cast out, Pharaoh's daughter took him up, and nourished him for her own son. 
And Moses was learned in all the wisdom of the Egyptians, and was mighty in words and in deeds. 
And when he was full forty years old, it came into his heart to visit his brethren the children of Israel. 
And seeing one of them suffer wrong, he defended him, and avenged him that was oppressed, and smote the Egyptian: 
For he supposed his brethren would have understood how that God by his hand would deliver them: but they understood not. 
And the next day he shewed himself unto them as they strove,
746,els, and all the instruments of the sanctuary, and the fine flour, and the wine, and the oil, and the frankincense, and the spices. 
And some of the sons of the priests made the ointment of the spices. 
And Mattithiah, one of the Levites, who was the firstborn of Shallum the Korahite, had the set office over the things that were made in the pans. 
And other of their brethren, of the sons of the Kohathites, were over the shewbread, to prepare it every sabbath. 
And these are the singers, chief of the fathers of the Levites, who remaining in the chambers were free: for they were employed in that work day and night. 
These chief fathers of the Levites were chief throughout their generations; these dwelt at Jerusalem. 
And in Gibeon dwelt t
1006,h ye shall have an holy convocation; ye shall do no servile work, and ye shall keep a feast unto the LORD seven days: 
And ye shall offer a burnt offering, a sacrifice made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD; thirteen young bullocks, two rams, and fourteen lambs of the first year; they shall be without blemish: 
And their meat offering shall be of flour mingled with oil, three tenth deals unto every bullock of the thirteen bullocks, two tenth deals to each ram of the two rams, 
And a several tenth deal to each lamb of the fourteen lambs: 
And one kid of the goats for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, his meat offering, and his drink offering. 
And on the second day ye shall offer twelve young bullocks, two rams, fourteen lambs of the first year without spot: 
And their meat offering and their drink offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the lambs, shall be according to their number, after the manner: 
And one kid of the goats for a sin offering; beside the
886,and we will walk in the name of the LORD our God for ever and ever. 
In that day, saith the LORD, will I assemble her that halteth, and I will gather her that is driven out, and her that I have afflicted; 
And I will make her that halted a remnant, and her that was cast far off a strong nation: and the LORD shall reign over them in mount Zion from henceforth, even for ever. 
And thou, O tower of the flock, the strong hold of the daughter of Zion, unto thee shall it come, even the first dominion; the kingdom shall come to the daughter of Jerusalem. 
Now why dost thou cry out aloud? is there no king in thee? is thy counsellor perished? for pangs have taken thee as a woman in travail. 
Be in pain, and labour to bring forth, O daughter of Zion, like a woman in travail: for now shalt thou go forth out of the city, and thou shalt dwell in the field, and thou shalt go even to Baby
1075,in the man of God is buried; lay my bones beside his bones: 
For the saying which he cried by the word of the LORD against the altar in Bethel, and against all the houses of the high places which are in the cities of Samaria, shall surely come to pass. 
After this thing Jeroboam returned not from his evil way, but made again of the lowest of the people priests of the high places: whosoever would, he consecrated him, and he became one of the priests of the high places. 
And this thing became sin unto the house of Jeroboam, even to cut it off, and to destroy it from off the face of the earth. 
At that time Abijah the son of Jeroboam fell sick. 
And Jeroboam said to his wife, Arise, I pray thee, and disguise thyself, that thou be not known to be the wife of Jeroboam; and get thee to Shiloh: behold, there is Ahijah the prophet, which told me that I should be king over this people. 
And take with thee ten loaves, and cracknels, and a cruse of honey, and go to him: he shall tell thee what shall become of the child. 
And Jeroboam's wife did so, and arose, and went t
829,had married her. 
For John had said unto Herod, It is not lawful for thee to have thy brother's wife. 
Therefore Herodias had a quarrel against him, and would have killed him; but she could not: 
For Herod feared John, knowing that he was a just man and an holy, and observed him; and when he heard him, he did many things, and heard him gladly. 
And when a convenient day was come, that Herod on his birthday made a supper to his lords, high captains, and chief estates of Galilee; 
And when the daughter of the said Herodias came in, and danced, and pleased Herod and them that sat with him, the king said unto the damsel, Ask of me whatsoever thou wilt, and I will give it thee. 
And he sware unto her, Whatsoever thou shalt ask of me, I will give it thee, unto the half of my kingdom. 
And she went forth, and said unto her m
736,to a multitude; and the LORD hath blessed thee since my coming: and now when shall I provide for mine own house also? 
And he said, What shall I give thee? And Jacob said, Thou shalt not give me any thing: if thou wilt do this thing for me, I will again feed and keep thy flock. 
I will pass through all thy flock to day, removing from thence all the speckled and spotted cattle, and all the brown cattle among the sheep, and the spotted and speckled among the goats: and of such shall be my hire. 
So shall my righteousness answer for me in time to come, when it shall come for my hire before thy face: every one that is not speckled and spotted among the goats, and brown among the sheep, that shall be counted stolen with me. 
And La
788,eir nets, and followed him. 
And going on from thence, he saw other two brethren, James the son of Zebedee, and John his brother, in a ship with Zebedee their father, mending their nets; and he called them. 
And they immediately left the ship and their father, and followed him. 
And Jesus went about all Galilee, teaching in their synagogues, and preaching the gospel of the kingdom, and healing all manner of sickness and all manner of disease among the people. 
And his fame went throughout all Syria: and they brought unto him all sick people that were taken with divers diseases and torments, and those which were possessed with devils, and those which were lunatick, and those that had the palsy; and he healed them. 
And there followed him great multitudes of people from Galilee, 
796, people is taken away for nought? they that rule over them make them to howl, saith the LORD; and my name continually every day is blasphemed. 
Therefore my people shall know my name: therefore they shall know in that day that I am he that doth speak: behold, it is I. 
How beautiful upon the mountains are the feet of him that bringeth good tidings, that publisheth peace; that bringeth good tidings of good, that publisheth salvation; that saith unto Zion, Thy God reigneth! 
Thy watchmen shall lift up the voice; with the voice together shall they sing: for they shall see eye to eye, when the LORD shall bring again Zion. 
Break forth into joy, sing together, ye waste places of Jerusalem: for the LORD hath comforted his people, he hath redeemed Jerusalem. 
The LORD hath made bare his holy 
1069,
And he hath given it to be furbished, that it may be handled: this sword is sharpened, and it is furbished, to give it into the hand of the slayer. 
Cry and howl, son of man: for it shall be upon my people, it shall be upon all the princes of Israel: terrors by reason of the sword shall be upon my people: smite therefore upon thy thigh. 
Because it is a trial, and what if the sword contemn even the rod? it shall be no more, saith the Lord GOD. 
Thou therefore, son of man, prophesy, and smite thine hands together. and let the sword be doubled the third time, the sword of the slain: it is the sword of the great men that are slain, which entereth into their privy chambers. 
I have set the point of the sword against all their gates, that their heart may faint, and their ruins be multiplied: ah! it is made bright, it is wrapped up for the slaughter. 
Go thee one way or other, either on the right hand, or on the left, whithersoever thy face is set. 
I will also smite mine hands together, and I will cause my fury to rest: I the LORD have said it. 
The word of
1006,thirty pieces of silver, and cast them to the potter in the house of the LORD. 
Then I cut asunder mine other staff, even Bands, that I might break the brotherhood between Judah and Israel. 
And the LORD said unto me, Take unto thee yet the instruments of a foolish shepherd. 
For, lo, I will raise up a shepherd in the land, which shall not visit those that be cut off, neither shall seek the young one, nor heal that that is broken, nor feed that that standeth still: but he shall eat the flesh of the fat, and tear their claws in pieces. 
Woe to the idol shepherd that leaveth the flock! the sword shall be upon his arm, and upon his right eye: his arm shall be clean dried up, and his right eye shall be utterly darkened. 
The burden of the word of the LORD for Israel, saith the LORD, which stretcheth forth the heavens, and layeth the foundation of the earth, and formeth the spirit of man within him. 
Behold, I will make Jerusalem a cup of trembling unto all the people round about, when they shall
933,o it the preaching that I bid thee. 
So Jonah arose, and went unto Nineveh, according to the word of the LORD. Now Nineveh was an exceeding great city of three days' journey. 
And Jonah began to enter into the city a day's journey, and he cried, and said, Yet forty days, and Nineveh shall be overthrown. 
So the people of Nineveh believed God, and proclaimed a fast, and put on sackcloth, from the greatest of them even to the least of them. 
For word came unto the king of Nineveh, and he arose from his throne, and he laid his robe from him, and covered him with sackcloth, and sat in ashes. 
And he caused it to be proclaimed and published through Nineveh by the decree of the king and his nobles, saying, Let neither man nor beast, herd nor flock, taste any thing: let them not feed, nor drink water: 
But let man and beast be covered with sackcloth, and cry mightily unto God: yea, let them turn every one from his evil way, an
896, so clothe the grass of the field, which to day is, and to morrow is cast into the oven, shall he not much more clothe you, O ye of little faith? 
Therefore take no thought, saying, What shall we eat? or, What shall we drink? or, Wherewithal shall we be clothed? 
(For after all these things do the Gentiles seek:) for your heavenly Father knoweth that ye have need of all these things. 
But seek ye first the kingdom of God, and his righteousness; and all these things shall be added unto you. 
Take therefore no thought for the morrow: for the morrow shall take thought for the things of itself. Sufficient unto the day is the evil thereof. 
Judge not, that ye be not judged. 
For with what judgment ye judge, ye shall be judged: and with what measure ye mete, it shall be measured to you again. 
And why beholdest thou the mote that is in thy brother's eye, but considerest not the beam that i
760, 
But I will have mercy upon the house of Judah, and will save them by the LORD their God, and will not save them by bow, nor by sword, nor by battle, by horses, nor by horsemen. 
Now when she had weaned Loruhamah, she conceived, and bare a son. 
Then said God, Call his name Loammi: for ye are not my people, and I will not be your God. 
Yet the number of the children of Israel shall be as the sand of the sea, which cannot be measured nor numbered; and it shall come to pass, that in the place where it was said unto them, Ye are not my people, there it shall be said unto them, Ye are the sons of the living God. 
Then shall the children of Judah and the children of Israel be gathered together, and appoint themselves one head, and they shall come up out 
877,And ye have not kept the charge of mine holy things: but ye have set keepers of my charge in my sanctuary for yourselves. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; No stranger, uncircumcised in heart, nor uncircumcised in flesh, shall enter into my sanctuary, of any stranger that is among the children of Israel. 
And the Levites that are gone away far from me, when Israel went astray, which went astray away from me after their idols; they shall even bear their iniquity. 
Yet they shall be ministers in my sanctuary, having charge at the gates of the house, and ministering to the house: they shall slay the burnt offering and the sacrifice for the people, and they shall stand before them to minister unto them. 
Because they ministered unto them before their idols, and caused the house of Israel to fall into iniquity; therefore have I lifted up mine hand against them, saith the Lord G
876,n her; as she hath done, do unto her. 
Cut off the sower from Babylon, and him that handleth the sickle in the time of harvest: for fear of the oppressing sword they shall turn every one to his people, and they shall flee every one to his own land. 
Israel is a scattered sheep; the lions have driven him away: first the king of Assyria hath devoured him; and last this Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon hath broken his bones. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Behold, I will punish the king of Babylon and his land, as I have punished the king of Assyria. 
And I will bring Israel again to his habitation, and he shall feed on Carmel and Bashan, and his soul shall be satisfied upon mount Ephraim and Gilead. 
In those days, and in that time, saith the LORD, the iniquity of Israel shall be sought for, and there shall be none; and the sins of Judah, a
844,at followed him from Galilee, stood afar off, beholding these things. 
And, behold, there was a man named Joseph, a counsellor; and he was a good man, and a just: 
(The same had not consented to the counsel and deed of them;) he was of Arimathaea, a city of the Jews: who also himself waited for the kingdom of God. 
This man went unto Pilate, and begged the body of Jesus. 
And he took it down, and wrapped it in linen, and laid it in a sepulchre that was hewn in stone, wherein never man before was laid. 
And that day was the preparation, and the sabbath drew on. 
And the women also, which came with him from Galilee, followed after, and beheld the sepulchre, and how his body was laid. 
And they returned, and prepared spices and ointments; and rested the sabbath day according to the commandment. 
Now upon the first day of the week, very
909,and thy voice shall be, as of one that hath a familiar spirit, out of the ground, and thy speech shall whisper out of the dust. 
Moreover the multitude of thy strangers shall be like small dust, and the multitude of the terrible ones shall be as chaff that passeth away: yea, it shall be at an instant suddenly. 
Thou shalt be visited of the LORD of hosts with thunder, and with earthquake, and great noise, with storm and tempest, and the flame of devouring fire. 
And the multitude of all the nations that fight against Ariel, even all that fight against her and her munition, and that distress her, shall be as a dream of a night vision. 
It shall even be as when an hungry man dreameth, and, behold, he eateth; but he awaketh, and his soul is empty: or as when a thirsty man dreameth, and, behold, he drinketh; but he awaketh, and, behold, he is faint, and his soul hath appetite: so shall the multitude o
1074, thou visited and destroyed them, and made all their memory to perish. 
Thou hast increased the nation, O LORD, thou hast increased the nation: thou art glorified: thou hadst removed it far unto all the ends of the earth. 
LORD, in trouble have they visited thee, they poured out a prayer when thy chastening was upon them. 
Like as a woman with child, that draweth near the time of her delivery, is in pain, and crieth out in her pangs; so have we been in thy sight, O LORD. 
We have been with child, we have been in pain, we have as it were brought forth wind; we have not wrought any deliverance in the earth; neither have the inhabitants of the world fallen. 
Thy dead men shall live, together with my dead body shall they arise. Awake and sing, ye that dwell in dust: for thy dew is as the dew of herbs, and the earth shall cast out the dead. 
Come, my people, enter thou into thy chambers, and shut thy doors about thee: hide thyself as it were for a little moment, until the indignation be overpast. 
For, behold, the LORD cometh out of his place to punish the inhabi
922,orted me. 
His foundation is in the holy mountains. 
The LORD loveth the gates of Zion more than all the dwellings of Jacob. 
Glorious things are spoken of thee, O city of God. Selah. 
I will make mention of Rahab and Babylon to them that know me: behold Philistia, and Tyre, with Ethiopia; this man was born there. 
And of Zion it shall be said, This and that man was born in her: and the highest himself shall establish her. 
The LORD shall count, when he writeth up the people, that this man was born there. Selah. 
As well the singers as the players on instruments shall be there: all my springs are in thee. 
O lord God of my salvation, I have cried day and night before thee: 
Let my prayer come before thee: incline thine ear unto my cry; 
For my soul is full of troubles: and my life draweth nigh unto the grave. 
I am counted with them that go down into the pit: I am as a man that hath no strength: 
Free among t
893,rds, O ye wise men; and give ear unto me, ye that have knowledge. 
For the ear trieth words, as the mouth tasteth meat. 
Let us choose to us judgment: let us know among ourselves what is good. 
For Job hath said, I am righteous: and God hath taken away my judgment. 
Should I lie against my right? my wound is incurable without transgression. 
What man is like Job, who drinketh up scorning like water? 
Which goeth in company with the workers of iniquity, and walketh with wicked men. 
For he hath said, It profiteth a man nothing that he should delight himself with God. 
Therefore hearken unto me ye men of understanding: far be it from God, that he should do wickedness; and from the Almighty, that he should commit iniquity. 
For the work of a man shall he render unto him, and cause every man to find according to his ways. 
Yea, surely God will not do wickedly, neither will the Almight
791,have burned incense unto all the host of heaven, and have poured out drink offerings unto other gods. 
Then came Jeremiah from Tophet, whither the LORD had sent him to prophesy; and he stood in the court of the LORD's house; and said to all the people, 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Behold, I will bring upon this city and upon all her towns all the evil that I have pronounced against it, because they have hardened their necks, that they might not hear my words. 
Now Pashur the son of Immer the priest, who was also chief governor in the house of the LORD, heard that Jeremiah prophesied these things. 
Then Pashur smote Jeremiah the prophet, and put him in the stocks that were in the high gate of Benjamin, which was by the house of the LORD. 
And it came to pass on
880,RD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, speak unto Pharaoh king of Egypt, and to his multitude; Whom art thou like in thy greatness? 
Behold, the Assyrian was a cedar in Lebanon with fair branches, and with a shadowing shroud, and of an high stature; and his top was among the thick boughs. 
The waters made him great, the deep set him up on high with her rivers running round about his plants, and sent her little rivers unto all the trees of the field. 
Therefore his height was exalted above all the trees of the field, and his boughs were multiplied, and his branches became long because of the multitude of waters, when he shot forth. 
All the fowls of heaven made their nests in his boughs, and under his branches did all the beasts of the field bring forth their young, and under his shadow dwelt all great nations. 
Thus was he fair in his greatness, in the length of his br
970,he earth beneath, or that is in the waters beneath the earth: 
Thou shalt not bow down thyself unto them, nor serve them: for I the LORD thy God am a jealous God, visiting the iniquity of the fathers upon the children unto the third and fourth generation of them that hate me, 
And shewing mercy unto thousands of them that love me and keep my commandments. 
Thou shalt not take the name of the LORD thy God in vain: for the LORD will not hold him guiltless that taketh his name in vain. 
Keep the sabbath day to sanctify it, as the LORD thy God hath commanded thee. 
Six days thou shalt labour, and do all thy work: 
But the seventh day is the sabbath of the LORD thy God: in it thou shalt not do any work, thou, nor thy son, nor thy daughter, nor thy manservant, nor thy maidservant, nor thine ox, nor thine ass, nor any of thy cattle, nor thy stranger that is within thy gates; that thy manservant and thy maidservant may rest as well as thou. 
And remember that thou
1013,e woman. 
He that blesseth his friend with a loud voice, rising early in the morning, it shall be counted a curse to him. 
A continual dropping in a very rainy day and a contentious woman are alike. 
Whosoever hideth her hideth the wind, and the ointment of his right hand, which bewrayeth itself. 
Iron sharpeneth iron; so a man sharpeneth the countenance of his friend. 
Whoso keepeth the fig tree shall eat the fruit thereof: so he that waiteth on his master shall be honoured. 
As in water face answereth to face, so the heart of man to man. 
Hell and destruction are never full; so the eyes of man are never satisfied. 
As the fining pot for silver, and the furnace for gold; so is a man to his praise. 
Though thou shouldest bray a fool in a mortar among wheat with a pestle, yet will not his foolishness depart from him. 
Be thou diligent to know the state of thy flocks, and look well to thy herds. 
For riches are not for ever: and doth the crown endure to every generation? 
The hay appeareth, and the t
873, of a buryingplace with you, that I may bury my dead out of my sight. 
And the children of Heth answered Abraham, saying unto him, 
Hear us, my lord: thou art a mighty prince among us: in the choice of our sepulchres bury thy dead; none of us shall withhold from thee his sepulchre, but that thou mayest bury thy dead. 
And Abraham stood up, and bowed himself to the people of the land, even to the children of Heth. 
And he communed with them, saying, If it be your mind that I should bury my dead out of my sight; hear me, and intreat for me to Ephron the son of Zohar, 
That he may give me the cave of Machpelah, which he hath, which is in the end of his field; for as much money as it is worth he shall give it me for a possession of a buryingplace amongst you. 
And Ephron dwelt among the children of Heth: and Ephron the Hittite answered Abraham in the audience of th
817, of the LORD is strength to the upright: but destruction shall be to the workers of iniquity. 
The righteous shall never be removed: but the wicked shall not inhabit the earth. 
The mouth of the just bringeth forth wisdom: but the froward tongue shall be cut out. 
The lips of the righteous know what is acceptable: but the mouth of the wicked speaketh frowardness. 
A false balance is abomination to the LORD: but a just weight is his delight. 
When pride cometh, then cometh shame: but with the lowly is wisdom. 
The integrity of the upright shall guide them: but the perverseness of transgressors shall destroy them. 
Riches profit not in the day of wrath: but righteousness delivereth from death. 
The righteousness of the perfect shall direct his way: but the wicked shall fall by his own wickedness. 
The righte
878,t, I am exceeding joyful in all our tribulation. 
For, when we were come into Macedonia, our flesh had no rest, but we were troubled on every side; without were fightings, within were fears. 
Nevertheless God, that comforteth those that are cast down, comforted us by the coming of Titus; 
And not by his coming only, but by the consolation wherewith he was comforted in you, when he told us your earnest desire, your mourning, your fervent mind toward me; so that I rejoiced the more. 
For though I made you sorry with a letter, I do not repent, though I did repent: for I perceive that the same epistle hath made you sorry, though it were but for a season. 
Now I rejoice, not that ye were made sorry, but that ye sorrowed to repentance: for ye were made sorry after a godly manner, that ye might receive damage by us in nothing. 
For godly sorrow worketh repentance to salvat
1020,e LORD was laid. 
But many of the priests and Levites and chief of the fathers, who were ancient men, that had seen the first house, when the foundation of this house was laid before their eyes, wept with a loud voice; and many shouted aloud for joy: 
So that the people could not discern the noise of the shout of joy from the noise of the weeping of the people: for the people shouted with a loud shout, and the noise was heard afar off. 
Now when the adversaries of Judah and Benjamin heard that the children of the captivity builded the temple unto the LORD God of Israel; 
Then they came to Zerubbabel, and to the chief of the fathers, and said unto them, Let us build with you: for we seek your God, as ye do; and we do sacrifice unto him since the days of Esarhaddon king of Assur, which brought us up hither. 
But Zerubbabel, and Jeshua, and the rest of the chief of the fathers of Israel, said unto them, Ye have nothing to do with us to build an house unto our God; but we ourselves together will build unto th
997,hen hands? 
He answered and said unto them, Well hath Esaias prophesied of you hypocrites, as it is written, This people honoureth me with their lips, but their heart is far from me. 
Howbeit in vain do they worship me, teaching for doctrines the commandments of men. 
For laying aside the commandment of God, ye hold the tradition of men, as the washing of pots and cups: and many other such like things ye do. 
And he said unto them, Full well ye reject the commandment of God, that ye may keep your own tradition. 
For Moses said, Honour thy father and thy mother; and, Whoso curseth father or mother, let him die the death: 
But ye say, If a man shall say to his father or mother, It is Corban, that is to say, a gift, by whatsoever thou mightest be profited by me; he shall be free. 
And ye suffer him no more to do ought for his father or his mother; 
Making the word of God of none effect through your tradition, which ye have delivered: and many such like things do ye. 
And when he had ca
909,lain the king: wherefore all Israel made Omri, the captain of the host, king over Israel that day in the camp. 
And Omri went up from Gibbethon, and all Israel with him, and they besieged Tirzah. 
And it came to pass, when Zimri saw that the city was taken, that he went into the palace of the king's house, and burnt the king's house over him with fire, and died. 
For his sins which he sinned in doing evil in the sight of the LORD, in walking in the way of Jeroboam, and in his sin which he did, to make Israel to sin. 
Now the rest of the acts of Zimri, and his treason that he wrought, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel? 
Then were the people of Israel divided into two parts: half of the people followed Tibni the son of Ginath, to make him king; and half followed Omri. 
But the people that followed Omri prevailed against the people that followed Tibni the son 
810,y more; neither shall the sun light on them, nor any heat. 
For the Lamb which is in the midst of the throne shall feed them, and shall lead them unto living fountains of waters: and God shall wipe away all tears from their eyes. 
And when he had opened the seventh seal, there was silence in heaven about the space of half an hour. 
And I saw the seven angels which stood before God; and to them were given seven trumpets. 
And another angel came and stood at the altar, having a golden censer; and there was given unto him much incense, that he should offer it with the prayers of all saints upon the golden altar which was before the throne. 
And the smoke of the incense, which came with the prayers of the saints, ascended up before God out of the angel's hand. 
And the angel took the censer, and filled 
855, hand, and on their left. 
Thus the LORD saved Israel that day out of the hand of the Egyptians; and Israel saw the Egyptians dead upon the sea shore. 
And Israel saw that great work which the LORD did upon the Egyptians: and the people feared the LORD, and believed the LORD, and his servant Moses. 
Then sang Moses and the children of Israel this song unto the LORD, and spake, saying, I will sing unto the LORD, for he hath triumphed gloriously: the horse and his rider hath he thrown into the sea. 
The LORD is my strength and song, and he is become my salvation: he is my God, and I will prepare him an habitation; my father's God, and I will exalt him. 
The LORD is a man of war: the LORD is his name. 
Pharaoh's chariots and his host hath he cast into the sea: his chosen captains also are drowned in the Red sea. 
The depths have covered them: the
963,e, came, and with him a great multitude with swords and staves, from the chief priests and elders of the people. 
Now he that betrayed him gave them a sign, saying, Whomsoever I shall kiss, that same is he: hold him fast. 
And forthwith he came to Jesus, and said, Hail, master; and kissed him. 
And Jesus said unto him, Friend, wherefore art thou come? Then came they, and laid hands on Jesus and took him. 
And, behold, one of them which were with Jesus stretched out his hand, and drew his sword, and struck a servant of the high priest's, and smote off his ear. 
Then said Jesus unto him, Put up again thy sword into his place: for all they that take the sword shall perish with the sword. 
Thinkest thou that I cannot now pray to my Father, and he shall presently give me more than twelve legions of angels? 
But how then shall the scriptures be fulfilled, that thus it must be? 
In that same hour said Jesus to the multitudes, Are ye come out as against a t
933,es, lest ye forget the covenant of the LORD your God, which he made with you, and make you a graven image, or the likeness of any thing, which the LORD thy God hath forbidden thee. 
For the LORD thy God is a consuming fire, even a jealous God. 
When thou shalt beget children, and children's children, and ye shall have remained long in the land, and shall corrupt yourselves, and make a graven image, or the likeness of any thing, and shall do evil in the sight of the LORD thy God, to provoke him to anger: 
I call heaven and earth to witness against you this day, that ye shall soon utterly perish from off the land whereunto ye go over Jordan to possess it; ye shall not prolong your days upon it, but shall utterly be destroyed. 
And the LORD shall scatter you among the nations, and ye shall be left few in number among the heathen, whither the LORD shall lead you. 
And there ye shall serve gods, the work of men's hands, wood
775,e gathered thy children together, even as a hen gathereth her chickens under her wings, and ye would not! 
Behold, your house is left unto you desolate. 
For I say unto you, Ye shall not see me henceforth, till ye shall say, Blessed is he that cometh in the name of the Lord. 
And Jesus went out, and departed from the temple: and his disciples came to him for to shew him the buildings of the temple. 
And Jesus said unto them, See ye not all these things? verily I say unto you, There shall not be left here one stone upon another, that shall not be thrown down. 
And as he sat upon the mount of Olives, the disciples came unto him privately, saying, Tell us, when shall these things be? and what shall be the sign of thy coming, and of the end of the world? 
And Jesus ans
755,oncerning the bond of her soul, shall not stand: her husband hath made them void; and the LORD shall forgive her. 
Every vow, and every binding oath to afflict the soul, her husband may establish it, or her husband may make it void. 
But if her husband altogether hold his peace at her from day to day; then he establisheth all her vows, or all her bonds, which are upon her: he confirmeth them, because he held his peace at her in the day that he heard them. 
But if he shall any ways make them void after that he hath heard them; then he shall bear her iniquity. 
These are the statutes, which the LORD commanded Moses, between a man and his wife, between the father and his daughter, being yet in her youth in her father's house. 
And the LORD spake un
874,fore make confession unto the LORD God of your fathers, and do his pleasure: and separate yourselves from the people of the land, and from the strange wives. 
Then all the congregation answered and said with a loud voice, As thou hast said, so must we do. 
But the people are many, and it is a time of much rain, and we are not able to stand without, neither is this a work of one day or two: for we are many that have transgressed in this thing. 
Let now our rulers of all the congregation stand, and let all them which have taken strange wives in our cities come at appointed times, and with them the elders of every city, and the judges thereof, until the fierce wrath of our God for this matter be turned from us. 
Only Jonathan the son of Asahel and Jahaziah the son of Tikvah were employed about this matter: and Meshullam and Shabbethai the Levite helped them. 
And t
866,the reign of Artaxerxes king of Persia, Ezra the son of Seraiah, the son of Azariah, the son of Hilkiah, 
The son of Shallum, the son of Zadok, the son of Ahitub, 
The son of Amariah, the son of Azariah, the son of Meraioth, 
The son of Zerahiah, the son of Uzzi, the son of Bukki, 
The son of Abishua, the son of Phinehas, the son of Eleazar, the son of Aaron the chief priest: 
This Ezra went up from Babylon; and he was a ready scribe in the law of Moses, which the LORD God of Israel had given: and the king granted him all his request, according to the hand of the LORD his God upon him. 
And there went up some of the children of Israel, and of the priests, and the Levites, and the singers, and the porters, and the Nethinims, unto Jerusalem, in the seventh year of Artaxerxes the king. 
And he came to Jerusalem in the fifth month, which was in the seventh y
1032, cannot be gotten for gold, neither shall silver be weighed for the price thereof. 
It cannot be valued with the gold of Ophir, with the precious onyx, or the sapphire. 
The gold and the crystal cannot equal it: and the exchange of it shall not be for jewels of fine gold. 
No mention shall be made of coral, or of pearls: for the price of wisdom is above rubies. 
The topaz of Ethiopia shall not equal it, neither shall it be valued with pure gold. 
Whence then cometh wisdom? and where is the place of understanding? 
Seeing it is hid from the eyes of all living, and kept close from the fowls of the air. 
Destruction and death say, We have heard the fame thereof with our ears. 
God understandeth the way thereof, and he knoweth the place thereof. 
For he looketh to the ends of the earth, and seeth under the whole heaven; 
To make the weight for the winds; and he weigheth the waters by measure. 
When he made a decree for the rain, and a way for the lightning of the thunder: 
Then did he see it, and declare it; he prepared 
882, of heaven; yea, the fishes of the sea also shall be taken away. 
Yet let no man strive, nor reprove another: for thy people are as they that strive with the priest. 
Therefore shalt thou fall in the day, and the prophet also shall fall with thee in the night, and I will destroy thy mother. 
My people are destroyed for lack of knowledge: because thou hast rejected knowledge, I will also reject thee, that thou shalt be no priest to me: seeing thou hast forgotten the law of thy God, I will also forget thy children. 
As they were increased, so they sinned against me: therefore will I change their glory into shame. 
They eat up the sin of my people, and they set their heart on their iniquity. 
And there shall be, like people, like priest: and I will punish them for their ways, and reward them their doings. 
For they shall eat, and not have enough: they shall commit whoredom
957,dealeth in proud wrath. 
The desire of the slothful killeth him; for his hands refuse to labour. 
He coveteth greedily all the day long: but the righteous giveth and spareth not. 
The sacrifice of the wicked is abomination: how much more, when he bringeth it with a wicked mind? 
A false witness shall perish: but the man that heareth speaketh constantly. 
A wicked man hardeneth his face: but as for the upright, he directeth his way. 
There is no wisdom nor understanding nor counsel against the LORD. 
The horse is prepared against the day of battle: but safety is of the LORD. 
A GOOD name is rather to be chosen than great riches, and loving favour rather than silver and gold. 
The rich and poor meet together: the LORD is the maker of them all. 
A prudent man foreseeth the evil, and hideth himself: but the simple pass on, and are punished. 
By humility and the fear of the LORD are riches, and honour, and life. 
Thorns and snares are in the way of
770,ighteous smite me; it shall be a kindness: and let him reprove me; it shall be an excellent oil, which shall not break my head: for yet my prayer also shall be in their calamities. 
When their judges are overthrown in stony places, they shall hear my words; for they are sweet. 
Our bones are scattered at the grave's mouth, as when one cutteth and cleaveth wood upon the earth. 
But mine eyes are unto thee, O GOD the Lord: in thee is my trust; leave not my soul destitute. 
Keep me from the snares which they have laid for me, and the gins of the workers of iniquity. 
Let the wicked fall into their own nets, whilst that I withal escape. 
I cried unto the LORD with my voice; with my voice unto the LORD did I make my supplication. 
I poured out my complaint before h
772,, to the marriage. 
And when they wanted wine, the mother of Jesus saith unto him, They have no wine. 
Jesus saith unto her, Woman, what have I to do with thee? mine hour is not yet come. 
His mother saith unto the servants, Whatsoever he saith unto you, do it. 
And there were set there six waterpots of stone, after the manner of the purifying of the Jews, containing two or three firkins apiece. 
Jesus saith unto them, Fill the waterpots with water. And they filled them up to the brim. 
And he saith unto them, Draw out now, and bear unto the governor of the feast. And they bare it. 
When the ruler of the feast had tasted the water that was made wine, and knew not whence it was: (but the servants which drew the water knew;) the governor of the feast called the br
833, place therefore ye hear the sound of the trumpet, resort ye thither unto us: our God shall fight for us. 
So we laboured in the work: and half of them held the spears from the rising of the morning till the stars appeared. 
Likewise at the same time said I unto the people, Let every one with his servant lodge within Jerusalem, that in the night they may be a guard to us, and labour on the day. 
So neither I, nor my brethren, nor my servants, nor the men of the guard which followed me, none of us put off our clothes, saving that every one put them off for washing. 
And there was a great cry of the people and of their wives against their brethren the Jews. 
For there were that said, We, our sons, and our daughters, are many: therefore we take up corn for them, that we may eat, and live. 
Some also there were that said, We 
1047,e they cry, saying, Let us go and sacrifice to our God. 
Let there more work be laid upon the men, that they may labour therein; and let them not regard vain words. 
And the taskmasters of the people went out, and their officers, and they spake to the people, saying, Thus saith Pharaoh, I will not give you straw. 
Go ye, get you straw where ye can find it: yet not ought of your work shall be diminished. 
So the people were scattered abroad throughout all the land of Egypt to gather stubble instead of straw. 
And the taskmasters hasted them, saying, Fulfil your works, your daily tasks, as when there was straw. 
And the officers of the children of Israel, which Pharaoh's taskmasters had set over them, were beaten, and demanded, Wherefore have ye not fulfilled your task in making brick both yesterday and to day, as heretofore? 
Then the officers of the children of Israel came and cried unto Pharaoh, saying, Wherefore dealest thou thus with thy servants? 
There is no straw given unto thy servants, and they say to us, Make brick: and, b
1002, LORD in Jerusalem: and they killed the passover on the fourteenth day of the first month. 
And he set the priests in their charges, and encouraged them to the service of the house of the LORD, 
And said unto the Levites that taught all Israel, which were holy unto the LORD, Put the holy ark in the house which Solomon the son of David king of Israel did build; it shall not be a burden upon your shoulders: serve now the LORD your God, and his people Israel, 
And prepare yourselves by the houses of your fathers, after your courses, according to the writing of David king of Israel, and according to the writing of Solomon his son. 
And stand in the holy place according to the divisions of the families of the fathers of your brethren the people, and after the division of the families of the Levites. 
So kill the passover, and sanctify yourselves, and prepare your brethren, that they may do according to the word of the LORD by the hand of Moses. 
And Josiah gave to the people, of the flock, la
914, we have sworn by the LORD that we will not give them of our daughters to wives? 
And they said, What one is there of the tribes of Israel that came not up to Mizpeh to the LORD? And, behold, there came none to the camp from Jabeshgilead to the assembly. 
For the people were numbered, and, behold, there were none of the inhabitants of Jabeshgilead there. 
And the congregation sent thither twelve thousand men of the valiantest, and commanded them, saying, Go and smite the inhabitants of Jabeshgilead with the edge of the sword, with the women and the children. 
And this is the thing that ye shall do, Ye shall utterly destroy every male, and every woman that hath lain by man. 
And they found among the inhabitants of Jabeshgilead four hundred young virgins, that had known no man by lying with any male: and they brought them unto the camp to Shiloh, which is in the land of Canaan. 
And the whole congregati
936,delivered him to four quaternions of soldiers to keep him; intending after Easter to bring him forth to the people. 
Peter therefore was kept in prison: but prayer was made without ceasing of the church unto God for him. 
And when Herod would have brought him forth, the same night Peter was sleeping between two soldiers, bound with two chains: and the keepers before the door kept the prison. 
And, behold, the angel of the Lord came upon him, and a light shined in the prison: and he smote Peter on the side, and raised him up, saying, Arise up quickly. And his chains fell off from his hands. 
And the angel said unto him, Gird thyself, and bind on thy sandals. And so he did. And he saith unto him, Cast thy garment about thee, and follow me. 
And he went out, and followed him; and wist not that it was true which was done by the angel; but thought he saw a vision. 
When they were past the first and the second ward, they came un
844, 
And the LORD appeared to Solomon by night, and said unto him, I have heard thy prayer, and have chosen this place to myself for an house of sacrifice. 
If I shut up heaven that there be no rain, or if I command the locusts to devour the land, or if I send pestilence among my people; 
If my people, which are called by my name, shall humble themselves, and pray, and seek my face, and turn from their wicked ways; then will I hear from heaven, and will forgive their sin, and will heal their land. 
Now mine eyes shall be open, and mine ears attent unto the prayer that is made in this place. 
For now have I chosen and sanctified this house, that my name may be there for ever: and mine eyes and mine heart shall be there perpetually. 
And as for thee, if thou wilt walk before me, as David thy father walked, and do according to all that I 
822, 
And thou shalt command the priests that bear the ark of the covenant, saying, When ye are come to the brink of the water of Jordan, ye shall stand still in Jordan. 
And Joshua said unto the children of Israel, Come hither, and hear the words of the LORD your God. 
And Joshua said, Hereby ye shall know that the living God is among you, and that he will without fail drive out from before you the Canaanites, and the Hittites, and the Hivites, and the Perizzites, and the Girgashites, and the Amorites, and the Jebusites. 
Behold, the ark of the covenant of the LORD of all the earth passeth over before you into Jordan. 
Now therefore take you twelve men out of the tribes of Israel, out of every tribe a man. 
And it shall come to pass, as soon as the soles of the feet of the priests that bear the ark of the LORD, th
1055,even as he is righteous. 
He that committeth sin is of the devil; for the devil sinneth from the beginning. For this purpose the Son of God was manifested, that he might destroy the works of the devil. 
Whosoever is born of God doth not commit sin; for his seed remaineth in him: and he cannot sin, because he is born of God. 
In this the children of God are manifest, and the children of the devil: whosoever doeth not righteousness is not of God, neither he that loveth not his brother. 
For this is the message that ye heard from the beginning, that we should love one another. 
Not as Cain, who was of that wicked one, and slew his brother. And wherefore slew he him? Because his own works were evil, and his brother's righteous. 
Marvel not, my brethren, if the world hate you. 
We know that we have passed from death unto life, because we love the brethren. He that loveth not his brother abideth in death. 
Whosoever hateth his brother is a murderer: and ye know that no murderer hath eternal life abiding in him. 
Hereby perceive we the love of Go
966,d Rahab, and lodged there. 
And it was told the king of Jericho, saying, Behold, there came men in hither to night of the children of Israel to search out the country. 
And the king of Jericho sent unto Rahab, saying, Bring forth the men that are come to thee, which are entered into thine house: for they be come to search out all the country. 
And the woman took the two men, and hid them, and said thus, There came men unto me, but I wist not whence they were: 
And it came to pass about the time of shutting of the gate, when it was dark, that the men went out: whither the men went I wot not: pursue after them quickly; for ye shall overtake them. 
But she had brought them up to the roof of the house, and hid them with the stalks of flax, which she had laid in order upon the roof. 
And the men pursued after them the way to Jordan unto the fords: and as soon as they which pursued after them were gone out, they shut the gate. 
And before they were laid down
933,les began to rejoice and praise God with a loud voice for all the mighty works that they had seen; 
Saying, Blessed be the King that cometh in the name of the Lord: peace in heaven, and glory in the highest. 
And some of the Pharisees from among the multitude said unto him, Master, rebuke thy disciples. 
And he answered and said unto them, I tell you that, if these should hold their peace, the stones would immediately cry out. 
And when he was come near, he beheld the city, and wept over it, 
Saying, If thou hadst known, even thou, at least in this thy day, the things which belong unto thy peace! but now they are hid from thine eyes. 
For the days shall come upon thee, that thine enemies shall cast a trench about thee, and compass thee round, and keep thee in on every side, 
And shall lay thee even with the ground, and thy children within thee; and they shall not leave in thee one stone upon another; because thou knewes
832,e to look into. 
Wherefore gird up the loins of your mind, be sober, and hope to the end for the grace that is to be brought unto you at the revelation of Jesus Christ; 
As obedient children, not fashioning yourselves according to the former lusts in your ignorance: 
But as he which hath called you is holy, so be ye holy in all manner of conversation; 
Because it is written, Be ye holy; for I am holy. 
And if ye call on the Father, who without respect of persons judgeth according to every man's work, pass the time of your sojourning here in fear: 
Forasmuch as ye know that ye were not redeemed with corruptible things, as silver and gold, from your vain conversation received by tradition from your fathers; 
But with the precious blood of Christ, as of a lamb without blemish and without spot: 
Who verily was foreordained b
770,s not yet given; because that Jesus was not yet glorified.) 
Many of the people therefore, when they heard this saying, said, Of a truth this is the Prophet. 
Others said, This is the Christ. But some said, Shall Christ come out of Galilee? 
Hath not the scripture said, That Christ cometh of the seed of David, and out of the town of Bethlehem, where David was? 
So there was a division among the people because of him. 
And some of them would have taken him; but no man laid hands on him. 
Then came the officers to the chief priests and Pharisees; and they said unto them, Why have ye not brought him? 
The officers answered, Never man spake like this man. 
Then answered them the Pharisees, Are ye also deceived? 
Have any of the rulers or of the Pharisees believed 
930,the land of Egypt. And Jacob's heart fainted, for he believed them not. 
And they told him all the words of Joseph, which he had said unto them: and when he saw the wagons which Joseph had sent to carry him, the spirit of Jacob their father revived: 
And Israel said, It is enough; Joseph my son is yet alive: I will go and see him before I die. 
And Israel took his journey with all that he had, and came to Beersheba, and offered sacrifices unto the God of his father Isaac. 
And God spake unto Israel in the visions of the night, and said, Jacob, Jacob. And he said, Here am I. 
And he said, I am God, the God of thy father: fear not to go down into Egypt; for I will there make of thee a great nation: 
I will go down with thee into Egypt; and I will also surely bring thee up again: and Joseph shall put his hand upon thine eyes. 
And Jacob rose up from Beersheba: and the sons of Israel carried Jacob their father, and their
773,fied against me, and the Almighty hath afflicted me? 
So Naomi returned, and Ruth the Moabitess, her daughter in law, with her, which returned out of the country of Moab: and they came to Bethlehem in the beginning of barley harvest. 
And Naomi had a kinsman of her husband's, a mighty man of wealth, of the family of Elimelech; and his name was Boaz. 
And Ruth the Moabitess said unto Naomi, Let me now go to the field, and glean ears of corn after him in whose sight I shall find grace. And she said unto her, Go, my daughter. 
And she went, and came, and gleaned in the field after the reapers: and her hap was to light on a part of the field belonging unto Boaz, who was of the kindred of Elimelech. 
And, behold, Boaz came from Bethlehem, and said unto the reapers, Th
922,e are the families of Manasseh, and those that were numbered of them, fifty and two thousand and seven hundred. 
These are the sons of Ephraim after their families: of Shuthelah, the family of the Shuthalhites: of Becher, the family of the Bachrites: of Tahan, the family of the Tahanites. 
And these are the sons of Shuthelah: of Eran, the family of the Eranites. 
These are the families of the sons of Ephraim according to those that were numbered of them, thirty and two thousand and five hundred. These are the sons of Joseph after their families. 
The sons of Benjamin after their families: of Bela, the family of the Belaites: of Ashbel, the family of the Ashbelites: of Ahiram, the family of the Ahiramites: 
Of Shupham, the family of the Shuphamites: of Hupham, the family of the Huphamites. 
And the sons of Bela were ard and Naaman: of Ard, the family of the Ardites: and of Naaman, the family of the Naamites. 

850, earth. 
The LORD of hosts is with us; the God of Jacob is our refuge. Selah. 
O clap your hands, all ye people; shout unto God with the voice of triumph. 
For the LORD most high is terrible; he is a great King over all the earth. 
He shall subdue the people under us, and the nations under our feet. 
He shall choose our inheritance for us, the excellency of Jacob whom he loved. Selah. 
God is gone up with a shout, the LORD with the sound of a trumpet. 
Sing praises to God, sing praises: sing praises unto our King, sing praises. 
For God is the King of all the earth: sing ye praises with understanding. 
God reigneth over the heathen: God sitteth upon the throne of his holiness. 
The princes of the people are gathered together, even the people of the God of Abraham: for the shields of the earth belong unto God: he is greatly exalted. 
Great
1034, thee, that I may know what to do unto thee. 
And the children of Israel stripped themselves of their ornaments by the mount Horeb. 
And Moses took the tabernacle, and pitched it without the camp, afar off from the camp, and called it the Tabernacle of the congregation. And it came to pass, that every one which sought the LORD went out unto the tabernacle of the congregation, which was without the camp. 
And it came to pass, when Moses went out unto the tabernacle, that all the people rose up, and stood every man at his tent door, and looked after Moses, until he was gone into the tabernacle. 
And it came to pass, as Moses entered into the tabernacle, the cloudy pillar descended, and stood at the door of the tabernacle, and the Lord talked with Moses. 
And all the people saw the cloudy pillar stand at the tabernacle door: and all the people rose up and worshipped, every man in his tent door. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses face to face, as a man speaketh unto his friend. And he turned again into the camp: but his servan
916,hat we have vowed, to burn incense to the queen of heaven, and to pour out drink offerings unto her: ye will surely accomplish your vows, and surely perform your vows. 
Therefore hear ye the word of the LORD, all Judah that dwell in the land of Egypt; Behold, I have sworn by my great name, saith the LORD, that my name shall no more be named in the mouth of any man of Judah in all the land of Egypt, saying, The Lord GOD liveth. 
Behold, I will watch over them for evil, and not for good: and all the men of Judah that are in the land of Egypt shall be consumed by the sword and by the famine, until there be an end of them. 
Yet a small number that escape the sword shall return out of the land of Egypt into the land of Judah, and all the remnant of Judah, that are gone into the land of Egypt to sojourn there, shall know whose words shall stand, mine, or their's. 
And this shall be a sign unto you, saith the 
1055,r they were not numbered among the children of Israel, because there was no inheritance given them among the children of Israel. 
These are they that were numbered by Moses and Eleazar the priest, who numbered the children of Israel in the plains of Moab by Jordan near Jericho. 
But among these there was not a man of them whom Moses and Aaron the priest numbered, when they numbered the children of Israel in the wilderness of Sinai. 
For the LORD had said of them, They shall surely die in the wilderness. And there was not left a man of them, save Caleb the son of Jephunneh, and Joshua the son of Nun. 
Then came the daughters of Zelophehad, the son of Hepher, the son of Gilead, the son of Machir, the son of Manasseh, of the families of Manasseh the son of Joseph: and these are the names of his daughters; Mahlah, Noah, and Hoglah, and Milcah, and Tirzah. 
And they stood before Moses, and before Eleazar the priest, and before the princes and all the congregation, by the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, saying, 
Our father died in th
891,ot to be compared to it. 
I wisdom dwell with prudence, and find out knowledge of witty inventions. 
The fear of the LORD is to hate evil: pride, and arrogancy, and the evil way, and the froward mouth, do I hate. 
Counsel is mine, and sound wisdom: I am understanding; I have strength. 
By me kings reign, and princes decree justice. 
By me princes rule, and nobles, even all the judges of the earth. 
I love them that love me; and those that seek me early shall find me. 
Riches and honour are with me; yea, durable riches and righteousness. 
My fruit is better than gold, yea, than fine gold; and my revenue than choice silver. 
I lead in the way of righteousness, in the midst of the paths of judgment: 
That I may cause those that love me to inherit substance; and I will fill their treasures. 
The LORD possessed me in the beginning of his way, before his works of old. 
I was set up fr
1067, he hath lighted a candle, covereth it with a vessel, or putteth it under a bed; but setteth it on a candlestick, that they which enter in may see the light. 
For nothing is secret, that shall not be made manifest; neither any thing hid, that shall not be known and come abroad. 
Take heed therefore how ye hear: for whosoever hath, to him shall be given; and whosoever hath not, from him shall be taken even that which he seemeth to have. 
Then came to him his mother and his brethren, and could not come at him for the press. 
And it was told him by certain which said, Thy mother and thy brethren stand without, desiring to see thee. 
And he answered and said unto them, My mother and my brethren are these which hear the word of God, and do it. 
Now it came to pass on a certain day, that he went into a ship with his disciples: and he said unto them, Let us go over unto the other side of the lake. And they launched forth. 
But as they sailed he fell asleep: and there came down a storm of wind on the lake; and they were filled with water, and were in jeopardy
859,ial, and have strengthened themselves against Rehoboam the son of Solomon, when Rehoboam was young and tenderhearted, and could not withstand them. 
And now ye think to withstand the kingdom of the LORD in the hand of the sons of David; and ye be a great multitude, and there are with your golden calves, which Jeroboam made you for gods. 
Have ye not cast out the priests of the LORD, the sons of Aaron, and the Levites, and have made you priests after the manner of the nations of other lands? so that whosoever cometh to consecrate himself with a young bullock and seven rams, the same may be a priest of them that are no gods. 
But as for us, the LORD is our God, and we have not forsaken him; and the priests, which minister unto the LORD, are the sons of Aaron, and the Levites wait upon their business: 
And they burn unto the LORD every morning and ev
1075,nst the enemy. 
And Uzziah prepared for them throughout all the host shields, and spears, and helmets, and habergeons, and bows, and slings to cast stones. 
And he made in Jerusalem engines, invented by cunning men, to be on the towers and upon the bulwarks, to shoot arrows and great stones withal. And his name spread far abroad; for he was marvellously helped, till he was strong. 
But when he was strong, his heart was lifted up to his destruction: for he transgressed against the LORD his God, and went into the temple of the LORD to burn incense upon the altar of incense. 
And Azariah the priest went in after him, and with him fourscore priests of the LORD, that were valiant men: 
And they withstood Uzziah the king, and said unto him, It appertaineth not unto thee, Uzziah, to burn incense unto the LORD, but to the priests the sons of Aaron, that are consecrated to burn incense: go out of the sanctuary; for thou hast trespassed; neither shall it be for thine honour from the LORD God. 
Then Uzziah was wroth, and had a censer in his hand to burn incense: and whi
826,ing to these measures: and there were windows in it and in the arches thereof round about: it was fifty cubits long, and five and twenty cubits broad. 
And the arches round about were five and twenty cubits long, and five cubits broad. 
And the arches thereof were toward the utter court; and palm trees were upon the posts thereof: and the going up to it had eight steps. 
And he brought me into the inner court toward the east: and he measured the gate according to these measures. 
And the little chambers thereof, and the posts thereof, and the arches thereof, were according to these measures: and there were windows therein and in the arches thereof round about: it was fifty cubits long, and five and twenty cubits broad. 
And the arches thereof were toward the outward court; and palm trees were upon the posts thereof
903,er I called Bands; and I fed the flock. 
Three shepherds also I cut off in one month; and my soul lothed them, and their soul also abhorred me. 
Then said I, I will not feed you: that that dieth, let it die; and that that is to be cut off, let it be cut off; and let the rest eat every one the flesh of another. 
And I took my staff, even Beauty, and cut it asunder, that I might break my covenant which I had made with all the people. 
And it was broken in that day: and so the poor of the flock that waited upon me knew that it was the word of the LORD. 
And I said unto them, If ye think good, give me my price; and if not, forbear. So they weighed for my price thirty pieces of silver. 
And the LORD said unto me, Cast it unto the potter: a goodly price that I was prised at of them. And I took the thirty pieces of silver, and cast them to the potter in the house of the LORD. 
Then I cut asunder m
872,ir lust. 
Yea, they spake against God; they said, Can God furnish a table in the wilderness? 
Behold, he smote the rock, that the waters gushed out, and the streams overflowed; can he give bread also? can he provide flesh for his people? 
Therefore the LORD heard this, and was wroth: so a fire was kindled against Jacob, and anger also came up against Israel; 
Because they believed not in God, and trusted not in his salvation: 
Though he had commanded the clouds from above, and opened the doors of heaven, 
And had rained down manna upon them to eat, and had given them of the corn of heaven. 
Man did eat angels' food: he sent them meat to the full. 
He caused an east wind to blow in the heaven: and by his power he brought in the south wind. 
He rained flesh also upon them as dust, and feathered fowls like as the sand of the sea: 
And he let it fall in the midst 
783,u, and will punish you yet seven times for your sins. 
And I will bring a sword upon you, that shall avenge the quarrel of my covenant: and when ye are gathered together within your cities, I will send the pestilence among you; and ye shall be delivered into the hand of the enemy. 
And when I have broken the staff of your bread, ten women shall bake your bread in one oven, and they shall deliver you your bread again by weight: and ye shall eat, and not be satisfied. 
And if ye will not for all this hearken unto me, but walk contrary unto me; 
Then I will walk contrary unto you also in fury; and I, even I, will chastise you seven times for your sins. 
And ye shall eat the flesh of your sons, and the flesh of your daughters shall ye eat. 
And I will destroy your high places,
869,cannot leave his father: for if he should leave his father, his father would die. 
And thou saidst unto thy servants, Except your youngest brother come down with you, ye shall see my face no more. 
And it came to pass when we came up unto thy servant my father, we told him the words of my lord. 
And our father said, Go again, and buy us a little food. 
And we said, We cannot go down: if our youngest brother be with us, then will we go down: for we may not see the man's face, except our youngest brother be with us. 
And thy servant my father said unto us, Ye know that my wife bare me two sons: 
And the one went out from me, and I said, Surely he is torn in pieces; and I saw him not since: 
And if ye take this also from me, and mischief befall him, ye shall bring down my gray hairs with sorrow to the grave. 
Now therefore when I come to thy servant my father,
729, saw there a daughter of a certain Canaanite, whose name was Shuah; and he took her, and went in unto her. 
And she conceived, and bare a son; and he called his name Er. 
And she conceived again, and bare a son; and she called his name Onan. 
And she yet again conceived, and bare a son; and called his name Shelah: and he was at Chezib, when she bare him. 
And Judah took a wife for Er his firstborn, whose name was Tamar. 
And Er, Judah's firstborn, was wicked in the sight of the LORD; and the LORD slew him. 
And Judah said unto Onan, Go in unto thy brother's wife, and marry her, and raise up seed to thy brother. 
And Onan knew that the seed should not be his; and it came to pass, when he went in unto his brother's wife, 
773,ather; and he perceived not when she lay down, nor when she arose. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, that the firstborn said unto the younger, Behold, I lay yesternight with my father: let us make him drink wine this night also; and go thou in, and lie with him, that we may preserve seed of our father. 
And they made their father drink wine that night also: and the younger arose, and lay with him; and he perceived not when she lay down, nor when she arose. 
Thus were both the daughters of Lot with child by their father. 
And the first born bare a son, and called his name Moab: the same is the father of the Moabites unto this day. 
And the younger, she also bare a son, and called his name Benammi: the same is the father of the children of Ammon unto this day. 
A
907,all not stand on his side, neither be for him. 
After this shall he turn his face unto the isles, and shall take many: but a prince for his own behalf shall cause the reproach offered by him to cease; without his own reproach he shall cause it to turn upon him. 
Then he shall turn his face toward the fort of his own land: but he shall stumble and fall, and not be found. 
Then shall stand up in his estate a raiser of taxes in the glory of the kingdom: but within few days he shall be destroyed, neither in anger, nor in battle. 
And in his estate shall stand up a vile person, to whom they shall not give the honour of the kingdom: but he shall come in peaceably, and obtain the kingdom by flatteries. 
And with the arms of a flood shall they be overflown from before him, and shall be broken; yea, also the prince of the covenant. 
And after the league made with him he shall work deceitfully: for he sh
765, of corn, or the standing corn, or the field, be consumed therewith; he that kindled the fire shall surely make restitution. 
If a man shall deliver unto his neighbour money or stuff to keep, and it be stolen out of the man's house; if the thief be found, let him pay double. 
If the thief be not found, then the master of the house shall be brought unto the judges, to see whether he have put his hand unto his neighbour's goods. 
For all manner of trespass, whether it be for ox, for ass, for sheep, for raiment, or for any manner of lost thing which another challengeth to be his, the cause of both parties shall come before the judges; and whom the judges shall condemn, he shall pay double unto his neighbour. 
If a man deliver unto his neighbour an ass, or an
820,atherless, nor the widow, neither shed innocent blood in this place. 
For if ye do this thing indeed, then shall there enter in by the gates of this house kings sitting upon the throne of David, riding in chariots and on horses, he, and his servants, and his people. 
But if ye will not hear these words, I swear by myself, saith the LORD, that this house shall become a desolation. 
For thus saith the LORD unto the king's house of Judah; Thou art Gilead unto me, and the head of Lebanon: yet surely I will make thee a wilderness, and cities which are not inhabited. 
And I will prepare destroyers against thee, every one with his weapons: and they shall cut down thy choice cedars, and cast them into the fire. 
And many nations shall pass by this city, and they shall say every man to his neighbour, Wherefore hath th
976,, tell us plainly. 
Jesus answered them, I told you, and ye believed not: the works that I do in my Father's name, they bear witness of me. 
But ye believe not, because ye are not of my sheep, as I said unto you. 
My sheep hear my voice, and I know them, and they follow me: 
And I give unto them eternal life; and they shall never perish, neither shall any man pluck them out of my hand. 
My Father, which gave them me, is greater than all; and no man is able to pluck them out of my Father's hand. 
I and my Father are one. 
Then the Jews took up stones again to stone him. 
Jesus answered them, Many good works have I shewed you from my Father; for which of those works do ye stone me? 
The Jews answered him, saying, For a good work we stone thee not; but for blasphemy; and because that thou, being a man, makest thyself God. 
Jesus answered them, Is it not written in your law, I said, Ye are gods? 
If he called them gods, unto whom the word of God came, and the script
871,ll say, Where are their gods, their rock in whom they trusted, 
Which did eat the fat of their sacrifices, and drank the wine of their drink offerings? let them rise up and help you, and be your protection. 
See now that I, even I, am he, and there is no god with me: I kill, and I make alive; I wound, and I heal: neither is there any that can deliver out of my hand. 
For I lift up my hand to heaven, and say, I live for ever. 
If I whet my glittering sword, and mine hand take hold on judgment; I will render vengeance to mine enemies, and will reward them that hate me. 
I will make mine arrows drunk with blood, and my sword shall devour flesh; and that with the blood of the slain and of the captives, from the beginning of revenges upon the enemy. 
Rejoice, O ye nations, with his people: for he will avenge the blood of his servants, and will render vengeance to 
925,ead of the live goat, and confess over him all the iniquities of the children of Israel, and all their transgressions in all their sins, putting them upon the head of the goat, and shall send him away by the hand of a fit man into the wilderness: 
And the goat shall bear upon him all their iniquities unto a land not inhabited: and he shall let go the goat in the wilderness. 
And Aaron shall come into the tabernacle of the congregation, and shall put off the linen garments, which he put on when he went into the holy place, and shall leave them there: 
And he shall wash his flesh with water in the holy place, and put on his garments, and come forth, and offer his burnt offering, and the burnt offering of the people, and make an atonement for himself, and for the people. 
And the fat of the sin offering shall he burn upon the altar. 
And he that let go the goat for the scapegoat shall wash his clothes, and bathe hi
962,n I will carry, and will deliver you. 
To whom will ye liken me, and make me equal, and compare me, that we may be like? 
They lavish gold out of the bag, and weigh silver in the balance, and hire a goldsmith; and he maketh it a god: they fall down, yea, they worship. 
They bear him upon the shoulder, they carry him, and set him in his place, and he standeth; from his place shall he not remove: yea, one shall cry unto him, yet can he not answer, nor save him out of his trouble. 
Remember this, and shew yourselves men: bring it again to mind, O ye transgressors. 
Remember the former things of old: for I am God, and there is none else; I am God, and there is none like me, 
Declaring the end from the beginning, and from ancient times the things that are not yet done, saying, My counsel shall stand, and I will do all my pleasure: 
Calling a ravenous bird from the east, the man that executeth my counsel from a far country: yea, I have spoken it, I will 
886,s man: if by any means he be missing, then shall thy life be for his life, or else thou shalt pay a talent of silver. 
And as thy servant was busy here and there, he was gone. And the king of Israel said unto him, So shall thy judgment be; thyself hast decided it. 
And he hasted, and took the ashes away from his face; and the king of Israel discerned him that he was of the prophets. 
And he said unto him, Thus saith the LORD, Because thou hast let go out of thy hand a man whom I appointed to utter destruction, therefore thy life shall go for his life, and thy people for his people. 
And the king of Israel went to his house heavy and displeased, and came to Samaria. 
And it came to pass after these things, that Naboth the Jezreelite had a vineyard, which was in Jezreel, hard by the palace of Ahab king of Samaria. 
And Ahab spake unto Naboth, saying, Give me thy vineyard, tha
757,RD shall speak unto me: and the princes of Moab abode with Balaam. 
And God came unto Balaam, and said, What men are these with thee? 
And Balaam said unto God, Balak the son of Zippor, king of Moab, hath sent unto me, saying, 
Behold, there is a people come out of Egypt, which covereth the face of the earth: come now, curse me them; peradventure I shall be able to overcome them, and drive them out. 
And God said unto Balaam, Thou shalt not go with them; thou shalt not curse the people: for they are blessed. 
And Balaam rose up in the morning, and said unto the princes of Balak, Get you into your land: for the LORD refuseth to give me leave to go with you. 
And the princes of Moab rose up, and they went unto Balak, and said, Balaam refuseth to com
1076,he LORD said, I have pardoned according to thy word: 
But as truly as I live, all the earth shall be filled with the glory of the LORD. 
Because all those men which have seen my glory, and my miracles, which I did in Egypt and in the wilderness, and have tempted me now these ten times, and have not hearkened to my voice; 
Surely they shall not see the land which I sware unto their fathers, neither shall any of them that provoked me see it: 
But my servant Caleb, because he had another spirit with him, and hath followed me fully, him will I bring into the land whereinto he went; and his seed shall possess it. 
(Now the Amalekites and the Canaanites dwelt in the valley.) Tomorrow turn you, and get you into the wilderness by the way of the Red sea. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 
How long shall I bear with this evil congregation, which murmur against me? I have heard the murmurings of the children of Israel, which they murmur against me. 
Say unto them, As truly as I live, saith the LORD, as ye have spoken in mine ears, so will I do to you
890,he Jews were gone out of the synagogue, the Gentiles besought that these words might be preached to them the next sabbath. 
Now when the congregation was broken up, many of the Jews and religious proselytes followed Paul and Barnabas: who, speaking to them, persuaded them to continue in the grace of God. 
And the next sabbath day came almost the whole city together to hear the word of God. 
But when the Jews saw the multitudes, they were filled with envy, and spake against those things which were spoken by Paul, contradicting and blaspheming. 
Then Paul and Barnabas waxed bold, and said, It was necessary that the word of God should first have been spoken to you: but seeing ye put it from you, and judge yourselves unworthy of everlasting life, lo, we turn to the Gentiles. 
For so hath the Lord commanded us, saying, I have set thee to be a light of the Gentiles, that thou shoulde
815,ye which are spiritual, restore such an one in the spirit of meekness; considering thyself, lest thou also be tempted. 
Bear ye one another's burdens, and so fulfil the law of Christ. 
For if a man think himself to be something, when he is nothing, he deceiveth himself. 
But let every man prove his own work, and then shall he have rejoicing in himself alone, and not in another. 
For every man shall bear his own burden. 
Let him that is taught in the word communicate unto him that teacheth in all good things. 
Be not deceived; God is not mocked: for whatsoever a man soweth, that shall he also reap. 
For he that soweth to his flesh shall of the flesh reap corruption; but he that soweth to the Spirit shall of the Spirit reap life everlasting. 
And let us not be weary in well doing: for in due season we shal
951,d king over Israel, all the Philistines came up to seek David; and David heard of it, and went down to the hold. 
The Philistines also came and spread themselves in the valley of Rephaim. 
And David enquired of the LORD, saying, Shall I go up to the Philistines? wilt thou deliver them into mine hand? And the LORD said unto David, Go up: for I will doubtless deliver the Philistines into thine hand. 
And David came to Baalperazim, and David smote them there, and said, The LORD hath broken forth upon mine enemies before me, as the breach of waters. Therefore he called the name of that place Baalperazim. 
And there they left their images, and David and his men burned them. 
And the Philistines came up yet again, and spread themselves in the valley of Rephaim. 
And when David enquired of the LORD, he said, Thou shalt not go up; but fetch a compass behind them, and come upon them over against the mulberry trees. 
And let it be, when thou heare
806,amed, let not mine enemies triumph over me. 
Yea, let none that wait on thee be ashamed: let them be ashamed which transgress without cause. 
Shew me thy ways, O LORD; teach me thy paths. 
Lead me in thy truth, and teach me: for thou art the God of my salvation; on thee do I wait all the day. 
Remember, O LORD, thy tender mercies and thy lovingkindnesses; for they have been ever of old. 
Remember not the sins of my youth, nor my transgressions: according to thy mercy remember thou me for thy goodness' sake, O LORD. 
Good and upright is the LORD: therefore will he teach sinners in the way. 
The meek will he guide in judgment: and the meek will he teach his way. 
All the paths of the LORD are mercy and truth unto such as keep his covenant and his testimonies. 
For thy name's sake, O LORD, pardon m
986,not good, after their own thoughts; 
A people that provoketh me to anger continually to my face; that sacrificeth in gardens, and burneth incense upon altars of brick; 
Which remain among the graves, and lodge in the monuments, which eat swine's flesh, and broth of abominable things is in their vessels; 
Which say, Stand by thyself, come not near to me; for I am holier than thou. These are a smoke in my nose, a fire that burneth all the day. 
Behold, it is written before me: I will not keep silence, but will recompense, even recompense into their bosom, 
Your iniquities, and the iniquities of your fathers together, saith the LORD, which have burned incense upon the mountains, and blasphemed me upon the hills: therefore will I measure their former work into their bosom. 
Thus saith the LORD, As the new wine is found in the cluster, and one saith, Destroy it not; for a blessing is in it: so will I do for my servants' sakes, that I may not destroy them all. 
And I will bring
1052,Whosoever shall seek to save his life shall lose it; and whosoever shall lose his life shall preserve it. 
I tell you, in that night there shall be two men in one bed; the one shall be taken, and the other shall be left. 
Two women shall be grinding together; the one shall be taken, and the other left. 
Two men shall be in the field; the one shall be taken, and the other left. 
And they answered and said unto him, Where, Lord? And he said unto them, Wheresoever the body is, thither will the eagles be gathered together. 
And he spake a parable unto them to this end, that men ought always to pray, and not to faint; 
Saying, There was in a city a judge, which feared not God, neither regarded man: 
And there was a widow in that city; and she came unto him, saying, Avenge me of mine adversary. 
And he would not for a while: but afterward he said within himself, Though I fear not God, nor regard man; 
Yet because this widow troubleth me, I will avenge her, lest by her continual coming she weary me. 
And the Lord said, Hear what the unjust jud
923,an in travail, and the anguish as of her that bringeth forth her first child, the voice of the daughter of Zion, that bewaileth herself, that spreadeth her hands, saying, Woe is me now! for my soul is wearied because of murderers. 
Run ye to and fro through the streets of Jerusalem, and see now, and know, and seek in the broad places thereof, if ye can find a man, if there be any that executeth judgment, that seeketh the truth; and I will pardon it. 
And though they say, The LORD liveth; surely they swear falsely. 
O LORD, are not thine eyes upon the truth? thou hast stricken them, but they have not grieved; thou hast consumed them, but they have refused to receive correction: they have made their faces harder than a rock; they have refused to return. 
Therefore I said, Surely these are poor; they are foolish: for they know not the way of the LORD, nor the judgment of their God. 
I will get me unto the great m
892,he trespass offering; for the place is holy. 
When the priests enter therein, then shall they not go out of the holy place into the utter court, but there they shall lay their garments wherein they minister; for they are holy; and shall put on other garments, and shall approach to those things which are for the people. 
Now when he had made an end of measuring the inner house, he brought me forth toward the gate whose prospect is toward the east, and measured it round about. 
He measured the east side with the measuring reed, five hundred reeds, with the measuring reed round about. 
He measured the north side, five hundred reeds, with the measuring reed round about. 
He measured the south side, five hundred reeds, with the measuring reed. 
He turned about to the west side, and measured five hundred reeds with the measuring reed. 
He measured it by the four sides: it had a wall ro
858,r famine, or nakedness, or peril, or sword? 
As it is written, For thy sake we are killed all the day long; we are accounted as sheep for the slaughter. 
Nay, in all these things we are more than conquerors through him that loved us. 
For I am persuaded, that neither death, nor life, nor angels, nor principalities, nor powers, nor things present, nor things to come, 
Nor height, nor depth, nor any other creature, shall be able to separate us from the love of God, which is in Christ Jesus our Lord. 
I say the truth in Christ, I lie not, my conscience also bearing me witness in the Holy Ghost, 
That I have great heaviness and continual sorrow in my heart. 
For I could wish that myself were accursed from Christ for my brethren, my kinsmen according to the flesh: 
Who are Israelites; to whom pertaineth the adoption, and the glory, and the covenants, 
1038,hou art near in their mouth, and far from their reins. 
But thou, O LORD, knowest me: thou hast seen me, and tried mine heart toward thee: pull them out like sheep for the slaughter, and prepare them for the day of slaughter. 
How long shall the land mourn, and the herbs of every field wither, for the wickedness of them that dwell therein? the beasts are consumed, and the birds; because they said, He shall not see our last end. 
If thou hast run with the footmen, and they have wearied thee, then how canst thou contend with horses? and if in the land of peace, wherein thou trustedst, they wearied thee, then how wilt thou do in the swelling of Jordan? 
For even thy brethren, and the house of thy father, even they have dealt treacherously with thee; yea, they have called a multitude after thee: believe them not, though they speak fair words unto thee. 
I have forsaken mine house, I have left mine heritage; I have given the dearly beloved of my soul into the hand of her enemies. 
Mine heritage is unto me as a lion in the fores
1035,lo, thou shalt conceive, and bear a son; and no razor shall come on his head: for the child shall be a Nazarite unto God from the womb: and he shall begin to deliver Israel out of the hand of the Philistines. 
Then the woman came and told her husband, saying, A man of God came unto me, and his countenance was like the countenance of an angel of God, very terrible: but I asked him not whence he was, neither told he me his name: 
But he said unto me, Behold, thou shalt conceive, and bear a son; and now drink no wine nor strong drink, neither eat any unclean thing: for the child shall be a Nazarite to God from the womb to the day of his death. 
Then Manoah intreated the LORD, and said, O my Lord, let the man of God which thou didst send come again unto us, and teach us what we shall do unto the child that shall be born. 
And God hearkened to the voice of Manoah; and the angel of God came again unto the woman as she sat in the field: but Manoah her husband was not with her. 
And the woman made haste, and ran, and shewed her
725,cause the shadow thereof is good: therefore your daughters shall commit whoredom, and your spouses shall commit adultery. 
I will not punish your daughters when they commit whoredom, nor your spouses when they commit adultery: for themselves are separated with whores, and they sacrifice with harlots: therefore the people that doth not understand shall fall. 
Though thou, Israel, play the harlot, yet let not Judah offend; and come not ye unto Gilgal, neither go ye up to Bethaven, nor swear, The LORD liveth. 
For Israel slideth back as a backsliding heifer: now the LORD will feed them as a lamb in a large place. 
Ephraim is joined to idols: let him alone. 
Their drink is sour: they have committed whoredom continually:
1046,ut the door: and he preached the word unto them. 
And they come unto him, bringing one sick of the palsy, which was borne of four. 
And when they could not come nigh unto him for the press, they uncovered the roof where he was: and when they had broken it up, they let down the bed wherein the sick of the palsy lay. 
When Jesus saw their faith, he said unto the sick of the palsy, Son, thy sins be forgiven thee. 
But there was certain of the scribes sitting there, and reasoning in their hearts, 
Why doth this man thus speak blasphemies? who can forgive sins but God only? 
And immediately when Jesus perceived in his spirit that they so reasoned within themselves, he said unto them, Why reason ye these things in your hearts? 
Whether is it easier to say to the sick of the palsy, Thy sins be forgiven thee; or to say, Arise, and take up thy bed, and walk? 
But that ye may know that the Son of man hath power on earth to forgive sins, (he saith to the sick of the palsy,) 
I say unto thee, Arise, and take up thy bed, and go thy way into th
1032,ighty among the thirty, and above the thirty: and in his course was Ammizabad his son. 
The fourth captain for the fourth month was Asahel the brother of Joab, and Zebadiah his son after him: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
The fifth captain for the fifth month was Shamhuth the Izrahite: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
The sixth captain for the sixth month was Ira the son of Ikkesh the Tekoite: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
The seventh captain for the seventh month was Helez the Pelonite, of the children of Ephraim: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
The eighth captain for the eighth month was Sibbecai the Hushathite, of the Zarhites: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
The ninth captain for the ninth month was Abiezer the Anetothite, of the Benjamites: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
The tenth captain for the tenth month was Maharai the Netophathite, of the Zarhites: and in his course were twenty and four thousand.
1043,, the son of Eliashib the high priest, was son in law to Sanballat the Horonite: therefore I chased him from me. 
Remember them, O my God, because they have defiled the priesthood, and the covenant of the priesthood, and of the Levites. 
Thus cleansed I them from all strangers, and appointed the wards of the priests and the Levites, every one in his business; 
And for the wood offering, at times appointed, and for the firstfruits. Remember me, O my God, for good. 
Now it came to pass in the days of Ahasuerus, (this is Ahasuerus which reigned, from India even unto Ethiopia, over an hundred and seven and twenty provinces:) 
That in those days, when the king Ahasuerus sat on the throne of his kingdom, which was in Shushan the palace, 
In the third year of his reign, he made a feast unto all his princes and his servants; the power of Persia and Media, the nobles and princes of the provinces, being before him: 
When he shewed the riches of his glorious kingdom and the honour of his excellent majesty many days, even an hundred and fo
823,d these things, and to enter into his glory? 
And beginning at Moses and all the prophets, he expounded unto them in all the scriptures the things concerning himself. 
And they drew nigh unto the village, whither they went: and he made as though he would have gone further. 
But they constrained him, saying, Abide with us: for it is toward evening, and the day is far spent. And he went in to tarry with them. 
And it came to pass, as he sat at meat with them, he took bread, and blessed it, and brake, and gave to them. 
And their eyes were opened, and they knew him; and he vanished out of their sight. 
And they said one to another, Did not our heart burn within us, while he talked with us by the way, and while he opened to us the scriptures? 
And they rose up the same hour, and returned to Jerusalem, and found the 
1055,ervants will pass over, every man armed for war, before the Lord to battle, as my lord saith. 
So concerning them Moses commanded Eleazar the priest, and Joshua the son of Nun, and the chief fathers of the tribes of the children of Israel: 
And Moses said unto them, If the children of Gad and the children of Reuben will pass with you over Jordan, every man armed to battle, before the LORD, and the land shall be subdued before you; then ye shall give them the land of Gilead for a possession: 
But if they will not pass over with you armed, they shall have possessions among you in the land of Canaan. 
And the children of Gad and the children of Reuben answered, saying, As the LORD hath said unto thy servants, so will we do. 
We will pass over armed before the LORD into the land of Canaan, that the possession of our inheritance on this side Jordan may be our's. 
And Moses gave unto them, even to the children of Gad, and to the children of Reuben, and unto half the tribe of Manasseh the son of Joseph, the kingdom of Sihon king of the Amorites, 
1027,his city, and of your brethren that are not gone forth with you into captivity; 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Behold, I will send upon them the sword, the famine, and the pestilence, and will make them like vile figs, that cannot be eaten, they are so evil. 
And I will persecute them with the sword, with the famine, and with the pestilence, and will deliver them to be removed to all the kingdoms of the earth, to be a curse, and an astonishment, and an hissing, and a reproach, among all the nations whither I have driven them: 
Because they have not hearkened to my words, saith the LORD, which I sent unto them by my servants the prophets, rising up early and sending them; but ye would not hear, saith the LORD. 
Hear ye therefore the word of the LORD, all ye of the captivity, whom I have sent from Jerusalem to Babylon: 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, of Ahab the son of Kolaiah, and of Zedekiah the son of Maaseiah, which prophesy a lie unto you in my name; Behold, I will deliver them into the hand
1042,h out of the camp; and the priest shall look, and, behold, if the plague of leprosy be healed in the leper; 
Then shall the priest command to take for him that is to be cleansed two birds alive and clean, and cedar wood, and scarlet, and hyssop: 
And the priest shall command that one of the birds be killed in an earthen vessel over running water: 
As for the living bird, he shall take it, and the cedar wood, and the scarlet, and the hyssop, and shall dip them and the living bird in the blood of the bird that was killed over the running water: 
And he shall sprinkle upon him that is to be cleansed from the leprosy seven times, and shall pronounce him clean, and shall let the living bird loose into the open field. 
And he that is to be cleansed shall wash his clothes, and shave off all his hair, and wash himself in water, that he may be clean: and after that he shall come into the camp, and shall tarry abroad out of his tent seven days. 
But it shall be on the seventh day, that he shall shave all his hair off his head and his be
1046,in for the eleventh month was Benaiah the Pirathonite, of the children of Ephraim: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
The twelfth captain for the twelfth month was Heldai the Netophathite, of Othniel: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
Furthermore over the tribes of Israel: the ruler of the Reubenites was Eliezer the son of Zichri: of the Simeonites, Shephatiah the son of Maachah: 
Of the Levites, Hashabiah the son of Kemuel: of the Aaronites, Zadok: 
Of Judah, Elihu, one of the brethren of David: of Issachar, Omri the son of Michael: 
Of Zebulun, Ishmaiah the son of Obadiah: of Naphtali, Jerimoth the son of Azriel: 
Of the children of Ephraim, Hoshea the son of Azaziah: of the half tribe of Manasseh, Joel the son of Pedaiah: 
Of the half tribe of Manasseh in Gilead, Iddo the son of Zechariah: of Benjamin, Jaasiel the son of Abner: 
Of Dan, Azareel the son of Jeroham. These were the princes of the tribes of Israel. 
But David took not the number of them from twenty years old and under: because the LOR
772,sorcery, and bewitched the people of Samaria, giving out that himself was some great one: 
To whom they all gave heed, from the least to the greatest, saying, This man is the great power of God. 
And to him they had regard, because that of long time he had bewitched them with sorceries. 
But when they believed Philip preaching the things concerning the kingdom of God, and the name of Jesus Christ, they were baptized, both men and women. 
Then Simon himself believed also: and when he was baptized, he continued with Philip, and wondered, beholding the miracles and signs which were done. 
Now when the apostles which were at Jerusalem heard that Samaria had received the word of God, they sent unto them Peter and John: 
Who, when they were come down, prayed for them,
979, could not find them, they returned to Jerusalem. 
And it came to pass, after they were departed, that they came up out of the well, and went and told king David, and said unto David, Arise, and pass quickly over the water: for thus hath Ahithophel counselled against you. 
Then David arose, and all the people that were with him, and they passed over Jordan: by the morning light there lacked not one of them that was not gone over Jordan. 
And when Ahithophel saw that his counsel was not followed, he saddled his ass, and arose, and gat him home to his house, to his city, and put his household in order, and hanged himself, and died, and was buried in the sepulchre of his father. 
Then David came to Mahanaim. And Absalom passed over Jordan, he and all the men of Israel with him. 
And Absalom made Amasa captain of the host instead of Joab: which Amasa was a man's son, whose name was Ithra an Israelite, that went in to Abigail the daughter of Nahash, sister to Zeruiah Jo
913,nd much vexed. 
Behold, the princes of Israel, every one were in thee to their power to shed blood. 
In thee have they set light by father and mother: in the midst of thee have they dealt by oppression with the stranger: in thee have they vexed the fatherless and the widow. 
Thou hast despised mine holy things, and hast profaned my sabbaths. 
In thee are men that carry tales to shed blood: and in thee they eat upon the mountains: in the midst of thee they commit lewdness. 
In thee have they discovered their fathers' nakedness: in thee have they humbled her that was set apart for pollution. 
And one hath committed abomination with his neighbour's wife; and another hath lewdly defiled his daughter in law; and another in thee hath humbled his sister, his father's daughter. 
In thee have they taken gifts to shed blood; thou hast taken usury and increase, and thou hast greedily gained of thy neighbours by
797,th. 
And Noah went forth, and his sons, and his wife, and his sons' wives with him: 
Every beast, every creeping thing, and every fowl, and whatsoever creepeth upon the earth, after their kinds, went forth out of the ark. 
And Noah builded an altar unto the LORD; and took of every clean beast, and of every clean fowl, and offered burnt offerings on the altar. 
And the LORD smelled a sweet savour; and the LORD said in his heart, I will not again curse the ground any more for man's sake; for the imagination of man's heart is evil from his youth; neither will I again smite any more every thing living, as I have done. 
While the earth remaineth, seedtime and harvest, and cold and heat, and summer and winter, and day and night shall not cease. 
And God blessed Noah and his sons, and said unt
1039,hou hast sent. 
I have glorified thee on the earth: I have finished the work which thou gavest me to do. 
And now, O Father, glorify thou me with thine own self with the glory which I had with thee before the world was. 
I have manifested thy name unto the men which thou gavest me out of the world: thine they were, and thou gavest them me; and they have kept thy word. 
Now they have known that all things whatsoever thou hast given me are of thee. 
For I have given unto them the words which thou gavest me; and they have received them, and have known surely that I came out from thee, and they have believed that thou didst send me. 
I pray for them: I pray not for the world, but for them which thou hast given me; for they are thine. 
And all mine are thine, and thine are mine; and I am glorified in them. 
And now I am no more in the world, but these are in the world, and I come to thee. Holy Father, keep through thine own name those whom thou hast given me, that they may be one, as we are. 
While I was with them in the world, 
919,ant of the Amorites; and the children of Israel had sworn unto them: and Saul sought to slay them in his zeal to the children of Israel and Judah.) 
Wherefore David said unto the Gibeonites, What shall I do for you? and wherewith shall I make the atonement, that ye may bless the inheritance of the LORD? 
And the Gibeonites said unto him, We will have no silver nor gold of Saul, nor of his house; neither for us shalt thou kill any man in Israel. And he said, What ye shall say, that will I do for you. 
And they answered the king, The man that consumed us, and that devised against us that we should be destroyed from remaining in any of the coasts of Israel, 
Let seven men of his sons be delivered unto us, and we will hang them up unto the LORD in Gibeah of Saul, whom the LORD did choose. And the king said, I will give them. 
But the king spared Mephibosheth, the son of Jonathan the son of Saul, because of the
796,here unrighteousness with God? God forbid. 
For he saith to Moses, I will have mercy on whom I will have mercy, and I will have compassion on whom I will have compassion. 
So then it is not of him that willeth, nor of him that runneth, but of God that sheweth mercy. 
For the scripture saith unto Pharaoh, Even for this same purpose have I raised thee up, that I might shew my power in thee, and that my name might be declared throughout all the earth. 
Therefore hath he mercy on whom he will have mercy, and whom he will he hardeneth. 
Thou wilt say then unto me, Why doth he yet find fault? For who hath resisted his will? 
Nay but, O man, who art thou that repliest against God? Shall the thing formed say to him that formed it, Why hast thou made me thus? 
Hath not the potter power over the
1069,heir dens. 
Man goeth forth unto his work and to his labour until the evening. 
O LORD, how manifold are thy works! in wisdom hast thou made them all: the earth is full of thy riches. 
So is this great and wide sea, wherein are things creeping innumerable, both small and great beasts. 
There go the ships: there is that leviathan, whom thou hast made to play therein. 
These wait all upon thee; that thou mayest give them their meat in due season. 
That thou givest them they gather: thou openest thine hand, they are filled with good. 
Thou hidest thy face, they are troubled: thou takest away their breath, they die, and return to their dust. 
Thou sendest forth thy spirit, they are created: and thou renewest the face of the earth. 
The glory of the LORD shall endure for ever: the LORD shall rejoice in his works. 
He looketh on the earth, and it trembleth: he toucheth the hills, and they smoke. 
I will sing unto the LORD as long as I live: I will sing praise to my God while I have my being. 
My meditation of him shall be sweet: I will be glad in the LORD. 
L
1036,virgins were gathered together the second time, then Mordecai sat in the king's gate. 
Esther had not yet shewed her kindred nor her people; as Mordecai had charged her: for Esther did the commandment of Mordecai, like as when she was brought up with him. 
In those days, while Mordecai sat in the king's gate, two of the king's chamberlains, Bigthan and Teresh, of those which kept the door, were wroth, and sought to lay hands on the king Ahasuerus. 
And the thing was known to Mordecai, who told it unto Esther the queen; and Esther certified the king thereof in Mordecai's name. 
And when inquisition was made of the matter, it was found out; therefore they were both hanged on a tree: and it was written in the book of the chronicles before the king. 
After these things did king Ahasuerus promote Haman the son of Hammedatha the Agagite, and advanced him, and set his seat above all the princes that were with him. 
And all the king's servants, that were in the king's gate, bowed, and reverenced Haman: for the king had so comman
1006,d and prayer. 
If thou put the brethren in remembrance of these things, thou shalt be a good minister of Jesus Christ, nourished up in the words of faith and of good doctrine, whereunto thou hast attained. 
But refuse profane and old wives' fables, and exercise thyself rather unto godliness. 
For bodily exercise profiteth little: but godliness is profitable unto all things, having promise of the life that now is, and of that which is to come. 
This is a faithful saying and worthy of all acceptation. 
For therefore we both labour and suffer reproach, because we trust in the living God, who is the Saviour of all men, specially of those that believe. 
These things command and teach. 
Let no man despise thy youth; but be thou an example of the believers, in word, in conversation, in charity, in spirit, in faith, in purity. 
Till I come, give attendance to reading, to exhortation, to doctrine. 
Neglect not the gift that is in thee, which was given thee by prophecy, with the laying on of the hands
847,and the caldrons, and the candlesticks, and the spoons, and the cups; that which was of gold in gold, and that which was of silver in silver, took the captain of the guard away. 
The two pillars, one sea, and twelve brasen bulls that were under the bases, which king Solomon had made in the house of the LORD: the brass of all these vessels was without weight. 
And concerning the pillars, the height of one pillar was eighteen cubits; and a fillet of twelve cubits did compass it; and the thickness thereof was four fingers: it was hollow. 
And a chapiter of brass was upon it; and the height of one chapiter was five cubits, with network and pomegranates upon the chapiters round about, all of brass. The second pillar also and the pomegranates were like unto these. 
And there were ninety and six pomegranates on a side; and all the pomegranate
1072,all the beasts of the nations: both the cormorant and the bittern shall lodge in the upper lintels of it; their voice shall sing in the windows; desolation shall be in the thresholds; for he shall uncover the cedar work. 
This is the rejoicing city that dwelt carelessly, that said in her heart, I am, and there is none beside me: how is she become a desolation, a place for beasts to lie down in! every one that passeth by her shall hiss, and wag his hand. 
Woe to her that is filthy and polluted, to the oppressing city! 
She obeyed not the voice; she received not correction; she trusted not in the LORD; she drew not near to her God. 
Her princes within her are roaring lions; her judges are evening wolves; they gnaw not the bones till the morrow. 
Her prophets are light and treacherous persons: her priests have polluted the sanctuary, they have done violence to the law. 
The just LORD is in the midst thereof; he will not do iniquity: every morning doth he bring his judgment to light, he faileth not; but the unjust knoweth no shame. 
I have cut off the nations:
887,rdan, out of the place where the priests' feet stood firm, twelve stones, and ye shall carry them over with you, and leave them in the lodging place, where ye shall lodge this night. 
Then Joshua called the twelve men, whom he had prepared of the children of Israel, out of every tribe a man: 
And Joshua said unto them, Pass over before the ark of the LORD your God into the midst of Jordan, and take you up every man of you a stone upon his shoulder, according unto the number of the tribes of the children of Israel: 
That this may be a sign among you, that when your children ask their fathers in time to come, saying, What mean ye by these stones? 
Then ye shall answer them, That the waters of Jordan were cut off before the ark of the covenant of the LORD; when it passed over Jordan, the waters of Jordan were cut off: and these stones shall be for a memorial unto the children o
907,an evil man out of the evil treasure of his heart bringeth forth that which is evil: for of the abundance of the heart his mouth speaketh. 
And why call ye me, Lord, Lord, and do not the things which I say? 
Whosoever cometh to me, and heareth my sayings, and doeth them, I will shew you to whom he is like: 
He is like a man which built an house, and digged deep, and laid the foundation on a rock: and when the flood arose, the stream beat vehemently upon that house, and could not shake it: for it was founded upon a rock. 
But he that heareth, and doeth not, is like a man that without a foundation built an house upon the earth; against which the stream did beat vehemently, and immediately it fell; and the ruin of that house was great. 
Now when he had ended all his sayings in the audience of the people, he entered into Capernaum. 
And a certain centurion's servant, who was dear unto him, was sick
990, but Jerusalem shall be safely inhabited. 
And this shall be the plague wherewith the LORD will smite all the people that have fought against Jerusalem; Their flesh shall consume away while they stand upon their feet, and their eyes shall consume away in their holes, and their tongue shall consume away in their mouth. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that a great tumult from the LORD shall be among them; and they shall lay hold every one on the hand of his neighbour, and his hand shall rise up against the hand of his neighbour. 
And Judah also shall fight at Jerusalem; and the wealth of all the heathen round about shall be gathered together, gold, and silver, and apparel, in great abundance. 
And so shall be the plague of the horse, of the mule, of the camel, and of the ass, and of all the beasts that shall be in these tents, as this plague. 
And it shall come to pass, that every one that is left of all the nations which came against Jerusalem shall even go up from yea
1016,abeshgilead, and said unto them, Blessed be ye of the LORD, that ye have shewed this kindness unto your lord, even unto Saul, and have buried him. 
And now the LORD shew kindness and truth unto you: and I also will requite you this kindness, because ye have done this thing. 
Therefore now let your hands be strengthened, and be ye valiant: for your master Saul is dead, and also the house of Judah have anointed me king over them. 
But Abner the son of Ner, captain of Saul's host, took Ishbosheth the son of Saul, and brought him over to Mahanaim; 
And made him king over Gilead, and over the Ashurites, and over Jezreel, and over Ephraim, and over Benjamin, and over all Israel. 
Ishbosheth Saul's son was forty years old when he began to reign over Israel, and reigned two years. But the house of Judah followed David. 
And the time that David was king in Hebron over the house of Judah was seven years and six months. 
And Abner the son of Ner, and the servants of Ishbosheth the son of Saul, went out from Maha
1049,r them that be escaped of Benjamin, that a tribe be not destroyed out of Israel. 
Howbeit we may not give them wives of our daughters: for the children of Israel have sworn, saying, Cursed be he that giveth a wife to Benjamin. 
Then they said, Behold, there is a feast of the LORD in Shiloh yearly in a place which is on the north side of Bethel, on the east side of the highway that goeth up from Bethel to Shechem, and on the south of Lebonah. 
Therefore they commanded the children of Benjamin, saying, Go and lie in wait in the vineyards; 
And see, and, behold, if the daughters of Shiloh come out to dance in dances, then come ye out of the vineyards, and catch you every man his wife of the daughters of Shiloh, and go to the land of Benjamin. 
And it shall be, when their fathers or their brethren come unto us to complain, that we will say unto them, Be favourable unto them for our sakes: because we reserved not to each man his wife in the war: for ye did not give unto them at this time, that ye should be guilty. 
And the children of Ben
876, a royal commandment from him, and let it be written among the laws of the Persians and the Medes, that it be not altered, That Vashti come no more before king Ahasuerus; and let the king give her royal estate unto another that is better than she. 
And when the king's decree which he shall make shall be published throughout all his empire, (for it is great,) all the wives shall give to their husbands honour, both to great and small. 
And the saying pleased the king and the princes; and the king did according to the word of Memucan: 
For he sent letters into all the king's provinces, into every province according to the writing thereof, and to every people after their language, that every man should bear rule in his own house, and that it should be published according to the language of every people. 
After these things, when the wrath of king Ahasuerus was appease
865,eat offering thereof, and their drink offerings. 
And on the third day eleven bullocks, two rams, fourteen lambs of the first year without blemish; 
And their meat offering and their drink offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the lambs, shall be according to their number, after the manner: 
And one goat for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, and his meat offering, and his drink offering. 
And on the fourth day ten bullocks, two rams, and fourteen lambs of the first year without blemish: 
Their meat offering and their drink offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the lambs, shall be according to their number, after the manner: 
And one kid of the goats for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, his meat offering, and his drink offering. 
And on the fifth day nine bullocks, two rams, and fourteen lamb
732, Lord hath need of him; and straightway he will send him hither. 
And they went their way, and found the colt tied by the door without in a place where two ways met; and they loose him. 
And certain of them that stood there said unto them, What do ye, loosing the colt? 
And they said unto them even as Jesus had commanded: and they let them go. 
And they brought the colt to Jesus, and cast their garments on him; and he sat upon him. 
And many spread their garments in the way: and others cut down branches off the trees, and strawed them in the way. 
And they that went before, and they that followed, cried, saying, Hosanna; Blessed is he that cometh in the name of the Lord: 
Blessed be the kingdom of our father David, that co
928,l, but followers of them who through faith and patience inherit the promises. 
For when God made promise to Abraham, because he could swear by no greater, he sware by himself, 
Saying, Surely blessing I will bless thee, and multiplying I will multiply thee. 
And so, after he had patiently endured, he obtained the promise. 
For men verily swear by the greater: and an oath for confirmation is to them an end of all strife. 
Wherein God, willing more abundantly to shew unto the heirs of promise the immutability of his counsel, confirmed it by an oath: 
That by two immutable things, in which it was impossible for God to lie, we might have a strong consolation, who have fled for refuge to lay hold upon the hope set before us: 
Which hope we have as an anchor of the soul, both sure and stedfast, and which entereth into that within the veil; 
Whither the forerunner is for us entered, even Jesus, made an high priest for eve
1037,ivity shall go into captivity: he that killeth with the sword must be killed with the sword. Here is the patience and the faith of the saints. 
And I beheld another beast coming up out of the earth; and he had two horns like a lamb, and he spake as a dragon. 
And he exerciseth all the power of the first beast before him, and causeth the earth and them which dwell therein to worship the first beast, whose deadly wound was healed. 
And he doeth great wonders, so that he maketh fire come down from heaven on the earth in the sight of men, 
And deceiveth them that dwell on the earth by the means of those miracles which he had power to do in the sight of the beast; saying to them that dwell on the earth, that they should make an image to the beast, which had the wound by a sword, and did live. 
And he had power to give life unto the image of the beast, that the image of the beast should both speak, and cause that as many as would not worship the image of the beast should be killed. 
And he causeth all, both small and great, ric
1076, him, having with them those that were lame, blind, dumb, maimed, and many others, and cast them down at Jesus' feet; and he healed them: 
Insomuch that the multitude wondered, when they saw the dumb to speak, the maimed to be whole, the lame to walk, and the blind to see: and they glorified the God of Israel. 
Then Jesus called his disciples unto him, and said, I have compassion on the multitude, because they continue with me now three days, and have nothing to eat: and I will not send them away fasting, lest they faint in the way. 
And his disciples say unto him, Whence should we have so much bread in the wilderness, as to fill so great a multitude? 
And Jesus saith unto them, How many loaves have ye? And they said, Seven, and a few little fishes. 
And he commanded the multitude to sit down on the ground. 
And he took the seven loaves and the fishes, and gave thanks, and brake them, and gave to his disciples, and the disciples to the multitude. 
And they did all eat, and were filled: and they took up of the broken meat that was left seven baskets full. 
And 
927,, and returned to the castle: 
Who, when they came to Caesarea and delivered the epistle to the governor, presented Paul also before him. 
And when the governor had read the letter, he asked of what province he was. And when he understood that he was of Cilicia; 
I will hear thee, said he, when thine accusers are also come. And he commanded him to be kept in Herod's judgment hall. 
And after five days Ananias the high priest descended with the elders, and with a certain orator named Tertullus, who informed the governor against Paul. 
And when he was called forth, Tertullus began to accuse him, saying, Seeing that by thee we enjoy great quietness, and that very worthy deeds are done unto this nation by thy providence, 
We accept it always, and in all places, most noble Felix, with all thankfulness. 
Notwithstanding, that I be not further tedious unto thee, I pray thee that thou wouldest hear us of thy clemency a fe
905,ive. 
For as many as are led by the Spirit of God, they are the sons of God. 
For ye have not received the spirit of bondage again to fear; but ye have received the Spirit of adoption, whereby we cry, Abba, Father. 
The Spirit itself beareth witness with our spirit, that we are the children of God: 
And if children, then heirs; heirs of God, and joint-heirs with Christ; if so be that we suffer with him, that we may be also glorified together. 
For I reckon that the sufferings of this present time are not worthy to be compared with the glory which shall be revealed in us. 
For the earnest expectation of the creature waiteth for the manifestation of the sons of God. 
For the creature was made subject to vanity, not willingly, but by reason of him who hath subjected the same in hope, 
Because the creature itself also shall be delivered from the bondage of corruption into the glorious liberty of 
830,sit me, and revenge me of my persecutors; take me not away in thy longsuffering: know that for thy sake I have suffered rebuke. 
Thy words were found, and I did eat them; and thy word was unto me the joy and rejoicing of mine heart: for I am called by thy name, O LORD God of hosts. 
I sat not in the assembly of the mockers, nor rejoiced; I sat alone because of thy hand: for thou hast filled me with indignation. 
Why is my pain perpetual, and my wound incurable, which refuseth to be healed? wilt thou be altogether unto me as a liar, and as waters that fail? 
Therefore thus saith the LORD, If thou return, then will I bring thee again, and thou shalt stand before me: and if thou take forth the precious from the vile, thou shalt be as my mouth: let them return unto thee; but return not thou unto them. 
And I will make thee
880,ly so called: 
Which some professing have erred concerning the faith. Grace be with thee. Amen. 
Paul, an apostle of Jesus Christ by the will of God, according to the promise of life which is in Christ Jesus, 
To Timothy, my dearly beloved son: Grace, mercy, and peace, from God the Father and Christ Jesus our Lord. 
I thank God, whom I serve from my forefathers with pure conscience, that without ceasing I have remembrance of thee in my prayers night and day; 
Greatly desiring to see thee, being mindful of thy tears, that I may be filled with joy; 
When I call to remembrance the unfeigned faith that is in thee, which dwelt first in thy grandmother Lois, and thy mother Eunice; and I am persuaded that in thee also. 
Wherefore I put thee in remembrance that thou stir up the gift of God, which is in thee by the putting on of my hands. 
For God hath not given us the spirit 
1014,ty of his father, he shall surely live. 
As for his father, because he cruelly oppressed, spoiled his brother by violence, and did that which is not good among his people, lo, even he shall die in his iniquity. 
Yet say ye, Why? doth not the son bear the iniquity of the father? When the son hath done that which is lawful and right, and hath kept all my statutes, and hath done them, he shall surely live. 
The soul that sinneth, it shall die. The son shall not bear the iniquity of the father, neither shall the father bear the iniquity of the son: the righteousness of the righteous shall be upon him, and the wickedness of the wicked shall be upon him. 
But if the wicked will turn from all his sins that he hath committed, and keep all my statutes, and do that which is lawful and right, he shall surely live, he shall not die. 
All his transgressions that he hath committed, they shall not be mentioned unto him: in his righteousness that he hath done he shall live. 
Have I any pleasure at all that the wick
999, and he made him overseer over his house, and all that he had he put into his hand. 
And it came to pass from the time that he had made him overseer in his house, and over all that he had, that the LORD blessed the Egyptian's house for Joseph's sake; and the blessing of the LORD was upon all that he had in the house, and in the field. 
And he left all that he had in Joseph's hand; and he knew not ought he had, save the bread which he did eat. And Joseph was a goodly person, and well favoured. 
And it came to pass after these things, that his master's wife cast her eyes upon Joseph; and she said, Lie with me. 
But he refused, and said unto his master's wife, Behold, my master wotteth not what is with me in the house, and he hath committed all that he hath to my hand; 
There is none greater in this house than I; neither hath he kept back any thing from me but thee, because thou art his wife: how then can I do this great wickedness, and sin against God? 
And it came to pass, as she spake
755, by her shall hiss, and wag his hand. 
Woe to her that is filthy and polluted, to the oppressing city! 
She obeyed not the voice; she received not correction; she trusted not in the LORD; she drew not near to her God. 
Her princes within her are roaring lions; her judges are evening wolves; they gnaw not the bones till the morrow. 
Her prophets are light and treacherous persons: her priests have polluted the sanctuary, they have done violence to the law. 
The just LORD is in the midst thereof; he will not do iniquity: every morning doth he bring his judgment to light, he faileth not; but the unjust knoweth no shame. 
I have cut off the nations: their towers are desolate; I made their streets waste, that none passeth by: their cities are destroye
872,had left unto us a very small remnant, we should have been as Sodom, and we should have been like unto Gomorrah. 
Hear the word of the LORD, ye rulers of Sodom; give ear unto the law of our God, ye people of Gomorrah. 
To what purpose is the multitude of your sacrifices unto me? saith the LORD: I am full of the burnt offerings of rams, and the fat of fed beasts; and I delight not in the blood of bullocks, or of lambs, or of he goats. 
When ye come to appear before me, who hath required this at your hand, to tread my courts? 
Bring no more vain oblations; incense is an abomination unto me; the new moons and sabbaths, the calling of assemblies, I cannot away with; it is iniquity, even the solemn meeting. 
Your new moons and your appointed feasts my soul hateth: they are a trouble unto me; I am weary to bear them. 
And when ye spread forth your hands, I will hide
750,and the bread, which she had prepared, into the hand of her son Jacob. 
And he came unto his father, and said, My father: and he said, Here am I; who art thou, my son? 
And Jacob said unto his father, I am Esau thy first born; I have done according as thou badest me: arise, I pray thee, sit and eat of my venison, that thy soul may bless me. 
And Isaac said unto his son, How is it that thou hast found it so quickly, my son? And he said, Because the LORD thy God brought it to me. 
And Isaac said unto Jacob, Come near, I pray thee, that I may feel thee, my son, whether thou be my very son Esau or not. 
And Jacob went near unto Isaac his father; and he felt him, and said, The voice is Jacob's voice, but the hands are the hands of Esau. 
And he 
764,o pass through; and he made the waters to stand as an heap. 
In the daytime also he led them with a cloud, and all the night with a light of fire. 
He clave the rocks in the wilderness, and gave them drink as out of the great depths. 
He brought streams also out of the rock, and caused waters to run down like rivers. 
And they sinned yet more against him by provoking the most High in the wilderness. 
And they tempted God in their heart by asking meat for their lust. 
Yea, they spake against God; they said, Can God furnish a table in the wilderness? 
Behold, he smote the rock, that the waters gushed out, and the streams overflowed; can he give bread also? can he provide flesh for his people? 
Therefore the LORD heard this, and was wroth: so a fire was kin
881,way all iniquity, and receive us graciously: so will we render the calves of our lips. 
Asshur shall not save us; we will not ride upon horses: neither will we say any more to the work of our hands, Ye are our gods: for in thee the fatherless findeth mercy. 
I will heal their backsliding, I will love them freely: for mine anger is turned away from him. 
I will be as the dew unto Israel: he shall grow as the lily, and cast forth his roots as Lebanon. 
His branches shall spread, and his beauty shall be as the olive tree, and his smell as Lebanon. 
They that dwell under his shadow shall return; they shall revive as the corn, and grow as the vine: the scent thereof shall be as the wine of Lebanon. 
Ephraim shall say, What have I to do any more with idols? I have heard him, and observed him: I am like a green fir tree. From me is thy fruit found. 
Who is wise, and he shall 
1080,thy righteousness' sake bring my soul out of trouble. 
And of thy mercy cut off mine enemies, and destroy all them that afflict my soul: for I am thy servant. 
Blessed be the LORD my strength which teacheth my hands to war, and my fingers to fight: 
My goodness, and my fortress; my high tower, and my deliverer; my shield, and he in whom I trust; who subdueth my people under me. 
LORD, what is man, that thou takest knowledge of him! or the son of man, that thou makest account of him! 
Man is like to vanity: his days are as a shadow that passeth away. 
Bow thy heavens, O LORD, and come down: touch the mountains, and they shall smoke. 
Cast forth lightning, and scatter them: shoot out thine arrows, and destroy them. 
Send thine hand from above; rid me, and deliver me out of great waters, from the hand of strange children; 
Whose mouth speaketh vanity, and their right hand is a right hand of falsehood. 
I will sing a new song unto thee, O God: upon a psaltery and an instrument of ten strings will I sing praises unto thee. 
It is he that giveth salvation unto kings: wh
954,into the hand of Israel. 
And Jonathan climbed up upon his hands and upon his feet, and his armourbearer after him: and they fell before Jonathan; and his armourbearer slew after him. 
And that first slaughter, which Jonathan and his armourbearer made, was about twenty men, within as it were an half acre of land, which a yoke of oxen might plow. 
And there was trembling in the host, in the field, and among all the people: the garrison, and the spoilers, they also trembled, and the earth quaked: so it was a very great trembling. 
And the watchmen of Saul in Gibeah of Benjamin looked; and, behold, the multitude melted away, and they went on beating down one another. 
Then said Saul unto the people that were with him, Number now, and see who is gone from us. And when they had numbered, behold, Jonathan and his armourbearer were not there. 
And Saul said unto Ahiah, Bring hither the ark of God. For the ark of God was at that time with the child
985,amoth, and to them which were in Jattir, 
And to them which were in Aroer, and to them which were in Siphmoth, and to them which were in Eshtemoa, 
And to them which were in Rachal, and to them which were in the cities of the Jerahmeelites, and to them which were in the cities of the Kenites, 
And to them which were in Hormah, and to them which were in Chorashan, and to them which were in Athach, 
And to them which were in Hebron, and to all the places where David himself and his men were wont to haunt. 
Now the Philistines fought against Israel: and the men of Israel fled from before the Philistines, and fell down slain in mount Gilboa. 
And the Philistines followed hard upon Saul and upon his sons; and the Philistines slew Jonathan, and Abinadab, and Melchishua, Saul's sons. 
And the battle went sore against Saul, and the archers hit him; and he was sore wounded of the archers. 
Then said Saul unto his armourbearer, Draw thy sword, and thrust me through therewith; lest
1033, every one straight forward: whither the spirit was to go, they went; and they turned not when they went. 
As for the likeness of the living creatures, their appearance was like burning coals of fire, and like the appearance of lamps: it went up and down among the living creatures; and the fire was bright, and out of the fire went forth lightning. 
And the living creatures ran and returned as the appearance of a flash of lightning. 
Now as I beheld the living creatures, behold one wheel upon the earth by the living creatures, with his four faces. 
The appearance of the wheels and their work was like unto the colour of a beryl: and they four had one likeness: and their appearance and their work was as it were a wheel in the middle of a wheel. 
When they went, they went upon their four sides: and they turned not when they went. 
As for their rings, they were so high that they were dreadful; and their rings were full of eyes round about them four. 
And when the living creatures went, the wheels went by them: and when the
795,nd the ark of the LORD continued in the house of Obededom the Gittite three months: and the LORD blessed Obededom, and all his household. 
And it was told king David, saying, The LORD hath blessed the house of Obededom, and all that pertaineth unto him, because of the ark of God. So David went and brought up the ark of God from the house of Obededom into the city of David with gladness. 
And it was so, that when they that bare the ark of the LORD had gone six paces, he sacrificed oxen and fatlings. 
And David danced before the LORD with all his might; and David was girded with a linen ephod. 
So David and all the house of Israel brought up the ark of the LORD with shouting, and with the sound of the trumpet. 
And as the ark of the LORD came into the city of David, Michal Saul's daught
811,n a long white garment; and they were affrighted. 
And he saith unto them, Be not affrighted: Ye seek Jesus of Nazareth, which was crucified: he is risen; he is not here: behold the place where they laid him. 
But go your way, tell his disciples and Peter that he goeth before you into Galilee: there shall ye see him, as he said unto you. 
And they went out quickly, and fled from the sepulchre; for they trembled and were amazed: neither said they any thing to any man; for they were afraid. 
Now when Jesus was risen early the first day of the week, he appeared first to Mary Magdalene, out of whom he had cast seven devils. 
And she went and told them that had been with him, as they mourned and wept. 
And they, when they had heard that he was alive, and had been seen of her, believed not. 
After that he 
951,according to the oil. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; The gate of the inner court that looketh toward the east shall be shut the six working days; but on the sabbath it shall be opened, and in the day of the new moon it shall be opened. 
And the prince shall enter by the way of the porch of that gate without, and shall stand by the post of the gate, and the priests shall prepare his burnt offering and his peace offerings, and he shall worship at the threshold of the gate: then he shall go forth; but the gate shall not be shut until the evening. 
Likewise the people of the land shall worship at the door of this gate before the LORD in the sabbaths and in the new moons. 
And the burnt offering that the prince shall offer unto the LORD in the sabbath day shall be six lambs without blemish, and a ram without blemish. 
And the meat offering shall be an ephah for a ram, and the meat offering for the lambs as he shall be able to give, and an hin of o
872,ust of the earth in multitude. 
Give me now wisdom and knowledge, that I may go out and come in before this people: for who can judge this thy people, that is so great? 
And God said to Solomon, Because this was in thine heart, and thou hast not asked riches, wealth, or honour, nor the life of thine enemies, neither yet hast asked long life; but hast asked wisdom and knowledge for thyself, that thou mayest judge my people, over whom I have made thee king: 
Wisdom and knowledge is granted unto thee; and I will give thee riches, and wealth, and honour, such as none of the kings have had that have been before thee, neither shall there any after thee have the like. 
Then Solomon came from his journey to the high place that was at Gibeon to Jerusalem, from before the tabernacle of the congregation, and reigned over Israel. 
And Solomon gathered chariots and horseme
902,f his fathers, 
And prayed unto him: and he was intreated of him, and heard his supplication, and brought him again to Jerusalem into his kingdom. Then Manasseh knew that the LORD he was God. 
Now after this he built a wall without the city of David, on the west side of Gihon, in the valley, even to the entering in at the fish gate, and compassed about Ophel, and raised it up a very great height, and put captains of war in all the fenced cities of Judah. 
And he took away the strange gods, and the idol out of the house of the LORD, and all the altars that he had built in the mount of the house of the LORD, and in Jerusalem, and cast them out of the city. 
And he repaired the altar of the LORD, and sacrificed thereon peace offerings and thank offerings, and commanded Judah to serve the LORD God of Israel. 
Nevertheless the people did sacrifice still in the high places, yet unto the LORD the
958,he son of Ammishaddai. 
And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were threescore and two thousand and seven hundred. 
And those that encamp by him shall be the tribe of Asher: and the captain of the children of Asher shall be Pagiel the son of Ocran. 
And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were forty and one thousand and five hundred. 
Then the tribe of Naphtali: and the captain of the children of Naphtali shall be Ahira the son of Enan. 
And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were fifty and three thousand and four hundred. 
All they that were numbered in the camp of Dan were an hundred thousand and fifty and seven thousand and six hundred. They shall go hindmost with their standards. 
These are those which were numbered of the children of Israel by the house of their fathers: all those that were numbered of the camps throughout their hosts were six hundred thousand and three thousand and five hundred and fi
865,und in him, behold, they are written in the book of the kings of Israel and Judah: and Jehoiachin his son reigned in his stead. 
Jehoiachin was eight years old when he began to reign, and he reigned three months and ten days in Jerusalem: and he did that which was evil in the sight of the LORD. 
And when the year was expired, king Nebuchadnezzar sent, and brought him to Babylon, with the goodly vessels of the house of the LORD, and made Zedekiah his brother king over Judah and Jerusalem. 
Zedekiah was one and twenty years old when he began to reign, and reigned eleven years in Jerusalem. 
And he did that which was evil in the sight of the LORD his God, and humbled not himself before Jeremiah the prophet speaking from the mouth of the LORD. 
And he also rebelled against king Nebuchadnezzar, who had made him swear by God: but he stiffened his neck, and ha
889,l not doubt in his heart, but shall believe that those things which he saith shall come to pass; he shall have whatsoever he saith. 
Therefore I say unto you, What things soever ye desire, when ye pray, believe that ye receive them, and ye shall have them. 
And when ye stand praying, forgive, if ye have ought against any: that your Father also which is in heaven may forgive you your trespasses. 
But if ye do not forgive, neither will your Father which is in heaven forgive your trespasses. 
And they come again to Jerusalem: and as he was walking in the temple, there come to him the chief priests, and the scribes, and the elders, 
And say unto him, By what authority doest thou these things? and who gave thee this authority to do these things? 
And Jesus answered and said unto them, I will also ask of you one question, and answer me, and I will tell you by what authority I do the
843,ive it unto thy seed: I have caused thee to see it with thine eyes, but thou shalt not go over thither. 
So Moses the servant of the LORD died there in the land of Moab, according to the word of the LORD. 
And he buried him in a valley in the land of Moab, over against Bethpeor: but no man knoweth of his sepulchre unto this day. 
And Moses was an hundred and twenty years old when he died: his eye was not dim, nor his natural force abated. 
And the children of Israel wept for Moses in the plains of Moab thirty days: so the days of weeping and mourning for Moses were ended. 
And Joshua the son of Nun was full of the spirit of wisdom; for Moses had laid his hands upon him: and the children of Israel hearkened unto him, and did as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And there arose not a prophet since in Israel like unto Moses, whom the LORD kn
1077, or of men? And they reasoned with themselves, saying, If we shall say, From heaven; he will say unto us, Why did ye not then believe him? 
But if we shall say, Of men; we fear the people; for all hold John as a prophet. 
And they answered Jesus, and said, We cannot tell. And he said unto them, Neither tell I you by what authority I do these things. 
But what think ye? A certain man had two sons; and he came to the first, and said, Son, go work to day in my vineyard. 
He answered and said, I will not: but afterward he repented, and went. 
And he came to the second, and said likewise. And he answered and said, I go, sir: and went not. 
Whether of them twain did the will of his father? They say unto him, The first. Jesus saith unto them, Verily I say unto you, That the publicans and the harlots go into the kingdom of God before you. 
For John came unto you in the way of righteousness, and ye believed him not: but the publicans and the harlots believed him: and ye, when ye had seen it, repented not afterward, that ye might believe him. 
Hear another parable: There
1045,thus saith the Lord GOD, Behold, my servants shall eat, but ye shall be hungry: behold, my servants shall drink, but ye shall be thirsty: behold, my servants shall rejoice, but ye shall be ashamed: 
Behold, my servants shall sing for joy of heart, but ye shall cry for sorrow of heart, and shall howl for vexation of spirit. 
And ye shall leave your name for a curse unto my chosen: for the Lord GOD shall slay thee, and call his servants by another name: 
That he who blesseth himself in the earth shall bless himself in the God of truth; and he that sweareth in the earth shall swear by the God of truth; because the former troubles are forgotten, and because they are hid from mine eyes. 
For, behold, I create new heavens and a new earth: and the former shall not be remembered, nor come into mind. 
But be ye glad and rejoice for ever in that which I create: for, behold, I create Jerusalem a rejoicing, and her people a joy. 
And I will rejoice in Jerusalem, and joy in my people: and the voice of weeping shall be no more heard in her, no
1017,Then I looked, and, behold, in the firmament that was above the head of the cherubims there appeared over them as it were a sapphire stone, as the appearance of the likeness of a throne. 
And he spake unto the man clothed with linen, and said, Go in between the wheels, even under the cherub, and fill thine hand with coals of fire from between the cherubims, and scatter them over the city. And he went in in my sight. 
Now the cherubims stood on the right side of the house, when the man went in; and the cloud filled the inner court. 
Then the glory of the LORD went up from the cherub, and stood over the threshold of the house; and the house was filled with the cloud, and the court was full of the brightness of the LORD's glory. 
And the sound of the cherubims' wings was heard even to the outer court, as the voice of the Almighty God when he speaketh. 
And it came to pass, that when he had commanded the man clothed with linen, saying, Take fire from between the wheels, from between the cherubims; then he 
931,th of Israel, and strangers from the covenants of promise, having no hope, and without God in the world: 
But now in Christ Jesus ye who sometimes were far off are made nigh by the blood of Christ. 
For he is our peace, who hath made both one, and hath broken down the middle wall of partition between us; 
Having abolished in his flesh the enmity, even the law of commandments contained in ordinances; for to make in himself of twain one new man, so making peace; 
And that he might reconcile both unto God in one body by the cross, having slain the enmity thereby: 
And came and preached peace to you which were afar off, and to them that were nigh. 
For through him we both have access by one Spirit unto the Father. 
Now therefore ye are no more strangers and foreigners, but fellowcitizens with the saints, and of the household of God; 
And are built upon the foundation of the apostles and prophets, Jesus Christ himself bein
1073,he other disciples therefore said unto him, We have seen the LORD. But he said unto them, Except I shall see in his hands the print of the nails, and put my finger into the print of the nails, and thrust my hand into his side, I will not believe. 
And after eight days again his disciples were within, and Thomas with them: then came Jesus, the doors being shut, and stood in the midst, and said, Peace be unto you. 
Then saith he to Thomas, Reach hither thy finger, and behold my hands; and reach hither thy hand, and thrust it into my side: and be not faithless, but believing. 
And Thomas answered and said unto him, My LORD and my God. 
Jesus saith unto him, Thomas, because thou hast seen me, thou hast believed: blessed are they that have not seen, and yet have believed. 
And many other signs truly did Jesus in the presence of his disciples, which are not written in this book: 
But these are written, that ye might believe that Jesus is the Christ, the Son of God; and that believing ye might have life through his name. 
After these things Jesus shewed himself ag
961,, Let me go, I pray thee, and return unto my brethren which are in Egypt, and see whether they be yet alive. And Jethro said to Moses, Go in peace. 
And the LORD said unto Moses in Midian, Go, return into Egypt: for all the men are dead which sought thy life. 
And Moses took his wife and his sons, and set them upon an ass, and he returned to the land of Egypt: and Moses took the rod of God in his hand. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, When thou goest to return into Egypt, see that thou do all those wonders before Pharaoh, which I have put in thine hand: but I will harden his heart, that he shall not let the people go. 
And thou shalt say unto Pharaoh, Thus saith the LORD, Israel is my son, even my firstborn: 
And I say unto thee, Let my son go, that he may serve me: and if thou refuse to let him go, behold, I will slay thy son, even thy firstborn. 
And it came to pass by the way in the inn, that the LORD met him, and sought to kill him. 
Then Zippor
976,ut if it die, it bringeth forth much fruit. 
He that loveth his life shall lose it; and he that hateth his life in this world shall keep it unto life eternal. 
If any man serve me, let him follow me; and where I am, there shall also my servant be: if any man serve me, him will my Father honour. 
Now is my soul troubled; and what shall I say? Father, save me from this hour: but for this cause came I unto this hour. 
Father, glorify thy name. Then came there a voice from heaven, saying, I have both glorified it, and will glorify it again. 
The people therefore, that stood by, and heard it, said that it thundered: others said, An angel spake to him. 
Jesus answered and said, This voice came not because of me, but for your sakes. 
Now is the judgment of this world: now shall the prince of this world be cast out. 
And I, if I be lifted up from the earth, will draw all men unto me. 
This he said, signifying what death he should die. 
The people answered him, We have h
763, of God had David brought up from Kirjathjearim to the place which David had prepared for it: for he had pitched a tent for it at Jerusalem. 
Moreover the brasen altar, that Bezaleel the son of Uri, the son of Hur, had made, he put before the tabernacle of the LORD: and Solomon and the congregation sought unto it. 
And Solomon went up thither to the brasen altar before the LORD, which was at the tabernacle of the congregation, and offered a thousand burnt offerings upon it. 
In that night did God appear unto Solomon, and said unto him, Ask what I shall give thee. 
And Solomon said unto God, Thou hast shewed great mercy unto David my father, and hast made me to reign in his stead. 
Now, O LORD God, let thy promise unto David my father be established: for
876,s daughters. 
And if they be married to any of the sons of the other tribes of the children of Israel, then shall their inheritance be taken from the inheritance of our fathers, and shall be put to the inheritance of the tribe whereunto they are received: so shall it be taken from the lot of our inheritance. 
And when the jubile of the children of Israel shall be, then shall their inheritance be put unto the inheritance of the tribe whereunto they are received: so shall their inheritance be taken away from the inheritance of the tribe of our fathers. 
And Moses commanded the children of Israel according to the word of the LORD, saying, The tribe of the sons of Joseph hath said well. 
This is the thing which the LORD doth command concerning the daughters of Zelophehad, saying, Let them marry to whom they think best; only to the family of the tribe of their father s
788, goeth into the sanctuary, unto the inner court, to minister in the sanctuary, he shall offer his sin offering, saith the Lord GOD. 
And it shall be unto them for an inheritance: I am their inheritance: and ye shall give them no possession in Israel: I am their possession. 
They shall eat the meat offering, and the sin offering, and the trespass offering: and every dedicated thing in Israel shall be theirs. 
And the first of all the firstfruits of all things, and every oblation of all, of every sort of your oblations, shall be the priest's: ye shall also give unto the priest the first of your dough, that he may cause the blessing to rest in thine house. 
The priests shall not eat of any thing that is dead of itself, or torn, whether it be fowl or beast. 
Moreover, when ye shall
904,it came to pass from the time that he had made him overseer in his house, and over all that he had, that the LORD blessed the Egyptian's house for Joseph's sake; and the blessing of the LORD was upon all that he had in the house, and in the field. 
And he left all that he had in Joseph's hand; and he knew not ought he had, save the bread which he did eat. And Joseph was a goodly person, and well favoured. 
And it came to pass after these things, that his master's wife cast her eyes upon Joseph; and she said, Lie with me. 
But he refused, and said unto his master's wife, Behold, my master wotteth not what is with me in the house, and he hath committed all that he hath to my hand; 
There is none greater in this house than I; neither hath he kept back any thing from me but thee, because thou art his wife: how then can I do this great wickedness, and sin against God? 
And it came to pass, as she
1054,d, was glad, and exhorted them all, that with purpose of heart they would cleave unto the Lord. 
For he was a good man, and full of the Holy Ghost and of faith: and much people was added unto the Lord. 
Then departed Barnabas to Tarsus, for to seek Saul: 
And when he had found him, he brought him unto Antioch. And it came to pass, that a whole year they assembled themselves with the church, and taught much people. And the disciples were called Christians first in Antioch. 
And in these days came prophets from Jerusalem unto Antioch. 
And there stood up one of them named Agabus, and signified by the Spirit that there should be great dearth throughout all the world: which came to pass in the days of Claudius Caesar. 
Then the disciples, every man according to his ability, determined to send relief unto the brethren which dwelt in Judaea: 
Which also they did, and sent it to the elders by the hands of Barnabas and Saul. 
Now about that time Herod the king stretched forth his hands to vex certain of the church. 
And he killed James the brothe
951,at canst thou know? 
The measure thereof is longer than the earth, and broader than the sea. 
If he cut off, and shut up, or gather together, then who can hinder him? 
For he knoweth vain men: he seeth wickedness also; will he not then consider it? 
For vain men would be wise, though man be born like a wild ass's colt. 
If thou prepare thine heart, and stretch out thine hands toward him; 
If iniquity be in thine hand, put it far away, and let not wickedness dwell in thy tabernacles. 
For then shalt thou lift up thy face without spot; yea, thou shalt be stedfast, and shalt not fear: 
Because thou shalt forget thy misery, and remember it as waters that pass away: 
And thine age shall be clearer than the noonday: thou shalt shine forth, thou shalt be as the morning. 
And thou shalt be secure, because there is hope; yea, thou shalt dig about thee, and thou shalt take thy rest in safety. 
Also thou shalt lie down, and none shall make thee afr
994,shall come to pass, if they will not believe thee, neither hearken to the voice of the first sign, that they will believe the voice of the latter sign. 
And it shall come to pass, if they will not believe also these two signs, neither hearken unto thy voice, that thou shalt take of the water of the river, and pour it upon the dry land: and the water which thou takest out of the river shall become blood upon the dry land. 
And Moses said unto the LORD, O my LORD, I am not eloquent, neither heretofore, nor since thou hast spoken unto thy servant: but I am slow of speech, and of a slow tongue. 
And the LORD said unto him, Who hath made man's mouth? or who maketh the dumb, or deaf, or the seeing, or the blind? have not I the LORD? 
Now therefore go, and I will be with thy mouth, and teach thee what thou shalt say. 
And he said, O my LORD, send, I pray thee, by the hand of him whom thou wilt send. 
And the anger of the LORD was kindled against Moses, and he said, Is not Aaron the Levi
1076, beasts, and turneth not away for any; 
A greyhound; an he goat also; and a king, against whom there is no rising up. 
If thou hast done foolishly in lifting up thyself, or if thou hast thought evil, lay thine hand upon thy mouth. 
Surely the churning of milk bringeth forth butter, and the wringing of the nose bringeth forth blood: so the forcing of wrath bringeth forth strife. 
The words of king Lemuel, the prophecy that his mother taught him. 
What, my son? and what, the son of my womb? and what, the son of my vows? 
Give not thy strength unto women, nor thy ways to that which destroyeth kings. 
It is not for kings, O Lemuel, it is not for kings to drink wine; nor for princes strong drink: 
Lest they drink, and forget the law, and pervert the judgment of any of the afflicted. 
Give strong drink unto him that is ready to perish, and wine unto those that be of heavy hearts. 
Let him drink, and forget his poverty, and remember his misery no more. 
Open thy mouth for the dumb in the cause of all such as are appointed to destruction. 
Open thy mouth, judge righte
898,of Egypt came up against Jerusalem, because they had transgressed against the LORD, 
With twelve hundred chariots, and threescore thousand horsemen: and the people were without number that came with him out of Egypt; the Lubims, the Sukkiims, and the Ethiopians. 
And he took the fenced cities which pertained to Judah, and came to Jerusalem. 
Then came Shemaiah the prophet to Rehoboam, and to the princes of Judah, that were gathered together to Jerusalem because of Shishak, and said unto them, Thus saith the LORD, Ye have forsaken me, and therefore have I also left you in the hand of Shishak. 
Whereupon the princes of Israel and the king humbled themselves; and they said, The LORD is righteous. 
And when the LORD saw that they humbled themselves, the word of the LORD came to Shemaiah, saying, They have humbled themselves; therefore I will not destroy them, but I will grant them some del
804,not answer. 
Seest thou a man that is hasty in his words? there is more hope of a fool than of him. 
He that delicately bringeth up his servant from a child shall have him become his son at the length. 
An angry man stirreth up strife, and a furious man aboundeth in transgression. 
A man's pride shall bring him low: but honour shall uphold the humble in spirit. 
Whoso is partner with a thief hateth his own soul: he heareth cursing, and bewrayeth it not. 
The fear of man bringeth a snare: but whoso putteth his trust in the LORD shall be safe. 
Many seek the ruler's favour; but every man's judgment cometh from the LORD. 
An unjust man is an abomination to the just: and he that is upright in the way is abomination to the wicked. 
The words of Agur the son of Jakeh, even the prophecy: the man spak
750,eiah the Meronothite: 
And over the flocks was Jaziz the Hagerite. All these were the rulers of the substance which was king David's. 
Also Jonathan David's uncle was a counsellor, a wise man, and a scribe: and Jehiel the son of Hachmoni was with the king's sons: 
And Ahithophel was the king's counsellor: and Hushai the Archite was the king's companion: 
And after Ahithophel was Jehoiada the son of Benaiah, and Abiathar: and the general of the king's army was Joab. 
And David assembled all the princes of Israel, the princes of the tribes, and the captains of the companies that ministered to the king by course, and the captains over the thousands, and captains over the hundreds, and the stewards over all the substance and possession of the k
1007, we are strangers before thee, and sojourners, as were all our fathers: our days on the earth are as a shadow, and there is none abiding. 
O LORD our God, all this store that we have prepared to build thee an house for thine holy name cometh of thine hand, and is all thine own. 
I know also, my God, that thou triest the heart, and hast pleasure in uprightness. As for me, in the uprightness of mine heart I have willingly offered all these things: and now have I seen with joy thy people, which are present here, to offer willingly unto thee. 
O LORD God of Abraham, Isaac, and of Israel, our fathers, keep this for ever in the imagination of the thoughts of the heart of thy people, and prepare their heart unto thee: 
And give unto Solomon my son a perfect heart, to keep thy commandments, thy testimonies, and thy statutes, and to do all these things, and to build the palace, for the which I have made provision. 
And David said to all the congregation, Now bless the LORD your God. And all the congre
791,have opened your graves, O my people, and brought you up out of your graves, 
And shall put my spirit in you, and ye shall live, and I shall place you in your own land: then shall ye know that I the LORD have spoken it, and performed it, saith the LORD. 
The word of the LORD came again unto me, saying, 
Moreover, thou son of man, take thee one stick, and write upon it, For Judah, and for the children of Israel his companions: then take another stick, and write upon it, For Joseph, the stick of Ephraim and for all the house of Israel his companions: 
And join them one to another into one stick; and they shall become one in thine hand. 
And when the children of thy people shall speak unto thee, saying, Wilt thou not shew us what thou meanest by these? 
Say unto them, Thus saith the 
957,e unto Moses, saying, Behold, we die, we perish, we all perish. 
Whosoever cometh any thing near unto the tabernacle of the LORD shall die: shall we be consumed with dying? 
And the LORD said unto Aaron, Thou and thy sons and thy father's house with thee shall bear the iniquity of the sanctuary: and thou and thy sons with thee shall bear the iniquity of your priesthood. 
And thy brethren also of the tribe of Levi, the tribe of thy father, bring thou with thee, that they may be joined unto thee, and minister unto thee: but thou and thy sons with thee shall minister before the tabernacle of witness. 
And they shall keep thy charge, and the charge of all the tabernacle: only they shall not come nigh the vessels of the sanctuary and the altar, that neither they, nor ye also, die. 
And they shall be joined unto thee, and keep the charge of the tabernacle of the congregation, for all the service of the tabernacle: and a stranger shall not come nigh 
883,in your gates: 
And let none of you imagine evil in your hearts against his neighbour; and love no false oath: for all these are things that I hate, saith the LORD. 
And the word of the LORD of hosts came unto me, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; The fast of the fourth month, and the fast of the fifth, and the fast of the seventh, and the fast of the tenth, shall be to the house of Judah joy and gladness, and cheerful feasts; therefore love the truth and peace. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; It shall yet come to pass, that there shall come people, and the inhabitants of many cities: 
And the inhabitants of one city shall go to another, saying, Let us go speedily to pray before the LORD, and to seek the LORD of hosts: I will go also. 
Yea, many people and strong nations shall come to seek the LORD of hosts in Jerusalem, and to pray before the LORD. 
Thus saith the L
987,wall, every one unto his work. 
And it came to pass from that time forth, that the half of my servants wrought in the work, and the other half of them held both the spears, the shields, and the bows, and the habergeons; and the rulers were behind all the house of Judah. 
They which builded on the wall, and they that bare burdens, with those that laded, every one with one of his hands wrought in the work, and with the other hand held a weapon. 
For the builders, every one had his sword girded by his side, and so builded. And he that sounded the trumpet was by me. 
And I said unto the nobles, and to the rulers, and to the rest of the people, The work is great and large, and we are separated upon the wall, one far from another. 
In what place therefore ye hear the sound of the trumpet, resort ye thither unto us: our God shall fight for us. 
So we laboured in the work: and half of them held the spears from the rising of the morning till the stars appeared. 
Likewise at the sam
778,e men of Israel, when they saw the man, fled from him, and were sore afraid. 
And the men of Israel said, Have ye seen this man that is come up? surely to defy Israel is he come up: and it shall be, that the man who killeth him, the king will enrich him with great riches, and will give him his daughter, and make his father's house free in Israel. 
And David spake to the men that stood by him, saying, What shall be done to the man that killeth this Philistine, and taketh away the reproach from Israel? for who is this uncircumcised Philistine, that he should defy the armies of the living God? 
And the people answered him after this manner, saying, So shall it be done to the man that killeth him. 
And Eliab his eldest brother heard when he spake unto the men; and Eliab's
1080, to mine eyelids, 
Until I find out a place for the LORD, an habitation for the mighty God of Jacob. 
Lo, we heard of it at Ephratah: we found it in the fields of the wood. 
We will go into his tabernacles: we will worship at his footstool. 
Arise, O LORD, into thy rest; thou, and the ark of thy strength. 
Let thy priests be clothed with righteousness; and let thy saints shout for joy. 
For thy servant David's sake turn not away the face of thine anointed. 
The LORD hath sworn in truth unto David; he will not turn from it; Of the fruit of thy body will I set upon thy throne. 
If thy children will keep my covenant and my testimony that I shall teach them, their children shall also sit upon thy throne for evermore. 
For the LORD hath chosen Zion; he hath desired it for his habitation. 
This is my rest for ever: here will I dwell; for I have desired it. 
I will abundantly bless her provision: I will satisfy her poor with bread. 
I will also clothe her priests with salvation: and her saints shall shout aloud for joy. 
There will I make the horn of David to bud: I have
972,against me: for Tobiah and Sanballat had hired him. 
Therefore was he hired, that I should be afraid, and do so, and sin, and that they might have matter for an evil report, that they might reproach me. 
My God, think thou upon Tobiah and Sanballat according to these their works, and on the prophetess Noadiah, and the rest of the prophets, that would have put me in fear. 
So the wall was finished in the twenty and fifth day of the month Elul, in fifty and two days. 
And it came to pass, that when all our enemies heard thereof, and all the heathen that were about us saw these things, they were much cast down in their own eyes: for they perceived that this work was wrought of our God. 
Moreover in those days the nobles of Judah sent many letters unto Tobiah, and the letters of Tobiah came unto them. 
For there were many in Judah sworn unto him, because he was the son in law of Shechaniah the son of Arah; and his son Johanan had taken the daughter of Meshullam 
977, a great evil: for under the whole heaven hath not been done as hath been done upon Jerusalem. 
As it is written in the law of Moses, all this evil is come upon us: yet made we not our prayer before the LORD our God, that we might turn from our iniquities, and understand thy truth. 
Therefore hath the LORD watched upon the evil, and brought it upon us: for the LORD our God is righteous in all his works which he doeth: for we obeyed not his voice. 
And now, O Lord our God, that hast brought thy people forth out of the land of Egypt with a mighty hand, and hast gotten thee renown, as at this day; we have sinned, we have done wickedly. 
O LORD, according to all thy righteousness, I beseech thee, let thine anger and thy fury be turned away from thy city Jerusalem, thy holy mountain: because for our sins, and for the iniquities of our fathers, Jerusalem and thy people are become a reproach to all that are about us. 
Now therefore, O our God, hear the prayer of thy ser
845,tains shall be thrown down, and the steep places shall fall, and every wall shall fall to the ground. 
And I will call for a sword against him throughout all my mountains, saith the Lord GOD: every man's sword shall be against his brother. 
And I will plead against him with pestilence and with blood; and I will rain upon him, and upon his bands, and upon the many people that are with him, an overflowing rain, and great hailstones, fire, and brimstone. 
Thus will I magnify myself, and sanctify myself; and I will be known in the eyes of many nations, and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
Therefore, thou son of man, prophesy against Gog, and say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I am against thee, O Gog, the chief prince of Meshech and Tubal: 
And I will turn thee back, and leave but the sixth part of thee, and will cause thee to com
944,hey had dined, Jesus saith to Simon Peter, Simon, son of Jonas, lovest thou me more than these? He saith unto him, Yea, Lord; thou knowest that I love thee. He saith unto him, Feed my lambs. 
He saith to him again the second time, Simon, son of Jonas, lovest thou me? He saith unto him, Yea, Lord; thou knowest that I love thee. He saith unto him, Feed my sheep. 
He saith unto him the third time, Simon, son of Jonas, lovest thou me? Peter was grieved because he said unto him the third time, Lovest thou me? And he said unto him, Lord, thou knowest all things; thou knowest that I love thee. Jesus saith unto him, Feed my sheep. 
Verily, verily, I say unto thee, When thou wast young, thou girdest thyself, and walkedst whither thou wouldest: but when thou shalt be old, thou shalt stretch forth thy hands, and another shall gird thee, and carry thee whither thou wouldest not. 
This spake he, signifying by what death he should glorify God. 
826,s thereof were by the posts of the gates, where they washed the burnt offering. 
And in the porch of the gate were two tables on this side, and two tables on that side, to slay thereon the burnt offering and the sin offering and the trespass offering. 
And at the side without, as one goeth up to the entry of the north gate, were two tables; and on the other side, which was at the porch of the gate, were two tables. 
Four tables were on this side, and four tables on that side, by the side of the gate; eight tables, whereupon they slew their sacrifices. 
And the four tables were of hewn stone for the burnt offering, of a cubit and an half long, and a cubit and an half broad, and one cubit high: whereupon also they laid the instruments wherewith they slew the burnt offering and the sacrifice. 
And within were hooks, a
735,rst came to Jesus by night, and brought a mixture of myrrh and aloes, about an hundred pound weight. 
Then took they the body of Jesus, and wound it in linen clothes with the spices, as the manner of the Jews is to bury. 
Now in the place where he was crucified there was a garden; and in the garden a new sepulchre, wherein was never man yet laid. 
There laid they Jesus therefore because of the Jews' preparation day; for the sepulchre was nigh at hand. 
The first day of the week cometh Mary Magdalene early, when it was yet dark, unto the sepulchre, and seeth the stone taken away from the sepulchre. 
Then she runneth, and cometh to Simon Peter, and to the other disciple, whom Jesus loved, and saith unto them, They have taken aw
872,e seven heads and ten horns. 
The beast that thou sawest was, and is not; and shall ascend out of the bottomless pit, and go into perdition: and they that dwell on the earth shall wonder, whose names were not written in the book of life from the foundation of the world, when they behold the beast that was, and is not, and yet is. 
And here is the mind which hath wisdom. The seven heads are seven mountains, on which the woman sitteth. 
And there are seven kings: five are fallen, and one is, and the other is not yet come; and when he cometh, he must continue a short space. 
And the beast that was, and is not, even he is the eighth, and is of the seven, and goeth into perdition. 
And the ten horns which thou sawest are ten kings, which have received no kingdom as yet; but receive power as kings one hour with the beast. 
These have one mind, and shall give their p
966, of the LORD, even the pestilence, in the land, and the angel of the LORD destroying throughout all the coasts of Israel. Now therefore advise thyself what word I shall bring again to him that sent me. 
And David said unto Gad, I am in a great strait: let me fall now into the hand of the LORD; for very great are his mercies: but let me not fall into the hand of man. 
So the LORD sent pestilence upon Israel: and there fell of Israel seventy thousand men. 
And God sent an angel unto Jerusalem to destroy it: and as he was destroying, the LORD beheld, and he repented him of the evil, and said to the angel that destroyed, It is enough, stay now thine hand. And the angel of the LORD stood by the threshingfloor of Ornan the Jebusite. 
And David lifted up his eyes, and saw the angel of the LORD stand between the earth and the heaven, having a drawn sword in his hand stretched out over Jerusalem. Then David and the elders of Israel, who were clothed in sackclot
780, even unto Gibeon. 
And all these kings and their land did Joshua take at one time, because the LORD God of Israel fought for Israel. 
And Joshua returned, and all Israel with him, unto the camp to Gilgal. 
And it came to pass, when Jabin king of Hazor had heard those things, that he sent to Jobab king of Madon, and to the king of Shimron, and to the king of Achshaph, 
And to the kings that were on the north of the mountains, and of the plains south of Chinneroth, and in the valley, and in the borders of Dor on the west, 
And to the Canaanite on the east and on the west, and to the Amorite, and the Hittite, and the Perizzite, and the Jebusite in the mountains, and to the Hivite under Hermon in the land of Mizpeh. 
And they went out, they and all their hosts with them, m
1023,ot leave us, nor forsake us: 
That he may incline our hearts unto him, to walk in all his ways, and to keep his commandments, and his statutes, and his judgments, which he commanded our fathers. 
And let these my words, wherewith I have made supplication before the LORD, be nigh unto the LORD our God day and night, that he maintain the cause of his servant, and the cause of his people Israel at all times, as the matter shall require: 
That all the people of the earth may know that the LORD is God, and that there is none else. 
Let your heart therefore be perfect with the LORD our God, to walk in his statutes, and to keep his commandments, as at this day. 
And the king, and all Israel with him, offered sacrifice before the LORD. 
And Solomon offered a sacrifice of peace offerings, which he offered unto the LORD, two and twenty thousand oxen, and an hundred and twenty thousand sheep. So the king and all the children of Israel dedicated the house of the LORD. 
The same day did the king hallow the middle of the 
751,em wives which they had saved alive of the women of Jabeshgilead: and yet so they sufficed them not. 
And the people repented them for Benjamin, because that the LORD had made a breach in the tribes of Israel. 
Then the elders of the congregation said, How shall we do for wives for them that remain, seeing the women are destroyed out of Benjamin? 
And they said, There must be an inheritance for them that be escaped of Benjamin, that a tribe be not destroyed out of Israel. 
Howbeit we may not give them wives of our daughters: for the children of Israel have sworn, saying, Cursed be he that giveth a wife to Benjamin. 
Then they said, Behold, there is a feast of the LORD in Shiloh yearly in a place which is on the north side of Bethel, on the e
742, Epaphras, my fellowprisoner in Christ Jesus; 
Marcus, Aristarchus, Demas, Lucas, my fellowlabourers. 
The grace of our Lord Jesus Christ be with your spirit. Amen. 
God, who at sundry times and in divers manners spake in time past unto the fathers by the prophets, 
Hath in these last days spoken unto us by his Son, whom he hath appointed heir of all things, by whom also he made the worlds; 
Who being the brightness of his glory, and the express image of his person, and upholding all things by the word of his power, when he had by himself purged our sins, sat down on the right hand of the Majesty on high: 
Being made so much better than the angels, as he hath by inheritance obtained a more excellent name than they. 
For unto which o
911,ied, and all his brethren, and all that generation. 
And the children of Israel were fruitful, and increased abundantly, and multiplied, and waxed exceeding mighty; and the land was filled with them. 
Now there arose up a new king over Egypt, which knew not Joseph. 
And he said unto his people, Behold, the people of the children of Israel are more and mightier than we: 
Come on, let us deal wisely with them; lest they multiply, and it come to pass, that, when there falleth out any war, they join also unto our enemies, and fight against us, and so get them up out of the land. 
Therefore they did set over them taskmasters to afflict them with their burdens. And they built for Pharaoh treasure cities, Pithom and Raamses. 
But the more they afflicted them, the more they multiplied and grew. And they were grieved because of the children of Israel. 
And the Egyptians made the children of Israel to serve 
1001,nly that shall bite thee, and awake that shall vex thee, and thou shalt be for booties unto them? 
Because thou hast spoiled many nations, all the remnant of the people shall spoil thee; because of men's blood, and for the violence of the land, of the city, and of all that dwell therein. 
Woe to him that coveteth an evil covetousness to his house, that he may set his nest on high, that he may be delivered from the power of evil! 
Thou hast consulted shame to thy house by cutting off many people, and hast sinned against thy soul. 
For the stone shall cry out of the wall, and the beam out of the timber shall answer it. 
Woe to him that buildeth a town with blood, and stablisheth a city by iniquity! 
Behold, is it not of the LORD of hosts that the people shall labour in the very fire, and the people shall weary themselves for very vanity? 
For the earth shall be filled with the knowledge of the glory of the LORD, as the waters cover the sea. 
Woe unto him that giveth his neighbour drink, t
952,neys of rams: for the LORD hath a sacrifice in Bozrah, and a great slaughter in the land of Idumea. 
And the unicorns shall come down with them, and the bullocks with the bulls; and their land shall be soaked with blood, and their dust made fat with fatness. 
For it is the day of the LORD's vengeance, and the year of recompences for the controversy of Zion. 
And the streams thereof shall be turned into pitch, and the dust thereof into brimstone, and the land thereof shall become burning pitch. 
It shall not be quenched night nor day; the smoke thereof shall go up for ever: from generation to generation it shall lie waste; none shall pass through it for ever and ever. 
But the cormorant and the bittern shall possess it; the owl also and the raven shall dwell in it: and he shall stretch out upon it the line of confusion, and the stones of emptiness. 
They shall call the nobles thereof to the kingdom, but none shall be there, and all her pri
976,t out of this place into the land of the Chaldeans for their good. 
For I will set mine eyes upon them for good, and I will bring them again to this land: and I will build them, and not pull them down; and I will plant them, and not pluck them up. 
And I will give them an heart to know me, that I am the LORD: and they shall be my people, and I will be their God: for they shall return unto me with their whole heart. 
And as the evil figs, which cannot be eaten, they are so evil; surely thus saith the LORD, So will I give Zedekiah the king of Judah, and his princes, and the residue of Jerusalem, that remain in this land, and them that dwell in the land of Egypt: 
And I will deliver them to be removed into all the kingdoms of the earth for their hurt, to be a reproach and a proverb, a taunt and a curse, in all places whither I shall drive them. 
And I will send the sword, the famine, and the pestilence, among them, till they be consumed from off the land that I gav
1005,ve her light, 
And the stars of heaven shall fall, and the powers that are in heaven shall be shaken. 
And then shall they see the Son of man coming in the clouds with great power and glory. 
And then shall he send his angels, and shall gather together his elect from the four winds, from the uttermost part of the earth to the uttermost part of heaven. 
Now learn a parable of the fig tree; When her branch is yet tender, and putteth forth leaves, ye know that summer is near: 
So ye in like manner, when ye shall see these things come to pass, know that it is nigh, even at the doors. 
Verily I say unto you, that this generation shall not pass, till all these things be done. 
Heaven and earth shall pass away: but my words shall not pass away. 
But of that day and that hour knoweth no man, no, not the angels which are in heaven, neither the Son, but the Father. 
Take ye heed, watch and pray: for ye know not when the time is. 
For the Son of Man is as a man taking a far journey, who left his house
1009,t, when the times of refreshing shall come from the presence of the Lord. 
And he shall send Jesus Christ, which before was preached unto you: 
Whom the heaven must receive until the times of restitution of all things, which God hath spoken by the mouth of all his holy prophets since the world began. 
For Moses truly said unto the fathers, A prophet shall the Lord your God raise up unto you of your brethren, like unto me; him shall ye hear in all things whatsoever he shall say unto you. 
And it shall come to pass, that every soul, which will not hear that prophet, shall be destroyed from among the people. 
Yea, and all the prophets from Samuel and those that follow after, as many as have spoken, have likewise foretold of these days. 
Ye are the children of the prophets, and of the covenant which God made with our fathers, saying unto Abraham, And in thy seed shall all the kindreds of the earth be blessed. 
Unto you first God, having raised up his Son Jesus, sent him to bless you, in turning awa
939,d the laver and his foot. 
And thou shalt sanctify them, that they may be most holy: whatsoever toucheth them shall be holy. 
And thou shalt anoint Aaron and his sons, and consecrate them, that they may minister unto me in the priest's office. 
And thou shalt speak unto the children of Israel, saying, This shall be an holy anointing oil unto me throughout your generations. 
Upon man's flesh shall it not be poured, neither shall ye make any other like it, after the composition of it: it is holy, and it shall be holy unto you. 
Whosoever compoundeth any like it, or whosoever putteth any of it upon a stranger, shall even be cut off from his people. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Take unto thee sweet spices, stacte, and onycha, and galbanum; these sweet spices with pure frankincense: of each shall there be a like weight: 
And thou shalt make it a perfume, a confection after the art of the apothecary, tempered together, pure and h
808,y serve. 
At the appointment of Aaron and his sons shall be all the service of the sons of the Gershonites, in all their burdens, and in all their service: and ye shall appoint unto them in charge all their burdens. 
This is the service of the families of the sons of Gershon in the tabernacle of the congregation: and their charge shall be under the hand of Ithamar the son of Aaron the priest. 
As for the sons of Merari, thou shalt number them after their families, by the house of their fathers; 
From thirty years old and upward even unto fifty years old shalt thou number them, every one that entereth into the service, to do the work of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And this is the charge of their burden, according to all their service in the tabernacle of the congregation; the boards of the
1032,for the sword: and his offspring shall not be satisfied with bread. 
Those that remain of him shall be buried in death: and his widows shall not weep. 
Though he heap up silver as the dust, and prepare raiment as the clay; 
He may prepare it, but the just shall put it on, and the innocent shall divide the silver. 
He buildeth his house as a moth, and as a booth that the keeper maketh. 
The rich man shall lie down, but he shall not be gathered: he openeth his eyes, and he is not. 
Terrors take hold on him as waters, a tempest stealeth him away in the night. 
The east wind carrieth him away, and he departeth: and as a storm hurleth him out of his place. 
For God shall cast upon him, and not spare: he would fain flee out of his hand. 
Men shall clap their hands at him, and shall hiss him out of his place. 
Surely there is a vein for the silver, and a place for gold where they fine it. 
Iron is taken out of the earth, and brass is molten out of the stone. 
He setteth an end to darkness, and searcheth out all perfection: 
788, my deadly enemies, who compass me about. 
They are inclosed in their own fat: with their mouth they speak proudly. 
They have now compassed us in our steps: they have set their eyes bowing down to the earth; 
Like as a lion that is greedy of his prey, and as it were a young lion lurking in secret places. 
Arise, O LORD, disappoint him, cast him down: deliver my soul from the wicked, which is thy sword: 
From men which are thy hand, O LORD, from men of the world, which have their portion in this life, and whose belly thou fillest with thy hid treasure: they are full of children, and leave the rest of their substance to their babes. 
As for me, I will behold thy face in righteousness: I shall be satisfied, when I awake, with thy likeness. 
I will love thee, O LORD, my strength. 
803,servant, which thou hast brought unto us, came in unto me to mock me: 
And it came to pass, as I lifted up my voice and cried, that he left his garment with me, and fled out. 
And it came to pass, when his master heard the words of his wife, which she spake unto him, saying, After this manner did thy servant to me; that his wrath was kindled. 
And Joseph's master took him, and put him into the prison, a place where the king's prisoners were bound: and he was there in the prison. 
But the LORD was with Joseph, and shewed him mercy, and gave him favour in the sight of the keeper of the prison. 
And the keeper of the prison committed to Joseph's hand all the prisoners that were in the prison; and whatsoever they did there, he was the doer of it. 
The keeper of the prison looked not to any thing 
885,n my face: but he said unto me, Understand, O son of man: for at the time of the end shall be the vision. 
Now as he was speaking with me, I was in a deep sleep on my face toward the ground: but he touched me, and set me upright. 
And he said, Behold, I will make thee know what shall be in the last end of the indignation: for at the time appointed the end shall be. 
The ram which thou sawest having two horns are the kings of Media and Persia. 
And the rough goat is the king of Grecia: and the great horn that is between his eyes is the first king. 
Now that being broken, whereas four stood up for it, four kingdoms shall stand up out of the nation, but not in his power. 
And in the latter time of their kingdom, when the transgressors are come to the full, a king of fierce countenance, and understanding dark sentences, shall stand up. 
And his power shall be mighty, but not b
847,e bridegroom, 
And saith unto him, Every man at the beginning doth set forth good wine; and when men have well drunk, then that which is worse: but thou hast kept the good wine until now. 
This beginning of miracles did Jesus in Cana of Galilee, and manifested forth his glory; and his disciples believed on him. 
After this he went down to Capernaum, he, and his mother, and his brethren, and his disciples: and they continued there not many days. 
And the Jews' passover was at hand, and Jesus went up to Jerusalem. 
And found in the temple those that sold oxen and sheep and doves, and the changers of money sitting: 
And when he had made a scourge of small cords, he drove them all out of the temple, and the sheep, and the oxen; and poured out the changers' money, and overthrew the tables; 
And said unto them that sold doves, Take these thi
874,ught unto thee. 
With gladness and rejoicing shall they be brought: they shall enter into the king's palace. 
Instead of thy fathers shall be thy children, whom thou mayest make princes in all the earth. 
I will make thy name to be remembered in all generations: therefore shall the people praise thee for ever and ever. 
God is our refuge and strength, a very present help in trouble. 
Therefore will not we fear, though the earth be removed, and though the mountains be carried into the midst of the sea; 
Though the waters thereof roar and be troubled, though the mountains shake with the swelling thereof. Selah. 
There is a river, the streams whereof shall make glad the city of God, the holy place of the tabernacles of the most High. 
God is in the midst of her; she shall not be moved: God shall help her, and that right early. 
The heathen raged, the kingdoms were 
827,t a grate of network of brass; and upon the net shalt thou make four brasen rings in the four corners thereof. 
And thou shalt put it under the compass of the altar beneath, that the net may be even to the midst of the altar. 
And thou shalt make staves for the altar, staves of shittim wood, and overlay them with brass. 
And the staves shall be put into the rings, and the staves shall be upon the two sides of the altar, to bear it. 
Hollow with boards shalt thou make it: as it was shewed thee in the mount, so shall they make it. 
And thou shalt make the court of the tabernacle: for the south side southward there shall be hangings for the court of fine twined linen of an hundred cubits long for one side: 
And the twenty pillars thereof and their twenty sockets shall be of brass; the hooks of the pillars and their fil
1013, of the field cry also unto thee: for the rivers of waters are dried up, and the fire hath devoured the pastures of the wilderness. 
Blow ye the trumpet in Zion, and sound an alarm in my holy mountain: let all the inhabitants of the land tremble: for the day of the LORD cometh, for it is nigh at hand; 
A day of darkness and of gloominess, a day of clouds and of thick darkness, as the morning spread upon the mountains: a great people and a strong; there hath not been ever the like, neither shall be any more after it, even to the years of many generations. 
A fire devoureth before them; and behind them a flame burneth: the land is as the garden of Eden before them, and behind them a desolate wilderness; yea, and nothing shall escape them. 
The appearance of them is as the appearance of horses; and as horsemen, so shall they run. 
Like the noise of chariots on the tops of mountains shall they leap, like the noise of a flame of fire that devoureth the stubble, as a strong people set in battle array. 
B
765,w gather thyself in troops, O daughter of troops: he hath laid siege against us: they shall smite the judge of Israel with a rod upon the cheek. 
But thou, Bethlehem Ephratah, though thou be little among the thousands of Judah, yet out of thee shall he come forth unto me that is to be ruler in Israel; whose goings forth have been from of old, from everlasting. 
Therefore will he give them up, until the time that she which travaileth hath brought forth: then the remnant of his brethren shall return unto the children of Israel. 
And he shall stand and feed in the strength of the LORD, in the majesty of the name of the LORD his God; and they shall abide: for now shall he be great unto the ends of the earth. 
And this man shall be the peace, when the Assyrian
848,ny secret thing with thee? 
Why doth thine heart carry thee away? and what do thy eyes wink at, 
That thou turnest thy spirit against God, and lettest such words go out of thy mouth? 
What is man, that he should be clean? and he which is born of a woman, that he should be righteous? 
Behold, he putteth no trust in his saints; yea, the heavens are not clean in his sight. 
How much more abominable and filthy is man, which drinketh iniquity like water? 
I will shew thee, hear me; and that which I have seen I will declare; 
Which wise men have told from their fathers, and have not hid it: 
Unto whom alone the earth was given, and no stranger passed among them. 
The wicked man travaileth with pain all his days, and the number of years is hidden to the oppressor. 
A dreadful sound is in his ears: in prosperity the destroyer shall come upon hi
734,ng, Hew the tree down, and destroy it; yet leave the stump of the roots thereof in the earth, even with a band of iron and brass, in the tender grass of the field; and let it be wet with the dew of heaven, and let his portion be with the beasts of the field, till seven times pass over him; 
This is the interpretation, O king, and this is the decree of the most High, which is come upon my lord the king: 
That they shall drive thee from men, and thy dwelling shall be with the beasts of the field, and they shall make thee to eat grass as oxen, and they shall wet thee with the dew of heaven, and seven times shall pass over thee, till thou know that the most High ruleth in the kingdom of men, and giveth it to whomsoever he will. 
1061,LORD came unto Jeremiah the prophet, after that Hananiah the prophet had broken the yoke from off the neck of the prophet Jeremiah, saying, 
Go and tell Hananiah, saying, Thus saith the LORD; Thou hast broken the yokes of wood; but thou shalt make for them yokes of iron. 
For thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; I have put a yoke of iron upon the neck of all these nations, that they may serve Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon; and they shall serve him: and I have given him the beasts of the field also. 
Then said the prophet Jeremiah unto Hananiah the prophet, Hear now, Hananiah; The LORD hath not sent thee; but thou makest this people to trust in a lie. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD; Behold, I will cast thee from off the face of the earth: this year thou shalt die, because thou hast taught rebellion against the LORD. 
So Hananiah the prophet died the same year in the seventh month. 
Now these are the words of the letter that Jeremiah the prophet sent from Jerusalem unto the residue of the elders which were carried away captives, and t
836, overcometh shall not be hurt of the second death. 
And to the angel of the church in Pergamos write; These things saith he which hath the sharp sword with two edges; 
I know thy works, and where thou dwellest, even where Satan's seat is: and thou holdest fast my name, and hast not denied my faith, even in those days wherein Antipas was my faithful martyr, who was slain among you, where Satan dwelleth. 
But I have a few things against thee, because thou hast there them that hold the doctrine of Balaam, who taught Balac to cast a stumblingblock before the children of Israel, to eat things sacrificed unto idols, and to commit fornication. 
So hast thou also them that hold the doctrine of the Nicolaitanes, which thing I hate. 
Repent; or else I will come unto thee quickly, and will fight against them with the sword of my mouth.
1008,his grace which was bestowed upon me was not in vain; but I laboured more abundantly than they all: yet not I, but the grace of God which was with me. 
Therefore whether it were I or they, so we preach, and so ye believed. 
Now if Christ be preached that he rose from the dead, how say some among you that there is no resurrection of the dead? 
But if there be no resurrection of the dead, then is Christ not risen: 
And if Christ be not risen, then is our preaching vain, and your faith is also vain. 
Yea, and we are found false witnesses of God; because we have testified of God that he raised up Christ: whom he raised not up, if so be that the dead rise not. 
For if the dead rise not, then is not Christ raised: 
And if Christ be not raised, your faith is vain; ye are yet in your sins. 
Then they also which are fallen asleep in Christ are perished. 
If in this life only we have hope in Christ, we are of all men most miserable. 
But now is Christ risen from the dead, and become the firstfruits of t
720,ng men; 
And delivered his strength into captivity, and his glory into the enemy's hand. 
He gave his people over also unto the sword; and was wroth with his inheritance. 
The fire consumed their young men; and their maidens were not given to marriage. 
Their priests fell by the sword; and their widows made no lamentation. 
Then the LORD awaked as one out of sleep, and like a mighty man that shouteth by reason of wine. 
And he smote his enemies in the hinder parts: he put them to a perpetual reproach. 
Moreover he refused the tabernacle of Joseph, and chose not the tribe of Ephraim: 
But chose the tribe of Judah, the mount Zion which he loved. 
And he built his sanctuary like high palaces, like the earth which 
840,ment with thee? 
Who can bring a clean thing out of an unclean? not one. 
Seeing his days are determined, the number of his months are with thee, thou hast appointed his bounds that he cannot pass; 
Turn from him, that he may rest, till he shall accomplish, as an hireling, his day. 
For there is hope of a tree, if it be cut down, that it will sprout again, and that the tender branch thereof will not cease. 
Though the root thereof wax old in the earth, and the stock thereof die in the ground; 
Yet through the scent of water it will bud, and bring forth boughs like a plant. 
But man dieth, and wasteth away: yea, man giveth up the ghost, and where is he? 
As the waters fail from the sea, and the flood decayeth and drieth up: 
So man lieth down, and riseth not: till the heavens be no more, they shall not awake, nor be raised out of
720,e none. 
Mischief shall come upon mischief, and rumour shall be upon rumour; then shall they seek a vision of the prophet; but the law shall perish from the priest, and counsel from the ancients. 
The king shall mourn, and the prince shall be clothed with desolation, and the hands of the people of the land shall be troubled: I will do unto them after their way, and according to their deserts will I judge them; and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
And it came to pass in the sixth year, in the sixth month, in the fifth day of the month, as I sat in mine house, and the elders of Judah sat before me, that the hand of the Lord GOD fell there upon me. 
Then I beheld, and lo a likeness as the appearance of fire: f
1076, men. 
And when David heard of it, he sent Joab, and all the host of the mighty men. 
And the children of Ammon came out, and put the battle in array at the entering in of the gate: and the Syrians of Zoba, and of Rehob, and Ishtob, and Maacah, were by themselves in the field. 
When Joab saw that the front of the battle was against him before and behind, he chose of all the choice men of Israel, and put them in array against the Syrians: 
And the rest of the people he delivered into the hand of Abishai his brother, that he might put them in array against the children of Ammon. 
And he said, If the Syrians be too strong for me, then thou shalt help me: but if the children of Ammon be too strong for thee, then I will come and help thee. 
Be of good courage, and let us play the men for our people, and for the cities of our God: and the LORD do that which seemeth him good. 
And Joab drew nigh, and the people that were with him, unto the battle against the Syrians: and they fled before him. 
And when the children of Ammon saw that the Syrians were fled, then fled t
862,. 
When my soul fainted within me I remembered the LORD: and my prayer came in unto thee, into thine holy temple. 
They that observe lying vanities forsake their own mercy. 
But I will sacrifice unto thee with the voice of thanksgiving; I will pay that that I have vowed. Salvation is of the LORD. 
And the LORD spake unto the fish, and it vomited out Jonah upon the dry land. 
And the word of the LORD came unto Jonah the second time, saying, 
Arise, go unto Nineveh, that great city, and preach unto it the preaching that I bid thee. 
So Jonah arose, and went unto Nineveh, according to the word of the LORD. Now Nineveh was an exceeding great city of three days' journey. 
And Jonah began to enter into the city a day's journey, and he cried, and said, Yet forty days, and Nineveh shall be overthrown. 
So the people of Nineveh believed God, and proclaimed a 
827,n heard not when his father charged the people with the oath: wherefore he put forth the end of the rod that was in his hand, and dipped it in an honeycomb, and put his hand to his mouth; and his eyes were enlightened. 
Then answered one of the people, and said, Thy father straitly charged the people with an oath, saying, Cursed be the man that eateth any food this day. And the people were faint. 
Then said Jonathan, My father hath troubled the land: see, I pray you, how mine eyes have been enlightened, because I tasted a little of this honey. 
How much more, if haply the people had eaten freely to day of the spoil of their enemies which they found? for had there not been now a much greater slaughter among the Philistines? 
And they smote the Philistines that day from Michmash to Aijalon: and the people were very fa
869,s of Israel? 
And there was war between Asa and Baasha king of Israel all their days. 
In the third year of Asa king of Judah began Baasha the son of Ahijah to reign over all Israel in Tirzah, twenty and four years. 
And he did evil in the sight of the LORD, and walked in the way of Jeroboam, and in his sin wherewith he made Israel to sin. 
Then the word of the LORD came to Jehu the son of Hanani against Baasha, saying, 
Forasmuch as I exalted thee out of the dust, and made thee prince over my people Israel; and thou hast walked in the way of Jeroboam, and hast made my people Israel to sin, to provoke me to anger with their sins; 
Behold, I will take away the posterity of Baasha, and the posterity of his house; and will make thy house like the house of Jeroboam the son of Nebat. 
Him that dieth of Baasha in the city shall the dogs eat; and him that dieth of
1028,im king in Gihon: and they are come up from thence rejoicing, so that the city rang again. This is the noise that ye have heard. 
And also Solomon sitteth on the throne of the kingdom. 
And moreover the king's servants came to bless our lord king David, saying, God make the name of Solomon better than thy name, and make his throne greater than thy throne. And the king bowed himself upon the bed. 
And also thus said the king, Blessed be the LORD God of Israel, which hath given one to sit on my throne this day, mine eyes even seeing it. 
And all the guests that were with Adonijah were afraid, and rose up, and went every man his way. 
And Adonijah feared because of Solomon, and arose, and went, and caught hold on the horns of the altar. 
And it was told Solomon, saying, Behold, Adonijah feareth king Solomon: for, lo, he hath caught hold on the horns of the altar, saying, Let king Solomon swear unto me today that he will not slay his servant with the sword. 
And Solomon said, If he will shew himself a worthy man, the
737,the blood of it is for the life thereof: therefore I said unto the children of Israel, Ye shall eat the blood of no manner of flesh: for the life of all flesh is the blood thereof: whosoever eateth it shall be cut off. 
And every soul that eateth that which died of itself, or that which was torn with beasts, whether it be one of your own country, or a stranger, he shall both wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even: then shall he be clean. 
But if he wash them not, nor bathe his flesh; then he shall bear his iniquity. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and say unto them, I am the LORD your God. 
After the doings of the land of Egypt, wherein ye dwelt, s
914,of mine own mind. 
If these men die the common death of all men, or if they be visited after the visitation of all men; then the LORD hath not sent me. 
But if the LORD make a new thing, and the earth open her mouth, and swallow them up, with all that appertain unto them, and they go down quick into the pit; then ye shall understand that these men have provoked the LORD. 
And it came to pass, as he had made an end of speaking all these words, that the ground clave asunder that was under them: 
And the earth opened her mouth, and swallowed them up, and their houses, and all the men that appertained unto Korah, and all their goods. 
They, and all that appertained to them, went down alive into the pit, and the earth closed upon them: and they perished from among the congregation. 
And all Israel that were round about them fled at the cry of them: for they said, Lest the earth swallow us up also. 
And the
1054, her branch is yet tender, and putteth forth leaves, ye know that summer is near: 
So ye in like manner, when ye shall see these things come to pass, know that it is nigh, even at the doors. 
Verily I say unto you, that this generation shall not pass, till all these things be done. 
Heaven and earth shall pass away: but my words shall not pass away. 
But of that day and that hour knoweth no man, no, not the angels which are in heaven, neither the Son, but the Father. 
Take ye heed, watch and pray: for ye know not when the time is. 
For the Son of Man is as a man taking a far journey, who left his house, and gave authority to his servants, and to every man his work, and commanded the porter to watch. 
Watch ye therefore: for ye know not when the master of the house cometh, at even, or at midnight, or at the cockcrowing, or in the morning: 
Lest coming suddenly he find you sleeping. 
And what I say unto you I say unto all, Watch. 
After two days was the feast of the passover, and of unleavened bread: and the chief priests and the scribes so
999,ledge my transgressions: and my sin is ever before me. 
Against thee, thee only, have I sinned, and done this evil in thy sight: that thou mightest be justified when thou speakest, and be clear when thou judgest. 
Behold, I was shapen in iniquity; and in sin did my mother conceive me. 
Behold, thou desirest truth in the inward parts: and in the hidden part thou shalt make me to know wisdom. 
Purge me with hyssop, and I shall be clean: wash me, and I shall be whiter than snow. 
Make me to hear joy and gladness; that the bones which thou hast broken may rejoice. 
Hide thy face from my sins, and blot out all mine iniquities. 
Create in me a clean heart, O God; and renew a right spirit within me. 
Cast me not away from thy presence; and take not thy holy spirit from me. 
Restore unto me the joy of thy salvation; and uphold me with thy free spirit. 
Then will I teach transgressors thy ways; and sinners shall be converted unto thee. 
Deliver me from bloodguiltiness, O God, thou God of my sa
1006,h the Philistines. And the people were called together after Saul to Gilgal. 
And the Philistines gathered themselves together to fight with Israel, thirty thousand chariots, and six thousand horsemen, and people as the sand which is on the sea shore in multitude: and they came up, and pitched in Michmash, eastward from Bethaven. 
When the men of Israel saw that they were in a strait, (for the people were distressed,) then the people did hide themselves in caves, and in thickets, and in rocks, and in high places, and in pits. 
And some of the Hebrews went over Jordan to the land of Gad and Gilead. As for Saul, he was yet in Gilgal, and all the people followed him trembling. 
And he tarried seven days, according to the set time that Samuel had appointed: but Samuel came not to Gilgal; and the people were scattered from him. 
And Saul said, Bring hither a burnt offering to me, and peace offerings. And he offered the burnt offering. 
And it came to pass, that as soon as he had made an end of of
886,t not understand. Surely, had I sent thee to them, they would have hearkened unto thee. 
But the house of Israel will not hearken unto thee; for they will not hearken unto me: for all the house of Israel are impudent and hardhearted. 
Behold, I have made thy face strong against their faces, and thy forehead strong against their foreheads. 
As an adamant harder than flint have I made thy forehead: fear them not, neither be dismayed at their looks, though they be a rebellious house. 
Moreover he said unto me, Son of man, all my words that I shall speak unto thee receive in thine heart, and hear with thine ears. 
And go, get thee to them of the captivity, unto the children of thy people, and speak unto them, and tell them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; whether they will hear, or whether they will forbear. 
Then the spirit took me up, and I heard behind me a voice of a great rushing
767,they shall have no inheritance. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Thus speak unto the Levites, and say unto them, When ye take of the children of Israel the tithes which I have given you from them for your inheritance, then ye shall offer up an heave offering of it for the LORD, even a tenth part of the tithe. 
And this your heave offering shall be reckoned unto you, as though it were the corn of the threshingfloor, and as the fulness of the winepress. 
Thus ye also shall offer an heave offering unto the LORD of all your tithes, which ye receive of the children of Israel; and ye shall give thereof the LORD'S heave offering to Aaron the priest. 
Out of all your gifts ye shall offer every heave offering of the LORD, of all the best thereof, even the ha
976,thout us: and I would to God ye did reign, that we also might reign with you. 
For I think that God hath set forth us the apostles last, as it were appointed to death: for we are made a spectacle unto the world, and to angels, and to men. 
We are fools for Christ's sake, but ye are wise in Christ; we are weak, but ye are strong; ye are honourable, but we are despised. 
Even unto this present hour we both hunger, and thirst, and are naked, and are buffeted, and have no certain dwellingplace; 
And labour, working with our own hands: being reviled, we bless; being persecuted, we suffer it: 
Being defamed, we intreat: we are made as the filth of the world, and are the offscouring of all things unto this day. 
I write not these things to shame you, but as my beloved sons I warn you. 
For though ye have ten thousand instructers in Christ, yet have ye not many fathers: for in Christ Jesus I have begotten you through the gospel. 
Wherefore I beseech you, be ye followers
770,things? 
If others be partakers of this power over you, are not we rather? Nevertheless we have not used this power; but suffer all things, lest we should hinder the gospel of Christ. 
Do ye not know that they which minister about holy things live of the things of the temple? and they which wait at the altar are partakers with the altar? 
Even so hath the Lord ordained that they which preach the gospel should live of the gospel. 
But I have used none of these things: neither have I written these things, that it should be so done unto me: for it were better for me to die, than that any man should make my glorying void. 
For though I preach the gospel, I have nothing to glory of: for necessity is laid upon me; yea, woe is unto me, if I preach not the gospel! 
Fo
720,ing is infinite. 
The LORD lifteth up the meek: he casteth the wicked down to the ground. 
Sing unto the LORD with thanksgiving; sing praise upon the harp unto our God: 
Who covereth the heaven with clouds, who prepareth rain for the earth, who maketh grass to grow upon the mountains. 
He giveth to the beast his food, and to the young ravens which cry. 
He delighteth not in the strength of the horse: he taketh not pleasure in the legs of a man. 
The LORD taketh pleasure in them that fear him, in those that hope in his mercy. 
Praise the LORD, O Jerusalem; praise thy God, O Zion. 
For he hath strengthened the bars of thy gates; he hath blessed thy children within thee. 
He maketh peace in thy borders, and fillet
864,n in Maon, whose possessions were in Carmel; and the man was very great, and he had three thousand sheep, and a thousand goats: and he was shearing his sheep in Carmel. 
Now the name of the man was Nabal; and the name of his wife Abigail: and she was a woman of good understanding, and of a beautiful countenance: but the man was churlish and evil in his doings; and he was of the house of Caleb. 
And David heard in the wilderness that Nabal did shear his sheep. 
And David sent out ten young men, and David said unto the young men, Get you up to Carmel, and go to Nabal, and greet him in my name: 
And thus shall ye say to him that liveth in prosperity, Peace be both to thee, and peace be to thine house, and peace be unto all that thou hast. 
And now I have heard that thou hast shearers: now thy shepherds which were with us, we hurt them not, neither was the
733,hey would not have crucified the Lord of glory. 
But as it is written, Eye hath not seen, nor ear heard, neither have entered into the heart of man, the things which God hath prepared for them that love him. 
But God hath revealed them unto us by his Spirit: for the Spirit searcheth all things, yea, the deep things of God. 
For what man knoweth the things of a man, save the spirit of man which is in him? even so the things of God knoweth no man, but the Spirit of God. 
Now we have received, not the spirit of the world, but the spirit which is of God; that we might know the things that are freely given to us of God. 
Which things also we speak, not in the words which man's wisdom teacheth, but which the Holy Ghost teacheth; 
816,came into the city, and found as he had said unto them: and they made ready the passover. 
And in the evening he cometh with the twelve. 
And as they sat and did eat, Jesus said, Verily I say unto you, One of you which eateth with me shall betray me. 
And they began to be sorrowful, and to say unto him one by one, Is it I? and another said, Is it I? 
And he answered and said unto them, It is one of the twelve, that dippeth with me in the dish. 
The Son of man indeed goeth, as it is written of him: but woe to that man by whom the Son of man is betrayed! good were it for that man if he had never been born. 
And as they did eat, Jesus took bread, and blessed, and brake it, and gave to them, and said, Take, eat: this is my body. 
And he took the cup, and when he had given thanks, he gave it to them: and they 
795,th the guide of her youth, and forgetteth the covenant of her God. 
For her house inclineth unto death, and her paths unto the dead. 
None that go unto her return again, neither take they hold of the paths of life. 
That thou mayest walk in the way of good men, and keep the paths of the righteous. 
For the upright shall dwell in the land, and the perfect shall remain in it. 
But the wicked shall be cut off from the earth, and the transgressors shall be rooted out of it. 
My son, forget not my law; but let thine heart keep my commandments: 
For length of days, and long life, and peace, shall they add to thee. 
Let not mercy and truth forsake thee: bind them about thy neck; write them upon the table of thine heart: 
So shalt thou find favour and good understanding in the sight of God an
1042,s, and upon all the hills that are lifted up, 
And upon every high tower, and upon every fenced wall, 
And upon all the ships of Tarshish, and upon all pleasant pictures. 
And the loftiness of man shall be bowed down, and the haughtiness of men shall be made low: and the LORD alone shall be exalted in that day. 
And the idols he shall utterly abolish. 
And they shall go into the holes of the rocks, and into the caves of the earth, for fear of the LORD, and for the glory of his majesty, when he ariseth to shake terribly the earth. 
In that day a man shall cast his idols of silver, and his idols of gold, which they made each one for himself to worship, to the moles and to the bats; 
To go into the clefts of the rocks, and into the tops of the ragged rocks, for fear of the LORD, and for the glory of his majesty, when he ariseth to shake terribly the earth. 
Cease ye from man, whose breath is in his nostrils: for wherein is he to be accounted of ? 
For, behold, the Lord, the LORD of hosts, doth take away from Jerusalem and from Ju
801,h strength, and maketh my way perfect. 
He maketh my feet like hinds' feet, and setteth me upon my high places. 
He teacheth my hands to war, so that a bow of steel is broken by mine arms. 
Thou hast also given me the shield of thy salvation: and thy right hand hath holden me up, and thy gentleness hath made me great. 
Thou hast enlarged my steps under me, that my feet did not slip. 
I have pursued mine enemies, and overtaken them: neither did I turn again till they were consumed. 
I have wounded them that they were not able to rise: they are fallen under my feet. 
For thou hast girded me with strength unto the battle: thou hast subdued under me those that rose up against me. 
Thou hast also given me the necks of mine enemies; that I might destroy them that hate me. 
They cried, but there w
862,er soul; 
And her husband heard it, and held his peace at her in the day that he heard it: then her vows shall stand, and her bonds wherewith she bound her soul shall stand. 
But if her husband disallowed her on the day that he heard it; then he shall make her vow which she vowed, and that which she uttered with her lips, wherewith she bound her soul, of none effect: and the LORD shall forgive her. 
But every vow of a widow, and of her that is divorced, wherewith they have bound their souls, shall stand against her. 
And if she vowed in her husband's house, or bound her soul by a bond with an oath; 
And her husband heard it, and held his peace at her, and disallowed her not: then all her vows shall stand, and every bond wherewith she bound her soul shall stand. 
But if her husband hath utterly made them void on the day he heard them; then whatsoever 
1001,the instruction of wisdom; and before honour is humility. 
The preparations of the heart in man, and the answer of the tongue, is from the LORD. 
All the ways of a man are clean in his own eyes; but the LORD weigheth the spirits. 
Commit thy works unto the LORD, and thy thoughts shall be established. 
The LORD hath made all things for himself: yea, even the wicked for the day of evil. 
Every one that is proud in heart is an abomination to the LORD: though hand join in hand, he shall not be unpunished. 
By mercy and truth iniquity is purged: and by the fear of the LORD men depart from evil. 
When a man's ways please the LORD, he maketh even his enemies to be at peace with him. 
Better is a little with righteousness than great revenues without right. 
A man's heart deviseth his way: but the LORD directeth his steps. 
A divine sentence is in the lips of the king: his mouth transgresseth not in judgment. 
A just weight and balance are the LORD's: all the weights of the bag are his work. 
It
837,feet have they, but they walk not: neither speak they through their throat. 
They that make them are like unto them; so is every one that trusteth in them. 
O Israel, trust thou in the LORD: he is their help and their shield. 
O house of Aaron, trust in the LORD: he is their help and their shield. 
Ye that fear the LORD, trust in the LORD: he is their help and their shield. 
The LORD hath been mindful of us: he will bless us; he will bless the house of Israel; he will bless the house of Aaron. 
He will bless them that fear the LORD, both small and great. 
The LORD shall increase you more and more, you and your children. 
Ye are blessed of the LORD which made heaven and earth. 
The heaven, even the heavens, are the LORD's: but the earth hath he given to the children of men. 
The dead praise not the LORD, neither any that go do
763,And all the devils besought him, saying, Send us into the swine, that we may enter into them. 
And forthwith Jesus gave them leave. And the unclean spirits went out, and entered into the swine: and the herd ran violently down a steep place into the sea, (they were about two thousand;) and were choked in the sea. 
And they that fed the swine fled, and told it in the city, and in the country. And they went out to see what it was that was done. 
And they come to Jesus, and see him that was possessed with the devil, and had the legion, sitting, and clothed, and in his right mind: and they were afraid. 
And they that saw it told them how it befell to him that was possessed with the devil, and also concerning the swine. 
And they began to pray him to depart o
1059,u hast caused thy days to draw near, and art come even unto thy years: therefore have I made thee a reproach unto the heathen, and a mocking to all countries. 
Those that be near, and those that be far from thee, shall mock thee, which art infamous and much vexed. 
Behold, the princes of Israel, every one were in thee to their power to shed blood. 
In thee have they set light by father and mother: in the midst of thee have they dealt by oppression with the stranger: in thee have they vexed the fatherless and the widow. 
Thou hast despised mine holy things, and hast profaned my sabbaths. 
In thee are men that carry tales to shed blood: and in thee they eat upon the mountains: in the midst of thee they commit lewdness. 
In thee have they discovered their fathers' nakedness: in thee have they humbled her that was set apart for pollution. 
And one hath committed abomination with his neighbour's wife; and another hath lewdly defiled his daughter in law; and another in thee hath humbled his sister, his father's daughter. 
In thee have they taken gif
1044,erved Baal, and worshipped him. 
And he reared up an altar for Baal in the house of Baal, which he had built in Samaria. 
And Ahab made a grove; and Ahab did more to provoke the LORD God of Israel to anger than all the kings of Israel that were before him. 
In his days did Hiel the Bethelite build Jericho: he laid the foundation thereof in Abiram his firstborn, and set up the gates thereof in his youngest son Segub, according to the word of the LORD, which he spake by Joshua the son of Nun. 
And Elijah the Tishbite, who was of the inhabitants of Gilead, said unto Ahab, As the LORD God of Israel liveth, before whom I stand, there shall not be dew nor rain these years, but according to my word. 
And the word of the LORD came unto him, saying, 
Get thee hence, and turn thee eastward, and hide thyself by the brook Cherith, that is before Jordan. 
And it shall be, that thou shalt drink of the brook; and I have commanded the ravens to feed thee there. 
So he went and did according unto the word of the LORD: for he went and dwelt by th
964,ildren of Sheshan; Ahlai. 
And the sons of Jada the brother of Shammai; Jether, and Jonathan: and Jether died without children. 
And the sons of Jonathan; Peleth, and Zaza. These were the sons of Jerahmeel. 
Now Sheshan had no sons, but daughters. And Sheshan had a servant, an Egyptian, whose name was Jarha. 
And Sheshan gave his daughter to Jarha his servant to wife; and she bare him Attai. 
And Attai begat Nathan, and Nathan begat Zabad, 
And Zabad begat Ephlal, and Ephlal begat Obed, 
And Obed begat Jehu, and Jehu begat Azariah, 
And Azariah begat Helez, and Helez begat Eleasah, 
And Eleasah begat Sisamai, and Sisamai begat Shallum, 
And Shallum begat Jekamiah, and Jekamiah begat Elishama. 
Now the sons of Caleb the brother of Jerahmeel were, Mesha his firstborn, which was the father of Ziph; and the sons of Mareshah the father of Hebron. 
And the sons of Hebron; Korah, and Tappuah, and Rekem, and Shema. 
And Shema begat Raham, the father of Jorko
793, if he shall hear thee, thou hast gained thy brother. 
But if he will not hear thee, then take with thee one or two more, that in the mouth of two or three witnesses every word may be established. 
And if he shall neglect to hear them, tell it unto the church: but if he neglect to hear the church, let him be unto thee as an heathen man and a publican. 
Verily I say unto you, Whatsoever ye shall bind on earth shall be bound in heaven: and whatsoever ye shall loose on earth shall be loosed in heaven. 
Again I say unto you, That if two of you shall agree on earth as touching any thing that they shall ask, it shall be done for them of my Father which is in heaven. 
For where two or three are gathered together in my name, there am I in the midst of them. 
Then came Peter to him, and said
835,uffered to dwell by himself with a soldier that kept him. 
And it came to pass, that after three days Paul called the chief of the Jews together: and when they were come together, he said unto them, Men and brethren, though I have committed nothing against the people, or customs of our fathers, yet was I delivered prisoner from Jerusalem into the hands of the Romans. 
Who, when they had examined me, would have let me go, because there was no cause of death in me. 
But when the Jews spake against it, I was constrained to appeal unto Caesar; not that I had ought to accuse my nation of. 
For this cause therefore have I called for you, to see you, and to speak with you: because that for the hope of Israel I am bound with this chain. 
And they said unto him, We neither received letters out of Judaea concerning thee, neither any 
944, strength, every one of them in Zion appeareth before God. 
O LORD God of hosts, hear my prayer: give ear, O God of Jacob. Selah. 
Behold, O God our shield, and look upon the face of thine anointed. 
For a day in thy courts is better than a thousand. I had rather be a doorkeeper in the house of my God, than to dwell in the tents of wickedness. 
For the LORD God is a sun and shield: the LORD will give grace and glory: no good thing will he withhold from them that walk uprightly. 
O LORD of hosts, blessed is the man that trusteth in thee. 
Lord, thou hast been favourable unto thy land: thou hast brought back the captivity of Jacob. 
Thou hast forgiven the iniquity of thy people, thou hast covered all their sin. Selah. 
Thou hast taken away all thy wrath: thou hast turned thyself from the fierceness of thine anger. 
Turn us, O God of our salvation, and cause thine anger toward us to cease. 
Wilt thou be angry with us for ever? wilt t
729, eighteen males. 
And of the sons of Shelomith; the son of Josiphiah, and with him an hundred and threescore males. 
And of the sons of Bebai; Zechariah the son of Bebai, and with him twenty and eight males. 
And of the sons of Azgad; Johanan the son of Hakkatan, and with him an hundred and ten males. 
And of the last sons of Adonikam, whose names are these, Eliphelet, Jeiel, and Shemaiah, and with them threescore males. 
Of the sons also of Bigvai; Uthai, and Zabbud, and with them seventy males. 
And I gathered them together to the river that runneth to Ahava; and there abode we in tents three days: and I viewed the people, and the priests, and found there none of the sons of Levi. 
Then sent I for Eliezer, for Ariel, 
784,he God of the dead, but the God of the living: ye therefore do greatly err. 
And one of the scribes came, and having heard them reasoning together, and perceiving that he had answered them well, asked him, Which is the first commandment of all? 
And Jesus answered him, The first of all the commandments is, Hear, O Israel; The Lord our God is one Lord: 
And thou shalt love the Lord thy God with all thy heart, and with all thy soul, and with all thy mind, and with all thy strength: this is the first commandment. 
And the second is like, namely this, Thou shalt love thy neighbour as thyself. There is none other commandment greater than these. 
And the scribe said unto him, Well, Master, thou hast said the truth: for there is one God; and there is none other but he: 
And to lov
1018,ifice, they sacrifice to devils, and not to God: and I would not that ye should have fellowship with devils. 
Ye cannot drink the cup of the Lord, and the cup of devils: ye cannot be partakers of the Lord's table, and of the table of devils. 
Do we provoke the Lord to jealousy? are we stronger than he? 
All things are lawful for me, but all things are not expedient: all things are lawful for me, but all things edify not. 
Let no man seek his own, but every man another's wealth. 
Whatsoever is sold in the shambles, that eat, asking no question for conscience sake: 
For the earth is the Lord's, and the fulness thereof. 
If any of them that believe not bid you to a feast, and ye be disposed to go; whatsoever is set before you, eat, asking no question for conscience sake. 
But if any man say unto you, this is offered in sacrifice unto idols, eat not for his sake that shewed it, and for conscience sake: for the earth is the Lord's, and the fulness thereof: 
Conscience, I say, not thine own, but of the other:
951,; a fugitive and a vagabond shalt thou be in the earth. 
And Cain said unto the LORD, My punishment is greater than I can bear. 
Behold, thou hast driven me out this day from the face of the earth; and from thy face shall I be hid; and I shall be a fugitive and a vagabond in the earth; and it shall come to pass, that every one that findeth me shall slay me. 
And the LORD said unto him, Therefore whosoever slayeth Cain, vengeance shall be taken on him sevenfold. And the LORD set a mark upon Cain, lest any finding him should kill him. 
And Cain went out from the presence of the LORD, and dwelt in the land of Nod, on the east of Eden. 
And Cain knew his wife; and she conceived, and bare Enoch: and he builded a city, and called the name of the city, after the name of his son, Enoch. 
And unto Enoch was born Irad: and Irad begat Mehujael: and Mehujael begat Methusael: and Methusael begat Lamech. 
And Lamech took unto him two wives: the name o
761,e hallowed part thereof out of it. 
Therefore thou shalt say unto them, When ye have heaved the best thereof from it, then it shall be counted unto the Levites as the increase of the threshingfloor, and as the increase of the winepress. 
And ye shall eat it in every place, ye and your households: for it is your reward for your service in the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And ye shall bear no sin by reason of it, when ye have heaved from it the best of it: neither shall ye pollute the holy things of the children of Israel, lest ye die. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 
This is the ordinance of the law which the LORD hath commanded, saying, Speak unto the children of Israel, that they bring thee a red heifer without spot, wherei
837,are beyond the river, be ye far from thence: 
Let the work of this house of God alone; let the governor of the Jews and the elders of the Jews build this house of God in his place. 
Moreover I make a decree what ye shall do to the elders of these Jews for the building of this house of God: that of the king's goods, even of the tribute beyond the river, forthwith expenses be given unto these men, that they be not hindered. 
And that which they have need of, both young bullocks, and rams, and lambs, for the burnt offerings of the God of heaven, wheat, salt, wine, and oil, according to the appointment of the priests which are at Jerusalem, let it be given them day by day without fail: 
That they may offer sacrifices of sweet savours unto the God of heaven, and pray for the life of the king, and of his sons. 
Also I have made a d
826,d, and five on the left, to wash in them: such things as they offered for the burnt offering they washed in them; but the sea was for the priests to wash in. 
And he made ten candlesticks of gold according to their form, and set them in the temple, five on the right hand, and five on the left. 
He made also ten tables, and placed them in the temple, five on the right side, and five on the left. And he made an hundred basons of gold. 
Furthermore he made the court of the priests, and the great court, and doors for the court, and overlaid the doors of them with brass. 
And he set the sea on the right side of the east end, over against the south. 
And Huram made the pots, and the shovels, and the basons. And Huram finished the work that he was to make for king Solomon for the house of God; 
To wit, the two pillars, an
1020,before them, to make himself an everlasting name? 
That led them through the deep, as an horse in the wilderness, that they should not stumble? 
As a beast goeth down into the valley, the Spirit of the LORD caused him to rest: so didst thou lead thy people, to make thyself a glorious name. 
Look down from heaven, and behold from the habitation of thy holiness and of thy glory: where is thy zeal and thy strength, the sounding of thy bowels and of thy mercies toward me? are they restrained? 
Doubtless thou art our father, though Abraham be ignorant of us, and Israel acknowledge us not: thou, O LORD, art our father, our redeemer; thy name is from everlasting. 
O LORD, why hast thou made us to err from thy ways, and hardened our heart from thy fear? Return for thy servants' sake, the tribes of thine inheritance. 
The people of thy holiness have possessed it but a little while: our adversaries have trodden down thy sanctuary. 
We are thine: thou never barest rule over them; they were not called by thy name. 
O
896, Kedesh. 
And Barak called Zebulun and Naphtali to Kedesh; and he went up with ten thousand men at his feet: and Deborah went up with him. 
Now Heber the Kenite, which was of the children of Hobab the father in law of Moses, had severed himself from the Kenites, and pitched his tent unto the plain of Zaanaim, which is by Kedesh. 
And they shewed Sisera that Barak the son of Abinoam was gone up to mount Tabor. 
And Sisera gathered together all his chariots, even nine hundred chariots of iron, and all the people that were with him, from Harosheth of the Gentiles unto the river of Kishon. 
And Deborah said unto Barak, Up; for this is the day in which the LORD hath delivered Sisera into thine hand: is not the LORD gone out before thee? So Barak went down from mount Tabor, and ten thousand men after him. 
And the LORD discomfited Sisera, and all his chariots, and all his host, with the ed
925,unto the eyes of him with whom we have to do. 
Seeing then that we have a great high priest, that is passed into the heavens, Jesus the Son of God, let us hold fast our profession. 
For we have not an high priest which cannot be touched with the feeling of our infirmities; but was in all points tempted like as we are, yet without sin. 
Let us therefore come boldly unto the throne of grace, that we may obtain mercy, and find grace to help in time of need. 
For every high priest taken from among men is ordained for men in things pertaining to God, that he may offer both gifts and sacrifices for sins: 
Who can have compassion on the ignorant, and on them that are out of the way; for that he himself also is compassed with infirmity. 
And by reason hereof he ought, as for the people, so also for himself, to offer for sins. 
And no man taketh this honour unto himself, but he that is called of God, as was Aaron. 
So al
792,fering of the LORD, of all the best thereof, even the hallowed part thereof out of it. 
Therefore thou shalt say unto them, When ye have heaved the best thereof from it, then it shall be counted unto the Levites as the increase of the threshingfloor, and as the increase of the winepress. 
And ye shall eat it in every place, ye and your households: for it is your reward for your service in the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And ye shall bear no sin by reason of it, when ye have heaved from it the best of it: neither shall ye pollute the holy things of the children of Israel, lest ye die. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 
This is the ordinance of the law which the LORD hath commanded, saying, Speak unto the children of Israel, that they bring thee a red heifer
780,ife. 
And Jacob went out from Beersheba, and went toward Haran. 
And he lighted upon a certain place, and tarried there all night, because the sun was set; and he took of the stones of that place, and put them for his pillows, and lay down in that place to sleep. 
And he dreamed, and behold a ladder set up on the earth, and the top of it reached to heaven: and behold the angels of God ascending and descending on it. 
And, behold, the LORD stood above it, and said, I am the LORD God of Abraham thy father, and the God of Isaac: the land whereon thou liest, to thee will I give it, and to thy seed; 
And thy seed shall be as the dust of the earth, and thou shalt spread abroad to the west, and to the east, and to the north, and to the south: and in thee and in thy seed shall 
988,ers, from twenty years old and upward, all that were able to go forth to war in Israel; 
Even all they that were numbered were six hundred thousand and three thousand and five hundred and fifty. 
But the Levites after the tribe of their fathers were not numbered among them. 
For the LORD had spoken unto Moses, saying, 
Only thou shalt not number the tribe of Levi, neither take the sum of them among the children of Israel: 
But thou shalt appoint the Levites over the tabernacle of testimony, and over all the vessels thereof, and over all things that belong to it: they shall bear the tabernacle, and all the vessels thereof; and they shall minister unto it, and shall encamp round about the tabernacle. 
And when the tabernacle setteth forward, the Levites shall take it down: and when the tabernacle is to be pitched, the Levites shall set it up: and the stranger that cometh nigh shall be put to death. 
And the children of Israel shall pitch their tents, every man by his own camp
849,urse were twenty and four thousand. 
The ninth captain for the ninth month was Abiezer the Anetothite, of the Benjamites: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
The tenth captain for the tenth month was Maharai the Netophathite, of the Zarhites: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
The eleventh captain for the eleventh month was Benaiah the Pirathonite, of the children of Ephraim: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
The twelfth captain for the twelfth month was Heldai the Netophathite, of Othniel: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
Furthermore over the tribes of Israel: the ruler of the Reubenites was Eliezer the son of Zichri: of the Simeonites, Shephatiah the son of Maachah: 
Of the Levites, Hashabiah the son of Kemuel: of the Aaronites, Zadok: 
Of Judah, Elihu, one of the brethren o
807,he LORD God of hosts; the LORD is his memorial. 
Therefore turn thou to thy God: keep mercy and judgment and wait on thy God continually. 
He is a merchant, the balances of deceit are in his hand: he loveth to oppress. 
And Ephraim said, Yet I am become rich, I have found me out substance: in all my labours they shall find none iniquity in me that were sin. 
And I that am the LORD thy God from the land of Egypt will yet make thee to dwell in tabernacles, as in the days of the solemn feast. 
I have also spoken by the prophets, and I have multiplied visions, and used similitudes, by the ministry of the prophets. 
Is there iniquity in Gilead? surely they are vanity: they sacrifice bullocks in Gilgal; yea, their altars are as heaps in the furrows of the fields. 
And Jacob fled into the country of Syr
881, 
For thy servant David's sake turn not away the face of thine anointed. 
The LORD hath sworn in truth unto David; he will not turn from it; Of the fruit of thy body will I set upon thy throne. 
If thy children will keep my covenant and my testimony that I shall teach them, their children shall also sit upon thy throne for evermore. 
For the LORD hath chosen Zion; he hath desired it for his habitation. 
This is my rest for ever: here will I dwell; for I have desired it. 
I will abundantly bless her provision: I will satisfy her poor with bread. 
I will also clothe her priests with salvation: and her saints shall shout aloud for joy. 
There will I make the horn of David to bud: I have ordained a lamp for mine anointed. 
His enemies will I clothe with shame: but upon himself shall his crown flourish. 
Behold, how good and how pleasant it is for brethren to dwell together
950,bode both Peter, and James, and John, and Andrew, Philip, and Thomas, Bartholomew, and Matthew, James the son of Alphaeus, and Simon Zelotes, and Judas the brother of James. 
These all continued with one accord in prayer and supplication, with the women, and Mary the mother of Jesus, and with his brethren. 
And in those days Peter stood up in the midst of the disciples, and said, (the number of names together were about an hundred and twenty,) 
Men and brethren, this scripture must needs have been fulfilled, which the Holy Ghost by the mouth of David spake before concerning Judas, which was guide to them that took Jesus. 
For he was numbered with us, and had obtained part of this ministry. 
Now this man purchased a field with the reward of iniquity; and falling headlong, he burst asunder in the midst, and all his bowels gushed out. 
And it was known unto all the dwellers at Jerusalem; insomuch as that field is called in their proper ton
801,ded in thy fairs. 
Javan, Tubal, and Meshech, they were thy merchants: they traded the persons of men and vessels of brass in thy market. 
They of the house of Togarmah traded in thy fairs with horses and horsemen and mules. 
The men of Dedan were thy merchants; many isles were the merchandise of thine hand: they brought thee for a present horns of ivory and ebony. 
Syria was thy merchant by reason of the multitude of the wares of thy making: they occupied in thy fairs with emeralds, purple, and broidered work, and fine linen, and coral, and agate. 
Judah, and the land of Israel, they were thy merchants: they traded in thy market wheat of Minnith, and Pannag, and honey, and oil, and balm. 
Damascus was thy merchant in the multitude of the wares of thy making, for the multitude of all riches
1025,hirsty ground. 
And fire is gone out of a rod of her branches, which hath devoured her fruit, so that she hath no strong rod to be a sceptre to rule. This is a lamentation, and shall be for a lamentation. 
And it came to pass in the seventh year, in the fifth month, the tenth day of the month, that certain of the elders of Israel came to enquire of the LORD, and sat before me. 
Then came the word of the LORD unto me, saying, 
Son of man, speak unto the elders of Israel, and say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Are ye come to enquire of me? As I live, saith the Lord GOD, I will not be enquired of by you. 
Wilt thou judge them, son of man, wilt thou judge them? cause them to know the abominations of their fathers: 
And say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; In the day when I chose Israel, and lifted up mine hand unto the seed of the house of Jacob, and made myself known unto them in the land of Egypt, when I lifted up mine hand unto them, saying, I am the LORD your God; 
In the day that I lifted up mine hand
725,ples James and John saw this, they said, Lord, wilt thou that we command fire to come down from heaven, and consume them, even as Elias did? 
But he turned, and rebuked them, and said, Ye know not what manner of spirit ye are of. 
For the Son of man is not come to destroy men's lives, but to save them. And they went to another village. 
And it came to pass, that, as they went in the way, a certain man said unto him, Lord, I will follow thee whithersoever thou goest. 
And Jesus said unto him, Foxes have holes, and birds of the air have nests; but the Son of man hath not where to lay his head. 
And he said unto another, Follow me. But he said, Lord, suffer me first to go and bury my father. 
Jesus said unto him, Let t
923,will take you to me for a people, and I will be to you a God: and ye shall know that I am the LORD your God, which bringeth you out from under the burdens of the Egyptians. 
And I will bring you in unto the land, concerning the which I did swear to give it to Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob; and I will give it you for an heritage: I am the LORD. 
And Moses spake so unto the children of Israel: but they hearkened not unto Moses for anguish of spirit, and for cruel bondage. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Go in, speak unto Pharaoh king of Egypt, that he let the children of Israel go out of his land. 
And Moses spake before the LORD, saying, Behold, the children of Israel have not hearkened unto me; how then shall Pharaoh hear me, who am of uncircumcised lips? 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, and gave them a charge unto the children of Israel, and unto Pharaoh king of Egypt, to bring the ch
889, them; though they climb up to heaven, thence will I bring them down: 
And though they hide themselves in the top of Carmel, I will search and take them out thence; and though they be hid from my sight in the bottom of the sea, thence will I command the serpent, and he shall bite them: 
And though they go into captivity before their enemies, thence will I command the sword, and it shall slay them: and I will set mine eyes upon them for evil, and not for good. 
And the Lord GOD of hosts is he that toucheth the land, and it shall melt, and all that dwell therein shall mourn: and it shall rise up wholly like a flood; and shall be drowned, as by the flood of Egypt. 
It is he that buildeth his stories in the heaven, and hath founded his troop in the earth; he that calleth for the waters of the sea, and poureth them out upon the face of the earth: The LORD is his name. 
Are ye not a
819,gether against me: against me do they devise my hurt. 
An evil disease, say they, cleaveth fast unto him: and now that he lieth he shall rise up no more. 
Yea, mine own familiar friend, in whom I trusted, which did eat of my bread, hath lifted up his heel against me. 
But thou, O LORD, be merciful unto me, and raise me up, that I may requite them. 
By this I know that thou favourest me, because mine enemy doth not triumph over me. 
And as for me, thou upholdest me in mine integrity, and settest me before thy face for ever. 
Blessed be the LORD God of Israel from everlasting, and to everlasting. Amen, and Amen. 
As the hart panteth after the water brooks, so panteth my soul after thee, O God. 
My soul thirsteth for God, for the living God: when shall I come and appear before God? 
My tears have been my meat d
832,was not this to know me? saith the LORD. 
But thine eyes and thine heart are not but for thy covetousness, and for to shed innocent blood, and for oppression, and for violence, to do it. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD concerning Jehoiakim the son of Josiah king of Judah; They shall not lament for him, saying, Ah my brother! or, Ah sister! they shall not lament for him, saying, Ah lord! or, Ah his glory! 
He shall be buried with the burial of an ass, drawn and cast forth beyond the gates of Jerusalem. 
Go up to Lebanon, and cry; and lift up thy voice in Bashan, and cry from the passages: for all thy lovers are destroyed. 
I spake unto thee in thy prosperity; but thou saidst, I will not hear. This hath been thy manner from thy youth, that thou obeyedst not my voice. 
The wind shall eat up all thy pastors, and thy lovers sh
992,y experience that the LORD hath blessed me for thy sake. 
And he said, Appoint me thy wages, and I will give it. 
And he said unto him, Thou knowest how I have served thee, and how thy cattle was with me. 
For it was little which thou hadst before I came, and it is now increased unto a multitude; and the LORD hath blessed thee since my coming: and now when shall I provide for mine own house also? 
And he said, What shall I give thee? And Jacob said, Thou shalt not give me any thing: if thou wilt do this thing for me, I will again feed and keep thy flock. 
I will pass through all thy flock to day, removing from thence all the speckled and spotted cattle, and all the brown cattle among the sheep, and the spotted and speckled among the goats: and of such shall be my hire. 
So shall my righteousness answer for me in time to come, when it shall come for my hire before thy face: every one that is not speckled and spotted among the goats, and brown among the sheep, that shall be count
970,
But covet earnestly the best gifts: and yet shew I unto you a more excellent way. 
Though I speak with the tongues of men and of angels, and have not charity, I am become as sounding brass, or a tinkling cymbal. 
And though I have the gift of prophecy, and understand all mysteries, and all knowledge; and though I have all faith, so that I could remove mountains, and have not charity, I am nothing. 
And though I bestow all my goods to feed the poor, and though I give my body to be burned, and have not charity, it profiteth me nothing. 
Charity suffereth long, and is kind; charity envieth not; charity vaunteth not itself, is not puffed up, 
Doth not behave itself unseemly, seeketh not her own, is not easily provoked, thinketh no evil; 
Rejoiceth not in iniquity, but rejoiceth in the truth; 
Beareth all things, believeth all things, hopeth all things, endureth all things. 
Charity never faileth: but whether there be prophecies, they shall fail; whether there
725, the wicked is far from me. 
How oft is the candle of the wicked put out! and how oft cometh their destruction upon them! God distributeth sorrows in his anger. 
They are as stubble before the wind, and as chaff that the storm carrieth away. 
God layeth up his iniquity for his children: he rewardeth him, and he shall know it. 
His eyes shall see his destruction, and he shall drink of the wrath of the Almighty. 
For what pleasure hath he in his house after him, when the number of his months is cut off in the midst? 
Shall any teach God knowledge? seeing he judgeth those that are high. 
One dieth in his full strength, being wholly at ease and quiet. 
His breasts are full of milk, and his bones are moistened with marro
900, 
And Elkanah went to Ramah to his house. And the child did minister unto the LORD before Eli the priest. 
Now the sons of Eli were sons of Belial; they knew not the LORD. 
And the priest's custom with the people was, that, when any man offered sacrifice, the priest's servant came, while the flesh was in seething, with a fleshhook of three teeth in his hand; 
And he struck it into the pan, or kettle, or caldron, or pot; all that the fleshhook brought up the priest took for himself. So they did in Shiloh unto all the Israelites that came thither. 
Also before they burnt the fat, the priest's servant came, and said to the man that sacrificed, Give flesh to roast for the priest; for he will not have sodden flesh of thee, but raw. 
And if any man said unto him, Let them not fail to burn the fat presently, and then take as much as thy soul desireth; then he would answer him, Nay; but thou sha
742,Telah his son, and Tahan his son. 
Laadan his son, Ammihud his son, Elishama his son. 
Non his son, Jehoshuah his son. 
And their possessions and habitations were, Bethel and the towns thereof, and eastward Naaran, and westward Gezer, with the towns thereof; Shechem also and the towns thereof, unto Gaza and the towns thereof: 
And by the borders of the children of Manasseh, Bethshean and her towns, Taanach and her towns, Megiddo and her towns, Dor and her towns. In these dwelt the children of Joseph the son of Israel. 
The sons of Asher; Imnah, and Isuah, and Ishuai, and Beriah, and Serah their sister. 
And the sons of Beriah; Heber, and Malchiel, who is the father of Birzavith. 
And Heber begat Japhlet, and Shomer, and Hotham, and 
895,gged down thine altars; and I am left alone, and they seek my life. 
But what saith the answer of God unto him? I have reserved to myself seven thousand men, who have not bowed the knee to the image of Baal. 
Even so then at this present time also there is a remnant according to the election of grace. 
And if by grace, then is it no more of works: otherwise grace is no more grace. But if it be of works, then it is no more grace: otherwise work is no more work. 
What then? Israel hath not obtained that which he seeketh for; but the election hath obtained it, and the rest were blinded. 
(According as it is written, God hath given them the spirit of slumber, eyes that they should not see, and ears that they should not hear;) unto this day. 
And David saith, Let their table be made a snare, and a trap, and a stumblingblock, and a recompence unto them: 
Let their eyes be darkened, that t
962, might be fulfilled which was spoken by the prophet, They parted my garments among them, and upon my vesture did they cast lots. 
And sitting down they watched him there; 
And set up over his head his accusation written, THIS IS JESUS THE KING OF THE JEWS. 
Then were there two thieves crucified with him, one on the right hand, and another on the left. 
And they that passed by reviled him, wagging their heads, 
And saying, Thou that destroyest the temple, and buildest it in three days, save thyself. If thou be the Son of God, come down from the cross. 
Likewise also the chief priests mocking him, with the scribes and elders, said, 
He saved others; himself he cannot save. If he be the King of Israel, let him now come down from the cross, and we will believe him. 
He trusted in God; let him deliver him now, if he will have him: for he said, I am the Son of God. 
The thieves also, which were crucified with him, cast the same in his teeth. 
Now from th
805, if ye believe not that I am he, ye shall die in your sins. 
Then said they unto him, Who art thou? And Jesus saith unto them, Even the same that I said unto you from the beginning. 
I have many things to say and to judge of you: but he that sent me is true; and I speak to the world those things which I have heard of him. 
They understood not that he spake to them of the Father. 
Then said Jesus unto them, When ye have lifted up the Son of man, then shall ye know that I am he, and that I do nothing of myself; but as my Father hath taught me, I speak these things. 
And he that sent me is with me: the Father hath not left me alone; for I do always those things that please him. 
As he spake these words, many believed on him. 
Then said Jesus to those Jews which believed on him, If ye continue in m
921,governor in Judah, and Ekron as a Jebusite. 
And I will encamp about mine house because of the army, because of him that passeth by, and because of him that returneth: and no oppressor shall pass through them any more: for now have I seen with mine eyes. 
Rejoice greatly, O daughter of Zion; shout, O daughter of Jerusalem: behold, thy King cometh unto thee: he is just, and having salvation; lowly, and riding upon an ass, and upon a colt the foal of an ass. 
And I will cut off the chariot from Ephraim, and the horse from Jerusalem, and the battle bow shall be cut off: and he shall speak peace unto the heathen: and his dominion shall be from sea even to sea, and from the river even to the ends of the earth. 
As for thee also, by the blood of thy covenant I have sent forth thy prisoners out of the pit wherein is no water. 
Turn you to the strong hold, ye prisoners of hope: even to day do I declare that I will r
878,cob, saith the Lord GOD, the God of hosts, 
That in the day that I shall visit the transgressions of Israel upon him I will also visit the altars of Bethel: and the horns of the altar shall be cut off, and fall to the ground. 
And I will smite the winter house with the summer house; and the houses of ivory shall perish, and the great houses shall have an end, saith the LORD. 
Hear this word, ye kine of Bashan, that are in the mountain of Samaria, which oppress the poor, which crush the needy, which say to their masters, Bring, and let us drink. 
The Lord GOD hath sworn by his holiness, that, lo, the days shall come upon you, that he will take you away with hooks, and your posterity with fishhooks. 
And ye shall go out at the breaches, every cow at that which is before her; and ye shall cast them into the palace, saith the LORD. 
Come to Bethel, and transgress; at Gi
778, him. 
And it came to pass, as they departed from him, Peter said unto Jesus, Master, it is good for us to be here: and let us make three tabernacles; one for thee, and one for Moses, and one for Elias: not knowing what he said. 
While he thus spake, there came a cloud, and overshadowed them: and they feared as they entered into the cloud. 
And there came a voice out of the cloud, saying, This is my beloved Son: hear him. 
And when the voice was past, Jesus was found alone. And they kept it close, and told no man in those days any of those things which they had seen. 
And it came to pass, that on the next day, when they were come down from the hill, much people met him. 
And, behold, a man of the company cried out, saying, Master, I beseech thee, look upon my son: for
790,fore the tabernacle of the congregation, to do the service of the tabernacle. 
And they shall keep all the instruments of the tabernacle of the congregation, and the charge of the children of Israel, to do the service of the tabernacle. 
And thou shalt give the Levites unto Aaron and to his sons: they are wholly given unto him out of the children of Israel. 
And thou shalt appoint Aaron and his sons, and they shall wait on their priest's office: and the stranger that cometh nigh shall be put to death. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
And I, behold, I have taken the Levites from among the children of Israel instead of all the firstborn that openeth the matrix among the children of Israel: therefore the Levites shall be mine; 
Because all the firstborn are mine; for on the 
885,ut the seventh day is the sabbath of rest, an holy convocation; ye shall do no work therein: it is the sabbath of the LORD in all your dwellings. 
These are the feasts of the LORD, even holy convocations, which ye shall proclaim in their seasons. 
In the fourteenth day of the first month at even is the LORD's passover. 
And on the fifteenth day of the same month is the feast of unleavened bread unto the LORD: seven days ye must eat unleavened bread. 
In the first day ye shall have an holy convocation: ye shall do no servile work therein. 
But ye shall offer an offering made by fire unto the LORD seven days: in the seventh day is an holy convocation: ye shall do no servile work therein. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and say unto them, When ye be come into the land which I give unto you, and shall reap the harvest thereof, then y
811,nd justice in the earth. 
In his days Judah shall be saved, and Israel shall dwell safely: and this is his name whereby he shall be called, THE LORD OUR RIGHTEOUSNESS. 
Therefore, behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that they shall no more say, The LORD liveth, which brought up the children of Israel out of the land of Egypt; 
But, The LORD liveth, which brought up and which led the seed of the house of Israel out of the north country, and from all countries whither I had driven them; and they shall dwell in their own land. 
Mine heart within me is broken because of the prophets; all my bones shake; I am like a drunken man, and like a man whom wine hath overcome, because of the LORD, and because of the words of his holiness. 
For the land is full of adulterers; for because of swearing the land mou
1008, into the swine, that we may enter into them. 
And forthwith Jesus gave them leave. And the unclean spirits went out, and entered into the swine: and the herd ran violently down a steep place into the sea, (they were about two thousand;) and were choked in the sea. 
And they that fed the swine fled, and told it in the city, and in the country. And they went out to see what it was that was done. 
And they come to Jesus, and see him that was possessed with the devil, and had the legion, sitting, and clothed, and in his right mind: and they were afraid. 
And they that saw it told them how it befell to him that was possessed with the devil, and also concerning the swine. 
And they began to pray him to depart out of their coasts. 
And when he was come into the ship, he that had been possessed with the devil prayed him that he might be with him. 
Howbeit Jesus suffered him not, but saith unto him, Go home to thy friends, and tell them how great things the Lord hath done for thee, and hath had compas
778,eousness of the law, shall not his uncircumcision be counted for circumcision? 
And shall not uncircumcision which is by nature, if it fulfil the law, judge thee, who by the letter and circumcision dost transgress the law? 
For he is not a Jew, which is one outwardly; neither is that circumcision, which is outward in the flesh: 
But he is a Jew, which is one inwardly; and circumcision is that of the heart, in the spirit, and not in the letter; whose praise is not of men, but of God. 
What advantage then hath the Jew? or what profit is there of circumcision? 
Much every way: chiefly, because that unto them were committed the oracles of God. 
For what if some did not believe? shall their unbelief make the faith of God without effect? 
God forbid: yea, let God be true, b
820,y found written in the law which the LORD had commanded by Moses, that the children of Israel should dwell in booths in the feast of the seventh month: 
And that they should publish and proclaim in all their cities, and in Jerusalem, saying, Go forth unto the mount, and fetch olive branches, and pine branches, and myrtle branches, and palm branches, and branches of thick trees, to make booths, as it is written. 
So the people went forth, and brought them, and made themselves booths, every one upon the roof of his house, and in their courts, and in the courts of the house of God, and in the street of the water gate, and in the street of the gate of Ephraim. 
And all the congregation of them that were come again out of the captivity made booths, and sat under the booths: for since the days of Jeshua the son of 
843,the merryhearted do sigh. 
The mirth of tabrets ceaseth, the noise of them that rejoice endeth, the joy of the harp ceaseth. 
They shall not drink wine with a song; strong drink shall be bitter to them that drink it. 
The city of confusion is broken down: every house is shut up, that no man may come in. 
There is a crying for wine in the streets; all joy is darkened, the mirth of the land is gone. 
In the city is left desolation, and the gate is smitten with destruction. 
When thus it shall be in the midst of the land among the people, there shall be as the shaking of an olive tree, and as the gleaning grapes when the vintage is done. 
They shall lift up their voice, they shall sing for the majesty of the LORD, they shall cry aloud from the sea. 
Wherefore glorify ye the LORD in the fires, even the name of the LORD God of Israel in
917,ren, were twelve: 
The eleventh to Azareel, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The twelfth to Hashabiah, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The thirteenth to Shubael, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The fourteenth to Mattithiah, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The fifteenth to Jeremoth, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The sixteenth to Hananiah, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The seventeenth to Joshbekashah, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The eighteenth to Hanani, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The nineteenth to Mallothi, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The twentieth to Eliathah, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The one and twentieth to Hothir, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The two and twentieth to Giddalti, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
Th
1039,ly anointing oil, and the pure incense of sweet spices, according to the work of the apothecary. 
And he made the altar of burnt offering of shittim wood: five cubits was the length thereof, and five cubits the breadth thereof; it was foursquare; and three cubits the height thereof. 
And he made the horns thereof on the four corners of it; the horns thereof were of the same: and he overlaid it with brass. 
And he made all the vessels of the altar, the pots, and the shovels, and the basons, and the fleshhooks, and the firepans: all the vessels thereof made he of brass. 
And he made for the altar a brasen grate of network under the compass thereof beneath unto the midst of it. 
And he cast four rings for the four ends of the grate of brass, to be places for the staves. 
And he made the staves of shittim wood, and overlaid them with brass. 
And he put the staves into the rings on the sides of the altar, to bear it withal; he made the altar hollow with boards. 
And he made the laver of brass, and the foot of it of brass, of the
851,ways. 
Ye have sown much, and bring in little; ye eat, but ye have not enough; ye drink, but ye are not filled with drink; ye clothe you, but there is none warm; and he that earneth wages earneth wages to put it into a bag with holes. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Consider your ways. 
Go up to the mountain, and bring wood, and build the house; and I will take pleasure in it, and I will be glorified, saith the LORD. 
Ye looked for much, and, lo it came to little; and when ye brought it home, I did blow upon it. Why? saith the LORD of hosts. Because of mine house that is waste, and ye run every man unto his own house. 
Therefore the heaven over you is stayed from dew, and the earth is stayed from her fruit. 
And I called for a drought upon the land, and upon the mountains, and upon the corn, and upon the new wine, and upon the oil, and upon
929, I will speak in the anguish of my spirit; I will complain in the bitterness of my soul. 
Am I a sea, or a whale, that thou settest a watch over me? 
When I say, My bed shall comfort me, my couch shall ease my complaints; 
Then thou scarest me with dreams, and terrifiest me through visions: 
So that my soul chooseth strangling, and death rather than my life. 
I loathe it; I would not live alway: let me alone; for my days are vanity. 
What is man, that thou shouldest magnify him? and that thou shouldest set thine heart upon him? 
And that thou shouldest visit him every morning, and try him every moment? 
How long wilt thou not depart from me, nor let me alone till I swallow down my spittle? 
I have sinned; what shall I do unto thee, O thou preserver of men? why hast thou set me as a mark against thee, so that I am a burden to myself? 
And why dost thou not pardon my transgression, and take away my iniquity? for now s
769, his own power: and he shall destroy wonderfully, and shall prosper, and practise, and shall destroy the mighty and the holy people. 
And through his policy also he shall cause craft to prosper in his hand; and he shall magnify himself in his heart, and by peace shall destroy many: he shall also stand up against the Prince of princes; but he shall be broken without hand. 
And the vision of the evening and the morning which was told is true: wherefore shut thou up the vision; for it shall be for many days. 
And I Daniel fainted, and was sick certain days; afterward I rose up, and did the king's business; and I was astonished at the vision, but none understood it. 
In the first year of Darius the son of Ahasuerus, of the seed of the Medes, which was made king o
783,ir tongue walketh through the earth. 
Therefore his people return hither: and waters of a full cup are wrung out to them. 
And they say, How doth God know? and is there knowledge in the most High? 
Behold, these are the ungodly, who prosper in the world; they increase in riches. 
Verily I have cleansed my heart in vain, and washed my hands in innocency. 
For all the day long have I been plagued, and chastened every morning. 
If I say, I will speak thus; behold, I should offend against the generation of thy children. 
When I thought to know this, it was too painful for me; 
Until I went into the sanctuary of God; then understood I their end. 
Surely thou didst set them in slippery places: thou castedst them down into destruction. 
How are they brought into desolation, as in
761,usted. 
And the people journeyed from Kibrothhattaavah unto Hazeroth; and abode at Hazeroth. 
And Miriam and Aaron spake against Moses because of the Ethiopian woman whom he had married: for he had married an Ethiopian woman. 
And they said, Hath the LORD indeed spoken only by Moses? hath he not spoken also by us? And the LORD heard it. 
(Now the man Moses was very meek, above all the men which were upon the face of the earth.) 
And the LORD spake suddenly unto Moses, and unto Aaron, and unto Miriam, Come out ye three unto the tabernacle of the congregation. And they three came out. 
And the LORD came down in the pillar of the cloud, and stood in the door of the tabernacle, and called Aaron and Miriam: and they both came forth. 
And he said, Hear now 
995,to the grave. 
I am counted with them that go down into the pit: I am as a man that hath no strength: 
Free among the dead, like the slain that lie in the grave, whom thou rememberest no more: and they are cut off from thy hand. 
Thou hast laid me in the lowest pit, in darkness, in the deeps. 
Thy wrath lieth hard upon me, and thou hast afflicted me with all thy waves. Selah. 
Thou hast put away mine acquaintance far from me; thou hast made me an abomination unto them: I am shut up, and I cannot come forth. 
Mine eye mourneth by reason of affliction: LORD, I have called daily upon thee, I have stretched out my hands unto thee. 
Wilt thou shew wonders to the dead? shall the dead arise and praise thee? Selah. 
Shall thy lovingkindness be declared in the grave? or thy faithfulness in destruction? 
Shall thy wonders be known in the dark? and thy righteousness in the land of forgetfulness? 
But unto thee have I cried, O LORD; and in the morning shall my prayer prevent thee. 
LORD, why 
1044,ch were left of the captivity, and concerning Jerusalem. 
And they said unto me, The remnant that are left of the captivity there in the province are in great affliction and reproach: the wall of Jerusalem also is broken down, and the gates thereof are burned with fire. 
And it came to pass, when I heard these words, that I sat down and wept, and mourned certain days, and fasted, and prayed before the God of heaven, 
And said, I beseech thee, O LORD God of heaven, the great and terrible God, that keepeth covenant and mercy for them that love him and observe his commandments: 
Let thine ear now be attentive, and thine eyes open, that thou mayest hear the prayer of thy servant, which I pray before thee now, day and night, for the children of Israel thy servants, and confess the sins of the children of Israel, which we have sinned against thee: both I and my father's house have sinned. 
We have dealt very corruptly against thee, and have not kept the commandments, nor the statutes, nor the judgments, which thou commandedst thy serv
901,ansgressions, thou shalt purge them away. 
Blessed is the man whom thou choosest, and causest to approach unto thee, that he may dwell in thy courts: we shall be satisfied with the goodness of thy house, even of thy holy temple. 
By terrible things in righteousness wilt thou answer us, O God of our salvation; who art the confidence of all the ends of the earth, and of them that are afar off upon the sea: 
Which by his strength setteth fast the mountains; being girded with power: 
Which stilleth the noise of the seas, the noise of their waves, and the tumult of the people. 
They also that dwell in the uttermost parts are afraid at thy tokens: thou makest the outgoings of the morning and evening to rejoice. 
Thou visitest the earth, and waterest it: thou greatly enrichest it with the river of God, which is full of water: thou preparest them corn, when thou hast so provided for it. 
Thou wat
885,from mount Sinai with the two tables of testimony in Moses' hand, when he came down from the mount, that Moses wist not that the skin of his face shone while he talked with him. 
And when Aaron and all the children of Israel saw Moses, behold, the skin of his face shone; and they were afraid to come nigh him. 
And Moses called unto them; and Aaron and all the rulers of the congregation returned unto him: and Moses talked with them. 
And afterward all the children of Israel came nigh: and he gave them in commandment all that the LORD had spoken with him in mount Sinai. 
And till Moses had done speaking with them, he put a vail on his face. 
But when Moses went in before the LORD to speak with him, he took the vail off, until he came out. And he came out, and spake unto the children of Israel that which he was commanded. 
And the children of Israel saw the face of Moses, tha
1052,all be with a flood, and unto the end of the war desolations are determined. 
And he shall confirm the covenant with many for one week: and in the midst of the week he shall cause the sacrifice and the oblation to cease, and for the overspreading of abominations he shall make it desolate, even until the consummation, and that determined shall be poured upon the desolate. 
In the third year of Cyrus king of Persia a thing was revealed unto Daniel, whose name was called Belteshazzar; and the thing was true, but the time appointed was long: and he understood the thing, and had understanding of the vision. 
In those days I Daniel was mourning three full weeks. 
I ate no pleasant bread, neither came flesh nor wine in my mouth, neither did I anoint myself at all, till three whole weeks were fulfilled. 
And in the four and twentieth day of the first month, as I was by the side of the great river, which is Hiddekel; 
Then I lifted up mine eyes, and looked, and behold a certain man clothed in linen, whose loins were girded with fine gold of Upha
835, coming of our Lord Jesus Christ with all his saints. 
Furthermore then we beseech you, brethren, and exhort you by the Lord Jesus, that as ye have received of us how ye ought to walk and to please God, so ye would abound more and more. 
For ye know what commandments we gave you by the Lord Jesus. 
For this is the will of God, even your sanctification, that ye should abstain from fornication: 
That every one of you should know how to possess his vessel in sanctification and honour; 
Not in the lust of concupiscence, even as the Gentiles which know not God: 
That no man go beyond and defraud his brother in any matter: because that the Lord is the avenger of all such, as we also have forewarned you and testified. 
For God hath not called us unto uncleanness, but unto holiness. 
He therefore that despiseth, despiseth not man, 
892,et, and said, Upon me, my lord, upon me let this iniquity be: and let thine handmaid, I pray thee, speak in thine audience, and hear the words of thine handmaid. 
Let not my lord, I pray thee, regard this man of Belial, even Nabal: for as his name is, so is he; Nabal is his name, and folly is with him: but I thine handmaid saw not the young men of my lord, whom thou didst send. 
Now therefore, my lord, as the LORD liveth, and as thy soul liveth, seeing the LORD hath withholden thee from coming to shed blood, and from avenging thyself with thine own hand, now let thine enemies, and they that seek evil to my lord, be as Nabal. 
And now this blessing which thine handmaid hath brought unto my lord, let it even be given unto the young men that follow my lord. 
I pray thee, forgive the trespass of thine handmaid: for the LORD will certainly make my lord a sure house; because my lord fi
998, firstripe fruit. 
The good man is perished out of the earth: and there is none upright among men: they all lie in wait for blood; they hunt every man his brother with a net. 
That they may do evil with both hands earnestly, the prince asketh, and the judge asketh for a reward; and the great man, he uttereth his mischievous desire: so they wrap it up. 
The best of them is as a brier: the most upright is sharper than a thorn hedge: the day of thy watchmen and thy visitation cometh; now shall be their perplexity. 
Trust ye not in a friend, put ye not confidence in a guide: keep the doors of thy mouth from her that lieth in thy bosom. 
For the son dishonoureth the father, the daughter riseth up against her mother, the daughter in law against her mother in law; a man's enemies are the men of his own house. 
Therefore I will look unto the LORD; I will wait for the God of my salvation: my God will hear me. 
Rejoice not against me, O mine enemy: when I fall, I shall arise; when I sit in dar
981,he offerings of the LORD made by fire, and his inheritance. 
Therefore shall they have no inheritance among their brethren: the LORD is their inheritance, as he hath said unto them. 
And this shall be the priest's due from the people, from them that offer a sacrifice, whether it be ox or sheep; and they shall give unto the priest the shoulder, and the two cheeks, and the maw. 
The firstfruit also of thy corn, of thy wine, and of thine oil, and the first of the fleece of thy sheep, shalt thou give him. 
For the LORD thy God hath chosen him out of all thy tribes, to stand to minister in the name of the LORD, him and his sons for ever. 
And if a Levite come from any of thy gates out of all Israel, where he sojourned, and come with all the desire of his mind unto the place which the LORD shall choose; 
Then he shall minister in the name of the LORD his God, as all his brethren the Levites do, which stand there before the LORD. 
They shall have like portions to eat, besid
837,eme that worthy name by the which ye are called? 
If ye fulfil the royal law according to the scripture, Thou shalt love thy neighbour as thyself, ye do well: 
But if ye have respect to persons, ye commit sin, and are convinced of the law as transgressors. 
For whosoever shall keep the whole law, and yet offend in one point, he is guilty of all. 
For he that said, Do not commit adultery, said also, Do not kill. Now if thou commit no adultery, yet if thou kill, thou art become a transgressor of the law. 
So speak ye, and so do, as they that shall be judged by the law of liberty. 
For he shall have judgment without mercy, that hath shewed no mercy; and mercy rejoiceth against judgment. 
What doth it profit, my brethren, though a man say he hath faith, and have not works? can faith save him? 
If a brother or sister be naked, and
935,st me: 
Come now therefore, I pray thee, curse me this people; for they are too mighty for me: peradventure I shall prevail, that we may smite them, and that I may drive them out of the land: for I wot that he whom thou blessest is blessed, and he whom thou cursest is cursed. 
And the elders of Moab and the elders of Midian departed with the rewards of divination in their hand; and they came unto Balaam, and spake unto him the words of Balak. 
And he said unto them, Lodge here this night, and I will bring you word again, as the LORD shall speak unto me: and the princes of Moab abode with Balaam. 
And God came unto Balaam, and said, What men are these with thee? 
And Balaam said unto God, Balak the son of Zippor, king of Moab, hath sent unto me, saying, 
Behold, there is a people come out of Egypt, which covereth the face of the earth: come now, curse me them; peradventure I shall be able to overcome them, and drive them o
954,n one side, and I and Jonathan my son will be on the other side. And the people said unto Saul, Do what seemeth good unto thee. 
Therefore Saul said unto the LORD God of Israel, Give a perfect lot. And Saul and Jonathan were taken: but the people escaped. 
And Saul said, Cast lots between me and Jonathan my son. And Jonathan was taken. 
Then Saul said to Jonathan, Tell me what thou hast done. And Jonathan told him, and said, I did but taste a little honey with the end of the rod that was in mine hand, and, lo, I must die. 
And Saul answered, God do so and more also: for thou shalt surely die, Jonathan. 
And the people said unto Saul, Shall Jonathan die, who hath wrought this great salvation in Israel? God forbid: as the LORD liveth, there shall not one hair of his head fall to the ground; for he hath wrought with God this day. So the people rescued Jonathan, that he died not. 
Then Saul went up from following the Philistines: and the Philis
921,itch, and the dust thereof into brimstone, and the land thereof shall become burning pitch. 
It shall not be quenched night nor day; the smoke thereof shall go up for ever: from generation to generation it shall lie waste; none shall pass through it for ever and ever. 
But the cormorant and the bittern shall possess it; the owl also and the raven shall dwell in it: and he shall stretch out upon it the line of confusion, and the stones of emptiness. 
They shall call the nobles thereof to the kingdom, but none shall be there, and all her princes shall be nothing. 
And thorns shall come up in her palaces, nettles and brambles in the fortresses thereof: and it shall be an habitation of dragons, and a court for owls. 
The wild beasts of the desert shall also meet with the wild beasts of the island, and the satyr shall cry to his fellow; the screech owl also shall rest there, and find for herself a place of rest. 
1018,o into the lower parts of the earth. 
They shall fall by the sword: they shall be a portion for foxes. 
But the king shall rejoice in God; every one that sweareth by him shall glory: but the mouth of them that speak lies shall be stopped. 
Hear my voice, O God, in my prayer: preserve my life from fear of the enemy. 
Hide me from the secret counsel of the wicked; from the insurrection of the workers of iniquity: 
Who whet their tongue like a sword, and bend their bows to shoot their arrows, even bitter words: 
That they may shoot in secret at the perfect: suddenly do they shoot at him, and fear not. 
They encourage themselves in an evil matter: they commune of laying snares privily; they say, Who shall see them? 
They search out iniquities; they accomplish a diligent search: both the inward thought of every one of them, and the heart, is deep. 
But God shall shoot at them with an arrow; suddenly shall they be wounded. 
So they shall make their own tongue to fall upon themselves: all that see them shall f
1074,they hear. 
For verily I say unto you, That many prophets and righteous men have desired to see those things which ye see, and have not seen them; and to hear those things which ye hear, and have not heard them. 
Hear ye therefore the parable of the sower. 
When any one heareth the word of the kingdom, and understandeth it not, then cometh the wicked one, and catcheth away that which was sown in his heart. This is he which received seed by the way side. 
But he that received the seed into stony places, the same is he that heareth the word, and anon with joy receiveth it; 
Yet hath he not root in himself, but dureth for a while: for when tribulation or persecution ariseth because of the word, by and by he is offended. 
He also that received seed among the thorns is he that heareth the word; and the care of this world, and the deceitfulness of riches, choke the word, and he becometh unfruitful. 
But he that received seed into the good ground is he that heareth the word, and understandeth it; which also beareth fruit, and bringeth forth, some an hundredfold, so
785,rverse and crooked generation. 
Do ye thus requite the LORD, O foolish people and unwise? is not he thy father that hath bought thee? hath he not made thee, and established thee? 
Remember the days of old, consider the years of many generations: ask thy father, and he will shew thee; thy elders, and they will tell thee. 
When the Most High divided to the nations their inheritance, when he separated the sons of Adam, he set the bounds of the people according to the number of the children of Israel. 
For the LORD's portion is his people; Jacob is the lot of his inheritance. 
He found him in a desert land, and in the waste howling wilderness; he led him about, he instructed him, he kept him as the apple of his eye. 
As an eagle stirreth up her nest, fluttereth over her young, s
979,er in her hand, and went softly unto him, and smote the nail into his temples, and fastened it into the ground: for he was fast asleep and weary. So he died. 
And, behold, as Barak pursued Sisera, Jael came out to meet him, and said unto him, Come, and I will shew thee the man whom thou seekest. And when he came into her tent, behold, Sisera lay dead, and the nail was in his temples. 
So God subdued on that day Jabin the king of Canaan before the children of Israel. 
And the hand of the children of Israel prospered, and prevailed against Jabin the king of Canaan, until they had destroyed Jabin king of Canaan. 
Then sang Deborah and Barak the son of Abinoam on that day, saying, 
Praise ye the LORD for the avenging of Israel, when the people willingly offered themselves. 
Hear, O ye kings; give ear, O ye princes; I, even I, will sing unto the LORD; I will sing praise to the LORD God of Israel. 
LORD, when thou wentest out of Seir, when thou marchedst out of the field
913,s Adam, by hiding mine iniquity in my bosom: 
Did I fear a great multitude, or did the contempt of families terrify me, that I kept silence, and went not out of the door? 
Oh that one would hear me! behold, my desire is, that the Almighty would answer me, and that mine adversary had written a book. 
Surely I would take it upon my shoulder, and bind it as a crown to me. 
I would declare unto him the number of my steps; as a prince would I go near unto him. 
If my land cry against me, or that the furrows likewise thereof complain; 
If I have eaten the fruits thereof without money, or have caused the owners thereof to lose their life: 
Let thistles grow instead of wheat, and cockle instead of barley. The words of Job are ended. 
So these three men ceased to answer Job, because he was righteous in his own eyes. 
Then was kindled the wrath of Elihu the son of Barachel the Buzite, of the kindred of Ram: ag
757, 
And a stone was brought, and laid upon the mouth of the den; and the king sealed it with his own signet, and with the signet of his lords; that the purpose might not be changed concerning Daniel. 
Then the king went to his palace, and passed the night fasting: neither were instruments of musick brought before him: and his sleep went from him. 
Then the king arose very early in the morning, and went in haste unto the den of lions. 
And when he came to the den, he cried with a lamentable voice unto Daniel: and the king spake and said to Daniel, O Daniel, servant of the living God, is thy God, whom thou servest continually, able to deliver thee from the lions? 
Then said Daniel unto the king, O king, live for ever. 
My God hath sent his angel, and 
1012,n. 
Shall we then hearken unto you to do all this great evil, to transgress against our God in marrying strange wives? 
And one of the sons of Joiada, the son of Eliashib the high priest, was son in law to Sanballat the Horonite: therefore I chased him from me. 
Remember them, O my God, because they have defiled the priesthood, and the covenant of the priesthood, and of the Levites. 
Thus cleansed I them from all strangers, and appointed the wards of the priests and the Levites, every one in his business; 
And for the wood offering, at times appointed, and for the firstfruits. Remember me, O my God, for good. 
Now it came to pass in the days of Ahasuerus, (this is Ahasuerus which reigned, from India even unto Ethiopia, over an hundred and seven and twenty provinces:) 
That in those days, when the king Ahasuerus sat on the throne of his kingdom, which was in Shushan the palace, 
In the third year of his reign, he made a feast unto all his princes and his servants; the power of Persia and Media, the
1051,w their shining. 
The LORD also shall roar out of Zion, and utter his voice from Jerusalem; and the heavens and the earth shall shake: but the LORD will be the hope of his people, and the strength of the children of Israel. 
So shall ye know that I am the LORD your God dwelling in Zion, my holy mountain: then shall Jerusalem be holy, and there shall no strangers pass through her any more. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that the mountains shall drop down new wine, and the hills shall flow with milk, and all the rivers of Judah shall flow with waters, and a fountain shall come forth out of the house of the LORD, and shall water the valley of Shittim. 
Egypt shall be a desolation, and Edom shall be a desolate wilderness, for the violence against the children of Judah, because they have shed innocent blood in their land. 
But Judah shall dwell for ever, and Jerusalem from generation to generation. 
For I will cleanse their blood that I have not cleansed: for the LORD dwelleth in Zion. 
The words of Amos, who was among the herdmen 
1059,u make in the edge of the curtain that is in the coupling of the second; that the loops may take hold one of another. 
And thou shalt make fifty taches of gold, and couple the curtains together with the taches: and it shall be one tabernacle. 
And thou shalt make curtains of goats' hair to be a covering upon the tabernacle: eleven curtains shalt thou make. 
The length of one curtain shall be thirty cubits, and the breadth of one curtain four cubits: and the eleven curtains shall be all of one measure. 
And thou shalt couple five curtains by themselves, and six curtains by themselves, and shalt double the sixth curtain in the forefront of the tabernacle. 
And thou shalt make fifty loops on the edge of the one curtain that is outmost in the coupling, and fifty loops in the edge of the curtain which coupleth the second. 
And thou shalt make fifty taches of brass, and put the taches into the loops, and couple the tent together, that it may be one. 
And the remnant that remaineth of the curtains of the tent, the half curtain that remaineth, shall h
861,her I will drive them. 
Then said I, Ah Lord GOD! behold, my soul hath not been polluted: for from my youth up even till now have I not eaten of that which dieth of itself, or is torn in pieces; neither came there abominable flesh into my mouth. 
Then he said unto me, Lo, I have given thee cow's dung for man's dung, and thou shalt prepare thy bread therewith. 
Moreover he said unto me, Son of man, behold, I will break the staff of bread in Jerusalem: and they shall eat bread by weight, and with care; and they shall drink water by measure, and with astonishment: 
That they may want bread and water, and be astonied one with another, and consume away for their iniquity. 
And thou, son of man, take thee a sharp knife, take thee a barber's razor, and cause it to pass upon thine head and upon thy beard: then take thee balances to weigh, and divide the hai
1037,taken spoil, every man for himself.) 
And Moses and Eleazar the priest took the gold of the captains of thousands and of hundreds, and brought it into the tabernacle of the congregation, for a memorial for the children of Israel before the LORD. 
Now the children of Reuben and the children of Gad had a very great multitude of cattle: and when they saw the land of Jazer, and the land of Gilead, that, behold, the place was a place for cattle; 
The children of Gad and the children of Reuben came and spake unto Moses, and to Eleazar the priest, and unto the princes of the congregation, saying, 
Ataroth, and Dibon, and Jazer, and Nimrah, and Heshbon, and Elealeh, and Shebam, and Nebo, and Beon, 
Even the country which the LORD smote before the congregation of Israel, is a land for cattle, and thy servants have cattle: 
Wherefore, said they, if we have found grace in thy sight, let this land be given unto thy servants for a possession, and bring us not over Jordan. 
And Moses said unto the children of Gad and to the children of
972,a very far country thy servants are come because of the name of the LORD thy God: for we have heard the fame of him, and all that he did in Egypt, 
And all that he did to the two kings of the Amorites, that were beyond Jordan, to Sihon king of Heshbon, and to Og king of Bashan, which was at Ashtaroth. 
Wherefore our elders and all the inhabitants of our country spake to us, saying, Take victuals with you for the journey, and go to meet them, and say unto them, We are your servants: therefore now make ye a league with us. 
This our bread we took hot for our provision out of our houses on the day we came forth to go unto you; but now, behold, it is dry, and it is mouldy: 
And these bottles of wine, which we filled, were new; and, behold, they be rent: and these our garments and our shoes are become old by reason of the very long journey. 
And the men took of their victuals, and asked not counsel at the mouth of the LORD. 
And Joshua made peace with them, and m
862,and before a beast to lie down thereto: it is confusion. 
Defile not ye yourselves in any of these things: for in all these the nations are defiled which I cast out before you: 
And the land is defiled: therefore I do visit the iniquity thereof upon it, and the land itself vomiteth out her inhabitants. 
Ye shall therefore keep my statutes and my judgments, and shall not commit any of these abominations; neither any of your own nation, nor any stranger that sojourneth among you: 
(For all these abominations have the men of the land done, which were before you, and the land is defiled;) 
That the land spue not you out also, when ye defile it, as it spued out the nations that were before you. 
For whosoever shall commit any of these abominations, even the souls that commit them shall be cut off from among their people. 
Therefore shall ye keep mine ordi
981, for the earth, out of it cometh bread: and under it is turned up as it were fire. 
The stones of it are the place of sapphires: and it hath dust of gold. 
There is a path which no fowl knoweth, and which the vulture's eye hath not seen: 
The lion's whelps have not trodden it, nor the fierce lion passed by it. 
He putteth forth his hand upon the rock; he overturneth the mountains by the roots. 
He cutteth out rivers among the rocks; and his eye seeth every precious thing. 
He bindeth the floods from overflowing; and the thing that is hid bringeth he forth to light. 
But where shall wisdom be found? and where is the place of understanding? 
Man knoweth not the price thereof; neither is it found in the land of the living. 
The depth saith, It is not in me: and the sea saith, It is not with me. 
It cannot be gotten for gold, neither shall silver be weighed for the price thereof. 
It cannot be valued with the gold of Ophir, with the precious onyx, or the sapphire. 
The g
829,m say the people that I am? 
They answering said, John the Baptist; but some say, Elias; and others say, that one of the old prophets is risen again. 
He said unto them, But whom say ye that I am? Peter answering said, The Christ of God. 
And he straitly charged them, and commanded them to tell no man that thing; 
Saying, The Son of man must suffer many things, and be rejected of the elders and chief priests and scribes, and be slain, and be raised the third day. 
And he said to them all, If any man will come after me, let him deny himself, and take up his cross daily, and follow me. 
For whosoever will save his life shall lose it: but whosoever will lose his life for my sake, the same shall save it. 
For what is a man advantaged, if he gain the whole world, and lose himself, or be cast away? 
For whosoever shall be a
838,ect of God, holy and beloved, bowels of mercies, kindness, humbleness of mind, meekness, longsuffering; 
Forbearing one another, and forgiving one another, if any man have a quarrel against any: even as Christ forgave you, so also do ye. 
And above all these things put on charity, which is the bond of perfectness. 
And let the peace of God rule in your hearts, to the which also ye are called in one body; and be ye thankful. 
Let the word of Christ dwell in you richly in all wisdom; teaching and admonishing one another in psalms and hymns and spiritual songs, singing with grace in your hearts to the Lord. 
And whatsoever ye do in word or deed, do all in the name of the Lord Jesus, giving thanks to God and the Father by him. 
Wives, submit yourselves unto your own husbands, as it is fit in the Lord. 
Husbands, love your wives, a
966,be safe in their land, and shall know that I am the LORD, when I have broken the bands of their yoke, and delivered them out of the hand of those that served themselves of them. 
And they shall no more be a prey to the heathen, neither shall the beast of the land devour them; but they shall dwell safely, and none shall make them afraid. 
And I will raise up for them a plant of renown, and they shall be no more consumed with hunger in the land, neither bear the shame of the heathen any more. 
Thus shall they know that I the LORD their God am with them, and that they, even the house of Israel, are my people, saith the Lord GOD. 
And ye my flock, the flock of my pasture, are men, and I am your God, saith the Lord GOD. 
Moreover the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, set thy face against mount Seir, and prophesy against it, 
And say unto it, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, O mount Seir, I am against thee, and I will stretch out mine hand 
926,is wife with a kid; and he said, I will go in to my wife into the chamber. But her father would not suffer him to go in. 
And her father said, I verily thought that thou hadst utterly hated her; therefore I gave her to thy companion: is not her younger sister fairer than she? take her, I pray thee, instead of her. 
And Samson said concerning them, Now shall I be more blameless than the Philistines, though I do them a displeasure. 
And Samson went and caught three hundred foxes, and took firebrands, and turned tail to tail, and put a firebrand in the midst between two tails. 
And when he had set the brands on fire, he let them go into the standing corn of the Philistines, and burnt up both the shocks, and also the standing corn, with the vineyards and olives. 
Then the Philistines said, Who hath done this? And they answered, Samson, the son in law of the Timnite, because he had taken his wife, and given her to his
1040,d saith unto him, We have found him, of whom Moses in the law, and the prophets, did write, Jesus of Nazareth, the son of Joseph. 
And Nathanael said unto him, Can there any good thing come out of Nazareth? Philip saith unto him, Come and see. 
Jesus saw Nathanael coming to him, and saith of him, Behold an Israelite indeed, in whom is no guile! 
Nathanael saith unto him, Whence knowest thou me? Jesus answered and said unto him, Before that Philip called thee, when thou wast under the fig tree, I saw thee. 
Nathanael answered and saith unto him, Rabbi, thou art the Son of God; thou art the King of Israel. 
Jesus answered and said unto him, Because I said unto thee, I saw thee under the fig tree, believest thou? thou shalt see greater things than these. 
And he saith unto him, Verily, verily, I say unto you, Hereafter ye shall see heaven open, and the angels of God ascending and descending upon the Son of man. 
And the third day there was a marriage in Cana of Galilee; and the mother of Jesus was there: 
And both Jesus was cal
879, but go ye rather to them that sell, and buy for yourselves. 
And while they went to buy, the bridegroom came; and they that were ready went in with him to the marriage: and the door was shut. 
Afterward came also the other virgins, saying, Lord, Lord, open to us. 
But he answered and said, Verily I say unto you, I know you not. 
Watch therefore, for ye know neither the day nor the hour wherein the Son of man cometh. 
For the kingdom of heaven is as a man travelling into a far country, who called his own servants, and delivered unto them his goods. 
And unto one he gave five talents, to another two, and to another one; to every man according to his several ability; and straightway took his journey. 
Then he that had received the five talents went and traded with the same, and made them other five talents. 
And likewise he that had received two, he also gained other t
784,Baptist, preaching in the wilderness of Judaea, 
And saying, Repent ye: for the kingdom of heaven is at hand. 
For this is he that was spoken of by the prophet Esaias, saying, The voice of one crying in the wilderness, Prepare ye the way of the Lord, make his paths straight. 
And the same John had his raiment of camel's hair, and a leathern girdle about his loins; and his meat was locusts and wild honey. 
Then went out to him Jerusalem, and all Judaea, and all the region round about Jordan, 
And were baptized of him in Jordan, confessing their sins. 
But when he saw many of the Pharisees and Sadducees come to his baptism, he said unto them, O generation of vipers, who hath warned you to flee from the wrath to come? 
Bring forth therefore fruits meet for repentance: 
And thi
750, of the children of Judah, and of the children of Benjamin. Of the children of Judah; Athaiah the son of Uzziah, the son of Zechariah, the son of Amariah, the son of Shephatiah, the son of Mahalaleel, of the children of Perez; 
And Maaseiah the son of Baruch, the son of Colhozeh, the son of Hazaiah, the son of Adaiah, the son of Joiarib, the son of Zechariah, the son of Shiloni. 
All the sons of Perez that dwelt at Jerusalem were four hundred threescore and eight valiant men. 
And these are the sons of Benjamin; Sallu the son of Meshullam, the son of Joed, the son of Pedaiah, the son of Kolaiah, the son of Maaseiah, the son of Ithiel, the son of Jesaiah. 
And after him Gabbai, Sallai, nine hundred twenty and eight. 
And Joel the son of Zich
865, cities of Gilead. 
And after him Ibzan of Bethlehem judged Israel. 
And he had thirty sons, and thirty daughters, whom he sent abroad, and took in thirty daughters from abroad for his sons. And he judged Israel seven years. 
Then died Ibzan, and was buried at Bethlehem. 
And after him Elon, a Zebulonite, judged Israel; and he judged Israel ten years. 
And Elon the Zebulonite died, and was buried in Aijalon in the country of Zebulun. 
And after him Abdon the son of Hillel, a Pirathonite, judged Israel. 
And he had forty sons and thirty nephews, that rode on threescore and ten ass colts: and he judged Israel eight years. 
And Abdon the son of Hillel the Pirathonite died, and was buried in Pirathon in the land of Ephraim, in the mount of the Amalekites. 
And the children of Israel did evil again in the sight of the LORD; and the LORD delivered them into t
1062,ke up their names into my lips. 
The LORD is the portion of mine inheritance and of my cup: thou maintainest my lot. 
The lines are fallen unto me in pleasant places; yea, I have a goodly heritage. 
I will bless the LORD, who hath given me counsel: my reins also instruct me in the night seasons. 
I have set the LORD always before me: because he is at my right hand, I shall not be moved. 
Therefore my heart is glad, and my glory rejoiceth: my flesh also shall rest in hope. 
For thou wilt not leave my soul in hell; neither wilt thou suffer thine Holy One to see corruption. 
Thou wilt shew me the path of life: in thy presence is fulness of joy; at thy right hand there are pleasures for evermore. 
Hear the right, O LORD, attend unto my cry, give ear unto my prayer, that goeth not out of feigned lips. 
Let my sentence come forth from thy presence; let thine eyes behold the things that are equal. 
Thou hast proved mine heart; thou hast visited me in the night; thou hast tried me, and shalt find nothing; I am purposed that my mouth shall not transgress.
742,od of hosts; and they shall afflict you from the entering in of Hemath unto the river of the wilderness. 
Thus hath the Lord GOD shewed unto me; and, behold, he formed grasshoppers in the beginning of the shooting up of the latter growth; and, lo, it was the latter growth after the king's mowings. 
And it came to pass, that when they had made an end of eating the grass of the land, then I said, O Lord GOD, forgive, I beseech thee: by whom shall Jacob arise? for he is small. 
The LORD repented for this: It shall not be, saith the LORD. 
Thus hath the Lord GOD shewed unto me: and, behold, the Lord GOD called to contend by fire, and it devoured the great deep, and did eat up a part. 
Then said I, O Lord GOD, cease, I beseech thee: by w
980, of the hand of those that served themselves of them. 
And they shall no more be a prey to the heathen, neither shall the beast of the land devour them; but they shall dwell safely, and none shall make them afraid. 
And I will raise up for them a plant of renown, and they shall be no more consumed with hunger in the land, neither bear the shame of the heathen any more. 
Thus shall they know that I the LORD their God am with them, and that they, even the house of Israel, are my people, saith the Lord GOD. 
And ye my flock, the flock of my pasture, are men, and I am your God, saith the Lord GOD. 
Moreover the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, set thy face against mount Seir, and prophesy against it, 
And say unto it, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, O mount Seir, I am against thee, and I will stretch out mine hand against thee, and I will make thee most desolate. 
I will lay thy cities waste, and thou shalt be desolate, and thou shalt know that I am 
884,alley. 
And Saul said unto the Kenites, Go, depart, get you down from among the Amalekites, lest I destroy you with them: for ye shewed kindness to all the children of Israel, when they came up out of Egypt. So the Kenites departed from among the Amalekites. 
And Saul smote the Amalekites from Havilah until thou comest to Shur, that is over against Egypt. 
And he took Agag the king of the Amalekites alive, and utterly destroyed all the people with the edge of the sword. 
But Saul and the people spared Agag, and the best of the sheep, and of the oxen, and of the fatlings, and the lambs, and all that was good, and would not utterly destroy them: but every thing that was vile and refuse, that they destroyed utterly. 
Then came the word of the LORD unto Samuel, saying, 
It repenteth me that I have set up Saul to be king: for he is turned back from following me, and hath not p
1072,alt bring a troop suddenly upon them: for they have digged a pit to take me, and hid snares for my feet. 
Yet, LORD, thou knowest all their counsel against me to slay me: forgive not their iniquity, neither blot out their sin from thy sight, but let them be overthrown before thee; deal thus with them in the time of thine anger. 
Thus saith the LORD, Go and get a potter's earthen bottle, and take of the ancients of the people, and of the ancients of the priests; 
And go forth unto the valley of the son of Hinnom, which is by the entry of the east gate, and proclaim there the words that I shall tell thee, 
And say, Hear ye the word of the LORD, O kings of Judah, and inhabitants of Jerusalem; Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Behold, I will bring evil upon this place, the which whosoever heareth, his ears shall tingle. 
Because they have forsaken me, and have estranged this place, and have burned incense in it unto other gods, whom neither they nor their fathers have known, nor the kings of Judah, and have filled this place with the blood of in
857,other against the daughter, and the daughter against the mother; the mother in law against her daughter in law, and the daughter in law against her mother in law. 
And he said also to the people, When ye see a cloud rise out of the west, straightway ye say, There cometh a shower; and so it is. 
And when ye see the south wind blow, ye say, There will be heat; and it cometh to pass. 
Ye hypocrites, ye can discern the face of the sky and of the earth; but how is it that ye do not discern this time? 
Yea, and why even of yourselves judge ye not what is right? 
When thou goest with thine adversary to the magistrate, as thou art in the way, give diligence that thou mayest be delivered from him; lest he hale thee to the judge, and the judge deliver thee to the officer, and the officer cast thee into prison. 
I tell thee, thou shalt not depart thence, t
921,h them Heman and Jeduthun with trumpets and cymbals for those that should make a sound, and with musical instruments of God. And the sons of Jeduthun were porters. 
And all the people departed every man to his house: and David returned to bless his house. 
Now it came to pass, as David sat in his house, that David said to Nathan the prophet, Lo, I dwell in an house of cedars, but the ark of the covenant of the LORD remaineth under curtains. 
Then Nathan said unto David, Do all that is in thine heart; for God is with thee. 
And it came to pass the same night, that the word of God came to Nathan, saying, 
Go and tell David my servant, Thus saith the LORD, Thou shalt not build me an house to dwell in: 
For I have not dwelt in an house since the day that I brought up Israel unto this day; but have gone from tent to tent, and from one tabernacle to another. 
Wheresoever I have walked with all Israel, spake I a wo
1014, Zechariah, the son of Benaiah, the son of Jeiel, the son of Mattaniah, a Levite of the sons of Asaph, came the Spirit of the LORD in the midst of the congregation; 
And he said, Hearken ye, all Judah, and ye inhabitants of Jerusalem, and thou king Jehoshaphat, Thus saith the LORD unto you, Be not afraid nor dismayed by reason of this great multitude; for the battle is not yours, but God's. 
To morrow go ye down against them: behold, they come up by the cliff of Ziz; and ye shall find them at the end of the brook, before the wilderness of Jeruel. 
Ye shall not need to fight in this battle: set yourselves, stand ye still, and see the salvation of the LORD with you, O Judah and Jerusalem: fear not, nor be dismayed; to morrow go out against them: for the LORD will be with you. 
And Jehoshaphat bowed his head with his face to the ground: and all Judah and the inhabitants of Jerusalem fell before the LORD, worshipping the LORD. 
And the Levites, of the children of the Kohathites, and of the children of t
894,ite. 
And it came to pass, when he had made an end of speaking unto Saul, that the soul of Jonathan was knit with the soul of David, and Jonathan loved him as his own soul. 
And Saul took him that day, and would let him go no more home to his father's house. 
Then Jonathan and David made a covenant, because he loved him as his own soul. 
And Jonathan stripped himself of the robe that was upon him, and gave it to David, and his garments, even to his sword, and to his bow, and to his girdle. 
And David went out whithersoever Saul sent him, and behaved himself wisely: and Saul set him over the men of war, and he was accepted in the sight of all the people, and also in the sight of Saul's servants. 
And it came to pass as they came, when David was returned from the slaughter of the Philistine, that the women came out of all cities of Israel, singing and dancing, to meet king Saul, with
730, shall live by them. 
But the righteousness which is of faith speaketh on this wise, Say not in thine heart, Who shall ascend into heaven? (that is, to bring Christ down from above:) 
Or, Who shall descend into the deep? (that is, to bring up Christ again from the dead.) 
But what saith it? The word is nigh thee, even in thy mouth, and in thy heart: that is, the word of faith, which we preach; 
That if thou shalt confess with thy mouth the Lord Jesus, and shalt believe in thine heart that God hath raised him from the dead, thou shalt be saved. 
For with the heart man believeth unto righteousness; and with the mouth confession is made unto salvation. 
For the scripture saith, Whosoever believeth on him shall not be ashame
729,written was upright, even words of truth. 
The words of the wise are as goads, and as nails fastened by the masters of assemblies, which are given from one shepherd. 
And further, by these, my son, be admonished: of making many books there is no end; and much study is a weariness of the flesh. 
Let us hear the conclusion of the whole matter: Fear God, and keep his commandments: for this is the whole duty of man. 
For God shall bring every work into judgment, with every secret thing, whether it be good, or whether it be evil. 
The song of songs, which is Solomon's. 
Let him kiss me with the kisses of his mouth: for thy love is better than wine. 
Because of the savour of thy good ointments thy name is as ointment poured f
724,. And Saul numbered the people that were present with him, about six hundred men. 
And Saul, and Jonathan his son, and the people that were present with them, abode in Gibeah of Benjamin: but the Philistines encamped in Michmash. 
And the spoilers came out of the camp of the Philistines in three companies: one company turned unto the way that leadeth to Ophrah, unto the land of Shual: 
And another company turned the way to Bethhoron: and another company turned to the way of the border that looketh to the valley of Zeboim toward the wilderness. 
Now there was no smith found throughout all the land of Israel: for the Philistines said, Lest the Hebrews make them swords or spears: 
But all the Israelites went down to t
722,e. 
The sons of Shem; Elam, and Asshur, and Arphaxad, and Lud, and Aram, and Uz, and Hul, and Gether, and Meshech. 
And Arphaxad begat Shelah, and Shelah begat Eber. 
And unto Eber were born two sons: the name of the one was Peleg; because in his days the earth was divided: and his brother's name was Joktan. 
And Joktan begat Almodad, and Sheleph, and Hazarmaveth, and Jerah, 
Hadoram also, and Uzal, and Diklah, 
And Ebal, and Abimael, and Sheba, 
And Ophir, and Havilah, and Jobab. All these were the sons of Joktan. 
Shem, Arphaxad, Shelah, 
Eber, Peleg, Reu, 
Serug, Nahor, Terah, 
Abram; the same is Abraham. 
The sons of Abraham; Isaac, and Ishmael. 
These are their generations: The firstborn of Ishmael, Nebaioth
1025,of Moab, hath sent unto me, saying, 
Behold, there is a people come out of Egypt, which covereth the face of the earth: come now, curse me them; peradventure I shall be able to overcome them, and drive them out. 
And God said unto Balaam, Thou shalt not go with them; thou shalt not curse the people: for they are blessed. 
And Balaam rose up in the morning, and said unto the princes of Balak, Get you into your land: for the LORD refuseth to give me leave to go with you. 
And the princes of Moab rose up, and they went unto Balak, and said, Balaam refuseth to come with us. 
And Balak sent yet again princes, more, and more honourable than they. 
And they came to Balaam, and said to him, Thus saith Balak the son of Zippor, Let nothing, I pray thee, hinder thee from coming unto me: 
For I will promote thee unto very great honour, and I will do whatsoever thou sayest unto me: come therefore, I pray thee, curse me this people. 
And Balaam answered and said unto the servants of Balak, If Balak would give me his house f
783,rt is full of ravening and wickedness. 
Ye fools, did not he that made that which is without make that which is within also? 
But rather give alms of such things as ye have; and, behold, all things are clean unto you. 
But woe unto you, Pharisees! for ye tithe mint and rue and all manner of herbs, and pass over judgment and the love of God: these ought ye to have done, and not to leave the other undone. 
Woe unto you, Pharisees! for ye love the uppermost seats in the synagogues, and greetings in the markets. 
Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye are as graves which appear not, and the men that walk over them are not aware of them. 
Then answered one of the lawyers, and said unto him, Master, thus saying thou reproachest us also. 
And he said, Woe unto yo
993,h covetousness shall prolong his days. 
A man that doeth violence to the blood of any person shall flee to the pit; let no man stay him. 
Whoso walketh uprightly shall be saved: but he that is perverse in his ways shall fall at once. 
He that tilleth his land shall have plenty of bread: but he that followeth after vain persons shall have poverty enough. 
A faithful man shall abound with blessings: but he that maketh haste to be rich shall not be innocent. 
To have respect of persons is not good: for for a piece of bread that man will transgress. 
He that hasteth to be rich hath an evil eye, and considereth not that poverty shall come upon him. 
He that rebuketh a man afterwards shall find more favour than he that flattereth with the tongue. 
Whoso robbeth his father or his mother, and saith, It is no transgression; the same is the companion of a destroyer. 
He that is of a proud heart stirreth up strife: but he that putteth his trust in the LORD shall be made fat. 
He that trust
872,not unto death. 
We know that whosoever is born of God sinneth not; but he that is begotten of God keepeth himself, and that wicked one toucheth him not. 
And we know that we are of God, and the whole world lieth in wickedness. 
And we know that the Son of God is come, and hath given us an understanding, that we may know him that is true, and we are in him that is true, even in his Son Jesus Christ. This is the true God, and eternal life. 
Little children, keep yourselves from idols. Amen. 
The elder unto the elect lady and her children, whom I love in the truth; and not I only, but also all they that have known the truth; 
For the truth's sake, which dwelleth in us, and shall be with us for ever. 
Grace be with you, mercy, and peace, from God the Father, and from the Lord Jesus Christ, the Son of the Father, in truth and love. 
I rejoiced greatly that I found
826,roclamation concerning him, that he should be the third ruler in the kingdom. 
In that night was Belshazzar the king of the Chaldeans slain. 
And Darius the Median took the kingdom, being about threescore and two years old. 
It pleased Darius to set over the kingdom an hundred and twenty princes, which should be over the whole kingdom; 
And over these three presidents; of whom Daniel was first: that the princes might give accounts unto them, and the king should have no damage. 
Then this Daniel was preferred above the presidents and princes, because an excellent spirit was in him; and the king thought to set him over the whole realm. 
Then the presidents and princes sought to find occasion against Daniel concerning the kingdom; but they could find none occasion nor fault; forasmuch as he was faithful, neither was t
993,reth. 
The wicked, through the pride of his countenance, will not seek after God: God is not in all his thoughts. 
His ways are always grievous; thy judgments are far above out of his sight: as for all his enemies, he puffeth at them. 
He hath said in his heart, I shall not be moved: for I shall never be in adversity. 
His mouth is full of cursing and deceit and fraud: under his tongue is mischief and vanity. 
He sitteth in the lurking places of the villages: in the secret places doth he murder the innocent: his eyes are privily set against the poor. 
He lieth in wait secretly as a lion in his den: he lieth in wait to catch the poor: he doth catch the poor, when he draweth him into his net. 
He croucheth, and humbleth himself, that the poor may fall by his strong ones. 
He hath said in his heart, God hath forgotten: he hideth his face; he will never see it. 
Arise, O LORD; O God, lift up thine hand: forget not the humble. 
Wherefore doth the wicked contemn God? he hath said in h
803, come, his disciples went down unto the sea, 
And entered into a ship, and went over the sea toward Capernaum. And it was now dark, and Jesus was not come to them. 
And the sea arose by reason of a great wind that blew. 
So when they had rowed about five and twenty or thirty furlongs, they see Jesus walking on the sea, and drawing nigh unto the ship: and they were afraid. 
But he saith unto them, It is I; be not afraid. 
Then they willingly received him into the ship: and immediately the ship was at the land whither they went. 
The day following, when the people which stood on the other side of the sea saw that there was none other boat there, save that one whereinto his disciples were entered, and that Jesus went not with his disciples into the boat, but that his disciples were gone away alo
816,nd submit yourselves: for they watch for your souls, as they that must give account, that they may do it with joy, and not with grief: for that is unprofitable for you. 
Pray for us: for we trust we have a good conscience, in all things willing to live honestly. 
But I beseech you the rather to do this, that I may be restored to you the sooner. 
Now the God of peace, that brought again from the dead our Lord Jesus, that great shepherd of the sheep, through the blood of the everlasting covenant, 
Make you perfect in every good work to do his will, working in you that which is wellpleasing in his sight, through Jesus Christ; to whom be glory for ever and ever. Amen. 
And I beseech you, brethren, suffer the word of exhortation: for I have written a letter unto you in few words. 
Know ye that our brother Timo
815,nt through the midst of the sea on the dry land; and their persecutors thou threwest into the deeps, as a stone into the mighty waters. 
Moreover thou leddest them in the day by a cloudy pillar; and in the night by a pillar of fire, to give them light in the way wherein they should go. 
Thou camest down also upon mount Sinai, and spakest with them from heaven, and gavest them right judgments, and true laws, good statutes and commandments: 
And madest known unto them thy holy sabbath, and commandedst them precepts, statutes, and laws, by the hand of Moses thy servant: 
And gavest them bread from heaven for their hunger, and broughtest forth water for them out of the rock for their thirst, and promisedst them that they should go in to possess the land which thou hadst sworn to give them. 
But they and our 
1068,ncere milk of the word, that ye may grow thereby: 
If so be ye have tasted that the Lord is gracious. 
To whom coming, as unto a living stone, disallowed indeed of men, but chosen of God, and precious, 
Ye also, as lively stones, are built up a spiritual house, an holy priesthood, to offer up spiritual sacrifices, acceptable to God by Jesus Christ. 
Wherefore also it is contained in the scripture, Behold, I lay in Sion a chief corner stone, elect, precious: and he that believeth on him shall not be confounded. 
Unto you therefore which believe he is precious: but unto them which be disobedient, the stone which the builders disallowed, the same is made the head of the corner, 
And a stone of stumbling, and a rock of offence, even to them which stumble at the word, being disobedient: whereunto also they were appointed. 
But ye are a chosen generation, a royal priesthood, an holy nation, a peculiar people; that ye should shew forth the praises of him who hath called you out of darkness into his marvellous light; 
Which in time past were not a people, but 
917,one. 
And he went down, and talked with the woman; and she pleased Samson well. 
And after a time he returned to take her, and he turned aside to see the carcase of the lion: and, behold, there was a swarm of bees and honey in the carcase of the lion. 
And he took thereof in his hands, and went on eating, and came to his father and mother, and he gave them, and they did eat: but he told not them that he had taken the honey out of the carcase of the lion. 
So his father went down unto the woman: and Samson made there a feast; for so used the young men to do. 
And it came to pass, when they saw him, that they brought thirty companions to be with him. 
And Samson said unto them, I will now put forth a riddle unto you: if ye can certainly declare it me within the seven days of the feast, and find it out, then I will give you thirty sheets and thirty change of garments: 
But if ye cannot declare it me, then s
807,n they couch in their dens, and abide in the covert to lie in wait? 
Who provideth for the raven his food? when his young ones cry unto God, they wander for lack of meat. 
Knowest thou the time when the wild goats of the rock bring forth? or canst thou mark when the hinds do calve? 
Canst thou number the months that they fulfil? or knowest thou the time when they bring forth? 
They bow themselves, they bring forth their young ones, they cast out their sorrows. 
Their young ones are in good liking, they grow up with corn; they go forth, and return not unto them. 
Who hath sent out the wild ass free? or who hath loosed the bands of the wild ass? 
Whose house I have made the wilderness, and the barren land his dwellings. 
He scorneth the multitude of the city, neither regardeth he the crying of the 
780,vants' trade hath been about cattle from our youth even until now, both we, and also our fathers: that ye may dwell in the land of Goshen; for every shepherd is an abomination unto the Egyptians. 
Then Joseph came and told Pharaoh, and said, My father and my brethren, and their flocks, and their herds, and all that they have, are come out of the land of Canaan; and, behold, they are in the land of Goshen. 
And he took some of his brethren, even five men, and presented them unto Pharaoh. 
And Pharaoh said unto his brethren, What is your occupation? And they said unto Pharaoh, Thy servants are shepherds, both we, and also our fathers. 
They said morever unto Pharaoh, For to sojourn in the land are we come; for thy servants have no pasture for their flocks; for the famine 
777,the city, even behind the city: go not very far from the city, but be ye all ready: 
And I, and all the people that are with me, will approach unto the city: and it shall come to pass, when they come out against us, as at the first, that we will flee before them, 
(For they will come out after us) till we have drawn them from the city; for they will say, They flee before us, as at the first: therefore we will flee before them. 
Then ye shall rise up from the ambush, and seize upon the city: for the LORD your God will deliver it into your hand. 
And it shall be, when ye have taken the city, that ye shall set the city on fire: according to the commandment of the LORD shall ye do. See, I have commanded you. 
Joshua therefore sent them forth: and they went to lie in ambu
865,in the land of Edom before any king reigned over the children of Israel; Bela the son of Beor: and the name of his city was Dinhabah. 
And when Bela was dead, Jobab the son of Zerah of Bozrah reigned in his stead. 
And when Jobab was dead, Husham of the land of the Temanites reigned in his stead. 
And when Husham was dead, Hadad the son of Bedad, which smote Midian in the field of Moab, reigned in his stead: and the name of his city was Avith. 
And when Hadad was dead, Samlah of Masrekah reigned in his stead. 
And when Samlah was dead, Shaul of Rehoboth by the river reigned in his stead. 
And when Shaul was dead, Baalhanan the son of Achbor reigned in his stead. 
And when Baalhanan was dead, Hadad reigned in his stead: and the name of his city was Pai; and his wife's name was Mehetabel, the daughter of Matred, the daughter of Mezahab. 
Hadad died also. 
792,in all holy conversation and godliness, 
Looking for and hasting unto the coming of the day of God, wherein the heavens being on fire shall be dissolved, and the elements shall melt with fervent heat? 
Nevertheless we, according to his promise, look for new heavens and a new earth, wherein dwelleth righteousness. 
Wherefore, beloved, seeing that ye look for such things, be diligent that ye may be found of him in peace, without spot, and blameless. 
And account that the longsuffering of our Lord is salvation; even as our beloved brother Paul also according to the wisdom given unto him hath written unto you; 
As also in all his epistles, speaking in them of these things; in which are some things hard to be understood, which they that are unlearned and unstable wrest, as they do also 
1052,nst it, 
And say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I am against thee, O Zidon; and I will be glorified in the midst of thee: and they shall know that I am the LORD, when I shall have executed judgments in her, and shall be sanctified in her. 
For I will send into her pestilence, and blood into her streets; and the wounded shall be judged in the midst of her by the sword upon her on every side; and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
And there shall be no more a pricking brier unto the house of Israel, nor any grieving thorn of all that are round about them, that despised them; and they shall know that I am the Lord GOD. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; When I shall have gathered the house of Israel from the people among whom they are scattered, and shall be sanctified in them in the sight of the heathen, then shall they dwell in their land that I have given to my servant Jacob. 
And they shall dwell safely therein, and shall build houses, and plant vineyards; yea, they shall dwell with confidence, when I have executed judgments upon all those
898,ORD thy God hath blessed thee: 
And thou shalt rejoice before the LORD thy God, thou, and thy son, and thy daughter, and thy manservant, and thy maidservant, and the Levite that is within thy gates, and the stranger, and the fatherless, and the widow, that are among you, in the place which the LORD thy God hath chosen to place his name there. 
And thou shalt remember that thou wast a bondman in Egypt: and thou shalt observe and do these statutes. 
Thou shalt observe the feast of tabernacles seven days, after that thou hast gathered in thy corn and thy wine: 
And thou shalt rejoice in thy feast, thou, and thy son, and thy daughter, and thy manservant, and thy maidservant, and the Levite, the stranger, and the fatherless, and the widow, that are within thy gates. 
Seven days shalt thou keep a solemn feast unto the LORD thy God in the place which the LORD shall choose: because the LORD th
839,hava; and there abode we in tents three days: and I viewed the people, and the priests, and found there none of the sons of Levi. 
Then sent I for Eliezer, for Ariel, for Shemaiah, and for Elnathan, and for Jarib, and for Elnathan, and for Nathan, and for Zechariah, and for Meshullam, chief men; also for Joiarib, and for Elnathan, men of understanding. 
And I sent them with commandment unto Iddo the chief at the place Casiphia, and I told them what they should say unto Iddo, and to his brethren the Nethinims, at the place Casiphia, that they should bring unto us ministers for the house of our God. 
And by the good hand of our God upon us they brought us a man of understanding, of the sons of Mahli, the son of Levi, the son of Israel; and Sherebiah, with his sons and his brethren, eighteen; 
And Hashabiah, and with him Jeshaiah 
838,Jesus went thence, and departed into the coasts of Tyre and Sidon. 
And, behold, a woman of Canaan came out of the same coasts, and cried unto him, saying, Have mercy on me, O Lord, thou son of David; my daughter is grievously vexed with a devil. 
But he answered her not a word. And his disciples came and besought him, saying, Send her away; for she crieth after us. 
But he answered and said, I am not sent but unto the lost sheep of the house of Israel. 
Then came she and worshipped him, saying, Lord, help me. 
But he answered and said, It is not meet to take the children's bread, and to cast it to dogs. 
And she said, Truth, Lord: yet the dogs eat of the crumbs which fall from their masters' table. 
Then Jesus answered and said unto her, O woman, great is thy faith: be it unto thee even as thou wilt. And her daughter was made
922,t ye be consumed in all their sins. 
So they gat up from the tabernacle of Korah, Dathan, and Abiram, on every side: and Dathan and Abiram came out, and stood in the door of their tents, and their wives, and their sons, and their little children. 
And Moses said, Hereby ye shall know that the LORD hath sent me to do all these works; for I have not done them of mine own mind. 
If these men die the common death of all men, or if they be visited after the visitation of all men; then the LORD hath not sent me. 
But if the LORD make a new thing, and the earth open her mouth, and swallow them up, with all that appertain unto them, and they go down quick into the pit; then ye shall understand that these men have provoked the LORD. 
And it came to pass, as he had made an end of speaking all these words, that the ground clave asunder that was under them: 
And the earth opened her mouth, and swallowed them up, and thei
736,d with your mother, plead: for she is not my wife, neither am I her husband: let her therefore put away her whoredoms out of her sight, and her adulteries from between her breasts; 
Lest I strip her naked, and set her as in the day that she was born, and make her as a wilderness, and set her like a dry land, and slay her with thirst. 
And I will not have mercy upon her children; for they be the children of whoredoms. 
For their mother hath played the harlot: she that conceived them hath done shamefully: for she said, I will go after my lovers, that give me my bread and my water, my wool and my flax, mine oil and my drink. 
Therefore, behold, I will hedge up thy way with thorns, and make a wall, that she shall not find her path
954,all of the house he built chambers round about, against the walls of the house round about, both of the temple and of the oracle: and he made chambers round about: 
The nethermost chamber was five cubits broad, and the middle was six cubits broad, and the third was seven cubits broad: for without in the wall of the house he made narrowed rests round about, that the beams should not be fastened in the walls of the house. 
And the house, when it was in building, was built of stone made ready before it was brought thither: so that there was neither hammer nor axe nor any tool of iron heard in the house, while it was in building. 
The door for the middle chamber was in the right side of the house: and they went up with winding stairs into the middle chamber, and out of the middle into the third. 
So he built the house, and finished it; and covered the house with beams and boards of cedar. 
And then he built chambers against all the house, five 
746, every one that keepeth the sabbath from polluting it, and taketh hold of my covenant; 
Even them will I bring to my holy mountain, and make them joyful in my house of prayer: their burnt offerings and their sacrifices shall be accepted upon mine altar; for mine house shall be called an house of prayer for all people. 
The Lord GOD, which gathereth the outcasts of Israel saith, Yet will I gather others to him, beside those that are gathered unto him. 
All ye beasts of the field, come to devour, yea, all ye beasts in the forest. 
His watchmen are blind: they are all ignorant, they are all dumb dogs, they cannot bark; sleeping, lying down, loving to slumber. 
Yea, they are greedy dogs which can never have enough, and they are shepherds th
1070, Abimael, and Sheba, 
And Ophir, and Havilah, and Jobab. All these were the sons of Joktan. 
Shem, Arphaxad, Shelah, 
Eber, Peleg, Reu, 
Serug, Nahor, Terah, 
Abram; the same is Abraham. 
The sons of Abraham; Isaac, and Ishmael. 
These are their generations: The firstborn of Ishmael, Nebaioth; then Kedar, and Adbeel, and Mibsam, 
Mishma, and Dumah, Massa, Hadad, and Tema, 
Jetur, Naphish, and Kedemah. These are the sons of Ishmael. 
Now the sons of Keturah, Abraham's concubine: she bare Zimran, and Jokshan, and Medan, and Midian, and Ishbak, and Shuah. And the sons of Jokshan; Sheba, and Dedan. 
And the sons of Midian; Ephah, and Epher, and Henoch, and Abida, and Eldaah. All these are the sons of Keturah. 
And Abraham begat Isaac. The sons of Isaac; Esau and Israel. 
The sons of Esau; Eliphaz, Reuel, and Jeush, and Jaalam, and Korah. 
The sons of Eliphaz; Teman, and Omar, Zephi, and Gatam, Kenaz, and Timna, and Amalek. 
The sons of Reuel; Nahath, Zerah, Shammah, and Mizzah. 
And the sons of Seir; Lotan, and Shobal, and Zibeon, and Anah, and Dishon, and E
898,emnation? 
And we indeed justly; for we receive the due reward of our deeds: but this man hath done nothing amiss. 
And he said unto Jesus, Lord, remember me when thou comest into thy kingdom. 
And Jesus said unto him, Verily I say unto thee, To day shalt thou be with me in paradise. 
And it was about the sixth hour, and there was a darkness over all the earth until the ninth hour. 
And the sun was darkened, and the veil of the temple was rent in the midst. 
And when Jesus had cried with a loud voice, he said, Father, into thy hands I commend my spirit: and having said thus, he gave up the ghost. 
Now when the centurion saw what was done, he glorified God, saying, Certainly this was a righteous man. 
And all the people that came together to that sight, beholding the things which were done, smote their breasts, and returned. 
And all his acquaintance, and the women that followed him fro
834,when the cloud was taken up from over the tabernacle, the children of Israel went onward in all their journeys: 
But if the cloud were not taken up, then they journeyed not till the day that it was taken up. 
For the cloud of the LORD was upon the tabernacle by day, and fire was on it by night, in the sight of all the house of Israel, throughout all their journeys. 
And the LORD called unto Moses, and spake unto him out of the tabernacle of the congregation, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and say unto them, If any man of you bring an offering unto the LORD, ye shall bring your offering of the cattle, even of the herd, and of the flock. 
If his offering be a burnt sacrifice of the herd, let him offer a male without blemish: he shall offer it of his own voluntary will at the door of the tabernacle of the congreg
934,s Zeruah, a widow woman, even he lifted up his hand against the king. 
And this was the cause that he lifted up his hand against the king: Solomon built Millo, and repaired the breaches of the city of David his father. 
And the man Jeroboam was a mighty man of valour: and Solomon seeing the young man that he was industrious, he made him ruler over all the charge of the house of Joseph. 
And it came to pass at that time when Jeroboam went out of Jerusalem, that the prophet Ahijah the Shilonite found him in the way; and he had clad himself with a new garment; and they two were alone in the field: 
And Ahijah caught the new garment that was on him, and rent it in twelve pieces: 
And he said to Jeroboam, Take thee ten pieces: for thus saith the LORD, the God of Israel, Behold, I will rend the kingdom out of the hand of Solomon, and will give ten tribes to thee: 
(But he shall have one tribe for my servant David's sake, and f
962,ORD: and I will cause them to return to the land that I gave to their fathers, and they shall possess it. 
And these are the words that the LORD spake concerning Israel and concerning Judah. 
For thus saith the LORD; We have heard a voice of trembling, of fear, and not of peace. 
Ask ye now, and see whether a man doth travail with child? wherefore do I see every man with his hands on his loins, as a woman in travail, and all faces are turned into paleness? 
Alas! for that day is great, so that none is like it: it is even the time of Jacob's trouble, but he shall be saved out of it. 
For it shall come to pass in that day, saith the LORD of hosts, that I will break his yoke from off thy neck, and will burst thy bonds, and strangers shall no more serve themselves of him: 
But they shall serve the LORD their God, and David their king, whom I will raise up unto them. 
Therefore fear thou not, O my servant Jacob, saith the LORD; neither be dismayed, O Is
899,owed, and his garments, and his sons, and his sons' garments with him. 
Also thou shalt take of the ram the fat and the rump, and the fat that covereth the inwards, and the caul above the liver, and the two kidneys, and the fat that is upon them, and the right shoulder; for it is a ram of consecration: 
And one loaf of bread, and one cake of oiled bread, and one wafer out of the basket of the unleavened bread that is before the LORD: 
And thou shalt put all in the hands of Aaron, and in the hands of his sons; and shalt wave them for a wave offering before the LORD. 
And thou shalt receive them of their hands, and burn them upon the altar for a burnt offering, for a sweet savour before the LORD: it is an offering made by fire unto the LORD. 
And thou shalt take the breast of the ram of Aaron's consecration, and wave it for a wave offering before the LORD: and it shall be thy part. 
And t
990,mitted iniquity, and have done wickedly, and have rebelled, even by departing from thy precepts and from thy judgments: 
Neither have we hearkened unto thy servants the prophets, which spake in thy name to our kings, our princes, and our fathers, and to all the people of the land. 
O LORD, righteousness belongeth unto thee, but unto us confusion of faces, as at this day; to the men of Judah, and to the inhabitants of Jerusalem, and unto all Israel, that are near, and that are far off, through all the countries whither thou hast driven them, because of their trespass that they have trespassed against thee. 
O Lord, to us belongeth confusion of face, to our kings, to our princes, and to our fathers, because we have sinned against thee. 
To the Lord our God belong mercies and forgivenesses, though we have rebelled against him; 
Neither have we obeyed the voice of the LORD our God, to walk in his laws, which he set before us by his servants the prophets. 
Yea, all Israel have tra
835, had spoken by Moses. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Go in unto Pharaoh: for I have hardened his heart, and the heart of his servants, that I might shew these my signs before him: 
And that thou mayest tell in the ears of thy son, and of thy son's son, what things I have wrought in Egypt, and my signs which I have done among them; that ye may know how that I am the LORD. 
And Moses and Aaron came in unto Pharaoh, and said unto him, Thus saith the LORD God of the Hebrews, How long wilt thou refuse to humble thyself before me? let my people go, that they may serve me. 
Else, if thou refuse to let my people go, behold, to morrow will I bring the locusts into thy coast: 
And they shall cover the face of the earth, that one cannot be able to see the earth: and they shall eat the residue of that which is escaped, which remaineth 
1047, of weeks, and in the feast of tabernacles: and they shall not appear before the LORD empty: 
Every man shall give as he is able, according to the blessing of the LORD thy God which he hath given thee. 
Judges and officers shalt thou make thee in all thy gates, which the LORD thy God giveth thee, throughout thy tribes: and they shall judge the people with just judgment. 
Thou shalt not wrest judgment; thou shalt not respect persons, neither take a gift: for a gift doth blind the eyes of the wise, and pervert the words of the righteous. 
That which is altogether just shalt thou follow, that thou mayest live, and inherit the land which the LORD thy God giveth thee. 
Thou shalt not plant thee a grove of any trees near unto the altar of the LORD thy God, which thou shalt make thee. 
Neither shalt thou set thee up any image; which the LORD thy God hateth. 
Thou shalt not sacrifice unto the LORD thy God any bullock, or sheep, wherein is blemish, or any evilfavouredness: for that is an abomination unto the LORD thy God. 
If there be found
784,of the flock and the herd, in the place which the LORD shall choose to place his name there. 
Thou shalt eat no leavened bread with it; seven days shalt thou eat unleavened bread therewith, even the bread of affliction; for thou camest forth out of the land of Egypt in haste: that thou mayest remember the day when thou camest forth out of the land of Egypt all the days of thy life. 
And there shall be no leavened bread seen with thee in all thy coast seven days; neither shall there any thing of the flesh, which thou sacrificedst the first day at even, remain all night until the morning. 
Thou mayest not sacrifice the passover within any of thy gates, which the LORD thy God giveth thee: 
But at the place which the LORD thy God shall choose to place his name in, there thou sh
862, the land unto the place of Sichem, unto the plain of Moreh. And the Canaanite was then in the land. 
And the LORD appeared unto Abram, and said, Unto thy seed will I give this land: and there builded he an altar unto the LORD, who appeared unto him. 
And he removed from thence unto a mountain on the east of Bethel, and pitched his tent, having Bethel on the west, and Hai on the east: and there he builded an altar unto the LORD, and called upon the name of the LORD. 
And Abram journeyed, going on still toward the south. 
And there was a famine in the land: and Abram went down into Egypt to sojourn there; for the famine was grievous in the land. 
And it came to pass, when he was come near to enter into Egypt, that he said unto Sarai his wife, Behold now, I know that thou art a fair woman to look upon: 
Therefore it shall come to pass, when the Egyptia
911,hilistines; for Nadab and all Israel laid siege to Gibbethon. 
Even in the third year of Asa king of Judah did Baasha slay him, and reigned in his stead. 
And it came to pass, when he reigned, that he smote all the house of Jeroboam; he left not to Jeroboam any that breathed, until he had destroyed him, according unto the saying of the LORD, which he spake by his servant Ahijah the Shilonite: 
Because of the sins of Jeroboam which he sinned, and which he made Israel sin, by his provocation wherewith he provoked the LORD God of Israel to anger. 
Now the rest of the acts of Nadab, and all that he did, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel? 
And there was war between Asa and Baasha king of Israel all their days. 
In the third year of Asa king of Judah began Baasha the son of Ahijah to reign over all Israel in Tirzah, twenty and four years. 
And he did evil in the si
872, tribe a man: 
And Joshua said unto them, Pass over before the ark of the LORD your God into the midst of Jordan, and take you up every man of you a stone upon his shoulder, according unto the number of the tribes of the children of Israel: 
That this may be a sign among you, that when your children ask their fathers in time to come, saying, What mean ye by these stones? 
Then ye shall answer them, That the waters of Jordan were cut off before the ark of the covenant of the LORD; when it passed over Jordan, the waters of Jordan were cut off: and these stones shall be for a memorial unto the children of Israel for ever. 
And the children of Israel did so as Joshua commanded, and took up twelve stones out of the midst of Jordan, as the LORD spake unto Joshua, according to the number of the tribes of the children of Israel, and carried them over with them unto th
870, when there falleth out any war, they join also unto our enemies, and fight against us, and so get them up out of the land. 
Therefore they did set over them taskmasters to afflict them with their burdens. And they built for Pharaoh treasure cities, Pithom and Raamses. 
But the more they afflicted them, the more they multiplied and grew. And they were grieved because of the children of Israel. 
And the Egyptians made the children of Israel to serve with rigour: 
And they made their lives bitter with hard bondage, in morter, and in brick, and in all manner of service in the field: all their service, wherein they made them serve, was with rigour. 
And the king of Egypt spake to the Hebrew midwives, of which the name of the one was Shiphrah, and the name of the other Puah: 
And he said, When ye do the office of a midwife to the Hebrew women, and see them upon t
980, they withered away. 
And some fell among thorns; and the thorns sprung up, and choked them: 
But other fell into good ground, and brought forth fruit, some an hundredfold, some sixtyfold, some thirtyfold. 
Who hath ears to hear, let him hear. 
And the disciples came, and said unto him, Why speakest thou unto them in parables? 
He answered and said unto them, Because it is given unto you to know the mysteries of the kingdom of heaven, but to them it is not given. 
For whosoever hath, to him shall be given, and he shall have more abundance: but whosoever hath not, from him shall be taken away even that he hath. 
Therefore speak I to them in parables: because they seeing see not; and hearing they hear not, neither do they understand. 
And in them is fulfilled the prophecy of Esaias, which saith, By hearing ye shall hear, and shall not understand; and seeing ye shall see, and shall not perceive: 
For this people's heart is waxed gross, and their ears are dull of hearin
954,h been dead four days. 
Jesus saith unto her, Said I not unto thee, that, if thou wouldest believe, thou shouldest see the glory of God? 
Then they took away the stone from the place where the dead was laid. And Jesus lifted up his eyes, and said, Father, I thank thee that thou hast heard me. 
And I knew that thou hearest me always: but because of the people which stand by I said it, that they may believe that thou hast sent me. 
And when he thus had spoken, he cried with a loud voice, Lazarus, come forth. 
And he that was dead came forth, bound hand and foot with graveclothes: and his face was bound about with a napkin. Jesus saith unto them, Loose him, and let him go. 
Then many of the Jews which came to Mary, and had seen the things which Jesus did, believed on him. 
But some of them went their ways to the Pharisees, and told them what things Jesus had done. 
Then gathered the chief priests and the Pharisees a council, and said, What do 
849,e manner, when ye shall see these things come to pass, know that it is nigh, even at the doors. 
Verily I say unto you, that this generation shall not pass, till all these things be done. 
Heaven and earth shall pass away: but my words shall not pass away. 
But of that day and that hour knoweth no man, no, not the angels which are in heaven, neither the Son, but the Father. 
Take ye heed, watch and pray: for ye know not when the time is. 
For the Son of Man is as a man taking a far journey, who left his house, and gave authority to his servants, and to every man his work, and commanded the porter to watch. 
Watch ye therefore: for ye know not when the master of the house cometh, at even, or at midnight, or at the cockcrowing, or in the morning: 
Lest coming suddenly he find you sleeping. 
And what I say unto you I say unto all, Watch. 
A
1036, that Saul came after him into the wilderness. 
David therefore sent out spies, and understood that Saul was come in very deed. 
And David arose, and came to the place where Saul had pitched: and David beheld the place where Saul lay, and Abner the son of Ner, the captain of his host: and Saul lay in the trench, and the people pitched round about him. 
Then answered David and said to Ahimelech the Hittite, and to Abishai the son of Zeruiah, brother to Joab, saying, Who will go down with me to Saul to the camp? And Abishai said, I will go down with thee. 
So David and Abishai came to the people by night: and, behold, Saul lay sleeping within the trench, and his spear stuck in the ground at his bolster: but Abner and the people lay round about him. 
Then said Abishai to David, God hath delivered thine enemy into thine hand this day: now therefore let me smite him, I pray thee, with the spear even to the earth at once, and I will not smite him the second time. 
And David said to Abishai, Destroy him not: for who can stretch
977,from the places about Jerusalem, and from the land of Benjamin, and from the plain, and from the mountains, and from the south, bringing burnt offerings, and sacrifices, and meat offerings, and incense, and bringing sacrifices of praise, unto the house of the LORD. 
But if ye will not hearken unto me to hallow the sabbath day, and not to bear a burden, even entering in at the gates of Jerusalem on the sabbath day; then will I kindle a fire in the gates thereof, and it shall devour the palaces of Jerusalem, and it shall not be quenched. 
The word which came to Jeremiah from the LORD, saying, 
Arise, and go down to the potter's house, and there I will cause thee to hear my words. 
Then I went down to the potter's house, and, behold, he wrought a work on the wheels. 
And the vessel that he made of clay was marred in the hand of the potter: so he made it again another vessel, as seemed good to the potter to make it. 
Then the word of the LORD came to me, saying, 
O h
1077, the wheels were lifted up over against them: for the spirit of the living creature was in the wheels. 
And the likeness of the firmament upon the heads of the living creature was as the colour of the terrible crystal, stretched forth over their heads above. 
And under the firmament were their wings straight, the one toward the other: every one had two, which covered on this side, and every one had two, which covered on that side, their bodies. 
And when they went, I heard the noise of their wings, like the noise of great waters, as the voice of the Almighty, the voice of speech, as the noise of an host: when they stood, they let down their wings. 
And there was a voice from the firmament that was over their heads, when they stood, and had let down their wings. 
And above the firmament that was over their heads was the likeness of a throne, as the appearance of a sapphire stone: and upon the likeness of the throne was the likeness as the appearance of a man above upon it. 
And I saw as the colour of amber, as the appearance of fire round about within it, from t
739,arried into Egypt. 
The LORD hath also a controversy with Judah, and will punish Jacob according to his ways; according to his doings will he recompense him. 
He took his brother by the heel in the womb, and by his strength he had power with God: 
Yea, he had power over the angel, and prevailed: he wept, and made supplication unto him: he found him in Bethel, and there he spake with us; 
Even the LORD God of hosts; the LORD is his memorial. 
Therefore turn thou to thy God: keep mercy and judgment and wait on thy God continually. 
He is a merchant, the balances of deceit are in his hand: he loveth to oppress. 
And Ephraim said, Yet I am become rich, I have found me out substance: in all my labours they shall find none iniquity in 
824,in their hearts. 
And these are they likewise which are sown on stony ground; who, when they have heard the word, immediately receive it with gladness; 
And have no root in themselves, and so endure but for a time: afterward, when affliction or persecution ariseth for the word's sake, immediately they are offended. 
And these are they which are sown among thorns; such as hear the word, 
And the cares of this world, and the deceitfulness of riches, and the lusts of other things entering in, choke the word, and it becometh unfruitful. 
And these are they which are sown on good ground; such as hear the word, and receive it, and bring forth fruit, some thirtyfold, some sixty, and some an hundred. 
And he said unto them, Is a candle brought to be put under a bushel, or under a bed? and not to be set on a candlestick? 
786,ne that went to be numbered, from twenty years old and upward, for six hundred thousand and three thousand and five hundred and fifty men. 
And of the hundred talents of silver were cast the sockets of the sanctuary, and the sockets of the vail; an hundred sockets of the hundred talents, a talent for a socket. 
And of the thousand seven hundred seventy and five shekels he made hooks for the pillars, and overlaid their chapiters, and filleted them. 
And the brass of the offering was seventy talents, and two thousand and four hundred shekels. 
And therewith he made the sockets to the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, and the brasen altar, and the brasen grate for it, and all the vessels of the altar, 
And the sockets of the court round about, and the sockets of the co
769,h nigh shall be put to death. 
All that were numbered of the Levites, which Moses and Aaron numbered at the commandment of the LORD, throughout their families, all the males from a month old and upward, were twenty and two thousand. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Number all the firstborn of the males of the children of Israel from a month old and upward, and take the number of their names. 
And thou shalt take the Levites for me (I am the LORD) instead of all the firstborn among the children of Israel; and the cattle of the Levites instead of all the firstlings among the cattle of the children of Israel. 
And Moses numbered, as the LORD commanded him, all the firstborn among the children of Israel. 
And all the firstborn males by the number of names, from a m
751,ave them into the hand of their enemies: so fell they all by the sword. 
According to their uncleanness and according to their transgressions have I done unto them, and hid my face from them. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Now will I bring again the captivity of Jacob, and have mercy upon the whole house of Israel, and will be jealous for my holy name; 
After that they have borne their shame, and all their trespasses whereby they have trespassed against me, when they dwelt safely in their land, and none made them afraid. 
When I have brought them again from the people, and gathered them out of their enemies' lands, and am sanctified in them in the sight of many nations; 
Then shall they know that I am the LORD their God, which caused th
777,on of Manasseh went and took the small towns thereof, and called them Havothjair. 
And Nobah went and took Kenath, and the villages thereof, and called it Nobah, after his own name. 
These are the journeys of the children of Israel, which went forth out of the land of Egypt with their armies under the hand of Moses and Aaron. 
And Moses wrote their goings out according to their journeys by the commandment of the LORD: and these are their journeys according to their goings out. 
And they departed from Rameses in the first month, on the fifteenth day of the first month; on the morrow after the passover the children of Israel went out with an high hand in the sight of all the Egyptians. 
For the Egyptians buried all their firstborn, which the LORD had smitten among them
955,ed. 
For when they came into the house, he lay on his bed in his bedchamber, and they smote him, and slew him, and beheaded him, and took his head, and gat them away through the plain all night. 
And they brought the head of Ishbosheth unto David to Hebron, and said to the king, Behold the head of Ishbosheth the son of Saul thine enemy, which sought thy life; and the LORD hath avenged my lord the king this day of Saul, and of his seed. 
And David answered Rechab and Baanah his brother, the sons of Rimmon the Beerothite, and said unto them, As the LORD liveth, who hath redeemed my soul out of all adversity, 
When one told me, saying, Behold, Saul is dead, thinking to have brought good tidings, I took hold of him, and slew him in Ziklag, who thought that I would have given him a reward for his tidings: 
How much more, when wicked men have slain a righteous person in his own house upon his bed? shall I not therefore now require his blood of you
757,out of the stone. 
He setteth an end to darkness, and searcheth out all perfection: the stones of darkness, and the shadow of death. 
The flood breaketh out from the inhabitant; even the waters forgotten of the foot: they are dried up, they are gone away from men. 
As for the earth, out of it cometh bread: and under it is turned up as it were fire. 
The stones of it are the place of sapphires: and it hath dust of gold. 
There is a path which no fowl knoweth, and which the vulture's eye hath not seen: 
The lion's whelps have not trodden it, nor the fierce lion passed by it. 
He putteth forth his hand upon the rock; he overturneth the mountains by the roots. 
He cutteth out rivers among the rocks; and his eye seeth every precious thing. 
He bindeth 
755,nst him, and join his enemies together; 
The Syrians before, and the Philistines behind; and they shall devour Israel with open mouth. For all this his anger is not turned away, but his hand is stretched out still. 
For the people turneth not unto him that smiteth them, neither do they seek the LORD of hosts. 
Therefore the LORD will cut off from Israel head and tail, branch and rush, in one day. 
The ancient and honourable, he is the head; and the prophet that teacheth lies, he is the tail. 
For the leaders of this people cause them to err; and they that are led of them are destroyed. 
Therefore the LORD shall have no joy in their young men, neither shall have mercy on their fatherless and widows: for every one is an hypocrite and an evildoer, 
1012,he kings of Judah will I give into the hand of their enemies, which shall spoil them, and take them, and carry them to Babylon. 
And thou, Pashur, and all that dwell in thine house shall go into captivity: and thou shalt come to Babylon, and there thou shalt die, and shalt be buried there, thou, and all thy friends, to whom thou hast prophesied lies. 
O LORD, thou hast deceived me, and I was deceived; thou art stronger than I, and hast prevailed: I am in derision daily, every one mocketh me. 
For since I spake, I cried out, I cried violence and spoil; because the word of the LORD was made a reproach unto me, and a derision, daily. 
Then I said, I will not make mention of him, nor speak any more in his name. But his word was in mine heart as a burning fire shut up in my bones, and I was weary with forbearing, and I could not stay. 
For I heard the defaming of many, fear on every side. Report, say they, and we will report it. All my familiars watched for my halting, saying, Peradventure he will be e
1023, name? and in thy name have cast out devils? and in thy name done many wonderful works? 
And then will I profess unto them, I never knew you: depart from me, ye that work iniquity. 
Therefore whosoever heareth these sayings of mine, and doeth them, I will liken him unto a wise man, which built his house upon a rock: 
And the rain descended, and the floods came, and the winds blew, and beat upon that house; and it fell not: for it was founded upon a rock. 
And every one that heareth these sayings of mine, and doeth them not, shall be likened unto a foolish man, which built his house upon the sand: 
And the rain descended, and the floods came, and the winds blew, and beat upon that house; and it fell: and great was the fall of it. 
And it came to pass, when Jesus had ended these sayings, the people were astonished at his doctrine: 
For he taught them as one having authority, and not as the scribes. 
When he was come down from the mountain, great multitudes followed him. 
And, behold, there came a leper and wor
844,on, 
So that I come again to my father's house in peace; then shall the LORD be my God: 
And this stone, which I have set for a pillar, shall be God's house: and of all that thou shalt give me I will surely give the tenth unto thee. 
Then Jacob went on his journey, and came into the land of the people of the east. 
And he looked, and behold a well in the field, and, lo, there were three flocks of sheep lying by it; for out of that well they watered the flocks: and a great stone was upon the well's mouth. 
And thither were all the flocks gathered: and they rolled the stone from the well's mouth, and watered the sheep, and put the stone again upon the well's mouth in his place. 
And Jacob said unto them, My brethren, whence be ye? And they said, Of Haran are we. 
And he said unto them, Know ye Laban the son of Nahor? And they said, We
817,ce. 
His going forth is from the end of the heaven, and his circuit unto the ends of it: and there is nothing hid from the heat thereof. 
The law of the LORD is perfect, converting the soul: the testimony of the LORD is sure, making wise the simple. 
The statutes of the LORD are right, rejoicing the heart: the commandment of the LORD is pure, enlightening the eyes. 
The fear of the LORD is clean, enduring for ever: the judgments of the LORD are true and righteous altogether. 
More to be desired are they than gold, yea, than much fine gold: sweeter also than honey and the honeycomb. 
Moreover by them is thy servant warned: and in keeping of them there is great reward. 
Who can understand his errors? cleanse thou me from secret faults. 
Keep back thy servant also from presumptuous sins; let them not have dom
974,ed not afterward, that ye might believe him. 
Hear another parable: There was a certain householder, which planted a vineyard, and hedged it round about, and digged a winepress in it, and built a tower, and let it out to husbandmen, and went into a far country: 
And when the time of the fruit drew near, he sent his servants to the husbandmen, that they might receive the fruits of it. 
And the husbandmen took his servants, and beat one, and killed another, and stoned another. 
Again, he sent other servants more than the first: and they did unto them likewise. 
But last of all he sent unto them his son, saying, They will reverence my son. 
But when the husbandmen saw the son, they said among themselves, This is the heir; come, let us kill him, and let us seize on his inheritance. 
And they caught him, and cast him out of the vineyard, and slew him. 
When the lord therefore of the vineyard cometh, what will he do unto those husbandmen? 
They say unto him, He will
848,rop fatness. 
They drop upon the pastures of the wilderness: and the little hills rejoice on every side. 
The pastures are clothed with flocks; the valleys also are covered over with corn; they shout for joy, they also sing. 
Make a joyful noise unto God, all ye lands: 
Sing forth the honour of his name: make his praise glorious. 
Say unto God, How terrible art thou in thy works! through the greatness of thy power shall thine enemies submit themselves unto thee. 
All the earth shall worship thee, and shall sing unto thee; they shall sing to thy name. Selah. 
Come and see the works of God: he is terrible in his doing toward the children of men. 
He turned the sea into dry land: they went through the flood on foot: there did we rejoice in him. 
He ruleth by his power for ever; his eyes behold the nations: let not the rebellious exalt them
731, I plead with thee: yet let me talk with thee of thy judgments: Wherefore doth the way of the wicked prosper? wherefore are all they happy that deal very treacherously? 
Thou hast planted them, yea, they have taken root: they grow, yea, they bring forth fruit: thou art near in their mouth, and far from their reins. 
But thou, O LORD, knowest me: thou hast seen me, and tried mine heart toward thee: pull them out like sheep for the slaughter, and prepare them for the day of slaughter. 
How long shall the land mourn, and the herbs of every field wither, for the wickedness of them that dwell therein? the beasts are consumed, and the birds; because they said, He shall not see our last end. 
If thou hast run with the footmen, a
785,hbelites: of Ahiram, the family of the Ahiramites: 
Of Shupham, the family of the Shuphamites: of Hupham, the family of the Huphamites. 
And the sons of Bela were ard and Naaman: of Ard, the family of the Ardites: and of Naaman, the family of the Naamites. 
These are the sons of Benjamin after their families: and they that were numbered of them were forty and five thousand and six hundred. 
These are the sons of Dan after their families: of Shuham, the family of the Shuhamites. These are the families of Dan after their families. 
All the families of the Shuhamites, according to those that were numbered of them, were threescore and four thousand and four hundred. 
Of the children of Asher after their families: of Jimna, the family of the Jimnites: of Jesui, the family of the 
1036,ice in the midst of the four beasts say, A measure of wheat for a penny, and three measures of barley for a penny; and see thou hurt not the oil and the wine. 
And when he had opened the fourth seal, I heard the voice of the fourth beast say, Come and see. 
And I looked, and behold a pale horse: and his name that sat on him was Death, and Hell followed with him. And power was given unto them over the fourth part of the earth, to kill with sword, and with hunger, and with death, and with the beasts of the earth. 
And when he had opened the fifth seal, I saw under the altar the souls of them that were slain for the word of God, and for the testimony which they held: 
And they cried with a loud voice, saying, How long, O Lord, holy and true, dost thou not judge and avenge our blood on them that dwell on the earth? 
And white robes were given unto every one of them; and it was said unto them, that they should rest yet for a little season, until their fellowservants also and their brethren, that should be killed as they were,
934,lls be removed; but my kindness shall not depart from thee, neither shall the covenant of my peace be removed, saith the LORD that hath mercy on thee. 
O thou afflicted, tossed with tempest, and not comforted, behold, I will lay thy stones with fair colours, and lay thy foundations with sapphires. 
And I will make thy windows of agates, and thy gates of carbuncles, and all thy borders of pleasant stones. 
And all thy children shall be taught of the LORD; and great shall be the peace of thy children. 
In righteousness shalt thou be established: thou shalt be far from oppression; for thou shalt not fear: and from terror; for it shall not come near thee. 
Behold, they shall surely gather together, but not by me: whosoever shall gather together against thee shall fall for thy sake. 
Behold, I have created the smith that bloweth the coals in the fire, and that bringeth forth an instrument for his work; and I have created the 
763,was the son of Maath, which was the son of Mattathias, which was the son of Semei, which was the son of Joseph, which was the son of Juda, 
Which was the son of Joanna, which was the son of Rhesa, which was the son of Zorobabel, which was the son of Salathiel, which was the son of Neri, 
Which was the son of Melchi, which was the son of Addi, which was the son of Cosam, which was the son of Elmodam, which was the son of Er, 
Which was the son of Jose, which was the son of Eliezer, which was the son of Jorim, which was the son of Matthat, which was the son of Levi, 
Which was the son of Simeon, which was the son of Juda, which was the son of Joseph, which was the son of Jonan, which was the son of Eliakim, 
Which was the son of Melea, which was the son o
777,ill not save them by bow, nor by sword, nor by battle, by horses, nor by horsemen. 
Now when she had weaned Loruhamah, she conceived, and bare a son. 
Then said God, Call his name Loammi: for ye are not my people, and I will not be your God. 
Yet the number of the children of Israel shall be as the sand of the sea, which cannot be measured nor numbered; and it shall come to pass, that in the place where it was said unto them, Ye are not my people, there it shall be said unto them, Ye are the sons of the living God. 
Then shall the children of Judah and the children of Israel be gathered together, and appoint themselves one head, and they shall come up out of the land: for great shall be the day of Jezreel. 
Say ye unto your brethren, Ammi; and to your sisters, Ruhama
1078,me to pass in that day, saith the LORD of hosts, that I will break his yoke from off thy neck, and will burst thy bonds, and strangers shall no more serve themselves of him: 
But they shall serve the LORD their God, and David their king, whom I will raise up unto them. 
Therefore fear thou not, O my servant Jacob, saith the LORD; neither be dismayed, O Israel: for, lo, I will save thee from afar, and thy seed from the land of their captivity; and Jacob shall return, and shall be in rest, and be quiet, and none shall make him afraid. 
For I am with thee, saith the LORD, to save thee: though I make a full end of all nations whither I have scattered thee, yet I will not make a full end of thee: but I will correct thee in measure, and will not leave thee altogether unpunished. 
For thus saith the LORD, Thy bruise is incurable, and thy wound is grievous. 
There is none to plead thy cause, that thou mayest be bound up: thou hast no healing medicines. 
All thy lovers have forgotten thee; they seek thee not; for I have wounded thee with the wound of an enemy, with the c
1010,fear before him, all the earth. 
Say among the heathen that the LORD reigneth: the world also shall be established that it shall not be moved: he shall judge the people righteously. 
Let the heavens rejoice, and let the earth be glad; let the sea roar, and the fulness thereof. 
Let the field be joyful, and all that is therein: then shall all the trees of the wood rejoice 
Before the LORD: for he cometh, for he cometh to judge the earth: he shall judge the world with righteousness, and the people with his truth. 
The LORD reigneth; let the earth rejoice; let the multitude of isles be glad thereof. 
Clouds and darkness are round about him: righteousness and judgment are the habitation of his throne. 
A fire goeth before him, and burneth up his enemies round about. 
His lightnings enlightened the world: the earth saw, and trembled. 
The hills melted like wax at the presence of the LORD, at the presence of the Lord of the whole earth. 
The heavens declare his righteousness, and all the people see hi
978, you; of them shall ye buy bondmen and bondmaids. 
Moreover of the children of the strangers that do sojourn among you, of them shall ye buy, and of their families that are with you, which they begat in your land: and they shall be your possession. 
And ye shall take them as an inheritance for your children after you, to inherit them for a possession; they shall be your bondmen for ever: but over your brethren the children of Israel, ye shall not rule one over another with rigour. 
And if a sojourner or stranger wax rich by thee, and thy brother that dwelleth by him wax poor, and sell himself unto the stranger or sojourner by thee, or to the stock of the stranger's family: 
After that he is sold he may be redeemed again; one of his brethren may redeem him: 
Either his uncle, or his uncle's son, may redeem him, or any that is nigh of kin unto him of his family may redeem him; or if he be able, he may redeem himself. 
And he shall reckon with him that bought him fro
882,e into the camp again. 
Thou shalt have a place also without the camp, whither thou shalt go forth abroad: 
And thou shalt have a paddle upon thy weapon; and it shall be, when thou wilt ease thyself abroad, thou shalt dig therewith, and shalt turn back and cover that which cometh from thee: 
For the LORD thy God walketh in the midst of thy camp, to deliver thee, and to give up thine enemies before thee; therefore shall thy camp be holy: that he see no unclean thing in thee, and turn away from thee. 
Thou shalt not deliver unto his master the servant which is escaped from his master unto thee: 
He shall dwell with thee, even among you, in that place which he shall choose in one of thy gates, where it liketh him best: thou shalt not oppress him. 
There shall be no whore of the daughters of Israel, nor a sodomite of the sons of Israel. 
Thou shalt not bring the hire of a w
920,us Christ; 
How that they told you there should be mockers in the last time, who should walk after their own ungodly lusts. 
These be they who separate themselves, sensual, having not the Spirit. 
But ye, beloved, building up yourselves on your most holy faith, praying in the Holy Ghost, 
Keep yourselves in the love of God, looking for the mercy of our Lord Jesus Christ unto eternal life. 
And of some have compassion, making a difference: 
And others save with fear, pulling them out of the fire; hating even the garment spotted by the flesh. 
Now unto him that is able to keep you from falling, and to present you faultless before the presence of his glory with exceeding joy, 
To the only wise God our Saviour, be glory and majesty, dominion and power, both now and ever. Amen. 
The Revelation of Jesus Christ, which God gave unto him, to shew unto his servants things which must shortly come to pass; and he sent 
1014,his chambers in the waters: who maketh the clouds his chariot: who walketh upon the wings of the wind: 
Who maketh his angels spirits; his ministers a flaming fire: 
Who laid the foundations of the earth, that it should not be removed for ever. 
Thou coveredst it with the deep as with a garment: the waters stood above the mountains. 
At thy rebuke they fled; at the voice of thy thunder they hasted away. 
They go up by the mountains; they go down by the valleys unto the place which thou hast founded for them. 
Thou hast set a bound that they may not pass over; that they turn not again to cover the earth. 
He sendeth the springs into the valleys, which run among the hills. 
They give drink to every beast of the field: the wild asses quench their thirst. 
By them shall the fowls of the heaven have their habitation, which sing among the branches. 
He watereth the hills from his chambers: the earth is satisfied with the fruit of thy works. 
He causeth the grass to grow for the cattle, and herb for the se
896, of the world, may be required of this generation; 
From the blood of Abel unto the blood of Zacharias which perished between the altar and the temple: verily I say unto you, It shall be required of this generation. 
Woe unto you, lawyers! for ye have taken away the key of knowledge: ye entered not in yourselves, and them that were entering in ye hindered. 
And as he said these things unto them, the scribes and the Pharisees began to urge him vehemently, and to provoke him to speak of many things: 
Laying wait for him, and seeking to catch something out of his mouth, that they might accuse him. 
In the mean time, when there were gathered together an innumerable multitude of people, insomuch that they trode one upon another, he began to say unto his disciples first of all, Beware ye of the leaven of the Pharisees, which is hypocrisy. 
For there is nothing covered, that shall not be re
1003,ainst hope believed in hope, that he might become the father of many nations, according to that which was spoken, So shall thy seed be. 
And being not weak in faith, he considered not his own body now dead, when he was about an hundred years old, neither yet the deadness of Sarah's womb: 
He staggered not at the promise of God through unbelief; but was strong in faith, giving glory to God; 
And being fully persuaded that, what he had promised, he was able also to perform. 
And therefore it was imputed to him for righteousness. 
Now it was not written for his sake alone, that it was imputed to him; 
But for us also, to whom it shall be imputed, if we believe on him that raised up Jesus our Lord from the dead; 
Who was delivered for our offences, and was raised again for our justification. 
Therefore being justified by faith, we have peace with God through our Lord Jesus Christ: 
By whom also we have access by faith into this grace wherein we stand, and rejoice in hope of the glory of God. 
984, away: they shall take to themselves their curtains, and all their vessels, and their camels; and they shall cry unto them, Fear is on every side. 
Flee, get you far off, dwell deep, O ye inhabitants of Hazor, saith the LORD; for Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon hath taken counsel against you, and hath conceived a purpose against you. 
Arise, get you up unto the wealthy nation, that dwelleth without care, saith the LORD, which have neither gates nor bars, which dwell alone. 
And their camels shall be a booty, and the multitude of their cattle a spoil: and I will scatter into all winds them that are in the utmost corners; and I will bring their calamity from all sides thereof, saith the LORD. 
And Hazor shall be a dwelling for dragons, and a desolation for ever: there shall no man abide there, nor any son of man dwell in it. 
The word of the LORD that came to Jeremiah the prophet against Elam in the beginning of the reign of Zedekiah king of Judah, saying, 
Thus saith the 
981,l not suffer the destroyer to come in unto your houses to smite you. 
And ye shall observe this thing for an ordinance to thee and to thy sons for ever. 
And it shall come to pass, when ye be come to the land which the LORD will give you, according as he hath promised, that ye shall keep this service. 
And it shall come to pass, when your children shall say unto you, What mean ye by this service? 
That ye shall say, It is the sacrifice of the LORD's passover, who passed over the houses of the children of Israel in Egypt, when he smote the Egyptians, and delivered our houses. And the people bowed the head and worshipped. 
And the children of Israel went away, and did as the LORD had commanded Moses and Aaron, so did they. 
And it came to pass, that at midnight the LORD smote all the firstborn in the land of Egypt, from the firstborn of Pharaoh that sat on his throne unto the firstborn of the captive that was in the dungeon; and all the firstborn of cattle. 
And Pharao
797,are after the Spirit the things of the Spirit. 
For to be carnally minded is death; but to be spiritually minded is life and peace. 
Because the carnal mind is enmity against God: for it is not subject to the law of God, neither indeed can be. 
So then they that are in the flesh cannot please God. 
But ye are not in the flesh, but in the Spirit, if so be that the Spirit of God dwell in you. Now if any man have not the Spirit of Christ, he is none of his. 
And if Christ be in you, the body is dead because of sin; but the Spirit is life because of righteousness. 
But if the Spirit of him that raised up Jesus from the dead dwell in you, he that raised up Christ from the dead shall also quicken your mortal bodies by his Spirit that dwelleth in you. 
Therefore, brethren, we are debtors, not 
1050,nd his image, and whosoever receiveth the mark of his name. 
Here is the patience of the saints: here are they that keep the commandments of God, and the faith of Jesus. 
And I heard a voice from heaven saying unto me, Write, Blessed are the dead which die in the Lord from henceforth: Yea, saith the Spirit, that they may rest from their labours; and their works do follow them. 
And I looked, and behold a white cloud, and upon the cloud one sat like unto the Son of man, having on his head a golden crown, and in his hand a sharp sickle. 
And another angel came out of the temple, crying with a loud voice to him that sat on the cloud, Thrust in thy sickle, and reap: for the time is come for thee to reap; for the harvest of the earth is ripe. 
And he that sat on the cloud thrust in his sickle on the earth; and the earth was reaped. 
And another angel came out of the temple which is in heaven, he also having a sharp sickle. 
And another angel came out from the altar, which had power over fire; and cried with a loud cry to him that had the s
998,e LORD, The LORD God, merciful and gracious, longsuffering, and abundant in goodness and truth, 
Keeping mercy for thousands, forgiving iniquity and transgression and sin, and that will by no means clear the guilty; visiting the iniquity of the fathers upon the children, and upon the children's children, unto the third and to the fourth generation. 
And Moses made haste, and bowed his head toward the earth, and worshipped. 
And he said, If now I have found grace in thy sight, O LORD, let my LORD, I pray thee, go among us; for it is a stiffnecked people; and pardon our iniquity and our sin, and take us for thine inheritance. 
And he said, Behold, I make a covenant: before all thy people I will do marvels, such as have not been done in all the earth, nor in any nation: and all the people among which thou art shall see the work of the LORD: for it is a terrible thing that I will do with thee. 
Observe thou that which I command thee this day: behold, I drive out before thee the Amorite, 
997,s unto other gods. 
Then came Jeremiah from Tophet, whither the LORD had sent him to prophesy; and he stood in the court of the LORD's house; and said to all the people, 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Behold, I will bring upon this city and upon all her towns all the evil that I have pronounced against it, because they have hardened their necks, that they might not hear my words. 
Now Pashur the son of Immer the priest, who was also chief governor in the house of the LORD, heard that Jeremiah prophesied these things. 
Then Pashur smote Jeremiah the prophet, and put him in the stocks that were in the high gate of Benjamin, which was by the house of the LORD. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, that Pashur brought forth Jeremiah out of the stocks. Then said Jeremiah unto him, The LORD hath not called thy name Pashur, but Magormissabib. 
For thus saith the LORD, Behold, I will make thee a terror to thyself, and to all thy friends: and they shall fall by the sword of 
727,d forward the affliction. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD; I am returned to Jerusalem with mercies: my house shall be built in it, saith the LORD of hosts, and a line shall be stretched forth upon Jerusalem. 
Cry yet, saying, Thus saith the LORD of hosts; My cities through prosperity shall yet be spread abroad; and the LORD shall yet comfort Zion, and shall yet choose Jerusalem. 
Then lifted I up mine eyes, and saw, and behold four horns. 
And I said unto the angel that talked with me, What be these? And he answered me, These are the horns which have scattered Judah, Israel, and Jerusalem. 
And the LORD shewed me four carpenters. 
Then said I, What come these to do? And he spake, saying, These are the horns which have 
721,nother nation, by temptations, by signs, and by wonders, and by war, and by a mighty hand, and by a stretched out arm, and by great terrors, according to all that the LORD your God did for you in Egypt before your eyes? 
Unto thee it was shewed, that thou mightest know that the LORD he is God; there is none else beside him. 
Out of heaven he made thee to hear his voice, that he might instruct thee: and upon earth he shewed thee his great fire; and thou heardest his words out of the midst of the fire. 
And because he loved thy fathers, therefore he chose their seed after them, and brought thee out in his sight with his mighty power out of Egypt; 
To drive out nations from before thee greater and mightier than tho
925,
And make straight paths for your feet, lest that which is lame be turned out of the way; but let it rather be healed. 
Follow peace with all men, and holiness, without which no man shall see the Lord: 
Looking diligently lest any man fail of the grace of God; lest any root of bitterness springing up trouble you, and thereby many be defiled; 
Lest there be any fornicator, or profane person, as Esau, who for one morsel of meat sold his birthright. 
For ye know how that afterward, when he would have inherited the blessing, he was rejected: for he found no place of repentance, though he sought it carefully with tears. 
For ye are not come unto the mount that might be touched, and that burned with fire, nor unto blackness, and darkness, and tempest, 
And the sound of a trumpet, and the voice of words; which voice they that heard intreated that the word should not be spoken to them any more: 
(For they could not endu
1061,ubled at his presence. 
And Joseph said unto his brethren, Come near to me, I pray you. And they came near. And he said, I am Joseph your brother, whom ye sold into Egypt. 
Now therefore be not grieved, nor angry with yourselves, that ye sold me hither: for God did send me before you to preserve life. 
For these two years hath the famine been in the land: and yet there are five years, in the which there shall neither be earing nor harvest. 
And God sent me before you to preserve you a posterity in the earth, and to save your lives by a great deliverance. 
So now it was not you that sent me hither, but God: and he hath made me a father to Pharaoh, and lord of all his house, and a ruler throughout all the land of Egypt. 
Haste ye, and go up to my father, and say unto him, Thus saith thy son Joseph, God hath made me lord of all Egypt: come down unto me, tarry not: 
And thou shalt dwell in the land of Goshen, and thou shalt be near unto me, thou, and thy children, and thy children's children, and thy flocks, and thy herds, and all that thou hast: 
A
916,n toward this house night and day, even toward the place of which thou hast said, My name shall be there: that thou mayest hearken unto the prayer which thy servant shall make toward this place. 
And hearken thou to the supplication of thy servant, and of thy people Israel, when they shall pray toward this place: and hear thou in heaven thy dwelling place: and when thou hearest, forgive. 
If any man trespass against his neighbour, and an oath be laid upon him to cause him to swear, and the oath come before thine altar in this house: 
Then hear thou in heaven, and do, and judge thy servants, condemning the wicked, to bring his way upon his head; and justifying the righteous, to give him according to his righteousness. 
When thy people Israel be smitten down before the enemy, because they have sinned against thee, and shall turn again to thee, and confess thy name, and pray, and make supplication unto the
891, gone down to hell with their weapons of war: and they have laid their swords under their heads, but their iniquities shall be upon their bones, though they were the terror of the mighty in the land of the living. 
Yea, thou shalt be broken in the midst of the uncircumcised, and shalt lie with them that are slain with the sword. 
There is Edom, her kings, and all her princes, which with their might are laid by them that were slain by the sword: they shall lie with the uncircumcised, and with them that go down to the pit. 
There be the princes of the north, all of them, and all the Zidonians, which are gone down with the slain; with their terror they are ashamed of their might; and they lie uncircumcised with them that be slain by the sword, and bear their shame with them that go down to the pit. 
Pharaoh shall see them, and shall be comforted over all his multitude, even Pharaoh
967,so shall offend one of these little ones which believe in me, it were better for him that a millstone were hanged about his neck, and that he were drowned in the depth of the sea. 
Woe unto the world because of offences! for it must needs be that offences come; but woe to that man by whom the offence cometh! 
Wherefore if thy hand or thy foot offend thee, cut them off, and cast them from thee: it is better for thee to enter into life halt or maimed, rather than having two hands or two feet to be cast into everlasting fire. 
And if thine eye offend thee, pluck it out, and cast it from thee: it is better for thee to enter into life with one eye, rather than having two eyes to be cast into hell fire. 
Take heed that ye despise not one of these little ones; for I say unto you, That in heaven their angels do always behold the face of my Father which is in heaven. 
For the Son of man is come to save that which was lost. 
How think ye? if a man have an hundred
1019,to Babylon, and there shall he be until I visit him, saith the LORD: though ye fight with the Chaldeans, ye shall not prosper. 
And Jeremiah said, The word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Behold, Hanameel the son of Shallum thine uncle shall come unto thee saying, Buy thee my field that is in Anathoth: for the right of redemption is thine to buy it. 
So Hanameel mine uncle's son came to me in the court of the prison according to the word of the LORD, and said unto me, Buy my field, I pray thee, that is in Anathoth, which is in the country of Benjamin: for the right of inheritance is thine, and the redemption is thine; buy it for thyself. Then I knew that this was the word of the LORD. 
And I bought the field of Hanameel my uncle's son, that was in Anathoth, and weighed him the money, even seventeen shekels of silver. 
And I subscribed the evidence, and sealed it, and took witnesses, and weighed him the money in the balances. 
So I took the evidence of the purchase, both that which was sealed according
735,shall she say, I will go and return to my first husband; for then was it better with me than now. 
For she did not know that I gave her corn, and wine, and oil, and multiplied her silver and gold, which they prepared for Baal. 
Therefore will I return, and take away my corn in the time thereof, and my wine in the season thereof, and will recover my wool and my flax given to cover her nakedness. 
And now will I discover her lewdness in the sight of her lovers, and none shall deliver her out of mine hand. 
I will also cause all her mirth to cease, her feast days, her new moons, and her sabbaths, and all her solemn feasts. 
And I will destroy her vines and her fig trees, whereof she hath said, These are my rewards that my lovers
733, the king thereof he utterly destroyed, them, and all the souls that were therein; he let none remain: and he did to the king of Makkedah as he did unto the king of Jericho. 
Then Joshua passed from Makkedah, and all Israel with him, unto Libnah, and fought against Libnah: 
And the LORD delivered it also, and the king thereof, into the hand of Israel; and he smote it with the edge of the sword, and all the souls that were therein; he let none remain in it; but did unto the king thereof as he did unto the king of Jericho. 
And Joshua passed from Libnah, and all Israel with him, unto Lachish, and encamped against it, and fought against it: 
And the LORD delivered Lachish into the hand of Israel, which took it on the second da
871, the king of Jerusalem, the king of Hebron, the king of Jarmuth, the king of Lachish, the king of Eglon, gathered themselves together, and went up, they and all their hosts, and encamped before Gibeon, and made war against it. 
And the men of Gibeon sent unto Joshua to the camp to Gilgal, saying, Slack not thy hand from thy servants; come up to us quickly, and save us, and help us: for all the kings of the Amorites that dwell in the mountains are gathered together against us. 
So Joshua ascended from Gilgal, he, and all the people of war with him, and all the mighty men of valour. 
And the LORD said unto Joshua, Fear them not: for I have delivered them into thine hand; there shall not a man of them stand before thee. 
Joshua therefore came unto them suddenly, and went up from Gilgal all night. 
And the LORD discomfited them before Israel, and slew them with a
854,our one another, take heed that ye be not consumed one of another. 
This I say then, Walk in the Spirit, and ye shall not fulfil the lust of the flesh. 
For the flesh lusteth against the Spirit, and the Spirit against the flesh: and these are contrary the one to the other: so that ye cannot do the things that ye would. 
But if ye be led of the Spirit, ye are not under the law. 
Now the works of the flesh are manifest, which are these; Adultery, fornication, uncleanness, lasciviousness, 
Idolatry, witchcraft, hatred, variance, emulations, wrath, strife, seditions, heresies, 
Envyings, murders, drunkenness, revellings, and such like: of the which I tell you before, as I have also told you in time past, that they which do such things shall not inherit the kingdom of God. 
But the fruit of the Spirit is love, joy, peace, longsuffering, gentleness
779,spirit in the mouth of all his prophets. And the Lord said, Thou shalt entice him, and thou shalt also prevail: go out, and do even so. 
Now therefore, behold, the LORD hath put a lying spirit in the mouth of these thy prophets, and the LORD hath spoken evil against thee. 
Then Zedekiah the son of Chenaanah came near, and smote Micaiah upon the cheek, and said, Which way went the Spirit of the LORD from me to speak unto thee? 
And Micaiah said, Behold, thou shalt see on that day when thou shalt go into an inner chamber to hide thyself. 
Then the king of Israel said, Take ye Micaiah, and carry him back to Amon the governor of the city, and to Joash the king's son; 
And say, Thus saith the king, Put this fellow in the prison, and feed him with bread of affliction and wit
860, saith the LORD of the king that sitteth upon the throne of David, and of all the people that dwelleth in this city, and of your brethren that are not gone forth with you into captivity; 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Behold, I will send upon them the sword, the famine, and the pestilence, and will make them like vile figs, that cannot be eaten, they are so evil. 
And I will persecute them with the sword, with the famine, and with the pestilence, and will deliver them to be removed to all the kingdoms of the earth, to be a curse, and an astonishment, and an hissing, and a reproach, among all the nations whither I have driven them: 
Because they have not hearkened to my words, saith the LORD, which I sent unto them by my servants the prophets, rising up early and sending them; but ye would not hear, saith the LORD. 
Hear ye therefore the word of the
947,f the meat offering shall be Aaron's and his sons': it is a thing most holy of the offerings of the LORD made by fire. 
No meat offering, which ye shall bring unto the LORD, shall be made with leaven: for ye shall burn no leaven, nor any honey, in any offering of the LORD made by fire. 
As for the oblation of the firstfruits, ye shall offer them unto the LORD: but they shall not be burnt on the altar for a sweet savour. 
And every oblation of thy meat offering shalt thou season with salt; neither shalt thou suffer the salt of the covenant of thy God to be lacking from thy meat offering: with all thine offerings thou shalt offer salt. 
And if thou offer a meat offering of thy firstfruits unto the LORD, thou shalt offer for the meat offering of thy firstfruits green ears of corn dried by the fire, even corn beaten out of full ears. 
And thou shalt put oil upon it, and lay frankincense thereon: it is a meat offering. 
And the priest sha
1018,ut doting about questions and strifes of words, whereof cometh envy, strife, railings, evil surmisings, 
Perverse disputings of men of corrupt minds, and destitute of the truth, supposing that gain is godliness: from such withdraw thyself. 
But godliness with contentment is great gain. 
For we brought nothing into this world, and it is certain we can carry nothing out. 
And having food and raiment let us be therewith content. 
But they that will be rich fall into temptation and a snare, and into many foolish and hurtful lusts, which drown men in destruction and perdition. 
For the love of money is the root of all evil: which while some coveted after, they have erred from the faith, and pierced themselves through with many sorrows. 
But thou, O man of God, flee these things; and follow after righteousness, godliness, faith, love, patience, meekness. 
Fight the good fight of faith, lay hold on eternal life, whereunto thou art also called, and hast professed a good profession before many witnesses. 
I give
990,this man, if there be any wickedness in him. 
And when he had tarried among them more than ten days, he went down unto Caesarea; and the next day sitting on the judgment seat commanded Paul to be brought. 
And when he was come, the Jews which came down from Jerusalem stood round about, and laid many and grievous complaints against Paul, which they could not prove. 
While he answered for himself, Neither against the law of the Jews, neither against the temple, nor yet against Caesar, have I offended any thing at all. 
But Festus, willing to do the Jews a pleasure, answered Paul, and said, Wilt thou go up to Jerusalem, and there be judged of these things before me? 
Then said Paul, I stand at Caesar's judgment seat, where I ought to be judged: to the Jews have I done no wrong, as thou very well knowest. 
For if I be an offender, or have committed any thing worthy of death, I refuse not to die: but if there be none of these things whereof these accuse me, no man may deliver me u
899,n earth: the generation of the upright shall be blessed. 
Wealth and riches shall be in his house: and his righteousness endureth for ever. 
Unto the upright there ariseth light in the darkness: he is gracious, and full of compassion, and righteous. 
A good man sheweth favour, and lendeth: he will guide his affairs with discretion. 
Surely he shall not be moved for ever: the righteous shall be in everlasting remembrance. 
He shall not be afraid of evil tidings: his heart is fixed, trusting in the LORD. 
His heart is established, he shall not be afraid, until he see his desire upon his enemies. 
He hath dispersed, he hath given to the poor; his righteousness endureth for ever; his horn shall be exalted with honour. 
The wicked shall see it, and be grieved; he shall gnash with his teeth, and melt away: the desire of the wicked shall perish. 
Praise ye the LORD. Praise, O ye servants of th
890,eads, neither shalt thou mar the corners of thy beard. 
Ye shall not make any cuttings in your flesh for the dead, nor print any marks upon you: I am the LORD. 
Do not prostitute thy daughter, to cause her to be a whore; lest the land fall to whoredom, and the land become full of wickedness. 
Ye shall keep my sabbaths, and reverence my sanctuary: I am the LORD. 
Regard not them that have familiar spirits, neither seek after wizards, to be defiled by them: I am the LORD your God. 
Thou shalt rise up before the hoary head, and honour the face of the old man, and fear thy God: I am the LORD. 
And if a stranger sojourn with thee in your land, ye shall not vex him. 
But the stranger that dwelleth with you shall be unto you as one born among you, and thou shalt love him as thyself; for ye were strangers in the land of Egypt: I am the LORD your God. 
Ye shall do no unrighteousness in 
816, and laid the foundation on a rock: and when the flood arose, the stream beat vehemently upon that house, and could not shake it: for it was founded upon a rock. 
But he that heareth, and doeth not, is like a man that without a foundation built an house upon the earth; against which the stream did beat vehemently, and immediately it fell; and the ruin of that house was great. 
Now when he had ended all his sayings in the audience of the people, he entered into Capernaum. 
And a certain centurion's servant, who was dear unto him, was sick, and ready to die. 
And when he heard of Jesus, he sent unto him the elders of the Jews, beseeching him that he would come and heal his servant. 
And when they came to Jesus, they besought him instantly, saying, That he was worthy for whom he should do this: 
For he lovet
962,oupling; and likewise shalt thou make in the uttermost edge of another curtain, in the coupling of the second. 
Fifty loops shalt thou make in the one curtain, and fifty loops shalt thou make in the edge of the curtain that is in the coupling of the second; that the loops may take hold one of another. 
And thou shalt make fifty taches of gold, and couple the curtains together with the taches: and it shall be one tabernacle. 
And thou shalt make curtains of goats' hair to be a covering upon the tabernacle: eleven curtains shalt thou make. 
The length of one curtain shall be thirty cubits, and the breadth of one curtain four cubits: and the eleven curtains shall be all of one measure. 
And thou shalt couple five curtains by themselves, and six curtains by themselves, and shalt double the sixth curtain in the forefront of the tabernacle. 
And thou shalt make fifty loops on the edge of the one curtain that is outmost in the coupling, and fifty loops in
1001,And Benhadad sent unto him, and said, The gods do so unto me, and more also, if the dust of Samaria shall suffice for handfuls for all the people that follow me. 
And the king of Israel answered and said, Tell him, Let not him that girdeth on his harness boast himself as he that putteth it off. 
And it came to pass, when Ben-hadad heard this message, as he was drinking, he and the kings in the pavilions, that he said unto his servants, Set yourselves in array. And they set themselves in array against the city. 
And, behold, there came a prophet unto Ahab king of Israel, saying, Thus saith the LORD, Hast thou seen all this great multitude? behold, I will deliver it into thine hand this day; and thou shalt know that I am the LORD. 
And Ahab said, By whom? And he said, Thus saith the LORD, Even by the young men of the princes of the provinces. Then he said, Who shall order the battle? And he answered, Thou. 
Then he numbered the young men of the princes of the provinces, and they were two 
1031,hath remembered her iniquities. 
Reward her even as she rewarded you, and double unto her double according to her works: in the cup which she hath filled fill to her double. 
How much she hath glorified herself, and lived deliciously, so much torment and sorrow give her: for she saith in her heart, I sit a queen, and am no widow, and shall see no sorrow. 
Therefore shall her plagues come in one day, death, and mourning, and famine; and she shall be utterly burned with fire: for strong is the Lord God who judgeth her. 
And the kings of the earth, who have committed fornication and lived deliciously with her, shall bewail her, and lament for her, when they shall see the smoke of her burning, 
Standing afar off for the fear of her torment, saying, Alas, alas that great city Babylon, that mighty city! for in one hour is thy judgment come. 
And the merchants of the earth shall weep and mourn over her; for no man buyeth their merchandise any more: 
The merchandise of gold, and silver, and precious stones, and of pearls, a
791,s in the desert, go they forth to their work; rising betimes for a prey: the wilderness yieldeth food for them and for their children. 
They reap every one his corn in the field: and they gather the vintage of the wicked. 
They cause the naked to lodge without clothing, that they have no covering in the cold. 
They are wet with the showers of the mountains, and embrace the rock for want of a shelter. 
They pluck the fatherless from the breast, and take a pledge of the poor. 
They cause him to go naked without clothing, and they take away the sheaf from the hungry; 
Which make oil within their walls, and tread their winepresses, and suffer thirst. 
Men groan from out of the city, and the soul of the wounded crieth out: yet God layeth not folly to them. 
They are of those that rebel
1040, these witness against thee? 
But Jesus held his peace, And the high priest answered and said unto him, I adjure thee by the living God, that thou tell us whether thou be the Christ, the Son of God. 
Jesus saith unto him, Thou hast said: nevertheless I say unto you, Hereafter shall ye see the Son of man sitting on the right hand of power, and coming in the clouds of heaven. 
Then the high priest rent his clothes, saying, He hath spoken blasphemy; what further need have we of witnesses? behold, now ye have heard his blasphemy. 
What think ye? They answered and said, He is guilty of death. 
Then did they spit in his face, and buffeted him; and others smote him with the palms of their hands, 
Saying, Prophesy unto us, thou Christ, Who is he that smote thee? 
Now Peter sat without in the palace: and a damsel came unto him, saying, Thou also wast with Jesus of Galilee. 
But he denied before them all, saying, I know not what thou sayest. 
And when he was gone out into the porch, another maid saw him, and said unto them that were t
905, the high places, yet unto the LORD their God only. 
Now the rest of the acts of Manasseh, and his prayer unto his God, and the words of the seers that spake to him in the name of the LORD God of Israel, behold, they are written in the book of the kings of Israel. 
His prayer also, and how God was intreated of him, and all his sins, and his trespass, and the places wherein he built high places, and set up groves and graven images, before he was humbled: behold, they are written among the sayings of the seers. 
So Manasseh slept with his fathers, and they buried him in his own house: and Amon his son reigned in his stead. 
Amon was two and twenty years old when he began to reign, and reigned two years in Jerusalem. 
But he did that which was evil in the sight of the LORD, as did Manasseh his father: for Amon sacrificed unto all the carved images which Manasseh his father had made, and served t
898,one shall be called, The city of destruction. 
In that day shall there be an altar to the LORD in the midst of the land of Egypt, and a pillar at the border thereof to the LORD. 
And it shall be for a sign and for a witness unto the LORD of hosts in the land of Egypt: for they shall cry unto the LORD because of the oppressors, and he shall send them a saviour, and a great one, and he shall deliver them. 
And the LORD shall be known to Egypt, and the Egyptians shall know the LORD in that day, and shall do sacrifice and oblation; yea, they shall vow a vow unto the LORD, and perform it. 
And the LORD shall smite Egypt: he shall smite and heal it: and they shall return even to the LORD, and he shall be intreated of them, and shall heal them. 
In that day shall there be a highway out of Egypt to Assyria, and the Assyrian shall come into Egypt, and the Egyptian into Assyria, and the Egyptian
938, of the field, and with the fowls of heaven; yea, the fishes of the sea also shall be taken away. 
Yet let no man strive, nor reprove another: for thy people are as they that strive with the priest. 
Therefore shalt thou fall in the day, and the prophet also shall fall with thee in the night, and I will destroy thy mother. 
My people are destroyed for lack of knowledge: because thou hast rejected knowledge, I will also reject thee, that thou shalt be no priest to me: seeing thou hast forgotten the law of thy God, I will also forget thy children. 
As they were increased, so they sinned against me: therefore will I change their glory into shame. 
They eat up the sin of my people, and they set their heart on their iniquity. 
And there shall be, like people, like priest: and I will punish them for their ways, and reward them their doings. 
For they shall eat, and not have enough: they shall commit whoredom, and shall not increas
721,as of a great people; a tumultuous noise of the kingdoms of nations gathered together: the LORD of hosts mustereth the host of the battle. 
They come from a far country, from the end of heaven, even the LORD, and the weapons of his indignation, to destroy the whole land. 
Howl ye; for the day of the LORD is at hand; it shall come as a destruction from the Almighty. 
Therefore shall all hands be faint, and every man's heart shall melt: 
And they shall be afraid: pangs and sorrows shall take hold of them; they shall be in pain as a woman that travaileth: they shall be amazed one at another; their faces shall be as flames. 
Behold, the day of the LORD cometh, cruel both with wrath and fierce anger, to lay the land 
874,h thou hast set up. 
Then was Nebuchadnezzar full of fury, and the form of his visage was changed against Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego: therefore he spake, and commanded that they should heat the furnace one seven times more than it was wont to be heated. 
And he commanded the most mighty men that were in his army to bind Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego, and to cast them into the burning fiery furnace. 
Then these men were bound in their coats, their hosen, and their hats, and their other garments, and were cast into the midst of the burning fiery furnace. 
Therefore because the king's commandment was urgent, and the furnace exceeding hot, the flames of the fire slew those men that took up Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego. 
And these three men, Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego, fell down bound into the midst of the burning fiery furnace. 
Then Nebuchadnezzar th
1014,to give us. 
And the priest shall take the basket out of thine hand, and set it down before the altar of the LORD thy God. 
And thou shalt speak and say before the LORD thy God, A Syrian ready to perish was my father, and he went down into Egypt, and sojourned there with a few, and became there a nation, great, mighty, and populous: 
And the Egyptians evil entreated us, and afflicted us, and laid upon us hard bondage: 
And when we cried unto the LORD God of our fathers, the LORD heard our voice, and looked on our affliction, and our labour, and our oppression: 
And the LORD brought us forth out of Egypt with a mighty hand, and with an outstretched arm, and with great terribleness, and with signs, and with wonders: 
And he hath brought us into this place, and hath given us this land, even a land that floweth with milk and honey. 
And now, behold, I have brought the firstfruits of the land, which thou, O LORD, hast given me. And thou shalt set it before the LORD thy God, and worship before the LORD th
1063,ot with God: for with God all things are possible. 
Then Peter began to say unto him, Lo, we have left all, and have followed thee. 
And Jesus answered and said, Verily I say unto you, There is no man that hath left house, or brethren, or sisters, or father, or mother, or wife, or children, or lands, for my sake, and the gospel's, 
But he shall receive an hundredfold now in this time, houses, and brethren, and sisters, and mothers, and children, and lands, with persecutions; and in the world to come eternal life. 
But many that are first shall be last; and the last first. 
And they were in the way going up to Jerusalem; and Jesus went before them: and they were amazed; and as they followed, they were afraid. And he took again the twelve, and began to tell them what things should happen unto him, 
Saying, Behold, we go up to Jerusalem; and the Son of man shall be delivered unto the chief priests, and unto the scribes; and they shall condemn him to death, and shall deliver him to the Gentiles: 
And they shall mock him, and shall scourge him, and sha
991, possession, and ye shall return every man unto his family. 
A jubile shall that fiftieth year be unto you: ye shall not sow, neither reap that which groweth of itself in it, nor gather the grapes in it of thy vine undressed. 
For it is the jubile; it shall be holy unto you: ye shall eat the increase thereof out of the field. 
In the year of this jubile ye shall return every man unto his possession. 
And if thou sell ought unto thy neighbour, or buyest ought of thy neighbour's hand, ye shall not oppress one another: 
According to the number of years after the jubile thou shalt buy of thy neighbour, and according unto the number of years of the fruits he shall sell unto thee: 
According to the multitude of years thou shalt increase the price thereof, and according to the fewness of years thou shalt diminish the price of it: for according to the number of the years of the fruits doth he sell unto thee. 
Ye shall not therefore oppress one another; but thou shalt fear thy God:for 
917,I say unto you, and much more than a prophet. 
This is he, of whom it is written, Behold, I send my messenger before thy face, which shall prepare thy way before thee. 
For I say unto you, Among those that are born of women there is not a greater prophet than John the Baptist: but he that is least in the kingdom of God is greater than he. 
And all the people that heard him, and the publicans, justified God, being baptized with the baptism of John. 
But the Pharisees and lawyers rejected the counsel of God against themselves, being not baptized of him. 
And the Lord said, Whereunto then shall I liken the men of this generation? and to what are they like? 
They are like unto children sitting in the marketplace, and calling one to another, and saying, We have piped unto you, and ye have not danced; we have mourned to you, and ye have not wept. 
For John the Baptist came neither eating bread nor drinking win
921,but as it were in secret. 
Then the Jews sought him at the feast, and said, Where is he? 
And there was much murmuring among the people concerning him: for some said, He is a good man: others said, Nay; but he deceiveth the people. 
Howbeit no man spake openly of him for fear of the Jews. 
Now about the midst of the feast Jesus went up into the temple, and taught. 
And the Jews marvelled, saying, How knoweth this man letters, having never learned? 
Jesus answered them, and said, My doctrine is not mine, but his that sent me. 
If any man will do his will, he shall know of the doctrine, whether it be of God, or whether I speak of myself. 
He that speaketh of himself seeketh his own glory: but he that seeketh his glory that sent him, the same is true, and no unrighteousness is in him. 
Did not Moses give you the law, and yet none of you keepeth the law? Why go ye about to kill me? 
The people answered and said,
1046,nd took sheep, and oxen, and calves, and slew them on the ground: and the people did eat them with the blood. 
Then they told Saul, saying, Behold, the people sin against the LORD, in that they eat with the blood. And he said, Ye have transgressed: roll a great stone unto me this day. 
And Saul said, Disperse yourselves among the people, and say unto them, Bring me hither every man his ox, and every man his sheep, and slay them here, and eat; and sin not against the LORD in eating with the blood. And all the people brought every man his ox with him that night, and slew them there. 
And Saul built an altar unto the LORD: the same was the first altar that he built unto the LORD. 
And Saul said, Let us go down after the Philistines by night, and spoil them until the morning light, and let us not leave a man of them. And they said, Do whatsoever seemeth good unto thee. Then said the priest, Let us draw near hither unto God. 
And Saul asked counsel of God, Shall I go down after the Philistines? wilt thou deliver them into the hand of I
859,pitched in Zalmonah. 
And they departed from Zalmonah, and pitched in Punon. 
And they departed from Punon, and pitched in Oboth. 
And they departed from Oboth, and pitched in Ijeabarim, in the border of Moab. 
And they departed from Iim, and pitched in Dibongad. 
And they removed from Dibongad, and encamped in Almondiblathaim. 
And they removed from Almondiblathaim, and pitched in the mountains of Abarim, before Nebo. 
And they departed from the mountains of Abarim, and pitched in the plains of Moab by Jordan near Jericho. 
And they pitched by Jordan, from Bethjesimoth even unto Abelshittim in the plains of Moab. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses in the plains of Moab by Jordan near Jericho, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and say unto them, When ye are passed over Jordan into the land of Canaan; 
Then ye shall drive out all the inhabita
870,te me; 
And shewing mercy unto thousands of them that love me, and keep my commandments. 
Thou shalt not take the name of the LORD thy God in vain; for the LORD will not hold him guiltless that taketh his name in vain. 
Remember the sabbath day, to keep it holy. 
Six days shalt thou labour, and do all thy work: 
But the seventh day is the sabbath of the LORD thy God: in it thou shalt not do any work, thou, nor thy son, nor thy daughter, thy manservant, nor thy maidservant, nor thy cattle, nor thy stranger that is within thy gates: 
For in six days the LORD made heaven and earth, the sea, and all that in them is, and rested the seventh day: wherefore the LORD blessed the sabbath day, and hallowed it. 
Honour thy father and thy mother: that thy days may be long upon the land which the LORD thy God giveth thee. 
Thou shalt not kill. 
Thou shalt not commit adult
764,he whole multitude of them arose, and led him unto Pilate. 
And they began to accuse him, saying, We found this fellow perverting the nation, and forbidding to give tribute to Caesar, saying that he himself is Christ a King. 
And Pilate asked him, saying, Art thou the King of the Jews? And he answered him and said, Thou sayest it. 
Then said Pilate to the chief priests and to the people, I find no fault in this man. 
And they were the more fierce, saying, He stirreth up the people, teaching throughout all Jewry, beginning from Galilee to this place. 
When Pilate heard of Galilee, he asked whether the man were a Galilaean. 
And as soon as he knew that he belonged unto Herod's jurisdiction, he sent him to Herod, who himself also was at Jerusalem at that ti
1076,gates, that they may hear, and that they may learn, and fear the LORD your God, and observe to do all the words of this law: 
And that their children, which have not known any thing, may hear, and learn to fear the LORD your God, as long as ye live in the land whither ye go over Jordan to possess it. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Behold, thy days approach that thou must die: call Joshua, and present yourselves in the tabernacle of the congregation, that I may give him a charge. And Moses and Joshua went, and presented themselves in the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And the LORD appeared in the tabernacle in a pillar of a cloud: and the pillar of the cloud stood over the door of the tabernacle. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Behold, thou shalt sleep with thy fathers; and this people will rise up, and go a whoring after the gods of the strangers of the land, whither they go to be among them, and will forsake me, and break my covenant which I have made with them. 
Then my anger shall be kindled against them in that day, and I will forsake them, and I will hid
846,of them. 
And he denied it again. And a little after, they that stood by said again to Peter, Surely thou art one of them: for thou art a Galilaean, and thy speech agreeth thereto. 
But he began to curse and to swear, saying, I know not this man of whom ye speak. 
And the second time the cock crew. And Peter called to mind the word that Jesus said unto him, Before the cock crow twice, thou shalt deny me thrice. And when he thought thereon, he wept. 
And straightway in the morning the chief priests held a consultation with the elders and scribes and the whole council, and bound Jesus, and carried him away, and delivered him to Pilate. 
And Pilate asked him, Art thou the King of the Jews? And he answering said unto them, Thou sayest it. 
And the chief priests accused him of many things: but he answered nothing. 
And Pilate asked him aga
1014,and her towns, nor the inhabitants of Megiddo and her towns: but the Canaanites would dwell in that land. 
And it came to pass, when Israel was strong, that they put the Canaanites to tribute, and did not utterly drive them out. 
Neither did Ephraim drive out the Canaanites that dwelt in Gezer; but the Canaanites dwelt in Gezer among them. 
Neither did Zebulun drive out the inhabitants of Kitron, nor the inhabitants of Nahalol; but the Canaanites dwelt among them, and became tributaries. 
Neither did Asher drive out the inhabitants of Accho, nor the inhabitants of Zidon, nor of Ahlab, nor of Achzib, nor of Helbah, nor of Aphik, nor of Rehob: 
But the Asherites dwelt among the Canaanites, the inhabitants of the land: for they did not drive them out. 
Neither did Naphtali drive out the inhabitants of Bethshemesh, nor the inhabitants of Bethanath; but he dwelt among the Canaanites, the inhabitants of the land: nevertheless the inhabitants of Bethshemesh and of Bethanath became tributaries unto them. 
A
798,Gezer; and the goings out thereof are at the sea. 
So the children of Joseph, Manasseh and Ephraim, took their inheritance. 
And the border of the children of Ephraim according to their families was thus: even the border of their inheritance on the east side was Atarothaddar, unto Bethhoron the upper; 
And the border went out toward the sea to Michmethah on the north side; and the border went about eastward unto Taanathshiloh, and passed by it on the east to Janohah; 
And it went down from Janohah to Ataroth, and to Naarath, and came to Jericho, and went out at Jordan. 
The border went out from Tappuah westward unto the river Kanah; and the goings out thereof were at the sea. This is the inheritance of the tribe of the children of Ephraim by their families. 
And the separate cities for t
842, man can say that Jesus is the Lord, but by the Holy Ghost. 
Now there are diversities of gifts, but the same Spirit. 
And there are differences of administrations, but the same Lord. 
And there are diversities of operations, but it is the same God which worketh all in all. 
But the manifestation of the Spirit is given to every man to profit withal. 
For to one is given by the Spirit the word of wisdom; to another the word of knowledge by the same Spirit; 
To another faith by the same Spirit; to another the gifts of healing by the same Spirit; 
To another the working of miracles; to another prophecy; to another discerning of spirits; to another divers kinds of tongues; to another the interpretation of tongues: 
But all these worketh that one and the selfsame Spirit, dividing to every man severally as he will. 
For as the body is o
748,om Gudgodah to Jotbath, a land of rivers of waters. 
At that time the LORD separated the tribe of Levi, to bear the ark of the covenant of the LORD, to stand before the LORD to minister unto him, and to bless in his name, unto this day. 
Wherefore Levi hath no part nor inheritance with his brethren; the LORD is his inheritance, according as the LORD thy God promised him. 
And I stayed in the mount, according to the first time, forty days and forty nights; and the LORD hearkened unto me at that time also, and the LORD would not destroy thee. 
And the LORD said unto me, Arise, take thy journey before the people, that they may go in and possess the land, which I sware unto their fathers to give unto them. 
And now, Israel, what doth the LORD
848,d Moses spake so unto the children of Israel: but they hearkened not unto Moses for anguish of spirit, and for cruel bondage. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Go in, speak unto Pharaoh king of Egypt, that he let the children of Israel go out of his land. 
And Moses spake before the LORD, saying, Behold, the children of Israel have not hearkened unto me; how then shall Pharaoh hear me, who am of uncircumcised lips? 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, and gave them a charge unto the children of Israel, and unto Pharaoh king of Egypt, to bring the children of Israel out of the land of Egypt. 
These be the heads of their fathers' houses: The sons of Reuben the firstborn of Israel; Hanoch, and Pallu, Hezron, and Carmi: these be the families of Reuben. 
And the sons of Simeon; Jemuel, and Jamin, and Ohad, and Jachin, and Zo
968,ring spiritual things with spiritual. 
But the natural man receiveth not the things of the Spirit of God: for they are foolishness unto him: neither can he know them, because they are spiritually discerned. 
But he that is spiritual judgeth all things, yet he himself is judged of no man. 
For who hath known the mind of the Lord, that he may instruct him? but we have the mind of Christ. 
And I, brethren, could not speak unto you as unto spiritual, but as unto carnal, even as unto babes in Christ. 
I have fed you with milk, and not with meat: for hitherto ye were not able to bear it, neither yet now are ye able. 
For ye are yet carnal: for whereas there is among you envying, and strife, and divisions, are ye not carnal, and walk as men? 
For while one saith, I am of Paul; and another, I am of Apollos; are ye not carnal? 
Who then is Paul, and who is Apollos, but ministers by whom ye believed, even as the Lord gave to every man? 
I have planted, Apollos wat
764,at forsake the holy covenant. 
And arms shall stand on his part, and they shall pollute the sanctuary of strength, and shall take away the daily sacrifice, and they shall place the abomination that maketh desolate. 
And such as do wickedly against the covenant shall he corrupt by flatteries: but the people that do know their God shall be strong, and do exploits. 
And they that understand among the people shall instruct many: yet they shall fall by the sword, and by flame, by captivity, and by spoil, many days. 
Now when they shall fall, they shall be holpen with a little help: but many shall cleave to them with flatteries. 
And some of them of understanding shall fall, to try them, and to purge, and to make them white, even to the time of the end: becaus
811,oses gave the tribute, which was the LORD'S heave offering, unto Eleazar the priest, as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And of the children of Israel's half, which Moses divided from the men that warred, 
(Now the half that pertained unto the congregation was three hundred thousand and thirty thousand and seven thousand and five hundred sheep, 
And thirty and six thousand beeves, 
And thirty thousand asses and five hundred, 
And sixteen thousand persons;) 
Even of the children of Israel's half, Moses took one portion of fifty, both of man and of beast, and gave them unto the Levites, which kept the charge of the tabernacle of the LORD; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And the officers which were over thousands of the host, the captains of thousands, and captains of hundreds, came near unto Moses: 
And they s
838,h at hand. 
So likewise ye, when ye see these things come to pass, know ye that the kingdom of God is nigh at hand. 
Verily I say unto you, This generation shall not pass away, till all be fulfilled. 
Heaven and earth shall pass away: but my words shall not pass away. 
And take heed to yourselves, lest at any time your hearts be overcharged with surfeiting, and drunkenness, and cares of this life, and so that day come upon you unawares. 
For as a snare shall it come on all them that dwell on the face of the whole earth. 
Watch ye therefore, and pray always, that ye may be accounted worthy to escape all these things that shall come to pass, and to stand before the Son of man. 
And in the day time he was teaching in the temple; and at night he went out, and abode in the mount that is called the mount of Olives. 
And all the peop
833,ome the head stone of the corner. 
This is the LORD's doing; it is marvellous in our eyes. 
This is the day which the LORD hath made; we will rejoice and be glad in it. 
Save now, I beseech thee, O LORD: O LORD, I beseech thee, send now prosperity. 
Blessed be he that cometh in the name of the LORD: we have blessed you out of the house of the LORD. 
God is the LORD, which hath shewed us light: bind the sacrifice with cords, even unto the horns of the altar. 
Thou art my God, and I will praise thee: thou art my God, I will exalt thee. 
O give thanks unto the LORD; for he is good: for his mercy endureth for ever. 
Blessed are the undefiled in the way, who walk in the law of the LORD. 
Blessed are they that keep his testimonies, and that seek him with the whole heart. 
They also do no iniquity: they walk in his ways. 
Thou h
733,r of the LORD: but a man of wicked devices will he condemn. 
A man shall not be established by wickedness: but the root of the righteous shall not be moved. 
A virtuous woman is a crown to her husband: but she that maketh ashamed is as rottenness in his bones. 
The thoughts of the righteous are right: but the counsels of the wicked are deceit. 
The words of the wicked are to lie in wait for blood: but the mouth of the upright shall deliver them. 
The wicked are overthrown, and are not: but the house of the righteous shall stand. 
A man shall be commended according to his wisdom: but he that is of a perverse heart shall be despised. 
He that is despised, and hath a servant, is better than he that honoureth himself, and lacke
989,. 
And in the second month, on the seven and twentieth day of the month, was the earth dried. 
And God spake unto Noah, saying, 
Go forth of the ark, thou, and thy wife, and thy sons, and thy sons' wives with thee. 
Bring forth with thee every living thing that is with thee, of all flesh, both of fowl, and of cattle, and of every creeping thing that creepeth upon the earth; that they may breed abundantly in the earth, and be fruitful, and multiply upon the earth. 
And Noah went forth, and his sons, and his wife, and his sons' wives with him: 
Every beast, every creeping thing, and every fowl, and whatsoever creepeth upon the earth, after their kinds, went forth out of the ark. 
And Noah builded an altar unto the LORD; and took of every clean beast, and of every clean fowl, and offered burnt offerings on the altar. 
And the LORD smelled a sweet savour; and the LORD said in his heart, I will not again curse the ground any more for man's sake; for the imagination of man's heart
1001,lace there was a certain Jew, whose name was Mordecai, the son of Jair, the son of Shimei, the son of Kish, a Benjamite; 
Who had been carried away from Jerusalem with the captivity which had been carried away with Jeconiah king of Judah, whom Nebuchadnezzar the king of Babylon had carried away. 
And he brought up Hadassah, that is, Esther, his uncle's daughter: for she had neither father nor mother, and the maid was fair and beautiful; whom Mordecai, when her father and mother were dead, took for his own daughter. 
So it came to pass, when the king's commandment and his decree was heard, and when many maidens were gathered together unto Shushan the palace, to the custody of Hegai, that Esther was brought also unto the king's house, to the custody of Hegai, keeper of the women. 
And the maiden pleased him, and she obtained kindness of him; and he speedily gave her her things for purification, with such things as belonged to her, and seven maidens, which were meet to be given her, out of
926,h was an exceeding great city of three days' journey. 
And Jonah began to enter into the city a day's journey, and he cried, and said, Yet forty days, and Nineveh shall be overthrown. 
So the people of Nineveh believed God, and proclaimed a fast, and put on sackcloth, from the greatest of them even to the least of them. 
For word came unto the king of Nineveh, and he arose from his throne, and he laid his robe from him, and covered him with sackcloth, and sat in ashes. 
And he caused it to be proclaimed and published through Nineveh by the decree of the king and his nobles, saying, Let neither man nor beast, herd nor flock, taste any thing: let them not feed, nor drink water: 
But let man and beast be covered with sackcloth, and cry mightily unto God: yea, let them turn every one from his evil way, and from the violence that is in their hands. 
Who can tell if God will turn and repent, and turn away from his fier
916,nd if ought of the flesh of the consecrations, or of the bread, remain unto the morning, then thou shalt burn the remainder with fire: it shall not be eaten, because it is holy. 
And thus shalt thou do unto Aaron, and to his sons, according to all things which I have commanded thee: seven days shalt thou consecrate them. 
And thou shalt offer every day a bullock for a sin offering for atonement: and thou shalt cleanse the altar, when thou hast made an atonement for it, and thou shalt anoint it, to sanctify it. 
Seven days thou shalt make an atonement for the altar, and sanctify it; and it shall be an altar most holy: whatsoever toucheth the altar shall be holy. 
Now this is that which thou shalt offer upon the altar; two lambs of the first year day by day continually. 
The one lamb thou shalt offer in the morning; and the other lamb thou shalt offer at even: 
And with the one lamb a tenth deal of flour 
755,shout unto God with the voice of triumph. 
For the LORD most high is terrible; he is a great King over all the earth. 
He shall subdue the people under us, and the nations under our feet. 
He shall choose our inheritance for us, the excellency of Jacob whom he loved. Selah. 
God is gone up with a shout, the LORD with the sound of a trumpet. 
Sing praises to God, sing praises: sing praises unto our King, sing praises. 
For God is the King of all the earth: sing ye praises with understanding. 
God reigneth over the heathen: God sitteth upon the throne of his holiness. 
The princes of the people are gathered together, even the people of the God of Abraham: for the shields of the earth belong unto God: he is greatly exalted. 
Great is the LORD, and 
996,Lord, it is done as thou hast commanded, and yet there is room. 
And the lord said unto the servant, Go out into the highways and hedges, and compel them to come in, that my house may be filled. 
For I say unto you, That none of those men which were bidden shall taste of my supper. 
And there went great multitudes with him: and he turned, and said unto them, 
If any man come to me, and hate not his father, and mother, and wife, and children, and brethren, and sisters, yea, and his own life also, he cannot be my disciple. 
And whosoever doth not bear his cross, and come after me, cannot be my disciple. 
For which of you, intending to build a tower, sitteth not down first, and counteth the cost, whether he have sufficient to finish it? 
Lest haply, after he hath laid the foundation, and is not able to finish it, all that behold it begin to mock him, 
Saying, This man began to build, and was not able to finish. 
Or what king, going to make war against another king, sitteth not down fi
940,truth I say unto you, that he will make him ruler over all that he hath. 
But and if that servant say in his heart, My lord delayeth his coming; and shall begin to beat the menservants and maidens, and to eat and drink, and to be drunken; 
The lord of that servant will come in a day when he looketh not for him, and at an hour when he is not aware, and will cut him in sunder, and will appoint him his portion with the unbelievers. 
And that servant, which knew his lord's will, and prepared not himself, neither did according to his will, shall be beaten with many stripes. 
But he that knew not, and did commit things worthy of stripes, shall be beaten with few stripes. For unto whomsoever much is given, of him shall be much required: and to whom men have committed much, of him they will ask the more. 
I am come to send fire on the earth; and what will I, if it be already kindled? 
But I have a baptism to be baptized with; and how 
733,ron's hands, and upon his sons' hands, and waved them for a wave offering before the LORD. 
And Moses took them from off their hands, and burnt them on the altar upon the burnt offering: they were consecrations for a sweet savour: it is an offering made by fire unto the LORD. 
And Moses took the breast, and waved it for a wave offering before the LORD: for of the ram of consecration it was Moses' part; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And Moses took of the anointing oil, and of the blood which was upon the altar, and sprinkled it upon Aaron, and upon his garments, and upon his sons, and upon his sons' garments with him; and sanctified Aaron, and his garments, and his sons, and his sons' garments with him. 
And Moses said unto 
914,n the garden in the cool of the day: and Adam and his wife hid themselves from the presence of the LORD God amongst the trees of the garden. 
And the LORD God called unto Adam, and said unto him, Where art thou? 
And he said, I heard thy voice in the garden, and I was afraid, because I was naked; and I hid myself. 
And he said, Who told thee that thou wast naked? Hast thou eaten of the tree, whereof I commanded thee that thou shouldest not eat? 
And the man said, The woman whom thou gavest to be with me, she gave me of the tree, and I did eat. 
And the LORD God said unto the woman, What is this that thou hast done? And the woman said, The serpent beguiled me, and I did eat. 
And the LORD God said unto the serpent, Because thou hast done this, thou art cursed above all cattle, and above every beast of the field; upon thy belly shalt thou go, and dust shalt thou eat all the days of thy life: 
And I will
809,ce, and hast made thee an high place in every street. 
Thou hast built thy high place at every head of the way, and hast made thy beauty to be abhorred, and hast opened thy feet to every one that passed by, and multiplied thy whoredoms. 
Thou hast also committed fornication with the Egyptians thy neighbours, great of flesh; and hast increased thy whoredoms, to provoke me to anger. 
Behold, therefore I have stretched out my hand over thee, and have diminished thine ordinary food, and delivered thee unto the will of them that hate thee, the daughters of the Philistines, which are ashamed of thy lewd way. 
Thou hast played the whore also with the Assyrians, because thou wast unsatiable; yea, thou hast played the harlot with them, and yet couldest not be satisfied. 
Thou hast moreover multiplied thy fo
851,im at Gibeon. 
And the LORD said unto him, I have heard thy prayer and thy supplication, that thou hast made before me: I have hallowed this house, which thou hast built, to put my name there for ever; and mine eyes and mine heart shall be there perpetually. 
And if thou wilt walk before me, as David thy father walked, in integrity of heart, and in uprightness, to do according to all that I have commanded thee, and wilt keep my statutes and my judgments: 
Then I will establish the throne of thy kingdom upon Israel for ever, as I promised to David thy father, saying, There shall not fail thee a man upon the throne of Israel. 
But if ye shall at all turn from following me, ye or your children, and will not keep my commandments and my statutes which I have set before you, but go and serve other gods, and worship them: 
Then will I cut off Isr
839,cause he is poor: neither oppress the afflicted in the gate: 
For the LORD will plead their cause, and spoil the soul of those that spoiled them. 
Make no friendship with an angry man; and with a furious man thou shalt not go: 
Lest thou learn his ways, and get a snare to thy soul. 
Be not thou one of them that strike hands, or of them that are sureties for debts. 
If thou hast nothing to pay, why should he take away thy bed from under thee? 
Remove not the ancient landmark, which thy fathers have set. 
Seest thou a man diligent in his business? he shall stand before kings; he shall not stand before mean men. 
When thou sittest to eat with a ruler, consider diligently what is before thee: 
And put a knife to thy throat, if thou be a man given to appetite. 
Be not desirous of his dainties: for they are deceitful meat. 
Labour no
733,all he bring down, lay low, and bring to the ground, even to the dust. 
In that day shall this song be sung in the land of Judah; We have a strong city; salvation will God appoint for walls and bulwarks. 
Open ye the gates, that the righteous nation which keepeth the truth may enter in. 
Thou wilt keep him in perfect peace, whose mind is stayed on thee: because he trusteth in thee. 
Trust ye in the LORD for ever: for in the LORD JEHOVAH is everlasting strength: 
For he bringeth down them that dwell on high; the lofty city, he layeth it low; he layeth it low, even to the ground; he bringeth it even to the dust. 
The foot shall tread it down, even the feet of the poor, and the steps of the needy. 
The way of the just is uprig
874,n the altar to make an atonement for your souls: for it is the blood that maketh an atonement for the soul. 
Therefore I said unto the children of Israel, No soul of you shall eat blood, neither shall any stranger that sojourneth among you eat blood. 
And whatsoever man there be of the children of Israel, or of the strangers that sojourn among you, which hunteth and catcheth any beast or fowl that may be eaten; he shall even pour out the blood thereof, and cover it with dust. 
For it is the life of all flesh; the blood of it is for the life thereof: therefore I said unto the children of Israel, Ye shall eat the blood of no manner of flesh: for the life of all flesh is the blood thereof: whosoever eateth it shall be cut off. 
And every soul that eateth that which died of itself, or that which was torn with beasts, whether it be one of your own country, or a stran
1040, and bought with them the potter's field, to bury strangers in. 
Wherefore that field was called, The field of blood, unto this day. 
Then was fulfilled that which was spoken by Jeremy the prophet, saying, And they took the thirty pieces of silver, the price of him that was valued, whom they of the children of Israel did value; 
And gave them for the potter's field, as the Lord appointed me. 
And Jesus stood before the governor: and the governor asked him, saying, Art thou the King of the Jews? And Jesus said unto him, Thou sayest. 
And when he was accused of the chief priests and elders, he answered nothing. 
Then said Pilate unto him, Hearest thou not how many things they witness against thee? 
And he answered him to never a word; insomuch that the governor marvelled greatly. 
Now at that feast the governor was wont to release unto the people a prisoner, whom they would. 
And they had then a notable prisoner, called Barabbas. 
Therefore when they were gathered together, Pilate said unto them, Whom will ye that I release un
1038, ram, and the bread that is in the basket by the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And they shall eat those things wherewith the atonement was made, to consecrate and to sanctify them: but a stranger shall not eat thereof, because they are holy. 
And if ought of the flesh of the consecrations, or of the bread, remain unto the morning, then thou shalt burn the remainder with fire: it shall not be eaten, because it is holy. 
And thus shalt thou do unto Aaron, and to his sons, according to all things which I have commanded thee: seven days shalt thou consecrate them. 
And thou shalt offer every day a bullock for a sin offering for atonement: and thou shalt cleanse the altar, when thou hast made an atonement for it, and thou shalt anoint it, to sanctify it. 
Seven days thou shalt make an atonement for the altar, and sanctify it; and it shall be an altar most holy: whatsoever toucheth the altar shall be holy. 
Now this is that which thou shalt offer upon the altar; two lambs of the first year day by day continually. 
871,eth witness of me; and I know that the witness which he witnesseth of me is true. 
Ye sent unto John, and he bare witness unto the truth. 
But I receive not testimony from man: but these things I say, that ye might be saved. 
He was a burning and a shining light: and ye were willing for a season to rejoice in his light. 
But I have greater witness than that of John: for the works which the Father hath given me to finish, the same works that I do, bear witness of me, that the Father hath sent me. 
And the Father himself, which hath sent me, hath borne witness of me. Ye have neither heard his voice at any time, nor seen his shape. 
And ye have not his word abiding in you: for whom he hath sent, him ye believe not. 
Search the scriptures; for in them ye think ye have eternal life: and they are they which testify of me. 
And ye will not come to me, that ye might 
840,jathsepher: 
And Caleb said, He that smiteth Kirjathsepher, and taketh it, to him will I give Achsah my daughter to wife. 
And Othniel the son of Kenaz, Caleb's younger brother, took it: and he gave him Achsah his daughter to wife. 
And it came to pass, when she came to him, that she moved him to ask of her father a field: and she lighted from off her ass; and Caleb said unto her, What wilt thou? 
And she said unto him, Give me a blessing: for thou hast given me a south land; give me also springs of water. And Caleb gave her the upper springs and the nether springs. 
And the children of the Kenite, Moses' father in law, went up out of the city of palm trees with the children of Judah into the wilderness of Judah, which lieth in the south of Arad; and they went and dwelt among the people. 
And Judah went with Simeon his brother, 
814,ambs, and they sprinkled the blood upon the altar. 
And they brought forth the he goats for the sin offering before the king and the congregation; and they laid their hands upon them: 
And the priests killed them, and they made reconciliation with their blood upon the altar, to make an atonement for all Israel: for the king commanded that the burnt offering and the sin offering should be made for all Israel. 
And he set the Levites in the house of the LORD with cymbals, with psalteries, and with harps, according to the commandment of David, and of Gad the king's seer, and Nathan the prophet: for so was the commandment of the LORD by his prophets. 
And the Levites stood with the instruments of David, and the priests with the trumpets. 
And Hezekiah commanded to offer the burnt offering upon the altar. An
1049,r the fig tree. 
And the angel that talked with me came again, and waked me, as a man that is wakened out of his sleep. 
And said unto me, What seest thou? And I said, I have looked, and behold a candlestick all of gold, with a bowl upon the top of it, and his seven lamps thereon, and seven pipes to the seven lamps, which are upon the top thereof: 
And two olive trees by it, one upon the right side of the bowl, and the other upon the left side thereof. 
So I answered and spake to the angel that talked with me, saying, What are these, my lord? 
Then the angel that talked with me answered and said unto me, Knowest thou not what these be? And I said, No, my lord. 
Then he answered and spake unto me, saying, This is the word of the LORD unto Zerubbabel, saying, Not by might, nor by power, but by my spirit, saith the LORD of hosts. 
Who art thou, O great mountain? before Zerubbabel thou shalt become a plain: and he shall bring forth the headstone thereof with shoutings, crying, Grace, grace unto it. 
Moreover the word of the LORD came unt
1045,e righteous, no, not one: 
There is none that understandeth, there is none that seeketh after God. 
They are all gone out of the way, they are together become unprofitable; there is none that doeth good, no, not one. 
Their throat is an open sepulchre; with their tongues they have used deceit; the poison of asps is under their lips: 
Whose mouth is full of cursing and bitterness: 
Their feet are swift to shed blood: 
Destruction and misery are in their ways: 
And the way of peace have they not known: 
There is no fear of God before their eyes. 
Now we know that what things soever the law saith, it saith to them who are under the law: that every mouth may be stopped, and all the world may become guilty before God. 
Therefore by the deeds of the law there shall no flesh be justified in his sight: for by the law is the knowledge of sin. 
But now the righteousness of God without the law is manifested, being witnessed by the law and the prophets; 
Even the righteousness of God which is by faith of Jesus Christ unto all and upon all th
843,ted out of it. 
My son, forget not my law; but let thine heart keep my commandments: 
For length of days, and long life, and peace, shall they add to thee. 
Let not mercy and truth forsake thee: bind them about thy neck; write them upon the table of thine heart: 
So shalt thou find favour and good understanding in the sight of God and man. 
Trust in the LORD with all thine heart; and lean not unto thine own understanding. 
In all thy ways acknowledge him, and he shall direct thy paths. 
Be not wise in thine own eyes: fear the LORD, and depart from evil. 
It shall be health to thy navel, and marrow to thy bones. 
Honour the LORD with thy substance, and with the firstfruits of all thine increase: 
So shall thy barns be filled with plenty, and thy presses shall burst out with new wine. 
My son, despise not the chastening of the LORD; 
822,se not, then is not Christ raised: 
And if Christ be not raised, your faith is vain; ye are yet in your sins. 
Then they also which are fallen asleep in Christ are perished. 
If in this life only we have hope in Christ, we are of all men most miserable. 
But now is Christ risen from the dead, and become the firstfruits of them that slept. 
For since by man came death, by man came also the resurrection of the dead. 
For as in Adam all die, even so in Christ shall all be made alive. 
But every man in his own order: Christ the firstfruits; afterward they that are Christ's at his coming. 
Then cometh the end, when he shall have delivered up the kingdom to God, even the Father; when he shall have put down all rule and all authority and power. 
For he must reign, till he hath put all enemies under his feet. 
The last
1032,e will be glad in his heart. 
And thou shalt speak unto him, and put words in his mouth: and I will be with thy mouth, and with his mouth, and will teach you what ye shall do. 
And he shall be thy spokesman unto the people: and he shall be, even he shall be to thee instead of a mouth, and thou shalt be to him instead of God. 
And thou shalt take this rod in thine hand, wherewith thou shalt do signs. 
And Moses went and returned to Jethro his father in law, and said unto him, Let me go, I pray thee, and return unto my brethren which are in Egypt, and see whether they be yet alive. And Jethro said to Moses, Go in peace. 
And the LORD said unto Moses in Midian, Go, return into Egypt: for all the men are dead which sought thy life. 
And Moses took his wife and his sons, and set them upon an ass, and he returned to the land of Egypt: and Moses took the rod of God in his hand. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, When thou goest to return into Egypt, see that thou do all those wonders before Pharaoh, which I have put in thine ha
937,be, even a scribe of the words of the commandments of the LORD, and of his statutes to Israel. 
Artaxerxes, king of kings, unto Ezra the priest, a scribe of the law of the God of heaven, perfect peace, and at such a time. 
I make a decree, that all they of the people of Israel, and of his priests and Levites, in my realm, which are minded of their own freewill to go up to Jerusalem, go with thee. 
Forasmuch as thou art sent of the king, and of his seven counsellors, to enquire concerning Judah and Jerusalem, according to the law of thy God which is in thine hand; 
And to carry the silver and gold, which the king and his counsellors have freely offered unto the God of Israel, whose habitation is in Jerusalem, 
And all the silver and gold that thou canst find in all the province of Babylon, with the freewill offering of the people, and of the priests, offering willingly for the house of their God which is in Jerusalem: 
That 
977,Thus Israel dwelt in the land of the Amorites. 
And Moses sent to spy out Jaazer, and they took the villages thereof, and drove out the Amorites that were there. 
And they turned and went up by the way of Bashan: and og the king of bashan went out against them, he, and all his people, to the battle at edrei. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Fear him not: for I have delivered him into thy hand, and all his people, and his land; and thou shalt do to him as thou didst unto Sihon king of the Amorites, which dwelt at Heshbon. 
So they smote him, and his sons, and all his people, until there was none left him alive: and they possessed his land. 
And the children of Israel set forward, and pitched in the plains of Moab on this side Jordan by Jericho. 
And Balak the son of Zippor saw all that Israel had done to the Amorites. 
And Moab was sore afraid of the people, because they were many: and Moab was distressed because of the children of Israel. 
And Moab said unto the el
893,inst him. 
Yea, they that feed of the portion of his meat shall destroy him, and his army shall overflow: and many shall fall down slain. 
And both of these kings' hearts shall be to do mischief, and they shall speak lies at one table; but it shall not prosper: for yet the end shall be at the time appointed. 
Then shall he return into his land with great riches; and his heart shall be against the holy covenant; and he shall do exploits, and return to his own land. 
At the time appointed he shall return, and come toward the south; but it shall not be as the former, or as the latter. 
For the ships of Chittim shall come against him: therefore he shall be grieved, and return, and have indignation against the holy covenant: so shall he do; he shall even return, and have intelligence with them that forsake the holy covenant. 
And arms shall stand on his part, and they shall pollute the
869, one that is hasty only to want. 
The getting of treasures by a lying tongue is a vanity tossed to and fro of them that seek death. 
The robbery of the wicked shall destroy them; because they refuse to do judgment. 
The way of man is froward and strange: but as for the pure, his work is right. 
It is better to dwell in a corner of the housetop, than with a brawling woman in a wide house. 
The soul of the wicked desireth evil: his neighbour findeth no favour in his eyes. 
When the scorner is punished, the simple is made wise: and when the wise is instructed, he receiveth knowledge. 
The righteous man wisely considereth the house of the wicked: but God overthroweth the wicked for their wickedness. 
Whoso stoppeth his ears at the cry of the poor, he also shall cry himself, but shall not be heard. 
A gift in secret pacifieth anger: and a reward in the bosom str
972, ye seed of Israel his servant, ye children of Jacob, his chosen ones. 
He is the LORD our God; his judgments are in all the earth. 
Be ye mindful always of his covenant; the word which he commanded to a thousand generations; 
Even of the covenant which he made with Abraham, and of his oath unto Isaac; 
And hath confirmed the same to Jacob for a law, and to Israel for an everlasting covenant, 
Saying, Unto thee will I give the land of Canaan, the lot of your inheritance; 
When ye were but few, even a few, and strangers in it. 
And when they went from nation to nation, and from one kingdom to another people; 
He suffered no man to do them wrong: yea, he reproved kings for their sakes, 
Saying, Touch not mine anointed, and do my prophets no harm. 
Sing unto the LORD, all the earth; shew forth from day to day his salvation. 
Declare his glory among the heathen; his marvellous works among all nations. 
For great is the LORD, and greatly to be praised: he also is
912,I will make thee like the top of a rock: thou shalt be a place to spread nets upon; thou shalt be built no more: for I the LORD have spoken it, saith the Lord GOD. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD to Tyrus; Shall not the isles shake at the sound of thy fall, when the wounded cry, when the slaughter is made in the midst of thee? 
Then all the princes of the sea shall come down from their thrones, and lay away their robes, and put off their broidered garments: they shall clothe themselves with trembling; they shall sit upon the ground, and shall tremble at every moment, and be astonished at thee. 
And they shall take up a lamentation for thee, and say to thee, How art thou destroyed, that wast inhabited of seafaring men, the renowned city, which wast strong in the sea, she and her inhabitants, which cause their terror to be on all that haunt it! 
Now shall the isles tremble in the day of thy fall; yea, the is
1071,y: where is thy zeal and thy strength, the sounding of thy bowels and of thy mercies toward me? are they restrained? 
Doubtless thou art our father, though Abraham be ignorant of us, and Israel acknowledge us not: thou, O LORD, art our father, our redeemer; thy name is from everlasting. 
O LORD, why hast thou made us to err from thy ways, and hardened our heart from thy fear? Return for thy servants' sake, the tribes of thine inheritance. 
The people of thy holiness have possessed it but a little while: our adversaries have trodden down thy sanctuary. 
We are thine: thou never barest rule over them; they were not called by thy name. 
Oh that thou wouldest rend the heavens, that thou wouldest come down, that the mountains might flow down at thy presence, 
As when the melting fire burneth, the fire causeth the waters to boil, to make thy name known to thine adversaries, that the nations may tremble at thy presence! 
When thou didst terrible things which we looked not for, thou camest down, the mountains flowed down at thy presence. 
For since the beginning 
1039,man, from the man that speaketh froward things; 
Who leave the paths of uprightness, to walk in the ways of darkness; 
Who rejoice to do evil, and delight in the frowardness of the wicked; 
Whose ways are crooked, and they froward in their paths: 
To deliver thee from the strange woman, even from the stranger which flattereth with her words; 
Which forsaketh the guide of her youth, and forgetteth the covenant of her God. 
For her house inclineth unto death, and her paths unto the dead. 
None that go unto her return again, neither take they hold of the paths of life. 
That thou mayest walk in the way of good men, and keep the paths of the righteous. 
For the upright shall dwell in the land, and the perfect shall remain in it. 
But the wicked shall be cut off from the earth, and the transgressors shall be rooted out of it. 
My son, forget not my law; but let thine heart keep my commandments: 
For length of days, and long life, and peace, shall they add to thee. 
Let not mercy and truth forsake thee: bind them about thy neck; 
987, to speak to the people this parable; A certain man planted a vineyard, and let it forth to husbandmen, and went into a far country for a long time. 
And at the season he sent a servant to the husbandmen, that they should give him of the fruit of the vineyard: but the husbandmen beat him, and sent him away empty. 
And again he sent another servant: and they beat him also, and entreated him shamefully, and sent him away empty. 
And again he sent a third: and they wounded him also, and cast him out. 
Then said the lord of the vineyard, What shall I do? I will send my beloved son: it may be they will reverence him when they see him. 
But when the husbandmen saw him, they reasoned among themselves, saying, This is the heir: come, let us kill him, that the inheritance may be ours. 
So they cast him out of the vineyard, and killed him. What therefore shall the lord of the vineyard do unto them? 
He shall come and destroy these husbandmen, and shall give the vineyard to others. A
858,rd of the LORD. 
And the king answered and said unto the man of God, Intreat now the face of the LORD thy God, and pray for me, that my hand may be restored me again. And the man of God besought the LORD, and the king's hand was restored him again, and became as it was before. 
And the king said unto the man of God, Come home with me, and refresh thyself, and I will give thee a reward. 
And the man of God said unto the king, If thou wilt give me half thine house, I will not go in with thee, neither will I eat bread nor drink water in this place: 
For so was it charged me by the word of the LORD, saying, Eat no bread, nor drink water, nor turn again by the same way that thou camest. 
So he went another way, and returned not by the way that he came to Bethel. 
Now there dwelt an old prophet in Bethel; and his sons came and told him all the works th
934, of Israel, which Pharaoh's taskmasters had set over them, were beaten, and demanded, Wherefore have ye not fulfilled your task in making brick both yesterday and to day, as heretofore? 
Then the officers of the children of Israel came and cried unto Pharaoh, saying, Wherefore dealest thou thus with thy servants? 
There is no straw given unto thy servants, and they say to us, Make brick: and, behold, thy servants are beaten; but the fault is in thine own people. 
But he said, Ye are idle, ye are idle: therefore ye say, Let us go and do sacrifice to the LORD. 
Go therefore now, and work; for there shall no straw be given you, yet shall ye deliver the tale of bricks. 
And the officers of the children of Israel did see that they were in evil case, after it was said, Ye shall not minish ought from your bricks of your daily task. 
And they met Moses and Aaron, who stood in the way, as they came forth from Pharaoh: 
And they s
730, Persia: and when I am gone forth, lo, the prince of Grecia shall come. 
But I will shew thee that which is noted in the scripture of truth: and there is none that holdeth with me in these things, but Michael your prince. 
Also I in the first year of Darius the Mede, even I, stood to confirm and to strengthen him. 
And now will I shew thee the truth. Behold, there shall stand up yet three kings in Persia; and the fourth shall be far richer than they all: and by his strength through his riches he shall stir up all against the realm of Grecia. 
And a mighty king shall stand up, that shall rule with great dominion, and do according to his will. 
And when he shall stand up, his kingdom shall be broken, and shall be divided t
950,heus, unto the church of the Thessalonians which is in God the Father and in the Lord Jesus Christ: Grace be unto you, and peace, from God our Father, and the Lord Jesus Christ. 
We give thanks to God always for you all, making mention of you in our prayers; 
Remembering without ceasing your work of faith, and labour of love, and patience of hope in our Lord Jesus Christ, in the sight of God and our Father; 
Knowing, brethren beloved, your election of God. 
For our gospel came not unto you in word only, but also in power, and in the Holy Ghost, and in much assurance; as ye know what manner of men we were among you for your sake. 
And ye became followers of us, and of the Lord, having received the word in much affliction, with joy of the Holy Ghost. 
So that ye were ensamples to all that believe in Macedonia and Achaia. 
For from you sounded out the word of the Lord not only in Macedonia and Achaia, but also in every place your faith to 
962, past. 
And there was war again: and David went out, and fought with the Philistines, and slew them with a great slaughter; and they fled from him. 
And the evil spirit from the LORD was upon Saul, as he sat in his house with his javelin in his hand: and David played with his hand. 
And Saul sought to smite David even to the wall with the javelin: but he slipped away out of Saul's presence, and he smote the javelin into the wall: and David fled, and escaped that night. 
Saul also sent messengers unto David's house, to watch him, and to slay him in the morning: and Michal David's wife told him, saying, If thou save not thy life to night, to morrow thou shalt be slain. 
So Michal let David down through a window: and he went, and fled, and escaped. 
And Michal took an image, and laid it in the bed, and put a pillow of goats' hair for his bolster, and covered it with a cloth. 
And when Saul sent messengers to take David, she said, He is sick. 
And Saul
869,dah rejoiced because of thy judgments, O LORD. 
For thou, LORD, art high above all the earth: thou art exalted far above all gods. 
Ye that love the LORD, hate evil: he preserveth the souls of his saints; he delivereth them out of the hand of the wicked. 
Light is sown for the righteous, and gladness for the upright in heart. 
Rejoice in the LORD, ye righteous; and give thanks at the remembrance of his holiness. 
O sing unto the LORD a new song; for he hath done marvellous things: his right hand, and his holy arm, hath gotten him the victory. 
The LORD hath made known his salvation: his righteousness hath he openly shewed in the sight of the heathen. 
He hath remembered his mercy and his truth toward the house of Israel: all the ends of the earth have seen the salvation of our God. 
Make a joyful noise unto the LORD, all the earth: make a loud noise, and re
927,the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, saying, If a woman have conceived seed, and born a man child: then she shall be unclean seven days; according to the days of the separation for her infirmity shall she be unclean. 
And in the eighth day the flesh of his foreskin shall be circumcised. 
And she shall then continue in the blood of her purifying three and thirty days; she shall touch no hallowed thing, nor come into the sanctuary, until the days of her purifying be fulfilled. 
But if she bear a maid child, then she shall be unclean two weeks, as in her separation: and she shall continue in the blood of her purifying threescore and six days. 
And when the days of her purifying are fulfilled, for a son, or for a daughter, she shall bring a lamb of the first year for a burnt offering, and a young pigeon, or a turtledove, for a sin offering, unto the door of the tabernacle of the congr
953, I will give them an heart to know me, that I am the LORD: and they shall be my people, and I will be their God: for they shall return unto me with their whole heart. 
And as the evil figs, which cannot be eaten, they are so evil; surely thus saith the LORD, So will I give Zedekiah the king of Judah, and his princes, and the residue of Jerusalem, that remain in this land, and them that dwell in the land of Egypt: 
And I will deliver them to be removed into all the kingdoms of the earth for their hurt, to be a reproach and a proverb, a taunt and a curse, in all places whither I shall drive them. 
And I will send the sword, the famine, and the pestilence, among them, till they be consumed from off the land that I gave unto them and to their fathers. 
The word that came to Jeremiah concerning all the people of Judah in the fourth year of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah king of Judah, that was the first year of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon; 
The
953,he office of a deacon well purchase to themselves a good degree, and great boldness in the faith which is in Christ Jesus. 
These things write I unto thee, hoping to come unto thee shortly: 
But if I tarry long, that thou mayest know how thou oughtest to behave thyself in the house of God, which is the church of the living God, the pillar and ground of the truth. 
And without controversy great is the mystery of godliness: God was manifest in the flesh, justified in the Spirit, seen of angels, preached unto the Gentiles, believed on in the world, received up into glory. 
Now the Spirit speaketh expressly, that in the latter times some shall depart from the faith, giving heed to seducing spirits, and doctrines of devils; 
Speaking lies in hypocrisy; having their conscience seared with a hot iron; 
Forbidding to marry, and commanding to abstain from meats, which God hath created to be received with thanksgiving of them which believe and know 
838,e the LORD: 
This gate of the LORD, into which the righteous shall enter. 
I will praise thee: for thou hast heard me, and art become my salvation. 
The stone which the builders refused is become the head stone of the corner. 
This is the LORD's doing; it is marvellous in our eyes. 
This is the day which the LORD hath made; we will rejoice and be glad in it. 
Save now, I beseech thee, O LORD: O LORD, I beseech thee, send now prosperity. 
Blessed be he that cometh in the name of the LORD: we have blessed you out of the house of the LORD. 
God is the LORD, which hath shewed us light: bind the sacrifice with cords, even unto the horns of the altar. 
Thou art my God, and I will praise thee: thou art my God, I will exalt thee. 
O give thanks unto the LORD; for he is good: for his mercy endureth for ever. 
Blessed are the undefiled 
831,e will come when he shall have convenient time. 
Watch ye, stand fast in the faith, quit you like men, be strong. 
Let all your things be done with charity. 
I beseech you, brethren, (ye know the house of Stephanas, that it is the firstfruits of Achaia, and that they have addicted themselves to the ministry of the saints,) 
That ye submit yourselves unto such, and to every one that helpeth with us, and laboureth. 
I am glad of the coming of Stephanas and Fortunatus and Achaicus: for that which was lacking on your part they have supplied. 
For they have refreshed my spirit and your's: therefore acknowledge ye them that are such. 
The churches of Asia salute you. Aquila and Priscilla salute you much in the Lord, with the church that is in their house. 
All the brethren greet you. Greet ye one another with an holy kiss. 
T
985,hat Vashti come no more before king Ahasuerus; and let the king give her royal estate unto another that is better than she. 
And when the king's decree which he shall make shall be published throughout all his empire, (for it is great,) all the wives shall give to their husbands honour, both to great and small. 
And the saying pleased the king and the princes; and the king did according to the word of Memucan: 
For he sent letters into all the king's provinces, into every province according to the writing thereof, and to every people after their language, that every man should bear rule in his own house, and that it should be published according to the language of every people. 
After these things, when the wrath of king Ahasuerus was appeased, he remembered Vashti, and what she had done, and what was decreed against her. 
Then said the king's servants that ministered unto him, Let there be fair young virgins sought for the king: 
And let the king appoint officers in all
760,r comeliness; and when we shall see him, there is no beauty that we should desire him. 
He is despised and rejected of men; a man of sorrows, and acquainted with grief: and we hid as it were our faces from him; he was despised, and we esteemed him not. 
Surely he hath borne our griefs, and carried our sorrows: yet we did esteem him stricken, smitten of God, and afflicted. 
But he was wounded for our transgressions, he was bruised for our iniquities: the chastisement of our peace was upon him; and with his stripes we are healed. 
All we like sheep have gone astray; we have turned every one to his own way; and the LORD hath laid on him the iniquity of us all. 
He was oppressed, and he was afflicted, yet he opened not his mouth: he is brought as a lamb 
1052,e voice of the people in all that they say unto thee: for they have not rejected thee, but they have rejected me, that I should not reign over them. 
According to all the works which they have done since the day that I brought them up out of Egypt even unto this day, wherewith they have forsaken me, and served other gods, so do they also unto thee. 
Now therefore hearken unto their voice: howbeit yet protest solemnly unto them, and shew them the manner of the king that shall reign over them. 
And Samuel told all the words of the LORD unto the people that asked of him a king. 
And he said, This will be the manner of the king that shall reign over you: He will take your sons, and appoint them for himself, for his chariots, and to be his horsemen; and some shall run before his chariots. 
And he will appoint him captains over thousands, and captains over fifties; and will set them to ear his ground, and to reap his harvest, and to make his instruments of war, and instruments of his chariots. 
And he will take your daughters to be confection
755,said it, He destroyeth the perfect and the wicked. 
If the scourge slay suddenly, he will laugh at the trial of the innocent. 
The earth is given into the hand of the wicked: he covereth the faces of the judges thereof; if not, where, and who is he? 
Now my days are swifter than a post: they flee away, they see no good. 
They are passed away as the swift ships: as the eagle that hasteth to the prey. 
If I say, I will forget my complaint, I will leave off my heaviness, and comfort myself: 
I am afraid of all my sorrows, I know that thou wilt not hold me innocent. 
If I be wicked, why then labour I in vain? 
If I wash myself with snow water, and make my hands never so clean; 
Yet shalt thou plunge me in the ditch, and mine own clothes shall abhor 
1037,of Nun. 
Then came the daughters of Zelophehad, the son of Hepher, the son of Gilead, the son of Machir, the son of Manasseh, of the families of Manasseh the son of Joseph: and these are the names of his daughters; Mahlah, Noah, and Hoglah, and Milcah, and Tirzah. 
And they stood before Moses, and before Eleazar the priest, and before the princes and all the congregation, by the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, saying, 
Our father died in the wilderness, and he was not in the company of them that gathered themselves together against the LORD in the company of Korah; but died in his own sin, and had no sons. 
Why should the name of our father be done away from among his family, because he hath no son? Give unto us therefore a possession among the brethren of our father. 
And Moses brought their cause before the LORD. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
The daughters of Zelophehad speak right: thou shalt surely give them a possession of an inheritance among their father's brethren; and thou shalt cause the i
839,all the people, saying, 
Thus speaketh the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, saying, I have broken the yoke of the king of Babylon. 
Within two full years will I bring again into this place all the vessels of the LORD's house, that Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon took away from this place, and carried them to Babylon: 
And I will bring again to this place Jeconiah the son of Jehoiakim king of Judah, with all the captives of Judah, that went into Babylon, saith the LORD: for I will break the yoke of the king of Babylon. 
Then the prophet Jeremiah said unto the prophet Hananiah in the presence of the priests, and in the presence of all the people that stood in the house of the LORD, 
Even the prophet Jeremiah said, Amen: the LORD do so: the LORD perform thy words which thou hast prophesied, to bring again the vessels of the LORD's
879,nd the judgments, which the LORD commanded by the hand of Moses unto the children of Israel in the plains of Moab by Jordan near Jericho. 
These be the words which Moses spake unto all Israel on this side Jordan in the wilderness, in the plain over against the Red sea, between Paran, and Tophel, and Laban, and Hazeroth, and Dizahab. 
(There are eleven days' journey from Horeb by the way of mount Seir unto Kadeshbarnea.) 
And it came to pass in the fortieth year, in the eleventh month, on the first day of the month, that Moses spake unto the children of Israel, according unto all that the LORD had given him in commandment unto them; 
After he had slain Sihon the king of the Amorites, which dwelt in Heshbon, and Og the king of Bashan, which dwelt at Astaroth in Edrei: 
On this side Jordan, in the land of Moab, began Moses to declare this law, saying, 
The LORD our God 
1008,e midst of it. 
But the LORD is in his holy temple: let all the earth keep silence before him. 
A prayer of Habakkuk the prophet upon Shigionoth. 
O LORD, I have heard thy speech, and was afraid: O LORD, revive thy work in the midst of the years, in the midst of the years make known; in wrath remember mercy. 
God came from Teman, and the Holy One from mount Paran. Selah. His glory covered the heavens, and the earth was full of his praise. 
And his brightness was as the light; he had horns coming out of his hand: and there was the hiding of his power. 
Before him went the pestilence, and burning coals went forth at his feet. 
He stood, and measured the earth: he beheld, and drove asunder the nations; and the everlasting mountains were scattered, the perpetual hills did bow: his ways are everlasting. 
I saw the tents of Cushan in affliction: and the curtains of the land of Midian did tremble. 
Was the LORD displeased against the rivers? was thine anger against the rivers? was thy wrath against t
862,rds: and a man of understanding is of an excellent spirit. 
Even a fool, when he holdeth his peace, is counted wise: and he that shutteth his lips is esteemed a man of understanding. 
Through desire a man, having separated himself, seeketh and intermeddleth with all wisdom. 
A fool hath no delight in understanding, but that his heart may discover itself. 
When the wicked cometh, then cometh also contempt, and with ignominy reproach. 
The words of a man's mouth are as deep waters, and the wellspring of wisdom as a flowing brook. 
It is not good to accept the person of the wicked, to overthrow the righteous in judgment. 
A fool's lips enter into contention, and his mouth calleth for strokes. 
A fool's mouth is his destruction, and his lips are the snare of his soul. 
The words of a talebearer are as wounds, and they go down into the innermost parts of 
720,ss the cedar, the shittah tree, and the myrtle, and the oil tree; I will set in the desert the fir tree, and the pine, and the box tree together: 
That they may see, and know, and consider, and understand together, that the hand of the LORD hath done this, and the Holy One of Israel hath created it. 
Produce your cause, saith the LORD; bring forth your strong reasons, saith the King of Jacob. 
Let them bring them forth, and shew us what shall happen: let them shew the former things, what they be, that we may consider them, and know the latter end of them; or declare us things for to come. 
Shew the things that are to come hereafter, that we may know that ye are gods: yea, do good, or do evil, that we may be dis
1022,had put Jeremiah in the dungeon; the king then sitting in the gate of Benjamin; 
Ebedmelech went forth out of the king's house, and spake to the king saying, 
My lord the king, these men have done evil in all that they have done to Jeremiah the prophet, whom they have cast into the dungeon; and he is like to die for hunger in the place where he is: for there is no more bread in the city. 
Then the king commanded Ebedmelech the Ethiopian, saying, Take from hence thirty men with thee, and take up Jeremiah the prophet out of the dungeon, before he die. 
So Ebedmelech took the men with him, and went into the house of the king under the treasury, and took thence old cast clouts and old rotten rags, and let them down by cords into the dungeon to Jeremiah. 
And Ebedmelech the Ethiopian said unto Jeremiah, Put now these old cast clouts and rotten rags under thine armholes under the cords. And Jeremiah did so. 
So they drew up Jeremiah with cords, and took him up out of the dungeon: and Jeremiah remained in the cour
896,eeter than honey? And what is stronger than a lion? and he said unto them, If ye had not plowed with my heifer, ye had not found out my riddle. 
And the Spirit of the LORD came upon him, and he went down to Ashkelon, and slew thirty men of them, and took their spoil, and gave change of garments unto them which expounded the riddle. And his anger was kindled, and he went up to his father's house. 
But Samson's wife was given to his companion, whom he had used as his friend. 
But it came to pass within a while after, in the time of wheat harvest, that Samson visited his wife with a kid; and he said, I will go in to my wife into the chamber. But her father would not suffer him to go in. 
And her father said, I verily thought that thou hadst utterly hated her; therefore I gave her to thy companion: is not her younger sister fairer than she? take her, I pray thee, instead of her. 
And Sam
971, hand to the nail, and her right hand to the workmen's hammer; and with the hammer she smote Sisera, she smote off his head, when she had pierced and stricken through his temples. 
At her feet he bowed, he fell, he lay down: at her feet he bowed, he fell: where he bowed, there he fell down dead. 
The mother of Sisera looked out at a window, and cried through the lattice, Why is his chariot so long in coming? why tarry the wheels of his chariots? 
Her wise ladies answered her, yea, she returned answer to herself, 
Have they not sped? have they not divided the prey; to every man a damsel or two; to Sisera a prey of divers colours, a prey of divers colours of needlework, of divers colours of needlework on both sides, meet for the necks of them that take the spoil? 
So let all thine enemies perish, O LORD: but let them that love him be as the sun when he goeth forth in his might. And the land had rest forty years. 
And the children of Israel did evil in the sig
759,edst not, vineyards and olive trees, which thou plantedst not; when thou shalt have eaten and be full; 
Then beware lest thou forget the LORD, which brought thee forth out of the land of Egypt, from the house of bondage. 
Thou shalt fear the LORD thy God, and serve him, and shalt swear by his name. 
Ye shall not go after other gods, of the gods of the people which are round about you; 
(For the LORD thy God is a jealous God among you) lest the anger of the LORD thy God be kindled against thee, and destroy thee from off the face of the earth. 
Ye shall not tempt the LORD your God, as ye tempted him in Massah. 
Ye shall diligently keep the commandments of the LORD your God, and his testimonies, and his statutes, which he hath commanded thee. 
And thou
729,amuel to Ramah, and told him all that Saul had done to him. And he and Samuel went and dwelt in Naioth. 
And it was told Saul, saying, Behold, David is at Naioth in Ramah. 
And Saul sent messengers to take David: and when they saw the company of the prophets prophesying, and Samuel standing as appointed over them, the Spirit of God was upon the messengers of Saul, and they also prophesied. 
And when it was told Saul, he sent other messengers, and they prophesied likewise. And Saul sent messengers again the third time, and they prophesied also. 
Then went he also to Ramah, and came to a great well that is in Sechu: and he asked and said, Where are Samuel and David? And one said, Behold, they be at Naioth in Ramah. 
And h
919,u shalt hearken unto the voice of the LORD thy God, to keep his commandments and his statutes which are written in this book of the law, and if thou turn unto the LORD thy God with all thine heart, and with all thy soul. 
For this commandment which I command thee this day, it is not hidden from thee, neither is it far off. 
It is not in heaven, that thou shouldest say, Who shall go up for us to heaven, and bring it unto us, that we may hear it, and do it? 
Neither is it beyond the sea, that thou shouldest say, Who shall go over the sea for us, and bring it unto us, that we may hear it, and do it? 
But the word is very nigh unto thee, in thy mouth, and in thy heart, that thou mayest do it. 
See, I have set before thee this day life and good, and death and evil; 
In that I command thee this day to love the LORD thy God, to walk in his ways, and to keep his commandments and his statutes and his judgments, tha
1053,hen the captains of the chariots perceived that it was not the king of Israel, that they turned back from pursuing him. 
And a certain man drew a bow at a venture, and smote the king of Israel between the joints of the harness: wherefore he said unto the driver of his chariot, Turn thine hand, and carry me out of the host; for I am wounded. 
And the battle increased that day: and the king was stayed up in his chariot against the Syrians, and died at even: and the blood ran out of the wound into the midst of the chariot. 
And there went a proclamation throughout the host about the going down of the sun, saying, Every man to his city, and every man to his own country. 
So the king died, and was brought to Samaria; and they buried the king in Samaria. 
And one washed the chariot in the pool of Samaria; and the dogs licked up his blood; and they washed his armour; according unto the word of the LORD which he spake. 
Now the rest of the acts of Ahab, and all that he did, and the ivory house which he made, and all the cities that he built, are
888,O LORD God of my master Abraham, if now thou do prosper my way which I go: 
Behold, I stand by the well of water; and it shall come to pass, that when the virgin cometh forth to draw water, and I say to her, Give me, I pray thee, a little water of thy pitcher to drink; 
And she say to me, Both drink thou, and I will also draw for thy camels: let the same be the woman whom the LORD hath appointed out for my master's son. 
And before I had done speaking in mine heart, behold, Rebekah came forth with her pitcher on her shoulder; and she went down unto the well, and drew water: and I said unto her, Let me drink, I pray thee. 
And she made haste, and let down her pitcher from her shoulder, and said, Drink, and I will give thy camels drink also: so I drank, and she made the camels drink also. 
And I asked her, and said, Whose daughter art thou? And she said, the daughter of Bethuel
838, he that lieth with any manner of beast. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that lieth with his sister, the daughter of his father, or the daughter of his mother. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that lieth with his mother in law. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that smiteth his neighbour secretly. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that taketh reward to slay an innocent person. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that confirmeth not all the words of this law to do them. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
And it shall come to pass, if thou shalt hearken diligently unto the voice of the LORD thy God, to observe and to do all his commandments which I command thee this day, that the LORD thy God will set thee on high above all nations of the earth: 

782,ve him from death, and was heard in that he feared; 
Though he were a Son, yet learned he obedience by the things which he suffered; 
And being made perfect, he became the author of eternal salvation unto all them that obey him; 
Called of God an high priest after the order of Melchisedec. 
Of whom we have many things to say, and hard to be uttered, seeing ye are dull of hearing. 
For when for the time ye ought to be teachers, ye have need that one teach you again which be the first principles of the oracles of God; and are become such as have need of milk, and not of strong meat. 
For every one that useth milk is unskilful in the word of righteousness: for he is a babe. 
But strong meat belongeth to them that are of full age, even those who by reason of use have their se
917, Jesus. 
For he was numbered with us, and had obtained part of this ministry. 
Now this man purchased a field with the reward of iniquity; and falling headlong, he burst asunder in the midst, and all his bowels gushed out. 
And it was known unto all the dwellers at Jerusalem; insomuch as that field is called in their proper tongue, Aceldama, that is to say, The field of blood. 
For it is written in the book of Psalms, Let his habitation be desolate, and let no man dwell therein: and his bishoprick let another take. 
Wherefore of these men which have companied with us all the time that the Lord Jesus went in and out among us, 
Beginning from the baptism of John, unto that same day that he was taken up from us, must one be ordained to be a witness with us of his resurrection. 
And they appointed two, Joseph called Barsabas, who was surnamed Justus, and Matthias. 
And they prayed, and said, Thou, Lord, whic
905,e number that ye shall prepare, so shall ye do to every one according to their number. 
All that are born of the country shall do these things after this manner, in offering an offering made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And if a stranger sojourn with you, or whosoever be among you in your generations, and will offer an offering made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD; as ye do, so he shall do. 
One ordinance shall be both for you of the congregation, and also for the stranger that sojourneth with you, an ordinance for ever in your generations: as ye are, so shall the stranger be before the LORD. 
One law and one manner shall be for you, and for the stranger that sojourneth with you. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and say unto them, When ye come into the land whither I bring you, 
Then it shall be, that, when ye eat of the bread 
1030,And it came to pass, that a whole year they assembled themselves with the church, and taught much people. And the disciples were called Christians first in Antioch. 
And in these days came prophets from Jerusalem unto Antioch. 
And there stood up one of them named Agabus, and signified by the Spirit that there should be great dearth throughout all the world: which came to pass in the days of Claudius Caesar. 
Then the disciples, every man according to his ability, determined to send relief unto the brethren which dwelt in Judaea: 
Which also they did, and sent it to the elders by the hands of Barnabas and Saul. 
Now about that time Herod the king stretched forth his hands to vex certain of the church. 
And he killed James the brother of John with the sword. 
And because he saw it pleased the Jews, he proceeded further to take Peter also. (Then were the days of unleavened bread.) 
And when he had apprehended him, he put him in prison, and delivered him to four quaternions of soldiers to keep him; intending after Eas
1046, the LORD said unto me, Cast it unto the potter: a goodly price that I was prised at of them. And I took the thirty pieces of silver, and cast them to the potter in the house of the LORD. 
Then I cut asunder mine other staff, even Bands, that I might break the brotherhood between Judah and Israel. 
And the LORD said unto me, Take unto thee yet the instruments of a foolish shepherd. 
For, lo, I will raise up a shepherd in the land, which shall not visit those that be cut off, neither shall seek the young one, nor heal that that is broken, nor feed that that standeth still: but he shall eat the flesh of the fat, and tear their claws in pieces. 
Woe to the idol shepherd that leaveth the flock! the sword shall be upon his arm, and upon his right eye: his arm shall be clean dried up, and his right eye shall be utterly darkened. 
The burden of the word of the LORD for Israel, saith the LORD, which stretcheth forth the heavens, and layeth the foundation of the earth, and formeth the spirit of man within him. 
Behold, I will make Jerusale
882,hat thou hast commanded me. 
Look down from thy holy habitation, from heaven, and bless thy people Israel, and the land which thou hast given us, as thou swarest unto our fathers, a land that floweth with milk and honey. 
This day the LORD thy God hath commanded thee to do these statutes and judgments: thou shalt therefore keep and do them with all thine heart, and with all thy soul. 
Thou hast avouched the LORD this day to be thy God, and to walk in his ways, and to keep his statutes, and his commandments, and his judgments, and to hearken unto his voice: 
And the LORD hath avouched thee this day to be his peculiar people, as he hath promised thee, and that thou shouldest keep all his commandments; 
And to make thee high above all nations which he hath made, in praise, and in name, and in honour; and that thou mayest be an holy people unto the LORD thy God, as he hath 
982,I will set mine eyes upon them for evil, and not for good. 
And the Lord GOD of hosts is he that toucheth the land, and it shall melt, and all that dwell therein shall mourn: and it shall rise up wholly like a flood; and shall be drowned, as by the flood of Egypt. 
It is he that buildeth his stories in the heaven, and hath founded his troop in the earth; he that calleth for the waters of the sea, and poureth them out upon the face of the earth: The LORD is his name. 
Are ye not as children of the Ethiopians unto me, O children of Israel? saith the LORD. Have not I brought up Israel out of the land of Egypt? and the Philistines from Caphtor, and the Syrians from Kir? 
Behold, the eyes of the Lord GOD are upon the sinful kingdom, and I will destroy it from off the face of the earth; saving that I will not utterly destroy the house of Jacob, saith the LORD. 
For, lo, I will command, and I will sift the house of Israel among all nations, like as corn is sifted in a sieve,
833,imself, saying, I will be king: and he prepared him chariots and horsemen, and fifty men to run before him. 
And his father had not displeased him at any time in saying, Why hast thou done so? and he also was a very goodly man; and his mother bare him after Absalom. 
And he conferred with Joab the son of Zeruiah, and with Abiathar the priest: and they following Adonijah helped him. 
But Zadok the priest, and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, and Nathan the prophet, and Shimei, and Rei, and the mighty men which belonged to David, were not with Adonijah. 
And Adonijah slew sheep and oxen and fat cattle by the stone of Zoheleth, which is by Enrogel, and called all his brethren the king's sons, and all the men of Judah the king's servants: 
But Nathan the prophet, and Benaiah, and the mighty men, and Solomon his brother, he called
878,at dwell in the midst of them that rise up against me, a destroying wind; 
And will send unto Babylon fanners, that shall fan her, and shall empty her land: for in the day of trouble they shall be against her round about. 
Against him that bendeth let the archer bend his bow, and against him that lifteth himself up in his brigandine: and spare ye not her young men; destroy ye utterly all her host. 
Thus the slain shall fall in the land of the Chaldeans, and they that are thrust through in her streets. 
For Israel hath not been forsaken, nor Judah of his God, of the LORD of hosts; though their land was filled with sin against the Holy One of Israel. 
Flee out of the midst of Babylon, and deliver every man his soul: be not cut off in her iniquity; for this is the time of the LORD's vengeance; he will render unto her a recompence. 
Babylon hath been a golden cup in the
725,evil, know how to give good gifts unto your children, how much more shall your Father which is in heaven give good things to them that ask him? 
Therefore all things whatsoever ye would that men should do to you, do ye even so to them: for this is the law and the prophets. 
Enter ye in at the strait gate: for wide is the gate, and broad is the way, that leadeth to destruction, and many there be which go in thereat: 
Because strait is the gate, and narrow is the way, which leadeth unto life, and few there be that find it. 
Beware of false prophets, which come to you in sheep's clothing, but inwardly they are ravening wolves. 
Ye shall know them by their fruits. Do men gather grapes of thorns, or figs of thistles? 
Ev
974,rew away much people after him: he also perished; and all, even as many as obeyed him, were dispersed. 
And now I say unto you, Refrain from these men, and let them alone: for if this counsel or this work be of men, it will come to nought: 
But if it be of God, ye cannot overthrow it; lest haply ye be found even to fight against God. 
And to him they agreed: and when they had called the apostles, and beaten them, they commanded that they should not speak in the name of Jesus, and let them go. 
And they departed from the presence of the council, rejoicing that they were counted worthy to suffer shame for his name. 
And daily in the temple, and in every house, they ceased not to teach and preach Jesus Christ. 
And in those days, when the number of the disciples was multiplied, there arose a murmuring of the Grecians against the Hebrews, because their widows were neglected in the daily ministration. 
Then the twelve called the multitude of the disciples unto them
948,ild up; 
A time to weep, and a time to laugh; a time to mourn, and a time to dance; 
A time to cast away stones, and a time to gather stones together; a time to embrace, and a time to refrain from embracing; 
A time to get, and a time to lose; a time to keep, and a time to cast away; 
A time to rend, and a time to sew; a time to keep silence, and a time to speak; 
A time to love, and a time to hate; a time of war, and a time of peace. 
What profit hath he that worketh in that wherein he laboureth? 
I have seen the travail, which God hath given to the sons of men to be exercised in it. 
He hath made every thing beautiful in his time: also he hath set the world in their heart, so that no man can find out the work that God maketh from the beginning to the end. 
I know that there is no good in them, but for a man to rejoice, and to do good in his life. 
And also that every man should eat and drink, and enjoy the good of all his labour, it
949, unto the priests which were in the house of the LORD of hosts, and to the prophets, saying, Should I weep in the fifth month, separating myself, as I have done these so many years? 
Then came the word of the LORD of hosts unto me, saying, 
Speak unto all the people of the land, and to the priests, saying, When ye fasted and mourned in the fifth and seventh month, even those seventy years, did ye at all fast unto me, even to me? 
And when ye did eat, and when ye did drink, did not ye eat for yourselves, and drink for yourselves? 
Should ye not hear the words which the LORD hath cried by the former prophets, when Jerusalem was inhabited and in prosperity, and the cities thereof round about her, when men inhabited the south and the plain? 
And the word of the LORD came unto Zechariah, saying, 
Thus speaketh the LORD of hosts, saying, Execute true judgment, and shew mercy and compassions every man to his brother: 
And oppress not the wido
992,ding to his ways. 
Yea, surely God will not do wickedly, neither will the Almighty pervert judgment. 
Who hath given him a charge over the earth? or who hath disposed the whole world? 
If he set his heart upon man, if he gather unto himself his spirit and his breath; 
All flesh shall perish together, and man shall turn again unto dust. 
If now thou hast understanding, hear this: hearken to the voice of my words. 
Shall even he that hateth right govern? and wilt thou condemn him that is most just? 
Is it fit to say to a king, Thou art wicked? and to princes, Ye are ungodly? 
How much less to him that accepteth not the persons of princes, nor regardeth the rich more than the poor? for they all are the work of his hands. 
In a moment shall they die, and the people shall be troubled at midnight, and pass away: and the mighty shall be taken away without hand. 
For his eyes are upon the ways of man, and he seeth all his goings. 
There is no darkness, nor shadow of death, where the wo
804,ed him, and he was put in a coffin in Egypt. 
Now these are the names of the children of Israel, which came into Egypt; every man and his household came with Jacob. 
Reuben, Simeon, Levi, and Judah, 
Issachar, Zebulun, and Benjamin, 
Dan, and Naphtali, Gad, and Asher. 
And all the souls that came out of the loins of Jacob were seventy souls: for Joseph was in Egypt already. 
And Joseph died, and all his brethren, and all that generation. 
And the children of Israel were fruitful, and increased abundantly, and multiplied, and waxed exceeding mighty; and the land was filled with them. 
Now there arose up a new king over Egypt, which knew not Joseph. 
And he said unto his people, Behold, the people of the children of Israel are more and mightier than we: 
Come on, let us deal wisely with them; le
840, came unto his own, and his own received him not. 
But as many as received him, to them gave he power to become the sons of God, even to them that believe on his name: 
Which were born, not of blood, nor of the will of the flesh, nor of the will of man, but of God. 
And the Word was made flesh, and dwelt among us, (and we beheld his glory, the glory as of the only begotten of the Father,) full of grace and truth. 
John bare witness of him, and cried, saying, This was he of whom I spake, He that cometh after me is preferred before me: for he was before me. 
And of his fulness have all we received, and grace for grace. 
For the law was given by Moses, but grace and truth came by Jesus Christ. 
No man hath seen God at any time, the only begotten Son, which is in the bosom of the Father, he hath declared him. 
And this is the record
825,into the degenerate plant of a strange vine unto me? 
For though thou wash thee with nitre, and take thee much soap, yet thine iniquity is marked before me, saith the Lord GOD. 
How canst thou say, I am not polluted, I have not gone after Baalim? see thy way in the valley, know what thou hast done: thou art a swift dromedary traversing her ways; 
A wild ass used to the wilderness, that snuffeth up the wind at her pleasure; in her occasion who can turn her away? all they that seek her will not weary themselves; in her month they shall find her. 
Withhold thy foot from being unshod, and thy throat from thirst: but thou saidst, There is no hope: no; for I have loved strangers, and after them will I go. 
As the thief is ashamed when he is found, so is the house of Israel ashamed; they, their kings, their princes, and 
987,eon the son of Joash, a man of Israel: for into his hand hath God delivered Midian, and all the host. 
And it was so, when Gideon heard the telling of the dream, and the interpretation thereof, that he worshipped, and returned into the host of Israel, and said, Arise; for the LORD hath delivered into your hand the host of Midian. 
And he divided the three hundred men into three companies, and he put a trumpet in every man's hand, with empty pitchers, and lamps within the pitchers. 
And he said unto them, Look on me, and do likewise: and, behold, when I come to the outside of the camp, it shall be that, as I do, so shall ye do. 
When I blow with a trumpet, I and all that are with me, then blow ye the trumpets also on every side of all the camp, and say, The sword of the LORD, and of Gideon. 
So Gideon, and the hundred men that were with him, came unto the outside of the camp in the beginning of the middle watch; and they had but newly set the watch: and they blew the trumpe
974,re gathered together, the floods stood upright as an heap, and the depths were congealed in the heart of the sea. 
The enemy said, I will pursue, I will overtake, I will divide the spoil; my lust shall be satisfied upon them; I will draw my sword, my hand shall destroy them. 
Thou didst blow with thy wind, the sea covered them: they sank as lead in the mighty waters. 
Who is like unto thee, O LORD, among the gods? who is like thee, glorious in holiness, fearful in praises, doing wonders? 
Thou stretchedst out thy right hand, the earth swallowed them. 
Thou in thy mercy hast led forth the people which thou hast redeemed: thou hast guided them in thy strength unto thy holy habitation. 
The people shall hear, and be afraid: sorrow shall take hold on the inhabitants of Palestina. 
Then the dukes of Edom shall be amazed; the mighty men of Moab, trembling shall take hold upon them; all the inhabitants of Canaan shall melt away. 
Fear and dread shall fall upon them; 
943,n, or by knowledge, or by prophesying, or by doctrine? 
And even things without life giving sound, whether pipe or harp, except they give a distinction in the sounds, how shall it be known what is piped or harped? 
For if the trumpet give an uncertain sound, who shall prepare himself to the battle? 
So likewise ye, except ye utter by the tongue words easy to be understood, how shall it be known what is spoken? for ye shall speak into the air. 
There are, it may be, so many kinds of voices in the world, and none of them is without signification. 
Therefore if I know not the meaning of the voice, I shall be unto him that speaketh a barbarian, and he that speaketh shall be a barbarian unto me. 
Even so ye, forasmuch as ye are zealous of spiritual gifts, seek that ye may excel to the edifying of the church. 
Wherefore let him that speaketh in an unknown tongue pray that he may interpret. 
For if I pray in an unknown tongue, my spirit
907,And they shall mock him, and shall scourge him, and shall spit upon him, and shall kill him: and the third day he shall rise again. 
And James and John, the sons of Zebedee, come unto him, saying, Master, we would that thou shouldest do for us whatsoever we shall desire. 
And he said unto them, What would ye that I should do for you? 
They said unto him, Grant unto us that we may sit, one on thy right hand, and the other on thy left hand, in thy glory. 
But Jesus said unto them, Ye know not what ye ask: can ye drink of the cup that I drink of? and be baptized with the baptism that I am baptized with? 
And they said unto him, We can. And Jesus said unto them, Ye shall indeed drink of the cup that I drink of; and with the baptism that I am baptized withal shall ye be baptized: 
But to sit on my right hand and on my left hand is not mine to give; but it shall be given to them for whom it is prepar
844,nces? now what is thy petition? and it shall be granted thee: or what is thy request further? and it shall be done. 
Then said Esther, If it please the king, let it be granted to the Jews which are in Shushan to do to morrow also according unto this day's decree, and let Haman's ten sons be hanged upon the gallows. 
And the king commanded it so to be done: and the decree was given at Shushan; and they hanged Haman's ten sons. 
For the Jews that were in Shushan gathered themselves together on the fourteenth day also of the month Adar, and slew three hundred men at Shushan; but on the prey they laid not their hand. 
But the other Jews that were in the king's provinces gathered themselves together, and stood for their lives, and had rest from their enemies, and slew of their foes seventy and five thousand, but they laid not their hands
729,twelve, whom also he named apostles; 
Simon, (whom he also named Peter,) and Andrew his brother, James and John, Philip and Bartholomew, 
Matthew and Thomas, James the son of Alphaeus, and Simon called Zelotes, 
And Judas the brother of James, and Judas Iscariot, which also was the traitor. 
And he came down with them, and stood in the plain, and the company of his disciples, and a great multitude of people out of all Judaea and Jerusalem, and from the sea coast of Tyre and Sidon, which came to hear him, and to be healed of their diseases; 
And they that were vexed with unclean spirits: and they were healed. 
And the whole multitude sought to touch him: for there went virtue out of him, and healed them all. 
And he lift
765,e shall make an atonement for the tabernacle of the congregation, and for the altar, and he shall make an atonement for the priests, and for all the people of the congregation. 
And this shall be an everlasting statute unto you, to make an atonement for the children of Israel for all their sins once a year. And he did as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto Aaron, and unto his sons, and unto all the children of Israel, and say unto them; This is the thing which the LORD hath commanded, saying, 
What man soever there be of the house of Israel, that killeth an ox, or lamb, or goat, in the camp, or that killeth it out of the camp, 
And bringeth it not unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, to offer an of
842,nto Asia Sopater of Berea; and of the Thessalonians, Aristarchus and Secundus; and Gaius of Derbe, and Timotheus; and of Asia, Tychicus and Trophimus. 
These going before tarried for us at Troas. 
And we sailed away from Philippi after the days of unleavened bread, and came unto them to Troas in five days; where we abode seven days. 
And upon the first day of the week, when the disciples came together to break bread, Paul preached unto them, ready to depart on the morrow; and continued his speech until midnight. 
And there were many lights in the upper chamber, where they were gathered together. 
And there sat in a window a certain young man named Eutychus, being fallen into a deep sleep: and as Paul was long preaching, he sunk down with sleep, and fell down from the third loft, and was taken up dead. 
And Paul went down, and fell
965,u by the mutual faith both of you and me. 
Now I would not have you ignorant, brethren, that oftentimes I purposed to come unto you, (but was let hitherto,) that I might have some fruit among you also, even as among other Gentiles. 
I am debtor both to the Greeks, and to the Barbarians; both to the wise, and to the unwise. 
So, as much as in me is, I am ready to preach the gospel to you that are at Rome also. 
For I am not ashamed of the gospel of Christ: for it is the power of God unto salvation to every one that believeth; to the Jew first, and also to the Greek. 
For therein is the righteousness of God revealed from faith to faith: as it is written, The just shall live by faith. 
For the wrath of God is revealed from heaven against all ungodliness and unrighteousness of men, who hold the truth in unrighteousness; 
Because that which may be known of God is manifest in them; for God hath shewed it unto them. 
For the invisible things of him from the 
725, that are called gods, whether in heaven or in earth, (as there be gods many, and lords many,) 
But to us there is but one God, the Father, of whom are all things, and we in him; and one Lord Jesus Christ, by whom are all things, and we by him. 
Howbeit there is not in every man that knowledge: for some with conscience of the idol unto this hour eat it as a thing offered unto an idol; and their conscience being weak is defiled. 
But meat commendeth us not to God: for neither, if we eat, are we the better; neither, if we eat not, are we the worse. 
But take heed lest by any means this liberty of your's become a stumbling block to them that are weak. 
For if any man see thee which hast knowledge sit at meat in the ido
827,and three hundred. 
Then the tribe of Gad: and the captain of the sons of Gad shall be Eliasaph the son of Reuel. 
And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were forty and five thousand and six hundred and fifty. 
All that were numbered in the camp of Reuben were an hundred thousand and fifty and one thousand and four hundred and fifty, throughout their armies. And they shall set forth in the second rank. 
Then the tabernacle of the congregation shall set forward with the camp of the Levites in the midst of the camp: as they encamp, so shall they set forward, every man in his place by their standards. 
On the west side shall be the standard of the camp of Ephraim according to their armies: and the captain of the sons of Ephraim shall be Elishama the son of Ammihud. 
And his host, and those that were number
974,, and thou shalt stand before me: and if thou take forth the precious from the vile, thou shalt be as my mouth: let them return unto thee; but return not thou unto them. 
And I will make thee unto this people a fenced brasen wall: and they shall fight against thee, but they shall not prevail against thee: for I am with thee to save thee and to deliver thee, saith the LORD. 
And I will deliver thee out of the hand of the wicked, and I will redeem thee out of the hand of the terrible. 
The word of the LORD came also unto me, saying, 
Thou shalt not take thee a wife, neither shalt thou have sons or daughters in this place. 
For thus saith the LORD concerning the sons and concerning the daughters that are born in this place, and concerning their mothers that bare them, and concerning their fathers that begat them in this land; 
They shall die of grievous deaths; they shall not be lamented; neither shall they be buried; but they shall be as dung upon the face of th
930,Pharaoh's daughter said unto her, Take this child away, and nurse it for me, and I will give thee thy wages. And the women took the child, and nursed it. 
And the child grew, and she brought him unto Pharaoh's daughter, and he became her son. And she called his name Moses: and she said, Because I drew him out of the water. 
And it came to pass in those days, when Moses was grown, that he went out unto his brethren, and looked on their burdens: and he spied an Egyptian smiting an Hebrew, one of his brethren. 
And he looked this way and that way, and when he saw that there was no man, he slew the Egyptian, and hid him in the sand. 
And when he went out the second day, behold, two men of the Hebrews strove together: and he said to him that did the wrong, Wherefore smitest thou thy fellow? 
And he said, Who made thee a prince and a judge over us? intendest thou to kill me, as thou killedst the Egyptian? And Moses feared,
769,e instruction of fools is folly. 
The heart of the wise teacheth his mouth, and addeth learning to his lips. 
Pleasant words are as an honeycomb, sweet to the soul, and health to the bones. 
There is a way that seemeth right unto a man, but the end thereof are the ways of death. 
He that laboureth laboureth for himself; for his mouth craveth it of him. 
An ungodly man diggeth up evil: and in his lips there is as a burning fire. 
A froward man soweth strife: and a whisperer separateth chief friends. 
A violent man enticeth his neighbour, and leadeth him into the way that is not good. 
He shutteth his eyes to devise froward things: moving his lips he bringeth evil to pass. 
The hoary head is a crown of glory, if it be found in the way of righteousness. 
He that
724,save him? 
If a brother or sister be naked, and destitute of daily food, 
And one of you say unto them, Depart in peace, be ye warmed and filled; notwithstanding ye give them not those things which are needful to the body; what doth it profit? 
Even so faith, if it hath not works, is dead, being alone. 
Yea, a man may say, Thou hast faith, and I have works: shew me thy faith without thy works, and I will shew thee my faith by my works. 
Thou believest that there is one God; thou doest well: the devils also believe, and tremble. 
But wilt thou know, O vain man, that faith without works is dead? 
Was not Abraham our father justified by works, when he had offered Isaac his son upon the altar? 
Seest thou how faith wro
888, a grievous whirlwind: it shall fall grievously upon the head of the wicked. 
The anger of the LORD shall not return, until he have executed, and till he have performed the thoughts of his heart: in the latter days ye shall consider it perfectly. 
I have not sent these prophets, yet they ran: I have not spoken to them, yet they prophesied. 
But if they had stood in my counsel, and had caused my people to hear my words, then they should have turned them from their evil way, and from the evil of their doings. 
Am I a God at hand, saith the LORD, and not a God afar off? 
Can any hide himself in secret places that I shall not see him? saith the LORD. Do not I fill heaven and earth? saith the LORD. 
I have heard what the prophets said, that prophesy lies in my name, saying, I have dreamed, I have dreamed. 
How long shall this be in the heart of the prophets that prophesy lies? yea
1044,eth out from between her feet, and toward her children which she shall bear: for she shall eat them for want of all things secretly in the siege and straitness, wherewith thine enemy shall distress thee in thy gates. 
If thou wilt not observe to do all the words of this law that are written in this book, that thou mayest fear this glorious and fearful name, THE LORD THY GOD; 
Then the LORD will make thy plagues wonderful, and the plagues of thy seed, even great plagues, and of long continuance, and sore sicknesses, and of long continuance. 
Moreover he will bring upon thee all the diseases of Egypt, which thou wast afraid of; and they shall cleave unto thee. 
Also every sickness, and every plague, which is not written in the book of this law, them will the LORD bring upon thee, until thou be destroyed. 
And ye shall be left few in number, whereas ye were as the stars of heaven for multitude; because thou wouldest not obey the voice of the LORD thy God. 
And it shall come to pass, that as the LORD rejoiced over you to do you good
787, the law; 
And art confident that thou thyself art a guide of the blind, a light of them which are in darkness, 
An instructor of the foolish, a teacher of babes, which hast the form of knowledge and of the truth in the law. 
Thou therefore which teachest another, teachest thou not thyself? thou that preachest a man should not steal, dost thou steal? 
Thou that sayest a man should not commit adultery, dost thou commit adultery? thou that abhorrest idols, dost thou commit sacrilege? 
Thou that makest thy boast of the law, through breaking the law dishonourest thou God? 
For the name of God is blasphemed among the Gentiles through you, as it is written. 
For circumcision verily profiteth, if thou keep the law: but if thou be a breaker of the law, thy circumcision is made uncircu
880,Abraham, and the God of Isaac, and the God of Jacob? God is not the God of the dead, but of the living. 
And when the multitude heard this, they were astonished at his doctrine. 
But when the Pharisees had heard that he had put the Sadducees to silence, they were gathered together. 
Then one of them, which was a lawyer, asked him a question, tempting him, and saying, 
Master, which is the great commandment in the law? 
Jesus said unto him, Thou shalt love the Lord thy God with all thy heart, and with all thy soul, and with all thy mind. 
This is the first and great commandment. 
And the second is like unto it, Thou shalt love thy neighbour as thyself. 
On these two commandments hang all the law and the prophets. 
While the Pharisees were gathered together, Jesus asked them, 
Saying, What think ye of Christ? whose son is he? They say unto him, The son of David. 
He sai
812,and she threw in two mites, which make a farthing. 
And he called unto him his disciples, and saith unto them, Verily I say unto you, That this poor widow hath cast more in, than all they which have cast into the treasury: 
For all they did cast in of their abundance; but she of her want did cast in all that she had, even all her living. 
And as he went out of the temple, one of his disciples saith unto him, Master, see what manner of stones and what buildings are here! 
And Jesus answering said unto him, Seest thou these great buildings? there shall not be left one stone upon another, that shall not be thrown down. 
And as he sat upon the mount of Olives over against the temple, Peter and James and John and Andrew asked him privately, 
Tell us, when shall these things be? and what shall be the sign w
883,elf: handle me, and see; for a spirit hath not flesh and bones, as ye see me have. 
And when he had thus spoken, he shewed them his hands and his feet. 
And while they yet believed not for joy, and wondered, he said unto them, Have ye here any meat? 
And they gave him a piece of a broiled fish, and of an honeycomb. 
And he took it, and did eat before them. 
And he said unto them, These are the words which I spake unto you, while I was yet with you, that all things must be fulfilled, which were written in the law of Moses, and in the prophets, and in the psalms, concerning me. 
Then opened he their understanding, that they might understand the scriptures, 
And said unto them, Thus it is written, and thus it behoved Christ to suffer, and to rise from the dead the third day: 
And that repentance and remission of sins should be preached in his name among all nations, beginni
821,icate. 
Take the millstones, and grind meal: uncover thy locks, make bare the leg, uncover the thigh, pass over the rivers. 
Thy nakedness shall be uncovered, yea, thy shame shall be seen: I will take vengeance, and I will not meet thee as a man. 
As for our redeemer, the LORD of hosts is his name, the Holy One of Israel. 
Sit thou silent, and get thee into darkness, O daughter of the Chaldeans: for thou shalt no more be called, The lady of kingdoms. 
I was wroth with my people, I have polluted mine inheritance, and given them into thine hand: thou didst shew them no mercy; upon the ancient hast thou very heavily laid thy yoke. 
And thou saidst, I shall be a lady for ever: so that thou didst not lay these things to thy heart, neither didst remember the latter end of it. 
Therefore hear now this, thou that art 
928, his fellows. 
I beheld, and the same horn made war with the saints, and prevailed against them; 
Until the Ancient of days came, and judgment was given to the saints of the most High; and the time came that the saints possessed the kingdom. 
Thus he said, The fourth beast shall be the fourth kingdom upon earth, which shall be diverse from all kingdoms, and shall devour the whole earth, and shall tread it down, and break it in pieces. 
And the ten horns out of this kingdom are ten kings that shall arise: and another shall rise after them; and he shall be diverse from the first, and he shall subdue three kings. 
And he shall speak great words against the most High, and shall wear out the saints of the most High, and think to change times and laws: and they shall be given into his hand until a time and times and the dividing of time. 
But the judgment shall sit, and they shall take away his dominion, to consume and t
859,nd Jesus answering said unto them, The children of this world marry, and are given in marriage: 
But they which shall be accounted worthy to obtain that world, and the resurrection from the dead, neither marry, nor are given in marriage: 
Neither can they die any more: for they are equal unto the angels; and are the children of God, being the children of the resurrection. 
Now that the dead are raised, even Moses shewed at the bush, when he calleth the Lord the God of Abraham, and the God of Isaac, and the God of Jacob. 
For he is not a God of the dead, but of the living: for all live unto him. 
Then certain of the scribes answering said, Master, thou hast well said. 
And after that they durst not ask him any question at all. 
And he said unto them, How say they that Christ is David's son? 
And David himself saith in the book of Psalms, The LORD s
898,o her, and brought money in their hand. 
And she made him sleep upon her knees; and she called for a man, and she caused him to shave off the seven locks of his head; and she began to afflict him, and his strength went from him. 
And she said, The Philistines be upon thee, Samson. And he awoke out of his sleep, and said, I will go out as at other times before, and shake myself. And he wist not that the LORD was departed from him. 
But the Philistines took him, and put out his eyes, and brought him down to Gaza, and bound him with fetters of brass; and he did grind in the prison house. 
Howbeit the hair of his head began to grow again after he was shaven. 
Then the lords of the Philistines gathered them together for to offer a great sacrifice unto Dagon their god, and to rejoice: for they said, Our god hath delivered Samson our enemy into our hand. 
And when the people saw him, they pra
866,t it. 
And they shall eat the flesh in that night, roast with fire, and unleavened bread; and with bitter herbs they shall eat it. 
Eat not of it raw, nor sodden at all with water, but roast with fire; his head with his legs, and with the purtenance thereof. 
And ye shall let nothing of it remain until the morning; and that which remaineth of it until the morning ye shall burn with fire. 
And thus shall ye eat it; with your loins girded, your shoes on your feet, and your staff in your hand; and ye shall eat it in haste: it is the LORD's passover. 
For I will pass through the land of Egypt this night, and will smite all the firstborn in the land of Egypt, both man and beast; and against all the gods of Egypt I will execute judgment: I am the LORD. 
And the blood shall be to you for a token upon the houses where ye are: and when I see the blood, I will pas
1038,es upon their shoulders. 
And the children of Israel did according to the word of Moses; and they borrowed of the Egyptians jewels of silver, and jewels of gold, and raiment: 
And the LORD gave the people favour in the sight of the Egyptians, so that they lent unto them such things as they required. And they spoiled the Egyptians. 
And the children of Israel journeyed from Rameses to Succoth, about six hundred thousand on foot that were men, beside children. 
And a mixed multitude went up also with them; and flocks, and herds, even very much cattle. 
And they baked unleavened cakes of the dough which they brought forth out of Egypt, for it was not leavened; because they were thrust out of Egypt, and could not tarry, neither had they prepared for themselves any victual. 
Now the sojourning of the children of Israel, who dwelt in Egypt, was four hundred and thirty years. 
And it came to pass at the end of the four hundred and thirty years, even the selfsame day it came to pass, that all the hosts of the LORD went out from th
965,he harp ceaseth. 
They shall not drink wine with a song; strong drink shall be bitter to them that drink it. 
The city of confusion is broken down: every house is shut up, that no man may come in. 
There is a crying for wine in the streets; all joy is darkened, the mirth of the land is gone. 
In the city is left desolation, and the gate is smitten with destruction. 
When thus it shall be in the midst of the land among the people, there shall be as the shaking of an olive tree, and as the gleaning grapes when the vintage is done. 
They shall lift up their voice, they shall sing for the majesty of the LORD, they shall cry aloud from the sea. 
Wherefore glorify ye the LORD in the fires, even the name of the LORD God of Israel in the isles of the sea. 
From the uttermost part of the earth have we heard songs, even glory to the righteous. But I said, My leanness, my leanness, woe unto me! the treacherous dealers have dealt treacherously; yea, the treachero
1037,Then came the word of the LORD unto Jeremiah in Tahpanhes, saying, 
Take great stones in thine hand, and hide them in the clay in the brickkiln, which is at the entry of Pharaoh's house in Tahpanhes, in the sight of the men of Judah; 
And say unto them, Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Behold, I will send and take Nebuchadrezzar the king of Babylon, my servant, and will set his throne upon these stones that I have hid; and he shall spread his royal pavilion over them. 
And when he cometh, he shall smite the land of Egypt, and deliver such as are for death to death; and such as are for captivity to captivity; and such as are for the sword to the sword. 
And I will kindle a fire in the houses of the gods of Egypt; and he shall burn them, and carry them away captives: and he shall array himself with the land of Egypt, as a shepherd putteth on his garment; and he shall go forth from thence in peace. 
He shall break also the images of Bethshemesh, that is in the land of Egypt; and the houses of the gods of the 
1038, said, So do, as thou hast said. 
And Abraham hastened into the tent unto Sarah, and said, Make ready quickly three measures of fine meal, knead it, and make cakes upon the hearth. 
And Abraham ran unto the herd, and fetcht a calf tender and good, and gave it unto a young man; and he hasted to dress it. 
And he took butter, and milk, and the calf which he had dressed, and set it before them; and he stood by them under the tree, and they did eat. 
And they said unto him, Where is Sarah thy wife? And he said, Behold, in the tent. 
And he said, I will certainly return unto thee according to the time of life; and, lo, Sarah thy wife shall have a son. And Sarah heard it in the tent door, which was behind him. 
Now Abraham and Sarah were old and well stricken in age; and it ceased to be with Sarah after the manner of women. 
Therefore Sarah laughed within herself, saying, After I am waxed old shall I have pleasure, my lord being old also? 
And the LORD said unto Abraham, Wherefore did Sarah laugh, saying, Shall I of a surety bea
1048, art the Son of God; thou art the King of Israel. 
Jesus answered and said unto him, Because I said unto thee, I saw thee under the fig tree, believest thou? thou shalt see greater things than these. 
And he saith unto him, Verily, verily, I say unto you, Hereafter ye shall see heaven open, and the angels of God ascending and descending upon the Son of man. 
And the third day there was a marriage in Cana of Galilee; and the mother of Jesus was there: 
And both Jesus was called, and his disciples, to the marriage. 
And when they wanted wine, the mother of Jesus saith unto him, They have no wine. 
Jesus saith unto her, Woman, what have I to do with thee? mine hour is not yet come. 
His mother saith unto the servants, Whatsoever he saith unto you, do it. 
And there were set there six waterpots of stone, after the manner of the purifying of the Jews, containing two or three firkins apiece. 
Jesus saith unto them, Fill the waterpots with water. And they filled them up to the brim. 
And he saith unto them, Draw out now, and bear unto the 
892,l the people shouted with a great shout, when they praised the LORD, because the foundation of the house of the LORD was laid. 
But many of the priests and Levites and chief of the fathers, who were ancient men, that had seen the first house, when the foundation of this house was laid before their eyes, wept with a loud voice; and many shouted aloud for joy: 
So that the people could not discern the noise of the shout of joy from the noise of the weeping of the people: for the people shouted with a loud shout, and the noise was heard afar off. 
Now when the adversaries of Judah and Benjamin heard that the children of the captivity builded the temple unto the LORD God of Israel; 
Then they came to Zerubbabel, and to the chief of the fathers, and said unto them, Let us build with you: for we seek your God, as ye do; and we do sacrifice unto him since the days of Esarhaddon king of 
786, hand of them that afflict thee; which have said to thy soul, Bow down, that we may go over: and thou hast laid thy body as the ground, and as the street, to them that went over. 
Awake, awake; put on thy strength, O Zion; put on thy beautiful garments, O Jerusalem, the holy city: for henceforth there shall no more come into thee the uncircumcised and the unclean. 
Shake thyself from the dust; arise, and sit down, O Jerusalem: loose thyself from the bands of thy neck, O captive daughter of Zion. 
For thus saith the LORD, Ye have sold yourselves for nought; and ye shall be redeemed without money. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD, My people went down aforetime into Egypt to sojourn there; and the Assyrian oppressed them without cause. 
Now therefore, what have I here, saith the LOR
1078,nce against the children of Judah, because they have shed innocent blood in their land. 
But Judah shall dwell for ever, and Jerusalem from generation to generation. 
For I will cleanse their blood that I have not cleansed: for the LORD dwelleth in Zion. 
The words of Amos, who was among the herdmen of Tekoa, which he saw concerning Israel in the days of Uzziah king of Judah, and in the days of Jeroboam the son of Joash king of Israel, two years before the earthquake. 
And he said, The LORD will roar from Zion, and utter his voice from Jerusalem; and the habitations of the shepherds shall mourn, and the top of Carmel shall wither. 
Thus saith the LORD; For three transgressions of Damascus, and for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because they have threshed Gilead with threshing instruments of iron: 
But I will send a fire into the house of Hazael, which shall devour the palaces of Benhadad. 
I will break also the bar of Damascus, and cut off the inhabitant from the plain of Aven, and him that holdeth the sceptre from the house of Eden: and the 
732,e LORD: 
The two pillars, and the two bowls of the chapiters that were on the top of the two pillars; and the two networks, to cover the two bowls of the chapiters which were upon the top of the pillars; 
And four hundred pomegranates for the two networks, even two rows of pomegranates for one network, to cover the two bowls of the chapiters that were upon the pillars; 
And the ten bases, and ten lavers on the bases; 
And one sea, and twelve oxen under the sea; 
And the pots, and the shovels, and the basons: and all these vessels, which Hiram made to king Solomon for the house of the LORD, were of bright brass. 
In the plain of Jordan did the king cast them, in the clay ground between Succoth and Zarthan. 
And Solomon left
810,e doors of thy house into the street, his blood shall be upon his head, and we will be guiltless: and whosoever shall be with thee in the house, his blood shall be on our head, if any hand be upon him. 
And if thou utter this our business, then we will be quit of thine oath which thou hast made us to swear. 
And she said, According unto your words, so be it. And she sent them away, and they departed: and she bound the scarlet line in the window. 
And they went, and came unto the mountain, and abode there three days, until the pursuers were returned: and the pursuers sought them throughout all the way, but found them not. 
So the two men returned, and descended from the mountain, and passed over, and came to Joshua the son of Nun, and told him all things that befell them: 
And they said unto Joshua, 
910, the LORD: surely I will remember thy wonders of old. 
I will meditate also of all thy work, and talk of thy doings. 
Thy way, O God, is in the sanctuary: who is so great a God as our God? 
Thou art the God that doest wonders: thou hast declared thy strength among the people. 
Thou hast with thine arm redeemed thy people, the sons of Jacob and Joseph. Selah. 
The waters saw thee, O God, the waters saw thee; they were afraid: the depths also were troubled. 
The clouds poured out water: the skies sent out a sound: thine arrows also went abroad. 
The voice of thy thunder was in the heaven: the lightnings lightened the world: the earth trembled and shook. 
Thy way is in the sea, and thy path in the great waters, and thy footsteps are not known. 
Thou leddest thy people like a flock by the hand of Moses and Aaron. 
Give ear, O my people, to my law: incline your ears to the words of my mouth. 
I will op
1044, twenty and seven provinces, unto every province according to the writing thereof, and unto every people after their language, and to the Jews according to their writing, and according to their language. 
And he wrote in the king Ahasuerus' name, and sealed it with the king's ring, and sent letters by posts on horseback, and riders on mules, camels, and young dromedaries: 
Wherein the king granted the Jews which were in every city to gather themselves together, and to stand for their life, to destroy, to slay and to cause to perish, all the power of the people and province that would assault them, both little ones and women, and to take the spoil of them for a prey, 
Upon one day in all the provinces of king Ahasuerus, namely, upon the thirteenth day of the twelfth month, which is the month Adar. 
The copy of the writing for a commandment to be given in every province was published unto all people, and that the Jews should be ready against that day to avenge themselves on their enemies. 
So the posts that rode upon mules and cam
955,stines passed on by hundreds, and by thousands: but David and his men passed on in the rereward with Achish. 
Then said the princes of the Philistines, What do these Hebrews here? And Achish said unto the princes of the Philistines, Is not this David, the servant of Saul the king of Israel, which hath been with me these days, or these years, and I have found no fault in him since he fell unto me unto this day? 
And the princes of the Philistines were wroth with him; and the princes of the Philistines said unto him, Make this fellow return, that he may go again to his place which thou hast appointed him, and let him not go down with us to battle, lest in the battle he be an adversary to us: for wherewith should he reconcile himself unto his master? should it not be with the heads of these men? 
Is not this David, of whom they sang one to another in dances, saying, Saul slew his thousands, and David his ten thousands? 
Then Achish called David
791,this hearken unto me, but walk contrary unto me; 
Then I will walk contrary unto you also in fury; and I, even I, will chastise you seven times for your sins. 
And ye shall eat the flesh of your sons, and the flesh of your daughters shall ye eat. 
And I will destroy your high places, and cut down your images, and cast your carcases upon the carcases of your idols, and my soul shall abhor you. 
And I will make your cities waste, and bring your sanctuaries unto desolation, and I will not smell the savour of your sweet odours. 
And I will bring the land into desolation: and your enemies which dwell therein shall be astonished at it. 
And I will scatter you among the heathen, and will draw out a sword after you: and your land shall be desolate, and your cities waste. 
Then shall the l
906,efore he made the rampart and the wall to lament; they languished together. 
Her gates are sunk into the ground; he hath destroyed and broken her bars: her king and her princes are among the Gentiles: the law is no more; her prophets also find no vision from the LORD. 
The elders of the daughter of Zion sit upon the ground, and keep silence: they have cast up dust upon their heads; they have girded themselves with sackcloth: the virgins of Jerusalem hang down their heads to the ground. 
Mine eyes do fail with tears, my bowels are troubled, my liver is poured upon the earth, for the destruction of the daughter of my people; because the children and the sucklings swoon in the streets of the city. 
They say to their mothers, Where is corn and wine? when they swooned as the wounded in the streets of the city, when their soul was poured out into their mothers' bosom. 
What thing shall I take to wit
998, and Sidon, a great multitude, when they had heard what great things he did, came unto him. 
And he spake to his disciples, that a small ship should wait on him because of the multitude, lest they should throng him. 
For he had healed many; insomuch that they pressed upon him for to touch him, as many as had plagues. 
And unclean spirits, when they saw him, fell down before him, and cried, saying, Thou art the Son of God. 
And he straitly charged them that they should not make him known. 
And he goeth up into a mountain, and calleth unto him whom he would: and they came unto him. 
And he ordained twelve, that they should be with him, and that he might send them forth to preach, 
And to have power to heal sicknesses, and to cast out devils: 
And Simon he surnamed Peter; 
And James the son of Zebedee, and John the brother of James; and he surnamed them Boanerges, which is, The sons of thunder: 
And Andrew, and Philip, and Bartholomew, and Matthew, and Thomas, and James the son of Alpha
916, God that is above. 
If I rejoice at the destruction of him that hated me, or lifted up myself when evil found him: 
Neither have I suffered my mouth to sin by wishing a curse to his soul. 
If the men of my tabernacle said not, Oh that we had of his flesh! we cannot be satisfied. 
The stranger did not lodge in the street: but I opened my doors to the traveller. 
If I covered my transgressions as Adam, by hiding mine iniquity in my bosom: 
Did I fear a great multitude, or did the contempt of families terrify me, that I kept silence, and went not out of the door? 
Oh that one would hear me! behold, my desire is, that the Almighty would answer me, and that mine adversary had written a book. 
Surely I would take it upon my shoulder, and bind it as a crown to me. 
I would declare unto him the number of my steps; as a prince would I go near unto him. 
If my land cry against me, or that the furrows likewise th
910,e, and praised God. 
And fear came on all that dwelt round about them: and all these sayings were noised abroad throughout all the hill country of Judaea. 
And all they that heard them laid them up in their hearts, saying, What manner of child shall this be! And the hand of the Lord was with him. 
And his father Zacharias was filled with the Holy Ghost, and prophesied, saying, 
Blessed be the Lord God of Israel; for he hath visited and redeemed his people, 
And hath raised up an horn of salvation for us in the house of his servant David; 
As he spake by the mouth of his holy prophets, which have been since the world began: 
That we should be saved from our enemies, and from the hand of all that hate us; 
To perform the mercy promised to our fathers, and to remember his holy covenant; 
The oath which he sware to our father Abraham, 
That he would grant unto us, that we being delivered out of the ha
755,e in pain, and labour to bring forth, O daughter of Zion, like a woman in travail: for now shalt thou go forth out of the city, and thou shalt dwell in the field, and thou shalt go even to Babylon; there shalt thou be delivered; there the LORD shall redeem thee from the hand of thine enemies. 
Now also many nations are gathered against thee, that say, Let her be defiled, and let our eye look upon Zion. 
But they know not the thoughts of the LORD, neither understand they his counsel: for he shall gather them as the sheaves into the floor. 
Arise and thresh, O daughter of Zion: for I will make thine horn iron, and I will make thy hoofs brass: and thou shalt beat in pieces many people: and I will consecrate their gain unto the LORD, and their subst
773,er's sheep at Bethlehem. 
And the Philistine drew near morning and evening, and presented himself forty days. 
And Jesse said unto David his son, Take now for thy brethren an ephah of this parched corn, and these ten loaves, and run to the camp of thy brethren; 
And carry these ten cheeses unto the captain of their thousand, and look how thy brethren fare, and take their pledge. 
Now Saul, and they, and all the men of Israel, were in the valley of Elah, fighting with the Philistines. 
And David rose up early in the morning, and left the sheep with a keeper, and took, and went, as Jesse had commanded him; and he came to the trench, as the host was going forth to the fight, and shouted for the battle. 
For Israel and the Philistines had put the battle in array, arm
873,am, behold, a vine was before me; 
And in the vine were three branches: and it was as though it budded, and her blossoms shot forth; and the clusters thereof brought forth ripe grapes: 
And Pharaoh's cup was in my hand: and I took the grapes, and pressed them into Pharaoh's cup, and I gave the cup into Pharaoh's hand. 
And Joseph said unto him, This is the interpretation of it: The three branches are three days: 
Yet within three days shall Pharaoh lift up thine head, and restore thee unto thy place: and thou shalt deliver Pharaoh's cup into his hand, after the former manner when thou wast his butler. 
But think on me when it shall be well with thee, and shew kindness, I pray thee, unto me, and make mention of me unto Pharaoh, and bring me out of this house: 
For indeed I was stolen away out of the land of the Hebrews: and here also have I done nothing that the
954, did not burden you: nevertheless, being crafty, I caught you with guile. 
Did I make a gain of you by any of them whom I sent unto you? 
I desired Titus, and with him I sent a brother. Did Titus make a gain of you? walked we not in the same spirit? walked we not in the same steps? 
Again, think ye that we excuse ourselves unto you? we speak before God in Christ: but we do all things, dearly beloved, for your edifying. 
For I fear, lest, when I come, I shall not find you such as I would, and that I shall be found unto you such as ye would not: lest there be debates, envyings, wraths, strifes, backbitings, whisperings, swellings, tumults: 
And lest, when I come again, my God will humble me among you, and that I shall bewail many which have sinned already, and have not repented of the uncleanness and fornication and lasciviousness which they have committed. 
This is the third time I am coming to you. In the mouth of two or three witnesses sha
763,ht, who worship the beast and his image, and whosoever receiveth the mark of his name. 
Here is the patience of the saints: here are they that keep the commandments of God, and the faith of Jesus. 
And I heard a voice from heaven saying unto me, Write, Blessed are the dead which die in the Lord from henceforth: Yea, saith the Spirit, that they may rest from their labours; and their works do follow them. 
And I looked, and behold a white cloud, and upon the cloud one sat like unto the Son of man, having on his head a golden crown, and in his hand a sharp sickle. 
And another angel came out of the temple, crying with a loud voice to him that sat on the cloud, Thrust in thy sickle, and reap: for the time is come for thee to reap; for the harvest of the ear
1046,y. 
Because ye have burned incense, and because ye have sinned against the LORD, and have not obeyed the voice of the LORD, nor walked in his law, nor in his statutes, nor in his testimonies; therefore this evil is happened unto you, as at this day. 
Moreover Jeremiah said unto all the people, and to all the women, Hear the word of the LORD, all Judah that are in the land of Egypt: 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, saying; Ye and your wives have both spoken with your mouths, and fulfilled with your hand, saying, We will surely perform our vows that we have vowed, to burn incense to the queen of heaven, and to pour out drink offerings unto her: ye will surely accomplish your vows, and surely perform your vows. 
Therefore hear ye the word of the LORD, all Judah that dwell in the land of Egypt; Behold, I have sworn by my great name, saith the LORD, that my name shall no more be named in the mouth of any man of Judah in all the land of Egypt, saying, The Lord GOD liveth. 
Behold, I will watch over them for evil, and no
981,he cometh to Bethsaida; and they bring a blind man unto him, and besought him to touch him. 
And he took the blind man by the hand, and led him out of the town; and when he had spit on his eyes, and put his hands upon him, he asked him if he saw ought. 
And he looked up, and said, I see men as trees, walking. 
After that he put his hands again upon his eyes, and made him look up: and he was restored, and saw every man clearly. 
And he sent him away to his house, saying, Neither go into the town, nor tell it to any in the town. 
And Jesus went out, and his disciples, into the towns of Caesarea Philippi: and by the way he asked his disciples, saying unto them, Whom do men say that I am? 
And they answered, John the Baptist; but some say, Elias; and others, One of the prophets. 
And he saith unto them, But whom say ye that I am? And Peter answereth and saith unto him, Thou art the Christ. 
And he charged them that they should tell no man of him. 
And he began to teach t
891,e temple was rent in twain from the top to the bottom. 
And when the centurion, which stood over against him, saw that he so cried out, and gave up the ghost, he said, Truly this man was the Son of God. 
There were also women looking on afar off: among whom was Mary Magdalene, and Mary the mother of James the less and of Joses, and Salome; 
(Who also, when he was in Galilee, followed him, and ministered unto him;) and many other women which came up with him unto Jerusalem. 
And now when the even was come, because it was the preparation, that is, the day before the sabbath, 
Joseph of Arimathaea, an honourable counsellor, which also waited for the kingdom of God, came, and went in boldly unto Pilate, and craved the body of Jesus. 
And Pilate marvelled if he were already dead: and calling unto him the centurion, he asked him whether he had been any while dead. 
And when he knew it
787,er suburbs; two cities. 
All the cities were ten with their suburbs for the families of the children of Kohath that remained. 
And unto the children of Gershon, of the families of the Levites, out of the other half tribe of Manasseh they gave Golan in Bashan with her suburbs, to be a city of refuge for the slayer; and Beeshterah with her suburbs; two cities. 
And out of the tribe of Issachar, Kishon with her suburbs, Dabareh with her suburbs, 
Jarmuth with her suburbs, Engannim with her suburbs; four cities. 
And out of the tribe of Asher, Mishal with her suburbs, Abdon with her suburbs, 
Helkath with her suburbs, and Rehob with her suburbs; four cities. 
And out of the tribe of Naphtali, Kedesh in Galilee with her suburbs, to be a city of refuge for the slayer; and Hammothdor
788,ad of the bullock before the LORD: and the bullock shall be killed before the LORD. 
And the priest that is anointed shall bring of the bullock's blood to the tabernacle of the congregation: 
And the priest shall dip his finger in some of the blood, and sprinkle it seven times before the LORD, even before the vail. 
And he shall put some of the blood upon the horns of the altar which is before the LORD, that is in the tabernacle of the congregation, and shall pour out all the blood at the bottom of the altar of the burnt offering, which is at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And he shall take all his fat from him, and burn it upon the altar. 
And he shall do with the bullock as he did with the bullock for a sin offering, so shall he do with this: and the priest 
836,e how ye hear: for whosoever hath, to him shall be given; and whosoever hath not, from him shall be taken even that which he seemeth to have. 
Then came to him his mother and his brethren, and could not come at him for the press. 
And it was told him by certain which said, Thy mother and thy brethren stand without, desiring to see thee. 
And he answered and said unto them, My mother and my brethren are these which hear the word of God, and do it. 
Now it came to pass on a certain day, that he went into a ship with his disciples: and he said unto them, Let us go over unto the other side of the lake. And they launched forth. 
But as they sailed he fell asleep: and there came down a storm of wind on the lake; and they were filled with water, and were in jeopardy. 
And they came to him, and awoke him, saying, Master, master, we 
1074, found sinners, is therefore Christ the minister of sin? God forbid. 
For if I build again the things which I destroyed, I make myself a transgressor. 
For I through the law am dead to the law, that I might live unto God. 
I am crucified with Christ: neverthless I live; yet not I, but Christ liveth in me: and the life which I now live in the flesh I live by the faith of the Son of God, who loved me, and gave himself for me. 
I do not frustrate the grace of God: for if righteousness come by the law, then Christ is dead in vain. 
O foolish Galatians, who hath bewitched you, that ye should not obey the truth, before whose eyes Jesus Christ hath been evidently set forth, crucified among you? 
This only would I learn of you, Received ye the Spirit by the works of the law, or by the hearing of faith? 
Are ye so foolish? having begun in the Spirit, are ye now made perfect by the flesh? 
Have ye suffered so many things in vain? if it be yet in vain. 
He therefore that ministereth to you the Spirit, and worketh miracles among you, doeth he it by the works of the law,
956,was meat for all: the beasts of the field had shadow under it, and the fowls of the heaven dwelt in the boughs thereof, and all flesh was fed of it. 
I saw in the visions of my head upon my bed, and, behold, a watcher and an holy one came down from heaven; 
He cried aloud, and said thus, Hew down the tree, and cut off his branches, shake off his leaves, and scatter his fruit: let the beasts get away from under it, and the fowls from his branches: 
Nevertheless leave the stump of his roots in the earth, even with a band of iron and brass, in the tender grass of the field; and let it be wet with the dew of heaven, and let his portion be with the beasts in the grass of the earth: 
Let his heart be changed from man's, and let a beast's heart be given unto him; and let seven times pass over him. 
This matter is by the decree of the watchers, and the demand by the word of the holy ones: to the intent that the living may know that the most High rule
1045,e far from me; thou hast made me an abomination unto them: I am shut up, and I cannot come forth. 
Mine eye mourneth by reason of affliction: LORD, I have called daily upon thee, I have stretched out my hands unto thee. 
Wilt thou shew wonders to the dead? shall the dead arise and praise thee? Selah. 
Shall thy lovingkindness be declared in the grave? or thy faithfulness in destruction? 
Shall thy wonders be known in the dark? and thy righteousness in the land of forgetfulness? 
But unto thee have I cried, O LORD; and in the morning shall my prayer prevent thee. 
LORD, why castest thou off my soul? why hidest thou thy face from me? 
I am afflicted and ready to die from my youth up: while I suffer thy terrors I am distracted. 
Thy fierce wrath goeth over me; thy terrors have cut me off. 
They came round about me daily like water; they compassed me about together. 
Lover and friend hast thou put far from me, and mine acquaintance into darkness. 
I will sing of the mercies of the LORD for ever: with my mouth will I make known thy fa
733,bmitted themselves unto Solomon the king. 
And the LORD magnified Solomon exceedingly in the sight of all Israel, and bestowed upon him such royal majesty as had not been on any king before him in Israel. 
Thus David the son of Jesse reigned over all Israel. 
And the time that he reigned over Israel was forty years; seven years reigned he in Hebron, and thirty and three years reigned he in Jerusalem. 
And he died in a good old age, full of days, riches, and honour: and Solomon his son reigned in his stead. 
Now the acts of David the king, first and last, behold, they are written in the book of Samuel the seer, and in the book of Nathan the prophet, and in the book of Gad the seer, 
With all his reign and his might, and the 
884,, turned back, and with a loud voice glorified God, 
And fell down on his face at his feet, giving him thanks: and he was a Samaritan. 
And Jesus answering said, Were there not ten cleansed? but where are the nine? 
There are not found that returned to give glory to God, save this stranger. 
And he said unto him, Arise, go thy way: thy faith hath made thee whole. 
And when he was demanded of the Pharisees, when the kingdom of God should come, he answered them and said, The kingdom of God cometh not with observation: 
Neither shall they say, Lo here! or, lo there! for, behold, the kingdom of God is within you. 
And he said unto the disciples, The days will come, when ye shall desire to see one of the days of the Son of man, and ye shall not see it. 
And they shall say to you, See here; or, see there: go not after them, nor follow them. 
For as the lightning, that lightenet
902, the south shall come to the king of the north to make an agreement: but she shall not retain the power of the arm; neither shall he stand, nor his arm: but she shall be given up, and they that brought her, and he that begat her, and he that strengthened her in these times. 
But out of a branch of her roots shall one stand up in his estate, which shall come with an army, and shall enter into the fortress of the king of the north, and shall deal against them, and shall prevail: 
And shall also carry captives into Egypt their gods, with their princes, and with their precious vessels of silver and of gold; and he shall continue more years than the king of the north. 
So the king of the south shall come into his kingdom, and shall return into his own land. 
But his sons shall be stirred up, and shall assemble a multitude of great forces: and one shall certainly come, and overflow, and pass thr
1072,t, and called on the name of Baal from morning even until noon, saying, O Baal, hear us. But there was no voice, nor any that answered. And they leaped upon the altar which was made. 
And it came to pass at noon, that Elijah mocked them, and said, Cry aloud: for he is a god; either he is talking, or he is pursuing, or he is in a journey, or peradventure he sleepeth, and must be awaked. 
And they cried aloud, and cut themselves after their manner with knives and lancets, till the blood gushed out upon them. 
And it came to pass, when midday was past, and they prophesied until the time of the offering of the evening sacrifice, that there was neither voice, nor any to answer, nor any that regarded. 
And Elijah said unto all the people, Come near unto me. And all the people came near unto him. And he repaired the altar of the LORD that was broken down. 
And Elijah took twelve stones, according to the number of the tribes of the sons of Jacob, unto whom the word of the LORD came, saying, Israel shall be thy name: 
And with the stones he built an altar in the na
741,is inwards and his legs shall he wash in water: and the priest shall burn all on the altar, to be a burnt sacrifice, an offering made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And if his offering be of the flocks, namely, of the sheep, or of the goats, for a burnt sacrifice; he shall bring it a male without blemish. 
And he shall kill it on the side of the altar northward before the LORD: and the priests, Aaron's sons, shall sprinkle his blood round about upon the altar. 
And he shall cut it into his pieces, with his head and his fat: and the priest shall lay them in order on the wood that is on the fire which is upon the altar: 
But he shall wash the inwards and the legs with water: and the priest shall bring it all, and burn it 
855,, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Come from the four winds, O breath, and breathe upon these slain, that they may live. 
So I prophesied as he commanded me, and the breath came into them, and they lived, and stood up upon their feet, an exceeding great army. 
Then he said unto me, Son of man, these bones are the whole house of Israel: behold, they say, Our bones are dried, and our hope is lost: we are cut off for our parts. 
Therefore prophesy and say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, O my people, I will open your graves, and cause you to come up out of your graves, and bring you into the land of Israel. 
And ye shall know that I am the LORD, when I have opened your graves, O my people, and brought you up out of your graves, 
And shall put my spirit in you, and ye shall live, and I shall place you in your own land: then shall ye know that I
756,mber the days of old; I meditate on all thy works; I muse on the work of thy hands. 
I stretch forth my hands unto thee: my soul thirsteth after thee, as a thirsty land. Selah. 
Hear me speedily, O LORD: my spirit faileth: hide not thy face from me, lest I be like unto them that go down into the pit. 
Cause me to hear thy lovingkindness in the morning; for in thee do I trust: cause me to know the way wherein I should walk; for I lift up my soul unto thee. 
Deliver me, O LORD, from mine enemies: I flee unto thee to hide me. 
Teach me to do thy will; for thou art my God: thy spirit is good; lead me into the land of uprightness. 
Quicken me, O LORD, for thy name's sake: for thy righteousness' sake bring my soul out of trouble. 
And of thy mercy cut 
779,ur, were seventeen thousand and two hundred soldiers, fit to go out for war and battle. 
Shuppim also, and Huppim, the children of Ir, and Hushim, the sons of Aher. 
The sons of Naphtali; Jahziel, and Guni, and Jezer, and Shallum, the sons of Bilhah. 
The sons of Manasseh; Ashriel, whom she bare: (but his concubine the Aramitess bare Machir the father of Gilead: 
And Machir took to wife the sister of Huppim and Shuppim, whose sister's name was Maachah;) and the name of the second was Zelophehad: and Zelophehad had daughters. 
And Maachah the wife of Machir bare a son, and she called his name Peresh; and the name of his brother was Sheresh; and his sons were Ulam and Rakem. 
And the sons of Ulam; Bedan. These were the sons of Gilead, the son of Machir, the son of Manass
816,d in their hand to slay us. 
And Moses returned unto the LORD, and said, LORD, wherefore hast thou so evil entreated this people? why is it that thou hast sent me? 
For since I came to Pharaoh to speak in thy name, he hath done evil to this people; neither hast thou delivered thy people at all. 
Then the LORD said unto Moses, Now shalt thou see what I will do to Pharaoh: for with a strong hand shall he let them go, and with a strong hand shall he drive them out of his land. 
And God spake unto Moses, and said unto him, I am the LORD: 
And I appeared unto Abraham, unto Isaac, and unto Jacob, by the name of God Almighty, but by my name JEHOVAH was I not known to them. 
And I have also established my covenant with them, to give them the land of Canaan, the land of their pilgrimage, wherein they were stranger
1047,hings unto this day. 
I write not these things to shame you, but as my beloved sons I warn you. 
For though ye have ten thousand instructers in Christ, yet have ye not many fathers: for in Christ Jesus I have begotten you through the gospel. 
Wherefore I beseech you, be ye followers of me. 
For this cause have I sent unto you Timotheus, who is my beloved son, and faithful in the Lord, who shall bring you into remembrance of my ways which be in Christ, as I teach every where in every church. 
Now some are puffed up, as though I would not come to you. 
But I will come to you shortly, if the Lord will, and will know, not the speech of them which are puffed up, but the power. 
For the kingdom of God is not in word, but in power. 
What will ye? shall I come unto you with a rod, or in love, and in the spirit of meekness? 
It is reported commonly that there is fornication among you, and such fornication as is not so much as named among the Gentiles, that one should have his father's wife. 
And ye are puffed up, and have not rather mourned
964,beloved, understand the words that I speak unto thee, and stand upright: for unto thee am I now sent. And when he had spoken this word unto me, I stood trembling. 
Then said he unto me, Fear not, Daniel: for from the first day that thou didst set thine heart to understand, and to chasten thyself before thy God, thy words were heard, and I am come for thy words. 
But the prince of the kingdom of Persia withstood me one and twenty days: but, lo, Michael, one of the chief princes, came to help me; and I remained there with the kings of Persia. 
Now I am come to make thee understand what shall befall thy people in the latter days: for yet the vision is for many days. 
And when he had spoken such words unto me, I set my face toward the ground, and I became dumb. 
And, behold, one like the similitude of the sons of men touched my lips: then I opened my mouth, and spake, and said unto him that stood before me, O my lord, by the vision my sorrows are turned 
824,eign, and he reigned eight years in Jerusalem. 
And he walked in the way of the kings of Israel, like as did the house of Ahab: for he had the daughter of Ahab to wife: and he wrought that which was evil in the eyes of the LORD. 
Howbeit the LORD would not destroy the house of David, because of the covenant that he had made with David, and as he promised to give a light to him and to his sons for ever. 
In his days the Edomites revolted from under the dominion of Judah, and made themselves a king. 
Then Jehoram went forth with his princes, and all his chariots with him: and he rose up by night, and smote the Edomites which compassed him in, and the captains of the chariots. 
So the Edomites revolted from under the hand of Judah unto this day. The same time also did Libnah revolt from under his hand; because he ha
1075,in their brother, and said, There is one tribe cut off from Israel this day. 
How shall we do for wives for them that remain, seeing we have sworn by the LORD that we will not give them of our daughters to wives? 
And they said, What one is there of the tribes of Israel that came not up to Mizpeh to the LORD? And, behold, there came none to the camp from Jabeshgilead to the assembly. 
For the people were numbered, and, behold, there were none of the inhabitants of Jabeshgilead there. 
And the congregation sent thither twelve thousand men of the valiantest, and commanded them, saying, Go and smite the inhabitants of Jabeshgilead with the edge of the sword, with the women and the children. 
And this is the thing that ye shall do, Ye shall utterly destroy every male, and every woman that hath lain by man. 
And they found among the inhabitants of Jabeshgilead four hundred young virgins, that had known no man by lying with any male: and they brought them unto the camp to Shiloh, which is in the land of Canaan. 
And the whole congregation sent some to speak to the 
841,as a shepherd doth his flock. 
For the LORD hath redeemed Jacob, and ransomed him from the hand of him that was stronger than he. 
Therefore they shall come and sing in the height of Zion, and shall flow together to the goodness of the LORD, for wheat, and for wine, and for oil, and for the young of the flock and of the herd: and their soul shall be as a watered garden; and they shall not sorrow any more at all. 
Then shall the virgin rejoice in the dance, both young men and old together: for I will turn their mourning into joy, and will comfort them, and make them rejoice from their sorrow. 
And I will satiate the soul of the priests with fatness, and my people shall be satisfied with my goodness, saith the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD; A voice was heard in Ramah, lamentation, and bitter weeping; Rahel weeping for her children ref
1029,s. 
And it came to pass, as the ark of the covenant of the LORD came to the city of David, that Michal, the daughter of Saul looking out at a window saw king David dancing and playing: and she despised him in her heart. 
So they brought the ark of God, and set it in the midst of the tent that David had pitched for it: and they offered burnt sacrifices and peace offerings before God. 
And when David had made an end of offering the burnt offerings and the peace offerings, he blessed the people in the name of the LORD. 
And he dealt to every one of Israel, both man and woman, to every one a loaf of bread, and a good piece of flesh, and a flagon of wine. 
And he appointed certain of the Levites to minister before the ark of the LORD, and to record, and to thank and praise the LORD God of Israel: 
Asaph the chief, and next to him Zechariah, Jeiel, and Shemiramoth, and Jehiel, and Mattithiah, and Eliab, and Benaiah, and Obededom: and Jeiel with psalteries and with harps; but Asaph made a sound with cymbals; 
Benaiah als
902,d time by my servants the prophets of Israel, which prophesied in those days many years that I would bring thee against them? 
And it shall come to pass at the same time when Gog shall come against the land of Israel, saith the Lord GOD, that my fury shall come up in my face. 
For in my jealousy and in the fire of my wrath have I spoken, Surely in that day there shall be a great shaking in the land of Israel; 
So that the fishes of the sea, and the fowls of the heaven, and the beasts of the field, and all creeping things that creep upon the earth, and all the men that are upon the face of the earth, shall shake at my presence, and the mountains shall be thrown down, and the steep places shall fall, and every wall shall fall to the ground. 
And I will call for a sword against him throughout all my mountains, saith the Lord GOD: every man's sword shall be against his brother. 
And I will ple
900,l live in his sight. 
Then shall we know, if we follow on to know the LORD: his going forth is prepared as the morning; and he shall come unto us as the rain, as the latter and former rain unto the earth. 
O Ephraim, what shall I do unto thee? O Judah, what shall I do unto thee? for your goodness is as a morning cloud, and as the early dew it goeth away. 
Therefore have I hewed them by the prophets; I have slain them by the words of my mouth: and thy judgments are as the light that goeth forth. 
For I desired mercy, and not sacrifice; and the knowledge of God more than burnt offerings. 
But they like men have transgressed the covenant: there have they dealt treacherously against me. 
Gilead is a city of them that work iniquity, and is polluted with blood. 
And as troops of robbers wait for a man, so the company of priests murder in the way by consent: for they commit lewdness. 
I have se
1032,went up into the mount, having the two tables in mine hand. 
And he wrote on the tables, according to the first writing, the ten commandments, which the LORD spake unto you in the mount out of the midst of the fire in the day of the assembly: and the LORD gave them unto me. 
And I turned myself and came down from the mount, and put the tables in the ark which I had made; and there they be, as the LORD commanded me. 
And the children of Israel took their journey from Beeroth of the children of Jaakan to Mosera: there Aaron died, and there he was buried; and Eleazar his son ministered in the priest's office in his stead. 
From thence they journeyed unto Gudgodah; and from Gudgodah to Jotbath, a land of rivers of waters. 
At that time the LORD separated the tribe of Levi, to bear the ark of the covenant of the LORD, to stand before the LORD to minister unto him, and to bless in his name, unto this day. 
Wherefore Levi hath no part nor inheritance with his brethren; the LORD is his inheritance, according as the LORD thy 
802, of the children of Ammon. 
And she said unto her father, Let this thing be done for me: let me alone two months, that I may go up and down upon the mountains, and bewail my virginity, I and my fellows. 
And he said, Go. And he sent her away for two months: and she went with her companions, and bewailed her virginity upon the mountains. 
And it came to pass at the end of two months, that she returned unto her father, who did with her according to his vow which he had vowed: and she knew no man. And it was a custom in Israel, 
That the daughters of Israel went yearly to lament the daughter of Jephthah the Gileadite four days in a year. 
And the men of Ephraim gathered themselves together, and went northward, and said unto Jephthah, Wherefore passedst thou over to fight against the children of
997, the kings of the country which Joshua and the children of Israel smote on this side Jordan on the west, from Baalgad in the valley of Lebanon even unto the mount Halak, that goeth up to Seir; which Joshua gave unto the tribes of Israel for a possession according to their divisions; 
In the mountains, and in the valleys, and in the plains, and in the springs, and in the wilderness, and in the south country; the Hittites, the Amorites, and the Canaanites, the Perizzites, the Hivites, and the Jebusites: 
The king of Jericho, one; the king of Ai, which is beside Bethel, one; 
The king of Jerusalem, one; the king of Hebron, one; 
The king of Jarmuth, one; the king of Lachish, one; 
The king of Eglon, one; the king of Gezer, one; 
The king of Debir, one; the king of Geder, one; 
The king of Hormah, one; the king of Arad, one; 
The king of Libnah, one; the king of Adullam, one; 
The king of Makkedah, one; the king of Bethel, one; 
The king of Tappuah, one; the king of Hepher, one; 
The ki
828,
And when they had stripped him, they took his head, and his armour, and sent into the land of the Philistines round about, to carry tidings unto their idols, and to the people. 
And they put his armour in the house of their gods, and fastened his head in the temple of Dagon. 
And when all Jabeshgilead heard all that the Philistines had done to Saul, 
They arose, all the valiant men, and took away the body of Saul, and the bodies of his sons, and brought them to Jabesh, and buried their bones under the oak in Jabesh, and fasted seven days. 
So Saul died for his transgression which he committed against the LORD, even against the word of the LORD, which he kept not, and also for asking counsel of one that had a familiar spirit, to enquire of it; 
And enquired not of the LORD: therefore he slew him, and turned the kingd
887, the other on the left; and called the name of that on the right hand Jachin, and the name of that on the left Boaz. 
Moreover he made an altar of brass, twenty cubits the length thereof, and twenty cubits the breadth thereof, and ten cubits the height thereof. 
Also he made a molten sea of ten cubits from brim to brim, round in compass, and five cubits the height thereof; and a line of thirty cubits did compass it round about. 
And under it was the similitude of oxen, which did compass it round about: ten in a cubit, compassing the sea round about. Two rows of oxen were cast, when it was cast. 
It stood upon twelve oxen, three looking toward the north, and three looking toward the west, and three looking toward the south, and three looking toward the east: and the sea was set above upon them, and all their hinder parts were inward. 
And the thickness of it was an handbreadt
872,o wash his feet with tears, and did wipe them with the hairs of her head, and kissed his feet, and anointed them with the ointment. 
Now when the Pharisee which had bidden him saw it, he spake within himself, saying, This man, if he were a prophet, would have known who and what manner of woman this is that toucheth him: for she is a sinner. 
And Jesus answering said unto him, Simon, I have somewhat to say unto thee. And he saith, Master, say on. 
There was a certain creditor which had two debtors: the one owed five hundred pence, and the other fifty. 
And when they had nothing to pay, he frankly forgave them both. Tell me therefore, which of them will love him most? 
Simon answered and said, I suppose that he, to whom he forgave most. And he said unto him, Thou hast rightly judged. 
And he turned to the woman, and said unto Simon, Seest thou this woman? I ente
1041,ters of Merom, to fight against Israel. 
And the LORD said unto Joshua, Be not afraid because of them: for to morrow about this time will I deliver them up all slain before Israel: thou shalt hough their horses, and burn their chariots with fire. 
So Joshua came, and all the people of war with him, against them by the waters of Merom suddenly; and they fell upon them. 
And the LORD delivered them into the hand of Israel, who smote them, and chased them unto great Zidon, and unto Misrephothmaim, and unto the valley of Mizpeh eastward; and they smote them, until they left them none remaining. 
And Joshua did unto them as the LORD bade him: he houghed their horses, and burnt their chariots with fire. 
And Joshua at that time turned back, and took Hazor, and smote the king thereof with the sword: for Hazor beforetime was the head of all those kingdoms. 
And they smote all the souls that were therein with the edge of the sword, utterly destroying them: there was not any left to breathe: and he burnt Hazor with fire. 
And all the c
1057,to come, saying, What mean these stones? 
Then ye shall let your children know, saying, Israel came over this Jordan on dry land. 
For the LORD your God dried up the waters of Jordan from before you, until ye were passed over, as the LORD your God did to the Red sea, which he dried up from before us, until we were gone over: 
That all the people of the earth might know the hand of the LORD, that it is mighty: that ye might fear the LORD your God for ever. 
And it came to pass, when all the kings of the Amorites, which were on the side of Jordan westward, and all the kings of the Canaanites, which were by the sea, heard that the LORD had dried up the waters of Jordan from before the children of Israel, until we were passed over, that their heart melted, neither was there spirit in them any more, because of the children of Israel. 
At that time the LORD said unto Joshua, Make thee sharp knives, and circumcise again the children of Israel the second time. 
And Joshua made him sharp knives, and circumcised the children of Israel at the hill of t
1071,lah. 
I would hasten my escape from the windy storm and tempest. 
Destroy, O Lord, and divide their tongues: for I have seen violence and strife in the city. 
Day and night they go about it upon the walls thereof: mischief also and sorrow are in the midst of it. 
Wickedness is in the midst thereof: deceit and guile depart not from her streets. 
For it was not an enemy that reproached me; then I could have borne it: neither was it he that hated me that did magnify himself against me; then I would have hid myself from him: 
But it was thou, a man mine equal, my guide, and mine acquaintance. 
We took sweet counsel together, and walked unto the house of God in company. 
Let death seize upon them, and let them go down quick into hell: for wickedness is in their dwellings, and among them. 
As for me, I will call upon God; and the LORD shall save me. 
Evening, and morning, and at noon, will I pray, and cry aloud: and he shall hear my voice. 
He hath delivered my soul in peace from the battle that was against me: for there were many with me. 
God shall hear, and 
862,arose Ezra, and made the chief priests, the Levites, and all Israel, to swear that they should do according to this word. And they sware. 
Then Ezra rose up from before the house of God, and went into the chamber of Johanan the son of Eliashib: and when he came thither, he did eat no bread, nor drink water: for he mourned because of the transgression of them that had been carried away. 
And they made proclamation throughout Judah and Jerusalem unto all the children of the captivity, that they should gather themselves together unto Jerusalem; 
And that whosoever would not come within three days, according to the counsel of the princes and the elders, all his substance should be forfeited, and himself separated from the congregation of those that had been carried away. 
Then all the men of Judah and Benjamin gathered themselves together unto Jerusalem 
760, it was a very great company. 
And they came to the threshingfloor of Atad, which is beyond Jordan, and there they mourned with a great and very sore lamentation: and he made a mourning for his father seven days. 
And when the inhabitants of the land, the Canaanites, saw the mourning in the floor of Atad, they said, This is a grievous mourning to the Egyptians: wherefore the name of it was called Abelmizraim, which is beyond Jordan. 
And his sons did unto him according as he commanded them: 
For his sons carried him into the land of Canaan, and buried him in the cave of the field of Machpelah, which Abraham bought with the field for a possession of a buryingplace of Ephron the Hittite, before Mamre. 
And Joseph returned into Egypt, he, and his brethr
851,; and unto God the things that are God's. 
When they had heard these words, they marvelled, and left him, and went their way. 
The same day came to him the Sadducees, which say that there is no resurrection, and asked him, 
Saying, Master, Moses said, If a man die, having no children, his brother shall marry his wife, and raise up seed unto his brother. 
Now there were with us seven brethren: and the first, when he had married a wife, deceased, and, having no issue, left his wife unto his brother: 
Likewise the second also, and the third, unto the seventh. 
And last of all the woman died also. 
Therefore in the resurrection whose wife shall she be of the seven? for they all had her. 
Jesus answered and said unto them, Ye do err, not knowing the scriptures, nor the power of God. 
For in the resurrection they neither marry, nor are given in 
1028, the going down thereof. 
Out of Zion, the perfection of beauty, God hath shined. 
Our God shall come, and shall not keep silence: a fire shall devour before him, and it shall be very tempestuous round about him. 
He shall call to the heavens from above, and to the earth, that he may judge his people. 
Gather my saints together unto me; those that have made a covenant with me by sacrifice. 
And the heavens shall declare his righteousness: for God is judge himself. Selah. 
Hear, O my people, and I will speak; O Israel, and I will testify against thee: I am God, even thy God. 
I will not reprove thee for thy sacrifices or thy burnt offerings, to have been continually before me. 
I will take no bullock out of thy house, nor he goats out of thy folds. 
For every beast of the forest is mine, and the cattle upon a thousand hills. 
I know all the fowls of the mountains: and the wild beasts of the field are mine. 
If I were hungry, I would not tell thee: for the world is mine, and the fulness thereof. 
Will I eat the fle
907,Jesus saw that the people came running together, he rebuked the foul spirit, saying unto him, Thou dumb and deaf spirit, I charge thee, come out of him, and enter no more into him. 
And the spirit cried, and rent him sore, and came out of him: and he was as one dead; insomuch that many said, He is dead. 
But Jesus took him by the hand, and lifted him up; and he arose. 
And when he was come into the house, his disciples asked him privately, Why could not we cast him out? 
And he said unto them, This kind can come forth by nothing, but by prayer and fasting. 
And they departed thence, and passed through Galilee; and he would not that any man should know it. 
For he taught his disciples, and said unto them, The Son of man is delivered into the hands of men, and they shall kill him; and after that he is killed, he shall rise the third day. 
But they understood not that saying, and were afraid to as
